If they feel so moved, they can practice it, too.
That's the way the Buddha taught, and there hasn't been any improvement on it since.
So there's nothing wrong with having a goal.
As the Buddha said, the anguish that comes from realizing that you haven't reached your goal is much better than the pleasure that comes from indulging in sensual pleasures.
He talks about worldly or householder grief and renunciate grief.
Householder joy and renunciate joy.
Householder equanimity and renunciate equanimity.
Householder grief is realizing that you'd like to have pleasant sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile sensations, and ideas, but you've got unpleasant ones.
For most people, the antidote to that is to find pleasant ones, i.e., householder joy.
But that's not the path the Buddha recommends.
He recommends that if you have householder grief, try to replace it with renunciate grief.
In other words, even though things are uncomfortable outside, that's not the real problem.
The real problem is that you haven't found a deathless happiness inside.
The grief that comes when you reflect on the fact that you haven't reached the deathless yet motivates you in the right direction: to follow the path leading to renunciate joy.
That's the joy that comes when you realize that the qualities you've developed inside really have led to Awakening.
From there you go to renunciate equanimity, the peace of mind that comes when you've attained your goal.
People often have immature attitudes about goals, which is why some teachers say to drop all idea of goals when you meditate.
That may be a useful attitude for short-term meditation, but for the long term it leads to experienced meditators whose experience of meditation is of going nowhere, and who develop a perverse pride around their nowhere as well.
The long-term solution is to develop a mature attitude toward your goal, one that realizes that even though the path may take time, you can take comfort in the fact that it's a good path and it's headed in the right direction.
This is the mature kind of attitude that really does yield results.
There is a deathless happiness, and it can be found through your efforts.
Don't let anyone else tell you otherwise.
When you first look at a teaching like dependent co-arising, it seems very abstract and very far away from anything you might be doing in the practice.
But if you look at it more carefully, you see that it makes a whole series of important statements that have an immediate bearing on what you're doing right here.
To begin with, when the Buddha talks about the causes of suffering, he doesn't trace it back to what you are.
He doesn't say you suffer because you're basically bad, or because you're basically good but somehow have been socially conditioned to forget your true inner goodness.
He comes back instead to what you do.
That right there is a radical statement, and it opens huge possibilities.
It's hard to change what you are, but you can change your actions simply through knowledge, through understanding which things you do are going to cause suffering, which states of mind lead to suffering.
You can look for those and you can change them.
To the extent the Buddha does talk about what you are, it's far along the path of dependent co-arising, way up there in what's called bhava or becoming.
It's not a question of what you inherently are, good or bad.
Very simply, your being comes about from what you do.
That's the reverse of the way most of us think.
Most of us think that our basic nature is a certain way, and we act in certain ways because of our basic nature.
The Buddha says instead that what you are — in the sense of how you identify yourself on a sensual level, on the level of form, or on a formless level — can be traced back to what you do.
You can learn to do things in a more skillful way, which will lead to a change in your sense of what you are, and that in turn will be less and less likely to cause suffering.
This is why the Buddha's teaching is a training, because the kind of ignorance it's meant to overcome is not an ignorance of what you are; it's simply a practical ignorance of which kinds of actions work for true happiness and which kinds don't.
That's the basic principle of the four noble truths.
Each of the knowledges in the four noble truths deals with a task that you develop as a skill.
That in and of itself is another important statement.
If the ignorance at the root of the problem were simply a matter of not knowing your true nature, it would be an all-or-nothing sort of thing.
You'd know it or you wouldn't.
But skills can be developed gradually.
Your sensitivity develops, your dexterity at shaping things more skillfully, more appropriately, develops over time.
So the path overcoming this practical ignorance isn't a sudden, all-or-nothing sort of path.
It's a gradual path, a gradual training, in gaining more and more skill.
It's in this way that the teachings of dependent co-arising are directly connected to what you're doing right now.
You're focusing on your breath.
You're directing your thoughts to the breath and evaluating the breath.
You use certain perceptions, and certain feelings get involved.
These are all elements in the factor of fabrication, which comes right after ignorance.
We breathe ignorantly.
We perceive things through ignorance.
Our thoughts about things, the way we evaluate things, and our use of language generally are done with ignorance.
As a result, we suffer.
But if you bring knowledge to these processes, they can actually become a healing kind of fabrication.
After all, the path is a path of fabrication.
The Buddha doesn't tell you just to drop all activity at once, to be totally passive or totally devoid of any kind of intention.
We hear that the goal at the end of the path is to be free from fabrication, so we think we'll just stop fabricating and that should get us there.
But the mind can't do that.
The path doesn't work that way.
The intention to stop fabricating is itself an intention.
You can get very much attached to that kind of passivity and still be stuck with all your problems.
So instead we bring more and more knowledge to the process of breathing and how we use our thoughts around the process of breathing.
Sometimes you hear that our thinking, which is based a lot on language, is the reason why we suffer, that we picked up these bad social influences that taught us to think in dualistic terms or whatever, so we've got to drop language entirely.
But again, that's not the Buddha's approach.
He says that if you use language in ignorance, you're going to suffer.
But the problem is not with language; it's with the ignorance.
I was talking to a Hindu monk a while back, and he told me his response to someone who came up to him and asked, “How can we get beyond duality?” His response was: “What's wrong with duality?
You're talking to me, aren't you?” Language is useful because it makes distinctions.
If you couldn't make distinctions, how could we communicate?
What would our language be like?
It would be like speaking in tongues at a Pentecostal Church: booah!
Who knows what it means?
It doesn't mean anything, or could mean everything, which is a totally useless language.
The mind has to make distinctions.
We feel distinctions.
We have a sense of right and wrong not simply because we're taught them by society.
It's a deeply ingrained habit that comes from our sense that some things are painful and some things are not, and you've got to do something about the things that are painful.
This goes deep into our sense of feeling and perception, mental fabrications that are often pre-linguistic.
Deep down inside, we know that anything that threatens our existence is bad, anything that helps it is good.
Even lizards know this much.
That's why it's embedded in the lizard brain, a very strong sense of lizard good and lizard bad.
The hatred of pain, the love of pleasure, the ability to perceive an enemy, to perceive an escape from an enemy: These are really basic to the mind, much prior to any kind of social conditioning.
Our social conditioning, our more refined uses of language, are actually needed to mitigate some of those lizard fears and knee-jerk judgments.
So instead of throwing out language or throwing out our social conditioning, we learn how to use them more skillfully.
And working with the breath is an ideal place to start.
You give space to the mind by breathing in a way that feels good.
You can use your linguistic habits to talk to yourself about the breath: How does this breath feel?
How does that breath feel?
Where would it feel good to breathe right now?
Which part of the body needs a larger dose of good breath energy?
In this way you get more and more in touch with the immediate feeling of your body so that your linguistic habits can show immediate benefits.
It feels good to breathe this way.
It feels good to breathe that way.
Your mind and your body are getting more intimate so that all the levels of fabrication — physical, verbal, and mental — start working together around a common sense of wellbeing.
In this way they get to communicate with one another.
The process of focusing on the breath in a skillful way is really a healing process.
Each time you sit down to meditate, don't think of it as a chore.
Think of it as an opportunity to do some more healing work.
And don't think of it as a time when you're obliged to stop thinking.
In the beginning, you have to use directed thought and evaluation to get things to settle down, to adjust things, to get everybody together.
And when everyone is together like this, interesting things come up.
Hidden feelings, hidden perceptions suddenly show themselves.
And you can work through them.
It's almost like dealing with a person who's possessed.
The possessed person from the point of view of Western psychology is a schizophrenic: There are two different personalities in the one person.
From a more traditional perspective, there really are two different people in there.
The problem is that they're not cooperating.
They're working at cross purposes.
If they can learn to cooperate, there's no problem.
Who cares whether there are two or twenty people in there?
If they get along, the problem is gone.
That's how Ajaan Fuang approached cases of spirit possession.
Instead of driving out the spirit, he'd negotiate with it, so that it would stop interfering in the possessed person's life.
We have the same sort of problem even though we may seem normal.
Our directed thoughts and evaluations tend to work at cross purposes.
The way we feel and our different perceptions can be running off in every direction at once.
This is why we have to meditate.
To work with the breath is to create a space where all the different parts of the mind — all the different members of the committee, all the different levels of sensation and activity going on — learn how to be with one another in a peaceful spot, working on a common goal.
You're showing goodwill for one another because you're cooperating.
In that way, interesting things come up and you can deal with them.
You can learn new habits in how you relate to your body, new habits in how you think, how you frame an issue in the mind, and how you work through the difficulties in whatever issues you encounter.
When you learn how to deal with all the parts of yourself in a healthy way like this, it's a lot easier then to start dealing in a healthy way with other people, too.
So the breath meditation not only helps you.
It also helps everybody else you live with, because it gives you paradigms.
For one thing, it gives you immediate training in how to employ the brahma-viharas, the sublime attitudes of limitless goodwill, limitless compassion, limitless empathetic joy, limitless equanimity.
In other words, you start out with goodwill for yourself, allowing yourself to breathe in a comfortable way.
When you see that your breathing is uncomfortable, or that the way you think is causing dis-ease in the body or the mind, you have compassion for yourself: “Let's try to figure out a better way to do this.” When it's going well, you don't start feeding on the idea that you're not worthy of this, or that you really shouldn't allow yourself to feel this good.
You try to maintain that sense of wellbeing.
Appreciate it.
Let the ideas of deserving and not deserving just go by the boards.
Again, those attitudes are usually based on an idea of what you are deep down inside, that you're the sort of person who deserves to be punished for things you did in the past.
That's not how the Buddha's teachings work.
Different actions will inevitably lead to different results.
There's no question of anyone deserving to suffer.
So if you're able to maintain a sense of wellbeing, keep at it.
If you're operating from a stable sense of wellbeing, you're going to start acting in more skillful ways all around.
And then there's equanimity for the things that you can't change, the bad habits you aren't able to fully eradicate, or the problems that come in from past kamma that you can't alter.
The purpose of equanimity is to keep you focused on the things you can change, so that you don't waste energy focusing on the things you can't.
In this way, as the members of your committee work together on the breath in a skillful way, you're gaining some training in what are essentially social virtues, the brahmaviharas.
Then you can apply the same lessons to your dealings with people around you.
So instead of being a process of lobotomizing the mind so that you don't think, meditation is actually training in learning how to think in more skillful ways, how to act in more skillful ways — with knowledge, with an understanding of actions and their results.
In particular, it's training in learning how to distinguish the types of activities in the mind that would cause a particular situation to produce suffering or not.
In the course of this training, the question of who you are gets put aside.
The question of who you've been gets put aside.
You can focus purely on what you're doing, what you can do to train yourself to be more sensitive and more effective in bringing about an end to suffering, and what you can do to master activities that lead more and more to true happiness.
After all, the issue is not what you are, it's what you do.
And if what you do is not skillful, you can learn to make it more skillful with each in-and-out breath.
Those are some of the lessons that you can derive from what seems like a very abstract teaching on dependent co-arising.
It is abstract.
It's put out as a list and it's a very convoluted one.
As the Buddha himself admitted, it's not simple.
It's like a tangled bird's nest, he said, or a knotted ball of string.
But you can pull on a few strands, pull out a few of the twigs, and you find that even the individual strands and twigs are really helpful in putting an end to suffering, teaching you how to think and act and even breathe in ways that can bring suffering to an end.
There's a school of thought that says each present moment is so new and so unpredictable that you shouldn't bring any preconceived notions from the past to apply to it.
Any conditions you pick up from the past obscure the freshness of the present moment, so your duty as a meditator is to be totally present in an unmediated way to the raw data of the senses.
By allowing yourself to be fully immersed in the raw data of the present moment, you'll instinctively know the proper response.
There are no rules.
All bets are off as to what's going to be the appropriate response to any particular moment, any particular situation.
That school of thought leaves you pretty high and dry when things get difficult.
It throws you into the present moment with no lifesaver at all.
Fortunately, that's not how the Buddha taught.
The Buddha said that there's a regularity to the way things happen.
That's how he describes dependent co-arising: “this regularity of the Dhamma.” He doesn't say that everything is predetermined from the past, or that by knowing the past you'll be able to predict what's going to happen in the present or on into the future.
He simply says that there's a regularity to the way things are shaped in your experience, and certain things tend to be the shaping factors.
In one analysis of dependent co-arising, he describes these factors as name and form on the one hand, and consciousness on the other.
These two influence each other.
Form is the form of the body.
For example, you're sitting here right now with the form of the body, your sense of the body, how it feels from within.
That sense of form is made up of solidity, warmth, liquid sensations, and energy: the four elements or four properties.
As for name, it includes feeling, perception, attention, intention, and contact.
Consciousness, he says, lands on these factors of name and form, and then things proliferate out of that.
Under the heading of name, the two most important factors are intention and attention.
Other ways of describing dependent co-arising draw out this importance.
Sometimes, prior to name and form, they list fabrication, sankhara, which is the intentional element in experience — whether physical, verbal, or mental.
Physical or bodily fabrication is the breath, the intentional element in how you sense the breath, how you create the experience of the breath.
Verbal fabrication is directed thought and evaluation, which includes an intentional element.
Mental fabrication is feeling and perception.
There's an intentional element there as well.
So the intention is what's important, and it plays itself out in feeling, perception, and form.
Prior to fabrication comes ignorance.
Ignorance means not seeing things in terms of the four noble truths — in other words, applying inappropriate attention.
When you look at things in an inappropriate way, you frame issues in an inappropriate way, which means that your fabrications are going to lead to suffering.
All the other elements of name and form and consciousness will tend toward suffering and stress as well.
But you can change that way of attending to things.
You can look at things in terms of the four noble truths: Where is the stress, what are you doing to cause it, where is there freedom from stress, and what kind of actions lead to that freedom?
When you look in these terms, then the fabrications of your intentions go in a different direction; name and form and consciousness, all the other factors of your experience, go in a different direction: toward the end of suffering.
This is the regularity of the Dhamma.
We tend to think of dependent co-arising as an extremely complex and abstruse teaching, and as the Buddha pointed out it is complex; it's not easy.
Still, it does give us guidance in how to approach each present moment, where to look, how to look.
One of the interesting things about dependent co-arising is that all these factors come prior to sensory contact.
Even before you see sights, listen to sounds, and so forth, there's an intentional element already in play.
You have an agenda: what you're looking for, how you're going to look at things.
You bring that to each present moment.
So it's important to bring the right way of framing issues, framing questions, to everything you sense.
Remember this as you practice.
These are the important elements: intention and attention.
Everything else springs from there.
When things come up in the present moment, how do you look at them?
Try to look at them simply in terms of stress and lack of stress.
Which intentions and ways of attending to things lead to stress; which ones bring it to an end?
Try to put aside any ideas of yourself or what lies outside of yourself.
Put aside questions of what lies behind all of this.
Just look at things as they're directly experienced as stress.
This is a mode of perception that's important to develop.
The Buddha calls this mode “emptiness”: seeing what's present or what's not present — particularly, present or not present in terms of stress or disturbance.
That's where the big issue lies, and your duties as a meditator come from looking at these things in this way.
If you see stress, you try to comprehend it.
To do that, you need to develop certain qualities of mind: That's the path.
You need to put the mind in a position where it really can look at stress coming and going, and not feel threatened by it, especially when the stress is really painful, really burdensome.
Our normal reaction when we feel stress and strain is to say, “This is happening to me.” And when something bad happens to you, there's a different set of imperatives.
The imperative is to get rid of it, to get it out of the range of what you identify as “me.” But if you can pull out of that sense of “me” surrounding your experience and simply look at the stress happening right here, right now — from a position of wellbeing, the wellbeing that comes from right concentration — then the imperatives are different.
The imperative is to understand the stress, to see what's causing it, and then to abandon the cause.
This is why we practice right concentration: to put the mind in a good position to see things clearly and carry out its appropriate duties.
Actually, when the mind is in right concentration you're standing where the Buddha stood when he discovered all of these things.
It's from this point of view that you can see: “This is the intention; this is the act of attention; this is the stress; this is the cause of stress.” You can see them clearly because you're looking at them from the right spot.
Years back I went on a camping trip to Powell Point, which is the southern tip of a plateau in Utah, over, feet in elevation.
The guidebook said that you could see a good third of southern Utah from that spot.
We thought we were following the right directions, but we made a wrong turn and ended up in an outlook over Henderson Canyon.
Still, we thought we were at Powell Point.
The book said the road would end and then from there you had to walk out on a point.
Well, we found a point that we could walk out to.
From there, the book said, you could look out and see this, that, and the other thing.
So we identified the sights: This was this, that was that, and this was the other thing.
But then there was a huge plateau looming up to our east, which wasn't mentioned in the book at all.
Only after a good while did we realize that that was Powell Point.
We had made a wrong turn.
We were standing somewhere else.
So, the next day we made our way up to Powell Point, and then we saw what the guide book was actually referring to.
We realized that the this, that, and the other thing were not the this, that, and the other thing we thought we saw yesterday.
We had labeled things wrong because we were standing in the wrong place.
If you want to understand what the Buddha is talking about, you have to put yourself here, right at the present moment, where the mind is immersed in the form, the breath energy, of the body.
That's where the Buddha stood.
If there's going to be any directed thought and evaluation, relate it to the breath.
Any feelings and perceptions will be the feelings and perceptions of a mind really focused on the breath.
As the mind gets more and more still, those fabrications fall away.
Directed thoughts and evaluations fall away.
The movement of the breath falls away.
All you have is a still breath energy filling the body, a clear, bright awareness filling the body.
That's Powell Point.
From there you can see the Henry Mountains, you can see the Escalante region, you can see Bryce Canyon, the way they're described in the book.
In other words, from this point you can see stress, and you're in a position where you can really comprehend it because you don't feel so threatened by it.
You're not compelled by your old imperative, which was to get rid of it.
You attend to things in the right way.
You see things simply in terms of stress, its cause, the path leading to its ending, and its ending.
This is the framework you're supposed to bring to each present moment.
In other words, you see things in terms of the four noble truths, and your intention is to perform the duties appropriate to each.
When you develop that intention, it's bound to lead you to the end of all suffering and stress.
So this is the regularity of the Dhamma.
You may not be able to bring purely appropriate attention to every moment of your life, but you can get used to looking at each moment in terms of identifying your intention and examining how you frame the events of your life.
Do the narratives get in the way of your seeing things in terms of skillful and unskillful intentions?
Or do they actually help?
You should approach each situation with these thoughts in mind: Where is the stress here?
What can you do to at least minimize the stress, the harm, the disturbance, whatever is a burden for you or the people around you?
This way you come to each present moment armed with a knowledge of the regularity of the Dhamma: where you should focus your attention, and what the main priority should be — which is to keep on the path.
In this way the Buddha doesn't leave you high and dry, for no matter what the situation, this is how to look at it: in terms of the four noble truths.
Your intention should be to try to comprehend the suffering, the stress, wherever it may be in that moment, and to develop the factors that will enable you to comprehend suffering.
You may have other issues — for example, when you're dealing with people, it's very different from sitting here with your eyes closed — but your basic framework can be the same.
Once you've got this framework firmly in mind, you can go wherever you want and deal with any situation that confronts you, because you're working from a framework that instead of leading to more suffering and stress, actually helps bring them to an end.
And that way, whatever the situation, you're on the path.
The ability to keep all this in mind is mindfulness.
That, combined with appropriate attention and the right intention, is what turns each moment into a moment of the practice, regardless of the situation.
So this is how the complexity of dependent co-arising gives you tools for the present moment, tools that you can use for the sake of your own wellbeing and the wellbeing of all the people around you.
Each moment may be new, but it follows a pattern.
Always keep that pattern in mind.

An essential aspect of Buddhist practice is that we have to learn how to make use of things we'll eventually have to learn how to let go of.
We know that at some point the practice involves letting go of desire.
But we need to cultivate skillful desire to get to that point.
Ultimately the practice leads to the total end of fabrication, but the noble eightfold path is a type of fabrication.
As the Buddha once said, it's the ultimate level of fabrication.
In fact when you look at the factors of the path you realize that they're made up of the aggregates: form, feeling, perception, fabrication, consciousness.
These all have to play a role in the path, which means we have to learn how to change our attitude toward the aggregates.
Instead of just clinging to them as us or ours, we learn how to use them as elements in the path.
The important point here is to realize that these things have to be used in a skillful way.
When you come to the path, it's useful to reflect on skills you've developed in the past — as an artist, a cook, a carpenter, or a musician.
Whatever skills you've worked on in the past, it's good to reflect on how you became skillful, and particularly how you learned how to deal with mistakes.
Learning from your mistakes is essential to developing any kind of skill.
It's expected that you're going to make mistakes.
The teacher tries to help you avoid the really unnecessary ones by pointing them out in advance.
In other words, some mistakes are more avoidable than others.
But a large part of the practice lies in learning how to learn from your mistakes and not get knocked off course by them.
We all like to hear that there's a stage in the practice when you finally attain a certain level of awareness, a certain level of insight, and it's guaranteed that from that point on nothing you might do would be a mistake.
You may have heard about the “choicelessness” of the path: You finally get on the path and realize that there's only one thing to do.
If you just do what the path tells you to do, or what seems right at any one time, you're guaranteed that there will be no mistakes.
But that's not the way it works.
Even arahants make mistakes.
Their virtues in terms of the basics of a virtuous life — the five precepts — are unshakeable.
They don't make those mistakes any more, but simple mistakes in saying the wrong thing to the wrong person: That's human.
It has nothing to do with defilements of the mind.
It's simply the fact that we're human beings with limitations.
What's different about arahants is that they continue to learn from their mistakes.
They don't get knocked off course by them because they have no conceit that's going to be challenged by the mistake, destroyed by the mistake, or feel threatened by the mistake.
But for those of us on the path, that's an issue we still have to deal with: this issue of conceit, our narcissism.
We don't like the thought of having to make mistakes, but there's no other way we're going to learn.
This is why the Buddha gives so many instructions on how to learn from your mistakes, how to deal with a mistake so that it actually becomes an important element in the path.
There are the instructions to Rahula: When you realize you've done something that's been harmful, you resolve not to repeat it.
You also go talk it over with other people who are on the path to see what insight you can gain from them.
In other words, you admit the mistake, you learn how to recognize it, and that involves developing a certain amount of perceptiveness right there.
And as for learning from the counsel of others: We sometimes assume that the Buddha's instructions to the Kalamas tell you to go by your own sense of right and wrong.
But in fact, if you look carefully at his words, you realize that this assumption has nothing to do with what the Buddha actually said.
He said that you can't go totally on the instructions of others, but you can't go on your own preconceived ideas about what's right and wrong, either.
You have to look at what you're doing, along with the results of what you're doing and what you've done.
Then learn to recognize when you've caused harm and when you haven't.
At the same time, you take into consideration the counsel of the wise.
That, of course, requires you to learn how to recognize who's wise and who's not.
So in one way it does throw the whole issue back on you, but it's not that you have to totally reinvent the Dhamma wheel as you practice.
There is guidance, and when you learn how to make the best use of guidance, it gives you quite a leg up.
There's another passage where a student of the Jains comes to the Buddha.
The Jains were teaching that whoever kills, steals, has illicit sex, tells lies, or takes intoxicants is going to go to hell.
This person wanted to know what the Buddha had to say about that, and the Buddha replied that if you hear that teaching and you realize you've done these things in the past, that pretty much consigns you to hell right there; it makes things hopeless.
This is why the Buddha taught in a different way.
He taught that these activities are unwise.
They should be avoided because they cause harm.
You look at what you've done and you realize you've made mistakes like this.
So what's the proper attitude to develop toward those mistakes?
It's to resolve not to do them again.
At the same time, you realize that if you let yourself get tied up in remorse about your past mistakes, it's not going to undo the old mistake and it's going to make it less likely that you're going to do well in the future — because remorse saps your strength.
The proper attitude is to learn how to recognize a mistake and simply resolve, “I'm not going to repeat it.
The next step is to develop the sublime attitudes: limitless goodwill, limitless compassion, limitless empathetic joy, limitless equanimity.
Learn how to cultivate these emotions, because they help keep you on the right track, strengthen your resolve not to be harmful, and also teach you where your limitations are: what you can do, what you can't do in terms of correcting the situation within yourself and the world around you.
Again, these attitudes, too, are fabrications.
It's not that our nature is innately kind or innately bad.
These attitudes are things you have to learn how to cultivate.
They're fabrications.
So what happens when you come up against some ill will inside you, some resentment, or an inability to accept the situation as it is?
When you look at that emotion, you realize it's composed of all the different elements of fabrication.
There's the way you breathe.
There are the directed thoughts: the way you direct your thinking around that topic.
There's the way you evaluate what's happening, and there are also your feelings and perceptions about what's happening.
These are all the elements of fabrication that go into any thought, any emotion.
So, to begin with, you want to learn how to take your unskillful emotions apart.
When you find yourself thinking in an unskillful way, when an unskillful emotion comes up with regard either to yourself or somebody else, ask yourself, “What kind of breathing is going on here?
How does the breathing affect that emotion?
What if I were to make the breath more skillful — making it smooth, making it full, making it restful: Will that help get the body out of the grip of the emotion?
Then look at how you're thinking about the issue.
Is there some way you could change your thoughts about the issue?
Look at it from a different perspective.
A lot of the Buddha's teachings, say, on anger, are just that.
Look at the situation from another angle.
Look at the good in the people who make you angry.
After all, you need their good as much as they do.
If all you can see are the bad traits of other people, it's like being in a desert: You're hot, tired, trembling, thirsty, and the goodness of other people is like water.
You're not in some Olympian position where you can look down on the human race and say, “Well, they're bad, and these people are bad, and those people are bad,” and it doesn't affect you at all.
It does affect you to be constantly focusing on other people's bad habits.
It's like that New Yorker cartoon of the two female poodles sitting at a bar with grim, sneering looks on their faces, saying, “They're all sons of bitches.” When everyone is a son of a bitch, what does that make you?
So try to think about the situation in a way that helps you realize that you need the water of their goodness.
This waters the goodness of your own heart, this change in the element of perception along with directed thought and evaluation.
As for the feelings that come up, learn not to identify with them.
Just watch them: “Okay, these feelings are results of actions.
They, in and of themselves, are not skillful or unskillful, but the way you perceive them and the thoughts you build around them — those can be skillful and unskillful.” So learn how to step back.
In this way you use your understanding of fabrication to deconstruct unskillful emotions, unskillful mind states, and then to develop skillful emotions and skillful mind states in their place.
We don't usually like the idea of constructing an emotion, or fabricating an emotion: It seems too artificial.
But we do it all the time.
It's simply that we're not conscious of it.
So as you're meditating, what are you doing?
You're working with the breath.
That's one form of fabrication.
Try to make the breath comfortable.
When there's a sense of tension anywhere in the body, learn how to breathe around it, or breathe through it, to relieve as much of the tension as you can without totally losing focus.
You direct your thoughts to the breath.
You evaluate the breath: “What kind of breathing feels good right now?” This is an important part of the practice because it teaches you how to develop your powers of observation on a subtle level.
You're learning to recognize your actions and their results.
You're learning how to read those actions, read those results.
And if the results aren't what you want, you can think of ways of improving them.
That all comes under evaluation.
Then there are feelings.
You try to work with the breath in such a way as to develop feelings of ease and fullness.
There are also perceptions.
How do you perceive your breath?
What mental picture do you have of the breath?
How does that mental picture affect the way you actually breathe?
Can you think of the breath as an energy field in the body, that your whole awareness of the body right now is all breath, different levels of breath energy?
If you apply that perception, hold that label in mind, and explore the way you feel the body from the inside, what does it do?
You can think of the body as a big sponge — lots of holes for the breath to come in and out from all directions.
The breath comes in and goes out without any sense of blockage, no problem at all.
If you perceived it that way, what impact would it have on how you actually experience the breath?
In other words, you learn to take these aspects of fabrication and use them to your advantage.
And of course you're going to make mistakes, but you can learn from them — by learning how to notice things on your own, knowing how to seek advice from other people, learning how to apply their advice in a skillful way.
So, on the one hand, the Buddha gives you a lot of instructions on how to avoid mistakes, but he also is very open to the fact that we're still going to make mistakes on one level or another.
Instead of forbidding you from making mistakes, he gives you advice: When you make a mistake, this is how you handle it; this is how you learn from it so you can become more skillful.
This is how the process of fabrication can take you to the threshold where there's the unfabricated.
You develop your tools, and, as with any art, you're not developing the tools because you want to take the tools with you.
Say, for instance, you have some paint brushes.
You're not painting for the sake of paint brushes; you use the paint brushes for the sake of the art.
And as you master the use of those paint brushes, there comes a point where you've finished your artwork and you put the brushes aside.
It's the same with the path: You work on developing these elements of the path.
Learn how to notice when you've done it well and when you haven't.
In that way you develop your skill.
This skill, though, is special.
It takes you to the threshold of the unfabricated.
But you can't use the unfabricated to get to the unfabricated.
It can't be used as a cause at all, for it lies totally outside of the realm of causality.
But you can get there through causality, through learning fabrication as you learn to fabricate states of mind more and more skillfully.
So don't be afraid of mistakes.
Try to avoid them as much as you can, but don't be afraid of the idea that there will be mistakes down the line.
As Ajaan Fuang once said, “No matter what happens in the meditation, there's always a cure for it — if you develop the right attitude.” So the conceit that says, “I don't want to make any mistakes,” and simply wanting to will your way to a mistake-free life without doing anything: That you've got to put aside.
The narcissism of not wanting anyone to be able to criticize you: That you've got to put aside.
As the Buddha once said, “If someone points out your faults, regard that person as someone who's pointed out treasure.
So learn to live with the fact that, yes, we all make mistakes.
Even arahants make some mistakes.
But a mistake is not the end of the world.
It's a start.
It's a treasure in that it's your opportunity to learn.
One of the most important principles in meditating on the breath is learning how to experiment with it.
Try different kinds of breathing to see which rhythm, which texture of breathing feels best for the body right now, and which is also best for the mind.
Some ways of breathing can put you to sleep, other ways of breathing get you irritated, so you want to check and see what kind of breathing is going to make it easiest for the mind to settle down in a state of mindful alertness and want to stay there.
If the body is uncomfortable because of the way you breathe, you're not taking advantage of the fact that the breath can make it comfortable.
I know a lot of people who are surprised by this aspect of Ajaan Lee's instructions for breath meditation.
They come to meditation with the idea that you're supposed to let things simply happen on their own and not do anything to them — that you just watch the breath however it comes in, however it goes out.
But even the Buddha's instructions on breath meditation frequently state that you “train” yourself to do things in a certain way.
You train yourself to be aware of the whole body as you breathe in, aware of the whole body as you breath out.
You train yourself so that the breath calms down, giving rise to the next steps, where you can train yourself to breathe in with a sense of ease, with a sense of rapture.
And then you can calm those feelings.
There's an element of will in all this, an element of fabrication in which you intentionally cause things to happen.
That's important for not only getting the mind to settle down with a sense of ease, but also for developing insight — because insight comes down to a matter of seeing cause and effect.
I think it was Aristotle who defined intelligence as the ability to see connections.
When you do X, Y happens.
When you do Z, W happens.
The ability to see that on your own is a sign of intelligence, and that sort of intelligence can be developed by learning to look for causes and effects.
This is how you do it: You change certain things and see where the change has an impact.
You change other things and see where that has an impact.
If changing X causes Y to change every time, you know that X is a condition for Y.
This principle permeates all of the Buddha's teachings.
Everything is checked by the results it gives.
When the Buddha was teaching his aunt the basic principles of the Dhamma, it came down to this: When you adopt a particular teaching, what effect does it have?
Does it give rise to passion?
To being fettered?
To accumulating, to self-aggrandizement, to discontent, to entanglement, to laziness, to being burdensome?
Then that's a wrong teaching.
Does it give rise to the opposite qualities, such as dispassion, modesty, and not being fettered?
Okay, that's a right teaching.
That's how you know what's Dhamma and what's not.
You take all the Dhamma you hear and you test it in terms of cause and effect.
You don't take anything for granted just because you've heard that it's so.
Sometimes we hear that the basic Buddhist insight is into the three characteristics — inconstancy, stress, not-self — which doesn't seem to involve many connections between cause and effect.
But here you have to remember two things.
One, the Buddha never talked about “three characteristics.” The phrase “three characteristics” doesn't appear in his teachings.
That was something added later in the commentaries.
He taught these three themes — inconstancy, stress, not-self — as perceptions and contemplations, as labels you apply to things, and aspects you look for in your experience of things.
But there's a larger context for looking for these things, or learning to see things in light of them.
The larger context is formed by the four noble truths: the fact that there is suffering, that there's a cause for suffering, that suffering can cease, and that there's a path of practice leading to its cessation.
These truths in turn relate to a more basic issue: that the whole purpose of the Buddha's teachings is for the sake of finding true happiness.
And he brings both the heart and the head together on this project.
The heart's basic desire is for happiness with the least amount of effort, whereas the head is the part that recognizes that there are causes and effects, and that if you want to get anywhere, you have to learn this pattern and work within it.
In following the Buddha's teachings, these two sides of your awareness, heart and head, have to learn to work together.
The heart has to learn respect for the fact that if you want true happiness, it's going to require some work.
You'll have to get the causes right.
At the same time, the head has to recognize that true happiness is a worthwhile goal.
You don't just think about things and analyze them just for the sake of spinning out ideas and showing you're smart.
You want to understand cause and effect so that you can find true happiness.
And as the Buddha traces out the causes of suffering, one of the big causes is clinging.
So one way of learning how to let go of clinging is to see things in light of those three perceptions of inconstancy, stress, and not-self.
You don't stop with just seeing things in terms of those perceptions.
At the same time, you have to learn the right time and place to apply them: when they actually serve the purpose of leading to a greater happiness.
All the teachings have their time and place.
You have to see each teaching in the larger structure of this pursuit of happiness, and try to apply it in an intelligent way.
A large part of this means that you have to be heedful.
You can't just assume that anything that comes popping up in your mind, or any idea that you have, is going to lead to true happiness.
You can't assume that any teaching you receive from anybody is going to lead to true happiness, or that you can apply it willy-nilly to everything that comes up.
You have to test things to learn when and how they work.
So a central part of the Buddha's teaching consists of instructions in the best way to test things.
You start out by getting the mind to be still.
Get it into strong states of concentration where everything is very, very still, so that you can observe, when a thought comes into the mind, what it does to the mind; or when you do an action, what it does to the mind.
If things aren't really still, you can't see the impact of a thought, the impact of an action very clearly.
It's like trying to listen to a very soft piece of music on the stereo at the same time that you've got a lawnmower outside, or trucks driving up and down the road.
The background noise is so loud that it obscures the subtleties you're trying to hear.
The same way with the mind: Unless you can get the mind really, really still, you can't really watch the effects of your actions, the effects of your words, the effects of your thoughts.
Many actions may seem perfectly harmless in an ordinary state of mind, but when the mind gets really, really still, you begin to see that they actually have an adverse impact on the mind.
So this is why we work at bringing the mind to concentration.
This is why the Buddha said that concentration should be developed.
He didn't say, “States of concentration come and go.
You just watch their coming and going and say, 'Ah, yes, this is inconstant, stressful, not-self.'” That's not the duty that the four noble truths assign to concentration.
The duty they assign is that when you encounter states of mindfulness, you try to develop them.
When you encounter states of concentration, you try to develop them.
Make them stronger, because you're going to need them as tools.
Whatever serves as a tool on the path, you want to take care of it.
You don't just let it go.
The same with the breath: You work with it, you take care of it, because it's going to help you get the mind to settle down.
It's going to help give you a good solid foundation.
I know someone who went to study in Thailand after she'd been doing the Ajaan Lee method.
She met a teacher who said: “What is this, improving the breath?
You're supposed to let it go and be on its own.
After all, it's just a sankhara, just a fabrication.
Why try to improve it?” She reported to me what he had said.
My response was: “Go back and ask him, 'Why bathe your body?
After all, it's just a sankhara, just let it go.'” Of course you can't do that.
You've got to look after the body because you're using it as a tool.
The same with the breath: You look after the breath, tend to it, because it helps the mind to settle down with a sense of ease and solidity that you're going to need for deeper insights.
At the same time, as you're working with the breath, you get insight into cause and effect.
Because even when the mind settles down and you see things, you've got to test them.
Sometimes you hear the teaching that once the mind settles down, you get in touch with your Buddha nature or your Inner Stillness, and you can trust whatever your Buddha nature or Inner Stillness tells you.
The Buddha never taught that way.
Even stream enterers, he said, have got to be heedful.
You can't trust everything that comes out of the mind.
He even said that arahants had to be heedful about their actions.
Even totally enlightened beings can't totally assume that everything they see or hear is actually the way it is.
They have to test it.
Go look in the Vinaya.
A couple of the rules were actually formulated because some arahants made some mistakes.
For instance, there's the rule against monks eating stored-up food.
Ven.
Belatthasisa, who was an arahant, figured, “Well, I can just go for alms once a week, take the leftover rice, and dry it.
That's a nice frugal way of living, and I don't have to go out for alms every day.
Just eat the leftover rice from the days before.” The Buddha found out about it and took him to task.
He said, “This is not a wise course of action.” The story doesn't explain what the Buddha's reasoning was, but if you look at the history of Buddhism, you see that down the line, in later centuries, when monks stopped going for alms, they created a rift in the Buddhist community at large.
The monks lived on their own, they had their own kitchens, with monastery attendants to fix their food.
Lay people basically stopped caring about the monks.
And as a result, when the Muslims came into India and destroyed the monasteries, the lay people didn't really care.
The connection had been severed.
The Buddha saw that far ahead.
So even fully awakened arahants can't always assume that what they think is true.
They've got to test it and check it, just like everybody else.
So when insights arise in your meditation, or when you gain an intuitive feel for something, the question is not where the insight comes from, but what happens when you apply it.
You view it as a hypothesis in an experiment.
You're developing an experimental intelligence here.
You take the passages you read in the texts and you experiment with them.
You take the insights you receive from meditation and you experiment with them.
There's a passage in the very first sutta in the Digha Nikaya, listing all the different kinds of wrong views that people can develop, and not every wrong view comes from people simply thinking things out without having practiced meditation.
A lot of wrong views come from people who meditate and gain some insights or intuitive knowledge, but the knowledge isn't as complete as they thought it was.
So they jump to the wrong conclusions.
What this means is that whether the source of your insight is something you've learned from the texts, something you've thought out on your own, an intuitive feeling you have, or something that comes up in your meditation, you always have to test it to see: “If I adopt this, where does it go?
What does it connect with?
What are the connections here in terms of cause and effect?” That's how you test to see, in terms of the insights you gain, which ones are fool's gold and which ones are genuine gold.
You put them to use and then see what happens.
And you always adopt the heedful attitude that says, “I'm testing things here.
I won't draw any firm conclusions until I've seen what actually works in freeing the mind.” As the Buddha says, just because you like a particular truth or it seems to fit in with your worldview, that's no guarantee that it's actually true.
We've all read the Kalama Sutta, where the Buddha says not to take religious texts as being necessarily true.
That's the part everybody seems to remember.
The other part though, is that he also says not to take what you like as necessarily being true.
Don't take what seems to fit into your worldview as true; don't take what seems to work out logically as necessarily being true.
You've got to test things.
When you adopt this or that idea, this or that practice, what happens?
Check these things out not only against your own experience, but also against the experience of wise people.
In this way, you're much more likely to find truths that really, really are true, because they've stood up to the test.
Of course this means we have to be very careful in how we conduct our tests, which again is why we work at developing concentration, developing mindfulness, all the mental attributes of patience, endurance, alertness, honesty, and discernment.
They put us in a position where we can test things and evaluate the results reliably, so that we're not overcome by bias and we can overcome the limitations of the worldviews and ideas we bring to the practice.
After all, the purpose of the practice is to see things we've never seen before, to attain things we've never attained before.
That means you have to learn how to overcome the limitations of your assumptions.
And this is how you do it: You adopt this experimental way of developing intelligence, so that your heart's desire — a true happiness — will get fulfilled, even if it's not quite in the way you might have wanted it.
After all, this does require work.
But it's a path of work and of effort that leads ultimately to a happiness that, once you've attained it, doesn't require any effort to maintain.
Only through gaining intelligence in terms of cause and effect can you find the happiness that ultimately lies beyond cause and effect.
So we work with the nitty-gritty of just learning to observe what's going on in the mind, testing it, learning to put away whatever assumptions don't pass the test — because only through working through the details like this do we ultimately break through to something much larger and more lasting.
Almost any book on Buddhism will tell you that the three characteristics — the characteristic of inconstancy, the characteristic of stress or suffering, and the characteristic of not-self — were one of the Buddha's most central teachings.
The strange thing, though, is that when you look in the Pali Canon, the word for “three characteristics,” ti-lakkhana, doesn't appear.
If you do a search on any computerized version of the Canon and type in, say, the characteristic of inconstancy, anicca-lakkhana, it comes up with nothing.
The word's not in the Pali Canon at all.
The same with dukkha-lakkhana and anatta-lakkhana: Those compounds don't appear.
This is not to say that the concepts of anicca, dukkha, and anatta don't occur in the Canon; just that they're not termed characteristics.
They're not compounded with the word “characteristic.” The words they are compounded with are perception, sañña — as in the perception of inconstancy, the perception of stress, and the perception of not-self — and the word anupassana, which means to contemplate or to keep track of something as it occurs.
For instance, aniccanupassana, to contemplate inconstancy, means to look for inconstancy wherever it happens.
Now, it's true that you'll frequently find in the Canon the statements that all things compounded or fabricated are inconstant, that they're all stressful.
And all dhammas — all objects of the mind — are not-self.
So if that's the way things are, why not just say that these are characteristic features of these things?
Why make a big deal about the language?
Because words are like fingers, and you want to make sure they point in the right direction — especially when they're laying blame, the way these three perceptions do.
And in our practice, the direction they point to is important for a number of reasons.
One is that the Buddha's concern is not with trying to give an analysis of the ultimate nature of things outside.
He's more interested in seeing how the behavior of things affects our search for happiness.
As he once said, all he taught was suffering and the end of suffering.
The suffering is essentially an issue of the mind's searching for happiness in the wrong places, in the wrong way.
We look for a constant happiness in things that are inconstant.
We look for happiness in things that are stressful and we look for “our” happiness in things that are not-self, that lie beyond our control.
The three perceptions of inconstancy, stress, and not-self are focused on our psychology, on how we can recognize when we're looking for happiness in the wrong way so that we can learn to look for happiness in the right places, in the right ways.
The contemplation of these three themes, the use of these three perceptions, is aimed at finding happiness of a true and lasting sort.
So it's good to keep reminding ourselves of this point, because our prime focus in the meditation should always be on the mind.
We're not trying to analyze things outside in and of themselves.
We're trying to see how the mind's quest for happiness relates to the way things behave.
You always want to keep your focus here, on the mind's quest, even when you focus on the breath.
When the breath gets more and more refined, with a sense of ease filling the body, you reach a stage where the mind and the breath seem to become unified and one.
The mind and its functions become more and more prominent in the meditation, and the breath — as it grows more and more subtle — fades into the background.
This is just as it should be, because the mind is the culprit; the breath isn't the culprit.
Things that are inconstant, stressful, and not-self: They're not to blame.
The problem is the way the mind looks to these things for happiness.
Even when it looks for happiness in a relatively wise way, these issues are relevant.
As the Buddha said, the beginning of wisdom is when you go to people who've found true happiness and you ask them: “What should I do that will lead to my long-term welfare and happiness?” Notice that: My.
Long-term.
Welfare and happiness.
Those three categories are directly related to the three perceptions.
The “my” is related to not-self; “long-term” is related to inconstancy; “welfare-and-happiness” is related to stress.
The three perceptions act as ways of testing any happiness you find, to see if it measures up to the standards you've set.
But they follow on the “what-should-I-do.” That has to come first.
In other words, as we look for happiness, we focus first on actions that don't constitute ultimate happiness but can be used as the path: things like mindfulness, persistence, and concentration.
At that stage, the Buddha doesn't have us focus too much on these three characteristics.
He has us focus primarily on the doing.
As part of the doing, we hold on to other perceptions: the perception of breath, say, or the perception of whatever our meditation object is.
We make that prominent.
And we try to push that perception into a state of solid concentration — which means that we're pushing it in the direction of making it constant and easeful, and getting it under our control.
In this way, we're actually fighting the three characteristics as we try to bring the mind into concentration.
We push to see how far we can find a happiness based on conditioned things.
One reason for this is that if you don't push at a truth until it pushes back, you won't know how strong it is.
Another reason is that we're going to need that conditioned happiness, that sense of relatively solid wellbeing, to put ourselves in a position where we can look at things very carefully as they come to be.
That phrase, “as they come to be,” comes into play when we're no longer pushing.
But we've got to push first.
So you keep working on your concentration in all your activities, trying to keep the mind as constantly still as possible no matter what the outside conditions may be.
You create the conditions for stillness inside, a sense of ease inside, and try to maintain that stillness and ease in the face of all sorts of conditions around you.
You learn to gain more skill, more control.
At this stage in the game, the issues of inconstancy, stress, and not-self apply primarily to the things that would distract you from your concentration.
You try to see that no matter how attractive or alluring or interesting other topics might be, they don't measure up to concentration as a source for happiness.
They're less constant, more stressful, less under your control.
So you drop them in favor of the bliss of concentration.
You keep this up, gaining these insights, until you've fully mastered concentration — which, as the Buddha once said, happens well after your first taste of the deathless.
This means that there's going to be a long period in which you're essentially working against the three characteristics, at least as far as your concentration is concerned.
You'll use these three perceptions to analyze, say, any object of lust, anger, jealousy, or fear that would pull you out of concentration.
These perceptions are relevant because they're ways of reminding yourself that you can't find true happiness in those objects.
For the meantime, that's how you use the contemplation of these themes.
And again the focus is not so much on trying to get to the ultimate nature of these outside objects as it is on using the perception as an antidote for a tendency of the mind.
After all, these perceptions are not intended to be a statement of the ultimate nature of things out there — for, when you think about it, the ultimate nature of things out there is really not all that relevant an issue.
We don't hang on to things because we think that they have an inherent nature, that they inherently exist or don't exist.
We hang on to them because we think they're going to provide happiness that's worth whatever effort they involve.
What the Buddha is pointing out is that they really don't provide that happiness.
The happiness they do provide doesn't really measure up.
It's not worth the cost.
So you apply these three contemplations to things outside of your concentration, and then watch to see where the mind resists.
In other words, what does it refuse to see as inconstant, stressful, and not-self?
When you can catch the mind resisting in this way, you've gained an insight into its attachments.
You've found a spot where you need to dig down and question its resistance.
What deluded fantasy is the mind trying to protect here?
What attitude is it trying to hide from your scrutiny?
In this way, the three contemplations keep coming back to the mind, as they highlight your attachments and tell you where you still have work to do.
You can also apply these three contemplations to the first stages of concentration when you want to go to deeper stages.
When the mind is settled and quiet on a beginning level, is it as quiet as it could be?
Or is there still some inconstancy there?
If you see that any of the factors of your concentration are stressful or inconstant, you drop them, and that will take you to deeper stages of concentration.
Ultimately, as your attachments to things outside of the concentration drop away, you turn your attention more to applying these three perceptions to contemplating the concentration itself.
As this contemplation gets more refined, you see that even the most stable level of concentration you can attain — the one that has formed your highest experience of pleasure and ease — is composed of five aggregates on a very subtle level, and even on this subtle level their behavior displays these three features all the time.
You apply the three perceptions to them to pry away even your attachment to concentration.
That's when you incline the mind to the deathless — and, as the texts say, that inclination can take you in either of two directions.
One is to non-returning, where you delight in your taste of nibbana as a dhamma, as an object of the mind.
The other is full arahantship, when you go beyond even that kind of delight.
It's precisely at this fork in the road where the analysis of sabbe dhamma anatta — all dhammas are not-self — applies: where you might see nibbana as a dhamma, as an object of the mind.
As long as you perceive it in that way, there's going to be attachment, there's going to be a dhamma to hold on to.
So you have to learn how to overcome that attachment by applying the perception of not-self to the dhamma of the deathless.
Then, the texts say, you let go of all dhammas, which allows you to see nibbana in another way — not as a dhamma, but as the abandoning of all dhammas.
That's the ultimate.
And at that point, these three perceptions lose their function.
They've done their work, so you can put them aside.
After all, they're conditioned phenomena.
When you've put all dhammas aside, you put them aside, too.
Arahants can continue using these perceptions as a pleasant abiding for the mind, to remind them of why they've got the ultimate happiness, but these perceptions are no longer needed in the task of bringing about release.
So remember: We're not here to arrive at the true nature of things in and of themselves, aside from seeing how their behavior makes them inadequate as sources for true happiness.
The emphasis always points back to using the perceptions to counteract unskillful tendencies in the mind, because the issues of the mind are paramount.
Ajaan Fuang once had a student in Singapore who wrote him a letter describing how his meditation had reached the point where it was concerned solely with seeing the three characteristics in everything he encountered.
Ajaan Fuang had me write in reply: “Don't focus on things outside.
Keep looking back at the mind, to see what it is that keeps complaining that they're stressful, inconstant, and not self — because the fault lies not with the things: The fault lies with the mind that's looking for happiness in the wrong place.
So that's where your attention should always be focused: on the machinations of the mind.
Use whatever perceptions and means of contemplation that can cut through the mind's unskillful habits, and apply them in a way that leads to the goal of the teachings: an unconditioned happiness where you can put all perceptions, skillful and unskillful, aside.
We all practice for the sake of happiness, for a happiness that goes deeper than ordinary pleasures.
But in coming to the practice we often bring assumptions about happiness — how it works, why we're unhappy, what we can do to be happier — assumptions that we're hardly even aware are assumptions because we assume them so strongly.
We just take it for granted that they're true.
And sometimes they get in the way.
Two of the most common assumptions are ones that get most in the way.
The first is that we're unhappy because we can't accept the way things are; that the purpose of the practice is to learn more acceptance.
In other words, we're essentially neurotic, as in that old distinction between neurosis and psychosis: The psychotic person thinks that two plus two equals five.
The neurotic person knows that two plus two equals four, but hates them for it.
Our problem is that we simply can't accept the way things are.
If we could only learn how to accept that two plus two does equal four and it's perfectly fine, then we'd be happy.
And so in that model, the purpose of the practice is to learn acceptance.
But even Freud recognized that getting people past their neuroses would not solve the problem of happiness.
As he said, it would simply lead them to the level of ordinary, everyday misery.
And yet part of the common theory says, well, you have to learn how to accept that because that's just the way things are.
Another model is that we're unhappy because we have a sense of separateness.
Inside we're divided.
Outside we're separate from other people; we're separate from nature.
All we need to learn is how to develop a sense of oneness, a sense of interconnectedness, and then we'll be happy.
But that's not how the Buddha saw interconnectedness.
He saw that the way things are interconnected in terms of cause and effect is actually a cause for suffering.
And even a sense of oneness, he says, is inconstant.
It contains a subtle sense of stress.
If you cling to it, you're going to suffer.
There's a passage in the Canon where he describes the highest form of oneness, which is the oneness or non-duality of consciousness, in which you have a sense of consciousness as a totality, containing everything.
Yet even that, he says, is inconstant, stressful, and not-self.
What these two ideas about happiness have in common is that the way things are out there is already a given, and we're simply on the receiving end of what's given, so we have to learn how to develop the proper attitude to what's already there: Accept and try to find oneness within the way things are.
But the Buddha's take on things is different.
Reality is only partly a given.
We are also shapers of our reality.
We have an active role in shaping every present moment that we experience.
Now, the present moment is not entirely plastic, entirely responsive to everything we want out of it.
Some of it is formed by influences coming in from the past, but part of it comes from our intentions in the present moment.
In this way we are both producers and consumers.
We produce our suffering and then we consume our suffering.
We produce our pleasures and we consume our pleasures.
Understanding this point helps to open the road to a deeper happiness, because there is a happiness, the Buddha said, that is not produced and not consumed.
It just simply is.
But the way we keep feeding on the happiness we produce gets in the way.
So for him, the purpose of the meditation is not to celebrate oneness or to celebrate acceptance.
It's to develop two very different kinds of emotions: disenchantment and dispassion.
The Pali word for disenchantment, nibbida, also means distaste, disgust, or revulsion, which may sound strong, but it needs to be strong.
It's an antidote to our strong attachment to feeding on things.
That attachment, the Buddha said, is the essence of suffering.
The word upadana, which means clinging, also means the act of eating, of taking sustenance.
He says that upadana lies at the essence of suffering and stress.
So what we need to learn is how to look at the things we feed on until we develop a strong sense that we don't want to feed on them any more.
Now to get to that point, the Buddha does have us develop a certain amount of acceptance and a certain sense of oneness.
This is what the practice of concentration is all about.
You start by focusing on one object, like the breath, and then you stay with it long enough that you start developing a sense of oneness with it.
Your awareness of the breath and the breath itself seem to become one and the same thing.
There's a sense of unification — ekodi-bhava — which the Buddha has us develop as much as possible.
And he has us take that sense of oneness as far as it can go through the levels of concentration.
Why?
Because he wants us to feed on that and then to start comparing this food with the other things we've been feeding on, to see that this is a much more refined pleasure, a more satisfying form of nourishment.
The pleasure it gives is blameless: the pleasure that comes from just focusing your mind.
The pleasures we get from things outside contain a certain amount of blame in that our taking pleasure means that other people, other animals, have to work, have to suffer in one way or another.
An example is physical food.
As we eat physical food, we gain pleasure, but to get that food to our plate or into our bowls requires a lot of work and sacrifice.
So as the Buddha said, that's a pleasure that contains some blame.
Or in Ajaan Lee's terms, it contains some kammic debts.
Whereas the pleasure that comes simply from learning how to focus on your breath is not placing a burden on anyone, so it's a type of food for the mind that's really worth developing.
As you develop a sense of oneness with the food of concentration, you look at the other ways the mind has been feeding on things for its emotional pleasures and you realize that they're pretty miserable.
The image the Buddha gives in the Canon is of a blind person who has been given a soiled, oily rag by someone who says, “Look.
This is a nice, clean, white piece of cloth.” The blind person takes the oily rag and gets very possessive of it, thinking that it's a nice, clean white piece of cloth.
But when a doctor eventually cures the blind person of his blindness and he can start seeing, the first thing he looks at is his cloth.
He realizes that it's not nice, clean, and white.
It's a dirty and oily rag.
He says, “Wow, I was really fooled by that guy.
In the same way, the Buddha says that once you attain the first taste of Awakening, you look back on your old pleasures and realize how you've been fooled by the mind — that in finding your pleasure, what you've been feeding on is just forms and feelings and perceptions and thought constructs and consciousness — which, when you really look at them very carefully, are not worth feeding on at all.
There's a story they tell about the American occupation of Japan after World War There were some cooks in Japanese restaurants who were really upset by the fact that they had lost the war, and now they had to prepare food for the occupiers.
So, to get some revenge, they would take human excrement and prepare it with all kinds of wasabi or whatever to mask the taste, and then serve it to their American customers.
They would feed the occupiers shit, basically, and the occupiers didn't know.
So the cooks got their perverse pleasure that way.
If you look at what you've been taking as food for the mind, you realize that it's just the same sort of thing, that all the pleasure was in the preparation.
This is why we have the contemplation of the parts of the body, the analysis of things in terms of the aggregates, in terms of the sense media, in terms of the properties: so we can realize that the food of lust or possessiveness we've been feeding on with regard to the body is really not based on much.
It doesn't give us any real sustenance, and the pleasure we get out of it is certainly not worth all the effort that goes into dressing it up.
The purpose of this contemplation is to gain that sense of nibbida — disenchantment or revulsion — with the food we've been consuming so that we won't want to eat it anymore.
When you decide you don't want to eat it, you turn around and look at the fact that you've been preparing this food all along, and you realize you don't want to prepare it any longer: That's dispassion.
You've had a passion for creating this food out of form, feeling, whatever.
That's why it was there as food.
But once you gain a sense of dispassion for it, you stop creating it.
And when you stop creating it, it's no longer there.
That's when you experience cessation.
The mind is no longer entangled either in the process of production or in the process of consumption.
That's when it's freed.
It opens to the happiness that's there when you're not so wound up or enthralled in production and consumption of all these miserable forms of food.
So the Buddha's take on true happiness is very different from a lot of the assumptions we tend to bring to the practice.
It's important to keep this fact in mind.
We're not totally on the receiving end of things.
We're producers and consumers at the same time.
And the producing and consuming of our ordinary pleasures — or even some of our more refined pleasures — is what's getting in the way of realizing a happiness that goes beyond all this, that's not dependent on being connected or unconnected.
It's not dependent on accepting or not accepting.
It's just there.
But to find it we have to develop a sense of disconnect with our old enthrallments.
And we have to decide not to accept the way things have been.
In this way, the Buddha has a very different approach to how and where to find true happiness.
But the happiness that comes is a lot truer than anything that can come from simply learning how to accept things or learning how to become one with them.
So try to keep this point in mind — that you're both a producer and a consumer — and take a good, hard look at what you've been producing and how you've been consuming it.
Look at all the effort that goes into producing happiness out of this body we have, out of feelings and perceptions and thought constructs and consciousness.
Start asking yourself: Is it really worth all the effort?
Maybe there's something better.
Maybe it's time to grow up.
When you can develop that sense of disenchantment and dispassion, it leads to cessation.
Then you realize that cessation is not a scary thing.
It's not like extinction.
It's more like learning how to outgrow some old bad habits, your old addictions, your old intoxications, and finding that there's something a lot better there when you put your old feeding habits aside.
Try to keep track of the breath.
Don't think about the fact that you're going to be here for a whole hour.
Just think about this breath, and then this breath, each breath, one breath at a time.
Think about it and watch it, see what it does.
What do you notice when it comes in; what do you notice when it goes out?
What way of coming in feels best for the body; what way of letting it go out feels best for the body?
The breath is called the fabricator of the body, or bodily fabrication — kaya-sankhara — both because the way you breathe has a huge impact on the way you experience your body, and because there's an intentional element in the breath.
It's one of the few bodily processes that can be either voluntary or involuntary.
So make the most of the fact that you can exert some voluntary control over it.
You can choose when to breathe in; you can choose when to breathe out.
Then it's a matter of learning the best reasons for choosing to breathe in or breathe out in any particular way.
Can you sense how the body tells you that now's a good time for an in-breath, now's a good time for an out-breath?
It has its signals, you know.
There are certain feelings in the body that you can learn to recognize over time, and you can explore how best to respond to them.
Take their cue in such a way that it leads to a sense of fullness.
For example, you can breathe in till the body feels full, and then you don't squeeze it out.
Allow it to stay full.
Even though the breath will go out, you can still maintain some sense of fullness.
When the next breath comes in, add a little bit more fullness.
The same with the next and the next.
It builds up over time.
Simply by approaching the breathing process in a particular way, you can create a state of ease, you can create a state of fullness — even a sense of fullness that's a bit too much.
Sometimes people can begin to feel that they're going to drown in breath energy.
You might want to temper that a little bit.
But as long as the fullness feels refreshing and blissful, stick with it.
There was once a senior monk in Bangkok who was learning meditation from Ajaan Lee.
He was well read and knew his Buddhist doctrine.
After a while of practicing concentration, he complained to Ajaan Lee, “As we bring the mind to concentration like this, aren't we developing states of becoming and birth?” Bhava and jati are the words he used.
You may have noticed as we were chanting the Sutta on Setting the Wheel of Dhamma in Motion just now: The craving that leads to further becoming is the craving that leads to suffering as well.
The senior monk was reasoning from this point, saying that we should be trying to abandon states of becoming and birth, and yet here we are creating them.
And Ajaan Lee said, “Precisely.
That's what we're doing.
If you want to understand becoming and birth, you have to consciously create these states.
Create a state of wellbeing, create a state of fullness, get good at it.
That's when you understand the process.
Before you take things apart, you have to learn how to put them together.
And that's what we're doing right now, creating a state of becoming, a state of wellbeing or well-becoming.
We do this both so that we can get good at creating it and so that, in the course of creating it, we can put the mind in a good spot where it can watch things more carefully, more clearly.
When the mind is comfortable in the present moment, at ease in the present moment, it can stay firmly in the present moment and watch processes transparently as they come, as they go.
You get a better sense of your raw materials.
The creating of a state of becoming in the mind like this is the kamma of your meditation, right here, right now.
A lot of people believe that kamma is one of those teachings that's not particularly relevant to their meditation practice.
But essentially, kamma is what the practice is all about.
After all, kamma is what you're doing to create suffering.
Changing your kamma is what's going to bring suffering to an end.
The Buddha tends to avoid talking about metaphysical issues, but kamma is the one big metaphysical issue he talks about a lot.
The nature of action, what action does, when it gives its results, the fact that action is real, that it gives results both immediately and over time: These are metaphysical issues.
And the reason the Buddha focuses on these and not on other issues is because the nature of action is important for understanding why we suffer and how we can stop suffering.
There's the kamma that leads to suffering; there's the kamma that leads to its end.
So we're here trying to understand what action is all about, what action does, and what it creates.
And our state of concentration is Exhibit A, our primary example of action right here.
We're creating a state of wellbeing.
You can't let go of states of wellbeing until you learn how to make good ones.
Ajaan Lee's example, when he was talking to that senior monk, was of having a chicken that lays eggs.
Some of the eggs, he said, you can take apart and analyze; some of the eggs you can eat.
If you don't have anything to eat, you don't have the strength to take things apart and analyze them.
We're feeding on the sense of ease that comes from the concentration because that gives us the strength to analyze things.
How do you analyze things?
You take things apart in terms of what you're fabricating and of the raw materials with which you're fabricating them.
For example, we all know the teaching that you create a sense of self out of any of the five aggregates, all of which are activities.
Well, you can watch yourself as you meditate: Exactly how do you create a sense of me or mine around what you're doing?
One thing you tend to see very quickly is the way your sense of self gets involved as you watch yourself doing the meditation well or poorly.
When things aren't going well, you think you're a hopeless meditator.
You get all tied up in knots.
When they're going well, you get complacent and think you're a great meditator.
Either way, you set yourself up for trouble.
But when you realize that this is the process of I-making and my-making in action, you learn to leave things at the level of the raw materials.
You don't have to make an “I” out of them, just notice that there are feelings, perceptions, fabrications.
As you watch these things even more carefully, you begin to realize that even these aggregates have an element of fabrication, an element of intention, in what you thought was their raw form.
As the Buddha says, we create form for the sake of form-ness.
Your sense of the form of the body is something you fashion out of sensations so that you can breathe and move.
You can create formless states as well.
This is what you learn when you move from the fourth jhana into the four formless states: the infinitude of space, the infinitude of consciousness, nothingness, and neither perception nor non-perception.
You realize that you do create a sense of form with regard to the body by the way you move the breath around.
When the breath is very, very still, that sense of form begins to disintegrate, to dissolve away, and you have the choice of not applying the perception of form to the body.
You become sensitive to the space that permeates between the atoms of sensation making up your sense of the body.
All the places where you feel space in the body begin to connect and then they connect with the space outside.
It's as if you have a mist of atoms here.
In order to breathe, you applied perceptions — i.e., mental labels — to that mass of mist; you had an image of the form of the body that allowed you to make it move.
But when you don't have to move the body around — you don't even have to move the breath around — everything grows very still and you can drop that sense of form if you want to.
You can choose instead to focus on the perception of space permeating the mist.
That's when you experience the infinitude of that space — and at that point you begin to realize that even the perception of form or the experience of form contains an element of intention.
You then begin to see this process in relation to the formless realms as well: When you drop the perception of space, you're left with a perception of “knowing.” That's how you move from a sense of the infinitude of space to the infinitude of consciousness.
These experiences can be willed, and the fact that they're so subtle allows the willing to be transparent.
What you're doing is to take your experience apart, layer by layer, seeing where the different levels of intention get involved and learning how to drop them.
As you progressively do away with these layers of intention, you get down to what the Buddha calls knowledge of things as they have come to be.
As he said, only when he had gained knowledge of things as they have come to be — in terms of the four noble truths, and the three levels of knowledge about each truth — did he claim full Awakening.
That's the kind of knowledge we're working our way down to.
And the only way you can get down to that level of unintended, unshaped, unfabricated experience, getting down to the absolutely rawest of the raw materials of the present moment, is first by consciously putting them together into something.
Otherwise, you miss a lot of subtleties.
Sometimes you hear people say: “Try to sit with things simply as they are, right from the very beginning of the meditation, and you can get into a state of equanimity or pure mindfulness.
And then you realize that that equanimity is unfabricated.
Equanimity and mindfulness: That's it, that's the unfabricated.” But that's not the case at all.
Equanimity and mindfulness, when they're pure, constitute the fourth jhana, not the unfabricated.
There's an element of fabrication in mindfulness; there's even an element of fabrication in equanimity.
But unless you learn consciously how to fabricate mindfulness and equanimity for long periods of time and then how to observe them, you won't notice this.
This is why you have to build up these states of concentration before you can start taking them apart.
There's a sutta where the Buddha talks about the issue of thirsting for becoming, thirsting for non-becoming, and seeing things as they have come to be.
He starts out with two extremes: There are people who just love becoming this, becoming that, creating states of being as much as they can; and there are other people who want to destroy states of being.
They've gotten sick of what they've done in terms of creating their world and their experiences, and they just want to destroy the whole thing.
The Buddha says that neither extreme is proper.
In creating things, you just create more suffering.
That point is obvious.
But in destroying these things, you create a different kind of state of becoming, the process of searching for non-becoming.
That, he says, simply leads to more becoming.
You take on the identity of the destroyer, the annihilator.
The trick is to see simply what has come to be, i.e., to see the raw materials you've been shaping into the present simply as that — as raw materials — and then learn to develop dispassion for them.
It's as if you've been building houses with what you thought were bricks.
But if you look carefully at the bricks, you realize that they're actually frozen meat.
Of course any house built out of frozen meat, as it gets exposed to the heat, is going to turn into a big pile of rotting flesh.
When you realize that, you develop dispassion for the activity of building houses; you develop dispassion for the raw materials.
That's when you let go.
You don't have to destroy the houses.
They disintegrate on their own.
The issue here is learning to see the raw materials simply as they are, as something that's come into being through your past kamma.
And no matter how skillful you are at building an elaborate house with lots of gingerbread and balconies and whatever, it's still frozen meat and it's going to thaw.
So when you develop dispassion for what's come to be, you find true freedom.
You stop this process of fabricating, building, creating states of being.
You don't have to destroy the states of being.
Simply the fact that you've stopped creating them, stopped clinging to them, lets them fall away on their own.
And your dispassion means that you won't replace them with new ones.
It's a subtle skill, which means that you can't go straight to the letting go.
First you've got to learn how to build properly.
Only then can you see the subtleties of the intentions in the mind and, at the same time, get a felt sense for your raw materials.
Otherwise you hold to the intention of being equanimous, and think that that's it.
Or to the intention of being totally passive, nonreactive, and think that that's it — without seeing that that, too, is an intention; that, too, has an element of will that keeps it going.
So try to be as skillful as you can in staying with the breath, in creating a sense of wellbeing through the breathing, because it teaches you a lot of important lessons about the element of kamma, the element of will and fabrication that goes into the present moment.
It teaches you about the raw materials and the many levels of intention there within them.
You take these raw materials and turn them into a transparent state that allows you to watch these processes in action, so that someday you, too, can reach that point where, after putting things together, you can take them apart, see things simply as they come into being, develop dispassion for them, and drop them.
That way you can test for yourself: When the Buddha said that there is an unfabricated, is what he said really true?
It may seem like we're going in the opposite direction as we fabricate concentration here, but the only way you're going to see what's unfabricated is if you're totally sensitive to every level of fabrication possible.
So although we're creating a state of becoming here with the breath — a state of wellbeing, a state of rapture, ease, unification of mind — as Ajaan Lee says, you're going to need to eat some of these eggs.
You can't take them all apart; you can't destroy all of them.
You've got to eat some of them in order to keep going.
So feed yourself well.
It's good to come back to a place like this where you can hear the crickets chirping in the evening, the sound of the doves in the late afternoon.
There's something in the body and the mind that responds to being out in nature like this.
The mind gets the chance to settle down, to put aside a lot of its cares.
And for those of you who've been living in the city, cut off from nature, there's often the thought that if only you could get back to nature and stay there, that would solve all your problems.
But go ask people who live in nature all the time, and they can tell you a long list of problems they still suffer from, living out in nature.
Think about human history as a whole.
The times when people get really romantic about nature are the times when they don't have to live in it.
The idea of romanticizing wilderness didn't come into force in America until the frontier had been closed, and nature had been tamed to some extent — to the extent that human beings can tame nature.
It's important to keep this in mind as we practice.
Coming out here doesn't solve all your problems.
What it does is that it gives you a place to practice, so you can look deeper into where the real problems are.
When the Buddha talked about how conditions cause suffering, he wasn't talking just about your social conditioning.
He was talking about conditions of nature.
That chant we had just now — “the world is swept away” — doesn't refer just to the human social world or your psychological world.
It also refers to the world as a whole.
Everything in nature is marked with inconstancy, stress, things that lie beyond your control.
This applies not only to human beings but also to animals of every kind.
You sometimes hear people romanticizing the mental life of animals, that they don't suffer because they don't have a sense of self.
That's not the case.
Animals often suffer more than we do.
They live in constant fear, with no real understanding of what's going on around them.
All they know is that they're hungry all the time, yet the need to go out and search for food forces them to place themselves in danger.
And you can read the writings of the forest monks: They certainly don't romanticize nature.
Even Ajaan Lee, when he talks about the advantages of living in the forest and the lessons you learn there, doesn't talk about how nice it is to get back and be one with nature.
His focus is more on how nature is a dangerous place where you have to learn to be heedful all the time.
We don't suffer only because of our social conditioning.
We suffer because we live in a world of inter-eating, where beings are constantly feeding on one another.
We have this inner desire, this inner need to survive, to feed.
To create, to keep these worlds that they call bhava — our emotional worlds, our mental worlds, and the physical world we live in — to keep our experience of these worlds going, to survive, requires that we feed on one another, emotionally, mentally, physically.
And there's suffering not only in being eaten, but also in having to eat.
So the conditions the Buddha's talking about are not just social conditions.
We don't suffer only because we're neurotic about our cravings.
Craving in itself is a cause of suffering.
It's also the cause of continued being and becoming.
This is how nature keeps going: Animals crave.
People crave.
This is how we keep going, this is how we survive, this is how we die, how we get reborn.
So the ways of nature are not an ideal to which we're trying to return.
They exemplify the problem, which is that as long as you have to feed, there's going to be suffering.
As long as your happiness depends on conditions of any kind, there's going to be suffering and stress.
The advantage of coming to a place like this is that you get to look deep inside the mind to see where the wellsprings of these cravings come from, this process of fabrication that lies deep within the mind.
As we meditate, we're trying to study fabrication as we experience it.
This is the conditioning process in the mind and in the body.
The basic fabrication in terms of the body is the breath.
And as for the mind, there are two types of fabrication: verbal and mental.
Verbal fabrication is directed thought and evaluation.
These are the processes with which you put sentences together in the mind.
You focus on a topic and then you make comments about it.
That conditions the mind.
Then there's purely mental fabrication, which is feeling and perception, “perception” here meaning the labels you apply to things, while “feeling” means the different feeling-tones of pleasure, pain, and neither pleasure nor pain.
Normally, the way we put these things together causes stress and suffering.
If you do this with ignorance, you suffer.
If you can learn how to do it with knowledge, you can turn these processes of fabrication into the path.
This doesn't mean that when you're on the path you don't suffer.
It's simply a different type of suffering.
It's a suffering that leads to the end of suffering, the kamma that leads to the end of kamma.
There's still going to be a subtle level of suffering in the breath even when you're concentrated on it.
The breath can get very subtle and very pleasant, even rapturous, but there's still an element of stress there.
But for the time being, you're going to use that as a path.
In fact, you put all three types of fabrication together to get the mind into concentration.
You think about the breath — that's directed thought — and you evaluate the breath.
You explore to see which ways of perceiving the breath help in the process of making it feel more comfortable, so you've got perception and feeling there as well.
In this way you're taking the process of fabrication and turning it into a path to the end of fabrication.
As you do this, you begin to see how much your intentions really do shape these things.
The Buddha's picture of your experience is not that you're simply a passive observer of things, commenting on them.
In other words, it's not like watching a TV show.
The TV show is a given, and you simply like it or dislike it or you're neutral about it.
That's all.
But that's not the Buddha's picture of experience.
He says that you're actively engaged in shaping your experience all the time.
In fact, the extent to which your intentions are shaping your experience goes a lot deeper and is a lot more radical than you might imagine.
This is one of the insights of Awakening: how much your present intentions are needed for you to experience even the present moment.
As the Buddha points out, all of the aggregates — form, feeling, perception, fabrication, and consciousness — have an element of intention in them.
There are lots of different potentials from your past kamma that you can focus on in any given moment.
Your choice of what to focus on is going to determine what you experience.
For instance, there are potentials for different kinds of feelings.
There are places in the body that, if you focused on them, could get you really tied up in anguish or pain.
You could take the germs of a pain and build them into something really overwhelming.
There are other places in the body where there's a potential for pleasure.
If you learn how to focus there, you can develop a strong sense of refreshment, rapture, wellbeing.
Then you can let that pleasure and refreshment permeate and fill the body in the same way that the cool water in a spring coming from the bottom of a lake can fill the whole lake with its coolness.
So you have the choice of what you're going to focus on now — which sensations in the body help create a sense of wellbeing, which ones could create a sense of dis-ease, what you're going to think about, what you're going to focus on.
Those are choices you make all the time.
You take these potentials and turn them into an actual experience.
When you realize how you do this, you can learn how to make your choices more skillfully.
This is the advantage of coming out into a relatively natural place like this.
It's not totally natural.
If we turned off the water, the avocado trees would die and the chaparral would take over.
There wouldn't be any shade during the day.
So even here in the orchard it's not totally natural.
But at least there's enough peace and quiet for you to look into the mind and see that the source of trouble is not your social conditioning as much as it's just the plain old fact of conditioning or fabrication — this process of becoming, which is fed by craving.
When you hear those crickets cricketing out there, they're not doing it in total pleasure and joy.
They're hungry.
When you watch the animals around in the orchard, you see that they're hungry.
They have to be wary as they venture out for food.
As a meditator, you have to be wary as well.
Even when you create good states of concentration, that's still a type of becoming.
It still depends on causes and conditions.
At least it puts the mind in a position where it can observe the process of becoming and dig deeper, to watch the conditioning, to see how it happens — and ultimately to dig down to an area where there's no conditioning any more, which is something that stands outside of nature as we know it.
It's not the case that the conditioned comes from the unconditioned.
The way the Buddha explained causality is that causes and effects influence each other.
An effect turns around and has an influence on its cause.
So there's no prime mover or first cause or ground of being in the Buddha's teachings at all, for every cause can get shaped by its effects.
And if anybody had been qualified to talk about Buddha nature, the Buddha would have been the one.
But he never talked about Buddha nature at all, never said that Buddha nature was the ground of being.
He simply noted that there are causes and conditions that affect one another.
So if something is going to be unconditioned, it has to lie outside of the causal process entirely — something that's already there, but as long as you're entangled in fabrication you're not going to see it.
The only way you can see it is if you turn the fabrication in the direction of the path, so that the way you breathe, the way you think, and the way you feel and perceive things is conditioned not by ignorance, but by knowledge, by awareness — in particular, awareness of which activities cause stress and which activities don't.
That kind of awareness you develop gradually.
It's a skill you work on as you get more and more sensitive both to the process of fabrication and to the stress that it causes even at very subtle levels.
Ultimately, you bring the mind to the point where you realize that no matter which direction you fabricate, which direction you intend, there's going to be stress.
If your discernment is sharp, you drop all intention at that point.
That's when the mind opens up to this other dimension, which is totally separate.
So it's not the case that we're returning to a place we've come from.
After all, as the Buddha points out, even little babies have their greed, anger, and delusion.
It's just that their faculties and bodies aren't strong enough to act on those defilements very powerfully.
But they suffer powerfully: You can see that very clearly.
As soon as a child comes out of the womb, it cries.
A lot of the child's early life is spent in crying because it has all sorts of desires and yet can't fulfill them.
It has all sorts of pains but doesn't know what to do about them.
So we're not trying to return to that state or to a state of nature like an animal.
We're trying to find something that goes beyond nature as we know it.
After all, if we were simply returning to a state where we were before, what's to prevent us from coming back out of that state again?
If we could forget our true wonderful nature, was it really all that wonderful or true?
And what would prevent us from forgetting it again?
So instead of returning to something old, we look at this process of fabrication that's going on all the time to see if we can learn something new about it.
Learn how to understand it, learn how to take it apart, use it as a path.
Learn how, once it's taken you as far as it can take you, you can let it go.
That, as the Buddha said, allows us to see something we've never seen before: to attain the as yet unattained, to realize the as yet unrealized.
In other words, we're heading into totally new territory.
Keep that in mind as you practice.
You can create wonderful luminous states in the mind, but remember that those, too, are fabricated.
No matter what comes up in the practice, always learn how to familiarize yourself with it.
And then learn to look for where there's still a level of inconstancy and stress in here — because that perception of stress and inconstancy will be your way out.
Sit comfortably erect, without leaning forward or backward, left or right.
Close your eyes and think thoughts of good will.
Thoughts of good will go first to yourself, because if you can't think good will for yourself — if you can't feel a sincere desire for your own happiness — there's no way you can truly wish for the happiness of others.
So just tell yourself, “May I find true happiness.” Remind yourself that true happiness is something that comes from within, so this is not a selfish desire.
In fact, if you find and develop the resources for happiness within you, you're able to radiate it out to other people.
It's a happiness that doesn't depend on taking anything away from anyone else.
So now spread good will to other people.
First, people who are close to your heart — your family, your parents, your very close friends: May they find true happiness, as well.
Then spread those thoughts out in ever widening circles: people you know well, people you don't know so well, people you like, people you know and are neutral about, and even people you don't like.
Don't let there be any limitations on your good will, for if there are, there will be limitations on your mind.
Now spread thoughts of good will to people you don't even know — and not just people; all living beings of all kinds in all directions: east, west, north, south, above, and below, out to infinity.
May they find true happiness, too.
Then bring your thoughts back to the present.
If you want true happiness, you have to find it in the present, for the past is gone and the future is an uncertainty.
So you have to dig down into the present.
What do you have right here?
You've got the body, sitting here and breathing.
And you've got the mind, thinking and aware.
So bring all these things together.
Think about the breath and then be aware of the breath as it comes in and goes out.
Keeping your thoughts directed to the breath: that's mindfulness.
Being aware of the breath as it comes in and out: that's alertness.
Keep those two aspects of the mind together.
If you want, you can use a meditation word to strengthen your mindfulness.
Try “Buddho,” which means “awake.” Think “bud-” with the in-breath, “dho” with the out.
Try to breathe as comfortably as possible.
A very concrete way of learning how to provide for your own happiness in the immediate present — and at the same time, strengthening your alertness — is to let yourself breathe in a way that's comfortable.
Experiment to see what kind of breathing feels best for the body right now.
It might be long breathing, short breathing; in long, out short; or in short, out long.
Heavy or light, fast or slow, shallow or deep.
Once you find a rhythm that feels comfortable, stay with it for a while.
Learn to savor the sensation of the breathing.
Generally speaking, the smoother the texture of the breath, the better.
Think of the breath, not simply as the air coming in and out of the lungs, but as the entire energy flow that courses through the body with each in-and-out breath.
Be sensitive to the texture of that energy flow.
You may find that the body changes after a while.
One rhythm or texture may feel right for a while, and then something else will feel more comfortable.
Learn how to listen and respond to what the body is telling you right now.
What kind of breath energy does it need?
How can you best provide for that need?
If you feel tired, try to breathe in a way that energizes the body.
If you feel tense, try to breathe in a way that's relaxing.
If your mind wanders off, gently bring it right back.
If it wanders off ten times, a hundred times, bring it back ten times, a hundred times.
Don't give in.
This quality is called ardency.
In other words, as soon as you realize that the mind has slipped away, you bring it right back.
You don't spend time aimlessly sniffing at the flowers, looking at the sky, or listening to the birds.
You've got work to do: work in learning how to breathe comfortably, how to let the mind settle down in a good space here in the present moment.
When the breath starts feeling comfortable, you can start exploring it in other areas of the body.
If you simply stay with the comfortable breath in a narrow range, you'll tend to doze off.
So consciously expand your awareness.
A good place to focus first is right around the navel.
Locate that part of the body in your awareness: where is it right now?
Then notice: how does it feel there as you breathe in?
How does it feel when you breathe out?
Watch it for a couple of breaths, and notice if there's any sense of tension or tightness in that part of the body, either with the in-breath or with the out-breath.
Is it tensing up as you breathe in?
Are you holding onto the tension as you breathe out?
Are you putting too much force on the out-breath?
If you catch yourself doing any of these things, just relax.
Think of that tension dissolving away in the sensation of the in-breath, the sensation of the out-breath.
If you want, you can think of the breath energy coming into the body right there at the navel, working through any tension or tightness that you might feel there…
Then move your awareness to the right — to the lower right-hand corner of your abdomen — and follow the same three steps there: ) locate that general part of the body in your awareness; ) notice how it feels as you breathe in, how it feels as you breathe out; and ) if you sense any tension or tightness in the breath, just let it relax… Now move your awareness to the left, to the lower left-hand corner of your abdomen, and follow the same three steps there.
Now move your awareness up to the solar plexus… and then to the right, to the right flank… to the left flank… to the middle of the chest… After a while move up to the base of the throat… and then to the middle of the head.
Be very careful with the breath energy in the head.
Think of it very gently coming in, not only through the nose but also through the eyes, the ears, down from the top of the head, in from the back of the neck, very gently working through and loosening up any tension you may feel, say, around your jaws, the back of your neck, around your eyes, or around your face…
From there you can move your attention gradually down the back, out the legs, to the tips of the toes, the spaces between the toes.
As before, focus on a particular part of the body, notice how it feels with the in-breath and out-breath, relax any sensation of tension or tightness you might feel there, so that the breath energy can flow more freely, and then move on until you've reached the tips of the toes.
Then repeat the process, beginning at the back of the neck and going down the shoulders, through the arms, past your wrists, and out through your fingers.
You can repeat this survey of the body as many times as you like until the mind feels ready to settle down.
Then let your attention return to any spot in the body where it feels most naturally settled and centered.
Simply let your attention rest there, at one with the breath.
At the same time let the range of your awareness spread out so that it fills the entire body, like the light of a candle in the middle of a room: the candle flame is in one spot, but its light fills the entire room.
Or like a spider on a web: the spider's in one spot, but it knows the whole web.
Be keen on maintaining that broadened sense of awareness.
You'll find that it tends to shrink, like a balloon with a small hole in it, so keep broadening its range, thinking “whole body, whole body, breath in the whole body, from the top of the head down into the tips of the toes.” Think of the breath energy coming in and out of the body through every pore.
Make a point of staying with this centered, broadened awareness as long as you can.
There's nothing else you have to think about right now, nowhere else to go, nothing else to do.
Just stay with this centered, broadened awareness of the present…
When the time comes to leave meditation, remind yourself that there's a skill to leaving.
In other words, you don't just jump right out.
My teacher, Ajaan Fuang, once said that when most people meditate, it's as if they're climbing a ladder up to the second story of a building: step-by-step-by-step, rung-by-rung, slowly up the ladder.
But as soon as they get to the second story, they jump out the window.
Don't let yourself be that way.
Think of how much effort went into getting yourself centered.
Don't throw it away.
The first step in leaving is to spread thoughts of good will once more to all the people around you.
Then, before you open your eyes, remind yourself that even though you're going to have your eyes open, you want your attention to stay centered in the body, at the breath.
Try to maintain that center as long as you can, as you get up, walk around, talk, listen, whatever.
In other words, the skill of leaving meditation lies in learning how not to leave it, regardless of whatever else you may be doing.
Act from that sense of being centered.
If you can keep the mind centered in this way, you'll have a standard against which you can measure its movements, its reactions to the events around it and within it.
Only when you have a solid center like this can you gain insight into the movements of the mind.
The Theravada tradition, dominant in Sri Lanka, Myanmar, and Thailand, regards the Pali suttas as the authentic and authoritative record of the Buddha's own words.
When Western scholars — piqued by issues of authority and authenticity — first learned of these claims in the th century, they began employing the historical method to test them.
And although every conceivable scrap of literary or archeological evidence seems to have been examined, no air-tight historical proof or disproof of these claims has surfaced.
What has surfaced is a mass of minor facts and probabilities — showing that the Pali canon is probably the closest detailed record we have of the Buddha's teachings — but nothing more certain than that.
Archeological evidence shows that Pali was probably not the Buddha's native language, but is this proof that he didn't use Pali when talking to native speakers of that language?
The canon contains grammatical irregularities, but are these signs of an early stage in the language, before it was standardized, or a later stage of degeneration?
And in which stage of the language's development did the Buddha's life fall?
Fragments of other early Buddhist canons have been found, with slight deviations from the Pali canon in their wording, but not in their basic doctrines.
Is their unanimity in doctrine a sign that they all come from the Buddha himself, or was it the product of a later conspiracy to remake and standardize the doctrine in line with changed beliefs and tastes?
Scholars have proven eager to take sides on these issues, but the inevitable use of inference, conjecture, and probabilities in their arguments lends an air of uncertainty to the whole process.
Many have seen this uncertainty as sign of the inadequacy of the Theravadin claims to authenticity.
But simply to dismiss the teachings of the suttas for this reason would be to deprive ourselves of the opportunity to test their most remarkable assertion: that human effort, properly directed, can put an end to all suffering and stress.
Perhaps we should instead question the methods of the historians, and view the uncertainty of their conclusions as a sign of the inadequacy of the historical method as a tool for ascertaining the Dhamma.
The suttas themselves make this point in their own recommendations for how the authenticity and authority of the Dhamma is best ascertained.
In a famous passage, they quote the Buddha as saying:
“Kalamas, don't go by reports, by legends, by traditions, by scripture, by logical conjecture, by inference, by analogies, by agreement through pondering views, by probability, or by the thought, 'This contemplative is our teacher.' When you know for yourselves that, 'These dhammas are unskillful; these dhammas are blameworthy; these dhammas are criticized by the wise; these dhammas, when adopted and carried out, lead to harm and to suffering' — then you should abandon them… When you know for yourselves that, 'These dhammas are skillful; these dhammas are blameless; these dhammas are praised by the wise; these dhammas, when adopted and carried out, lead to welfare and to happiness' — then you should enter and remain in them.
Because this passage is contained in a religious scripture, the statements attracting the most attention have been those rejecting the authority of religious teachers, legends, traditions, and scripture; along with those insisting on the importance of knowing for oneself.
These remarkably anti-dogmatic statements — sometimes termed the Buddha's Charter of Free Inquiry — have tended to divert attention from the severe strictures that the passage places on what “knowing for oneself” entails.
In questioning the authority of reports, it dismisses the basic material on which the historical method is based.
In questioning the authority of inference and probability, it dismisses some of the method's basic techniques.
In questioning the authority of logical conjecture, analogies, and agreement through pondering views, it dismisses the methods of free-thinking rationalism in general.
This leaves only two methods for ascertaining the Dhamma, both of them related to the question raised in this passage and central to other teachings in the canon: What is skillful, what is unskillful?
In developing any skill, you must pay attention to the results of your own actions; and listen to those who have already mastered the skill.
Similarly, in ascertaining the Dhamma, you must examine the results that come from putting a particular teaching in practice; and check those results against the opinions of the wise.
Two aspects of the Dhamma, however, make it a skill apart.
The first is reflected in the fact that the word Dhamma means not only teaching, but also quality of the mind.
Thus the above passage could also be translated:
“When you know for yourselves that, 'These qualities are unskillful; these qualities are blameworthy; these qualities are criticized by the wise; these qualities, when adopted and carried out, lead to harm and to suffering' — then you should abandon them… When you know for yourselves that, 'These qualities are skillful; these qualities are blameless; these qualities are praised by the wise; these qualities, when adopted and carried out, lead to welfare and to happiness' — then you should enter and remain in them.
In fact, this is more likely the correct translation, as the discussion following this passage focuses on the results of acting on qualities of the mind: greed, aversion, and delusion in the unskillful set; and lack of greed, lack of aversion, and lack of delusion in the skillful one.
This points to the fact that Dhamma practice is primarily a skill of the mind.
The second aspect that sets the Dhamma apart as a skill is its goal: nothing less than the total ending of suffering.
While this second aspect of the Dhamma makes it an attractive skill to master, the first aspect makes it hard to determine who has mastered the skill and is thus qualified to speak about it with authority.
After all, we can't look into the minds of others to see what qualities are there and what the internal results of the practice are.
At best, we can detect hints of these things in their actions, but nothing more.
Thus, if we look to others for the last word on the Dhamma, we will always be in a position of uncertainty.
The only way to overcome uncertainty is to practice the Dhamma to see if it brings about an end to suffering within our own minds.
Traditionally, the texts state that uncertainty about the Dhamma ends only with the attainment of stream-entry, the first of the four levels of Awakening.
Even though a person who has reached this level of Awakening isn't totally immersed in the ending of suffering, he or she has seen enough of the end of suffering to know without a doubt that that's where the practice of the Dhamma leads.
So it's not surprising that the four factors the suttas identify as bringing about stream-entry are also the four methods they recommend for ascertaining whether they themselves are a truly authoritative and authentic guide to the end of suffering.
Those factors, listed in SN., are:
Passages from the suttas dealing with each of these factors help show how the two sources of skill — the counsel of the wise and the lessons learned by observing the results of your own actions — can be properly balanced and integrated so as to ascertain what the true Dhamma is.
And because listening to the true Dhamma now includes reading the true Dhamma, a knowledge of these factors and their interrelationships gives guidance in how to read the suttas.
In particular, these factors show how the suttas themselves say they should be read, and what other actions provide the skillful context for getting the most benefit from reading them.
As you explore the explanations of these factors, you find that their presentation as a short list is deceptively simple, inasmuch as each factor contains elements of the other factors as well.
For instance, associating with people of integrity is of great help in practicing the Dhamma, but for a person to recognize people of genuine integrity requires that he or she have some prior experience in practicing the Dhamma.
Thus, although the form of the list suggests a simple linear progression, the individual factors of the list are interrelated in complex ways.
What this means in practice is that the process of ascertaining the Dhamma is a complex one, requiring sensitivity and discernment in balancing and integrating the factors in an appropriate way.
Because the Dhamma consists primarily of qualities of the mind, any written account of the Dhamma is only a pale shadow of the real thing.
Thus, to gain a sense of the Dhamma's full dimensions, you must find people who embody the Dhamma in their thoughts, words, and deeds, and associate with them in a way that enables you to absorb as much of the Dhamma as possible.
The passages explaining this factor thus offer advice in two areas: how to recognize people of integrity and how best to associate with them once you have found them.
The immediate sign of integrity is gratitude.
“A person of integrity is grateful and acknowledges the help given to him.
This gratitude, this acknowledgment is second nature among admirable people.
It is entirely on the level of people of integrity.
Gratitude is a necessary sign of integrity in that people who do not recognize and value the goodness and integrity in others are unlikely to make the effort to develop integrity within themselves.
On its own, though, gratitude doesn't constitute integrity.
The essence of integrity lies in three qualities: truth, harmlessness, and discernment.
“There is the case where a monk lives in dependence on a certain village or town.
Then a householder or householder's son goes to him and observes him with regard to three mental qualities — qualities based on greed, qualities based on aversion, qualities based on delusion: 'Are there in this venerable one any such qualities based on greed… aversion… delusion that, with his mind overcome by these qualities, he might say, “I know,” while not knowing, or say, “I see,” while not seeing; or that he might urge another to act in a way that was for his/her long-term harm and pain?' As he observes him, he comes to know, 'There are in this venerable one no such qualities… His bodily and verbal behavior are those of one not greedy… aversive… deluded.
And the Dhamma he teaches is deep, hard to see, hard to realize, tranquil, refined, beyond the scope of conjecture, subtle, to-be-experienced by the wise.” 
As this passage shows, knowledge of a person's truthfulness requires that you be so observant of his or her behavior that you can confidently infer the quality of his or her mind.
This level of confidence, in turn, requires that you not only be observant, but also discerning and willing to take time, for as another passage points out, the appearance of spiritual integrity is easy to fake.
Then King Pasenadi Kosala went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
Then seven coiled-hair ascetics, seven Jain ascetics, seven naked ascetics, seven one-cloth ascetics, and seven wanderers — their nails grown long, their body-hair grown long — walked past not far from the Blessed One… On seeing them, King Pasenadi arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, knelt down with his right knee on the ground, saluted the ascetics with his hands before his heart, and announced his name to them three times: “I am the king, venerable sirs, Pasenadi Kosala.
I am the king, venerable sirs, Pasenadi Kosala.
I am the king, venerable sirs, Pasenadi Kosala.” Then not long after the ascetics had passed, he returned to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “Of those in the world who are arahants or on the path to arahantship, are these among them?
“Your majesty, as a layman enjoying sensual pleasures, living crowded with wives and children, using Kasi fabrics and sandalwood, wearing garlands, scents, and creams, handling gold and silver: it is hard for you to know whether these are arahants or on the path to arahantship.
“It's through living together that a person's virtue may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who isn't discerning.
“It's through trading with a person that his purity may be known…
“It's through adversity that a person's endurance may be known…
“It's through discussion that a person's discernment may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who isn't discerning.
“How amazing, lord!
How awesome!
How well that was put by the Blessed One!… These men, lord, are my spies, my scouts, returning after going out through the countryside.
They go out first, and then I go.
Now, when they have scrubbed off the dirt and mud, are well-bathed and well-perfumed, have trimmed their hair and beards, and have put on white clothes, they will go about endowed and provided with the five strings of sensuality.
AN.
expands on these points, indicating that the ability to recognize a person of integrity requires you to have a strong sense of integrity yourself.
In fact, MN insists that you must be a person of integrity in your actions, views, and friendships if you are to recognize integrity in another.
Once you've determined to the best of your ability that certain people embody integrity, the suttas advise listening to their Dhamma, both to learn about them — to further test their integrity — and to learn from them, to gain a sense of what the Dhamma might be.
And again, the suttas recommend both how to listen to the Dhamma and how to recognize true Dhamma when you hear it.
MN advises that you spend time near people of integrity, develop a sense of respect for them, and pay close attention to their Dhamma.
SN.
and AN.
explain the purpose for respect here: it's a prerequisite for learning.
Neither passage elaborates on this point, but its truth is fairly obvious.
You find it easier to learn from someone you respect than from someone you don't.
Respect opens your mind and loosens your preconceived opinions to make room for new knowledge and skills.
At the same time, a person with a valuable teaching to offer will feel more inclined to teach it to someone who shows respect than to someone who doesn't.
However, respect doesn't necessarily mean giving your full approval to the teaching.
After all, part of the purpose in listening to the Dhamma is to test whether the person teaching it has integrity in his views or hers.
Full approval can come only when you've put the teaching in practice and tasted its results.
This is why the Vinaya, the monastic discipline, never requires that a student take vows of obedience to a teacher.
Here respect means, in the words of Sn., a lack of stubbornness.
Or, in the words of AN., “the patience to comply with the teaching”: the willingness to listen with an open mind and to take the time and effort needed to give any teachings that seem reasonable a serious try.
The reasonability of the teaching can be gauged by the central principle in views of integrity as explained above in MN.
That principle is conviction in kamma, the efficacy of human action: that people are responsible for their actions, that their intentions determine the quality — the skillfulness or unskillfulness — of their actions, that actions give results, and that the quality of the action determines the quality of the result.
A person who doesn't believe in these principles cannot be trusted.
Because the distinction between skillfulness and unskillfulness is central to the principle of kamma — and also to the project of putting an end to suffering and stress — MN recommends approaching potential teachers and asking them:
“What is skillful?
What is unskillful?
What is blameworthy?
What is blameless?
What should be cultivated?
What should not be cultivated?
What, having been done by me, will be for my long-term harm and suffering?
Or what, having been done by me, will be for my long-term welfare and happiness?
The texts give a few examples of what might be called the lowest common denominator for judging whether answers to this question embody integrity.
In essence, these teachings constitute “what works” in eliminating blatant levels of suffering and stress in one's life.
“Now what is unskillful?
Taking life is unskillful, taking what is not given… sexual misconduct… lying… abusive speech… divisive tale-bearing… idle chatter is unskillful.
Covetousness… ill will… wrong views are unskillful.
These things are termed unskillful.
“And what are the roots of unskillful things?
Greed is a root of unskillful things, aversion is a root of unskillful things, delusion is a root of unskillful things.
These are termed the roots of unskillful things.
“And what is skillful?
Abstaining from taking life is skillful, abstaining from taking what is not given… from sexual misconduct… from lying… from abusive speech… from divisive tale-bearing… abstaining from idle chatter is skillful.
Lack of covetousness… lack of ill will… right views are skillful.
These things are termed skillful.
“And what are the roots of skillful things?
Lack of greed is a root of skillful things, lack of aversion is a root of skillful things, lack of delusion is a root of skillful things.
These are termed the roots of skillful things.
“These three things have been promulgated by wise people, by people who are truly good.
Which three?
Generosity… going-forth… and service to one's mother and father.
These three things have been promulgated by wise people, by people who are truly good.
However, the true Dhamma has a dimension that goes far beyond the lowest common denominator.
To repeat the words of MN, it is “deep, hard to see, hard to realize, tranquil, refined, beyond the scope of conjecture, subtle, to-be-experienced by the wise.” The principle of skillfulness — of cause and effect that can be tested in your own actions — still applies in this dimension, but the standards for “what works” on this level are correspondingly subtler and more refined.
Two famous passages indicate what these standards are.
“Gotami, the dhammas of which you may know, 'These dhammas lead — to passion, not to dispassion; to being fettered, not to being unfettered; to accumulating, not to shedding; to self-aggrandizement, not to modesty; to discontent, not to contentment; to entanglement, not to seclusion; to laziness, not to aroused persistence; to being burdensome, not to being unburdensome': You may categorically hold, 'This is not the Dhamma, this is not the Vinaya, this is not the Teacher's instruction.'
“As for the dhammas of which you may know, 'These dhammas lead — to dispassion, not to passion; to being unfettered, not to being fettered; to shedding, not to accumulating; to modesty, not to self-aggrandizement; to contentment, not to discontent; to seclusion, not to entanglement; to aroused persistence, not to laziness; to being unburdensome, not to being burdensome': You may categorically hold, 'This is the Dhamma, this is the Vinaya, this is the Teacher's instruction.'
“Upali, the dhammas of which you may know, 'These dhammas do not lead to utter disenchantment, to dispassion, to cessation, to calm, to direct knowledge, to self-awakening, nor to Unbinding': You may categorically hold, 'This is not the Dhamma, this is not the Vinaya, this is not the Teacher's instruction.'
“As for the dhammas of which you may know, 'These dhammas lead to utter disenchantment, to dispassion, to cessation, to calm, to direct knowledge, to self-awakening, to Unbinding': You may categorically hold, 'This is the Dhamma, this is the Vinaya, this is the Teacher's instruction.'
AN.
expands on some of the principles in the first of these two passages.
But here we will focus on the points where these two passages intersect — in the requirement that the Dhamma lead to dispassion and to being unfettered — for the standard test for a genuine experience of Awakening is that it arises from dispassion and cuts the fetters of the mind.
“There are these ten fetters… Self-identity views, uncertainty, grasping at precepts and practices, sensual desire, and ill will.
These are the five lower fetters.
And which are the five higher fetters?
Passion for form, passion for what is formless, conceit, restlessness, and ignorance.
These are the five higher fetters.
As MN explains, stream-entry cuts the first three fetters; once-returning, the second level of Awakening, weakens passion, aversion, and delusion; non-returning, the third level, cuts the fetters of sensual desire and ill will; and arahantship, the final level of Awakening, cuts the remaining five.
Ultimately, of course, the only proof for whether a teaching leads in this direction comes when, having put the teaching into practice, you actually begin to cut these fetters from the mind.
But as a preliminary exercise, you can contemplate a teaching to make sense of it and to see if there are good reasons for believing that it will lead in the right direction.
“Hearing the Dhamma, one remembers it.
Remembering it, one penetrates the meaning of those dhammas.
Penetrating the meaning, one comes to an agreement through pondering those dhammas.
There being an agreement through pondering those dhammas, desire arises.
With the arising of desire, one becomes willing.
Willing, one contemplates.
The process of pondering, weighing, and comparing the teachings is based on adopting the right attitude and asking the right questions about them.
As AN.
points out, some of the teachings are meant to have their meaning inferred, whereas others are not, and to misapprehend which of these two classes a particular teaching belongs to is a serious mistake.
This is where the next factor for stream-entry plays a role.
MN draws the line between appropriate and inappropriate attention on the basis of the questions you choose to pursue in contemplating the Dhamma.
“There is the case where an uninstructed, run-of-the-mill person… doesn't discern what ideas are fit for attention, or what ideas are unfit for attention… This is how he attends inappropriately: 'Was I in the past?
Was I not in the past?
What was I in the past?
How was I in the past?
Having been what, what was I in the past?
Shall I be in the future?
Shall I not be in the future?
What shall I be in the future?
How shall I be in the future?
Having been what, what shall I be in the future?' Or else he is inwardly perplexed about the immediate present: 'Am I?
Am I not?
What am I?
How am I?
Where has this being come from?
Where is it bound?'
“As he attends inappropriately in this way, one of six kinds of view arises in him: The view I have a self arises in him as true and established, or the view I have no self… or the view It is precisely by means of self that I perceive self… or the view It is precisely by means of self that I perceive not-self… or the view It is precisely by means of not-self that I perceive self arises in him as true and established, or else he has a view like this: This very self of mine — the knower that is sensitive here and there to the ripening of good and bad actions — is the self of mine that is constant, everlasting, eternal, not subject to change, and will endure as long as eternity.
This is called a thicket of views, a wilderness of views, a contortion of views, a writhing of views, a fetter of views.
Bound by a fetter of views, the uninstructed run-of-the-mill person is not freed from birth, aging, and death, from sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, and despair.
He is not freed, I tell you, from stress.
“The well-instructed disciple of the noble ones… discerns what ideas are fit for attention, and what ideas are unfit for attention… He attends appropriately, This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the way leading to the cessation of stress.
As he attends appropriately in this way, three fetters are abandoned in him: self-identity views, doubt, and grasping at precepts and practices.
Some of the most useless controversies in the history of Buddhist thought have come from ignoring this teaching on what is and is not an appropriate object for attention.
Buddhists have debated fruitlessly for centuries, and continue to debate today, on how to define a person's identity — the answer to the question, “What am I?” — or whether a person does or doesn't have a self — the answer to the questions, “Am I?
Am I not?” The fruitlessness of these arguments has proven repeatedly the point made by this passage: that any answer to these questions leads to entanglement in the fetters that the Dhamma is meant to cut away.
To avoid these controversies, the passage recommends focusing on four truths that constitute the appropriate object for attention — stress, its origination, its cessation, and the way leading to its cessation.
These truths are directly related to the question of skillfulness, which divides reality into two sets of variables: cause and effect, skillful and unskillful.
The origination of stress is an unskillful cause, and stress its result.
The way leading to the cessation of stress is a skillful cause, and the cessation of stress its result.
To look at experience in these terms is to attend appropriately in a way that can help cut the fetters underlying unskillfulness in the mind.
For instance, SN.
defines the truth of stress as the five clinging-aggregates — clinging to form, feeling, perception, fabrications, and consciousness — and maintains that this truth should be comprehended in such a way as to lead to dispassion for the clinging.
This, too, is a function of appropriate attention.
“A virtuous monk should attend in an appropriate way to these five clinging-aggregates as inconstant, stressful, a disease, a cancer, an arrow, painful, an affliction, alien, a dissolution, an emptiness, not-self.
For it is possible that a virtuous monk, attending in an appropriate way to these five clinging-aggregates as inconstant… not-self, would realize the fruit of stream-entry.
Thus appropriate attention entails a way of looking at the Dhamma not only as it is presented in a teaching, but also as it presents itself directly as experience to the mind.
Once you've gained a sense of the Dhamma through appropriate attention, the remaining step is to practice in accordance with the Dhamma.
As with the first two factors for stream-entry, this process is twofold: adapting your actions to follow in line with the Dhamma, and refining your understanding of the Dhamma as it is tested in experience.
MN offers explicit instructions on how this is to be done.
“What do you think, Rahula: What is a mirror for?
“For reflection, sir.
“In the same way, Rahula, bodily acts, verbal acts, and mental acts are to be done with repeated reflection.
“Whenever you want to perform a bodily act, you should reflect on it: 'This bodily act I want to perform — would it lead to self-affliction, to the affliction of others, or to both?
Is it an unskillful bodily act, with painful consequences, painful results?' If, on reflection, you know that it would lead to self-affliction, to the affliction of others, or to both; it would be an unskillful bodily act with painful consequences, painful results, then any bodily act of that sort is absolutely unfit for you to do.
But if on reflection you know that it would not cause affliction… it would be a skillful bodily action with happy consequences, happy results, then any bodily act of that sort is fit for you to do.
“While you are performing a bodily act, you should reflect on it: 'This bodily act I am doing — is it leading to self-affliction, to the affliction of others, or to both?
Is it an unskillful bodily act, with painful consequences, painful results?' If, on reflection, you know that it is leading to self-affliction, to affliction of others, or both… you should give it up.
But if on reflection you know that it is not… you may continue with it.
“Having performed a bodily act, you should reflect on it… If, on reflection, you know that it led to self-affliction, to the affliction of others, or to both; it was an unskillful bodily act with painful consequences, painful results, then you should confess it, reveal it, lay it open to the Teacher or to a knowledgeable companion in the holy life.
Having confessed it… you should exercise restraint in the future.
But if on reflection you know that it did not lead to affliction… it was a skillful bodily action with happy consequences, happy results, then you should stay mentally refreshed and joyful, training day and night in skillful mental qualities.
“Having performed a mental act, you should reflect on it… If, on reflection, you know that it led to self-affliction, to the affliction of others, or to both; it was an unskillful mental act with painful consequences, painful results, then you should feel distressed, ashamed, and disgusted with it.
Feeling distressed… you should exercise restraint in the future.
But if on reflection you know that it did not lead to affliction… it was a skillful mental action with happy consequences, happy results, then you should stay mentally refreshed and joyful, training day and night in skillful mental qualities.
The process of self-examination recommended in this passage includes the principles discussed under the first three factors for stream-entry.
You pay appropriate attention to your own intentions and actions, and to their results, to see whether they qualify as skillful or unskillful.
If you notice that any of your bodily or verbal actions have led to harmful results, you approach a person of integrity and listen to his/her advice.
In this way you combine the two principles that Iti & recommend as the most helpful internal and external principles for awakening: appropriate attention and friendship with admirable people.
It is no coincidence that these are precisely the two principles recommended in the discourse to the Kalamas.
Self-examination of this sort, however, shares yet another feature with the first factor for stream-entry: the need for integrity.
Just as your integrity is a prerequisite for your ability to detect integrity in others, so it is a prerequisite for your ability to gauge the true nature of your intentions and the results of your actions.
These are commonly the two areas of experience where people are least honest with themselves.
Yet, for your practice to accord with the Dhamma, you must resist any habitual tendency to be less than totally scrupulous about them.
This is why, as a preface to the above advice, the sutta shows the Buddha lecturing on the importance of truthfulness as the most essential quality for a person on the path.
Although Rahula reportedly received the above advice when he was a child, MN maintains that the principles it contains can lead all the way to full Awakening.
This means, of course, that they can lead to the first level of Awakening, which is stream-entry.
Stream-entry is often called the arising of the Dhamma eye.
What stream-enterers see with this Dhamma eye is always expressed in the same terms: “Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.” A passage in the Vinaya shows that the concept “all that is subject to origination” occurs in conjunction with a glimpse of what stands in opposition to “all that is subject to origination” — in other words, the Unfabricated: deathlessness.
Sariputta the Wanderer went to where Moggallana the Wanderer was staying.
Moggallana the Wanderer saw him coming from afar and, on seeing him.
said, “Your faculties are bright, my friend; your complexion pure & clear.
Could it be that you have attained the Deathless?
“Yes, my friend, I have…
The suttas describe the experience of the Deathless in only the sketchiest terms.
What little description there is, is intended to show that the Deathless lies beyond most linguistic categories.
However, there are a few indicators to show what the Deathless is not.
To begin with, it cannot be described as a state of either being nor non-being.
With the remainderless stopping and fading of the six spheres of contact is it the case that there is anything else?
Sariputta: Don't say that, my friend.
MahaKotthita: With the remainderless stopping and fading of the six spheres of contact, is it the case that there is not anything else?
Sariputta: Don't say that, my friend.
MahaKotthita:…is it the case that there both is and is not anything else?
Sariputta: Don't say that, my friend.
MahaKotthita:…is it the case that there neither is nor is not anything else?
Sariputta: Don't say that, my friend.
MahaKotthita: Being asked… if there is anything else, you say, 'Don't say that, my friend.' Being asked… if there is not anything else… if there both is and is not anything else… if there neither is nor is not anything else, you say, 'Don't say that, my friend.' Now, how is the meaning of this statement to be understood?
Sariputta: Saying… is it the case that there is anything else… is it the case that there is not anything else… is it the case that there both is and is not anything else… is it the case that there neither is nor is not anything else, one is objectifying non-objectification.
However far the six spheres of contact go, that is how far objectification goes.
However far objectification goes, that is how far the six spheres of contact go.
With the remainderless fading and stopping of the six spheres of contact, there comes to be the stopping, the allaying of objectification.
Second, the dimension of the Deathless is not devoid of awareness, although the awareness here must by definition lie apart from the consciousness included in the five aggregates of fabricated experience.
“Monks, that dimension should be known where the eye stops and the perception of form fades.
That dimension should be known where the ear stops and the perception of sound fades… where the nose stops and the perception of aroma fades… where the tongue stops and the perception of flavor fades… where the body stops and the perception of tactile sensation fades… where the intellect stops and the perception of idea/phenomenon fades: That dimension should be known.
“Having directly known the extent of designation and the extent of the objects of designation, the extent of expression and the extent of the objects of expression, the extent of description and the extent of the objects of description, the extent of discernment and the extent of the objects of discernment, the extent to which the cycle revolves: Having directly known that, the monk is released.
'The monk released, having directly known that, does not see, does not know is his opinion,' that would be mistaken.'
“Consciousness without feature, without end, luminous all around, does not partake of the solidity of earth, the liquidity of water, the radiance of fire, the windiness of wind, the divinity of devas the allness of the All.
“Even so, Vaccha, any form… feeling… perception… fabrication… consciousness by which one describing the Tathagata would describe him: That the Tathagata has abandoned, its root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
Freed from the classification of form… feeling… perception… fabrication… consciousness, Vaccha, the Tathagata is deep, boundless, hard to fathom, like the sea.
“Freed, dissociated, and released from ten things, Bahuna, the Tathagata dwells with unrestricted awareness.
Which ten?
Freed, dissociated, and released from form, the Tathagata dwells with unrestricted awareness.
Freed, dissociated, and released from feeling… from perception… from fabrications… from consciousness… from birth… from aging… from death… from stress… Freed, dissociated, and released from defilement, the Tathagata dwells with unrestricted awareness.
“Just as a red, blue, or white lotus born in the water and growing in the water, rises up above the water and stands with no water adhering to it, in the same way the Tathagata — freed, dissociated, and released from these ten things — dwells with unrestricted awareness.
These are not the words of a person who has found release in unconsciousness.
Finally, although the Deathless is sometimes called consciousness without feature, without end, it is not to be confused with the formless stage of concentration called the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
One of the main differences between the two is that the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness is fabricated and willed.
The element of will, though, can be very attenuated while one is in that dimension, and only discernment at an extremely subtle level can ferret it out.
One way of testing for it is to see if there is any sense of identification with the knowing.
If there is, then there is still the conceit of I-making and my-making applied to that state.
Another test is to see if there is any sense that the knowing contains all things or is their source.
If there is, then there is still fabrication in that state of mind, for when the Deathless is fully comprehended, the sense of unrestricted awareness as containing or acting as the source of other things is seen to be an ignorant conceit.
“There is the case, monks, where an uninstructed run-of-the-mill person… perceives Unbinding as Unbinding.
Perceiving Unbinding as Unbinding, he conceives things about Unbinding, he conceives things in Unbinding, he conceives things coming out of Unbinding, he conceives Unbinding as 'mine,' he delights in Unbinding.
Why is that?
Because he has not comprehended it, I tell you…
“A monk who is an arahant, devoid of mental fermentations — who has attained completion, finished the task, laid down the burden, attained the true goal, destroyed the fetters of becoming, and is released through right knowledge… directly knows Unbinding as Unbinding.
Directly knowing Unbinding as Unbinding, he does not conceive things about Unbinding, does not conceive things in Unbinding, does not conceive things coming out of Unbinding, does not conceive Unbinding as 'mine,' does not delight in Unbinding.
Why is that?
Because he has comprehended it, I tell you.
However, in line with the instructions to Gotami and Upali, the true test of an experience of stream-entry is not in its description, but in the results it produces.
The texts describe these in two ways: four factors that characterize a person who has entered the stream, and three fetters that stream-entry automatically cuts.
The four factors, according to AN., unwavering conviction in the Buddha, unwavering conviction in the Dhamma, unwavering conviction in the Sangha, and “virtues that are appealing to the noble ones — untorn, unbroken, unspotted, unsplattered, liberating, praised by the wise, untarnished, leading to concentration.” The three fetters are: self-identity views, doubt, and grasping at precepts and practices.
The two lists have their common ground in the experience of the path to stream-entry.
As the path — the noble eightfold path — yields to the fruit of stream-entry, you see that although ordinary action can lead to pleasant, unpleasant, or mixed results on the level of fabricated experience, the noble eightfold path is a form of action that produces none of these results, but instead leads to the end of action.
This experience cuts through any doubt about the truth of the Buddha's Awakening, thus ensuring that your conviction in the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha will not waver.
Having seen the results that ordinary actions do have on the fabricated level, however, you wouldn't dare transgress the five precepts that embody the virtues appealing to the noble ones.
Still, because the Deathless is the end of action, you don't grasp at precepts and practices as the goal in and of themselves.
And because you have seen the aggregates of form, feeling, perception, fabrication, and consciousness fade away in the experience of the Deathless, you would never construct an identity view around them.
Although the traditional lists of the results of stream-entry provide stringent standards for judging one's own attainment, the texts — and living Buddhist traditions today — record many instances of people who have over-estimated their attainment.
Thus when you have what seems to be an attainment of this sort, you have to examine it carefully and test the mind to see if the three fetters are actually cut.
And because the attainment itself is what proves or disproves the authority and authenticity of the texts, as well as the integrity of your teachers, you are ultimately left with only one guarantee of your attainment: your own integrity, which you hope has been adequately developed along the path.
In keeping with the principle that the Dhamma is ultimately a quality of the mind as embodied in the entire person, the only way you can ultimately gauge the truth of the Dhamma is if you as a person are true.
Because the attainment of stream-entry can make such an enormous difference in your life, it is worth every ounce of integrity needed to attain it and to ascertain the attainment.
Then the Blessed One, picking up a little bit of dust with the tip of his fingernail, said to the monks, “What do you think, monks?
Which is greater: the little bit of dust I have picked up with the tip of my fingernail, or the great earth?
“The great earth is far greater, lord.
The little bit of dust the Blessed One has picked up with the tip of his fingernail is next to nothing.
It's not a hundredth, a thousandth, a one hundred-thousandth… when compared with the great earth.
“In the same way, monks, for a disciple of the noble ones who is consummate in view, an individual who has broken through, the suffering and stress totally ended and extinguished is far greater.
That which remains in the state of having at most seven remaining lifetimes is next to nothing: it's not a hundredth, a thousandth, a one hundred-thousandth, when compared with the previous mass of suffering.
That's how great the benefit is of breaking through to the Dhamma, monks.
That's how great the benefit is of obtaining the Dhamma eye.
For a person who has been relieved of this much suffering, the question of the historical Buddha becomes irrelevant.
If the genuine Deathless is not the historical Buddha's attainment, it's what a genuine Buddha would have attained.
The Dhamma leading to this attainment could not have come from anyone else.
As SN.
quotes the Buddha as saying, “One who sees the Dhamma sees me,” i.e., the aspect of the Buddha that really matters, the aspect signaling that total freedom, the total end of suffering, is an attainable goal.
These are audacious claims, and they obviously require an approach more audacious than the historical method to test them.
As the suttas indicate, nothing less than genuine integrity of character, developed through careful training and practice, will suffice.
Given that “dhamma” means both teaching and quality of mind, it stands to reason that truth of character is needed to measure the truth of the teaching.
Only true people can know the truth of the suttas' claims.
This may seem an exclusionary or elitist thing to say, but actually it's not.
The sort of education needed to master the historical method isn't open to everyone, but integrity is — if you want to develop it.
The suttas say that the best things in life are available to those who are true.
The only question is whether you're true enough to want to know if they're right.
The Buddha's teachings, like the principles they describe, are inter-related in complex ways.
It is difficult to point out any one teaching that underlies everything else, as all the teachings are mutually dependent.
Nevertheless, there are a number of possible entry points into their pattern, and one of those points is the Buddha's observation that it is possible to master a skill.
Unlike many of his contemporaries — and many thinkers before and since — the Buddha did not try to reason from abstract principles down to direct experience.
As we noted in the Introduction, the Buddha's contemporaries were influenced by the premier science of their time — astronomy — in the way they viewed experience, and it is easy to see prejudices derived from astronomy at work in their thought: that the universe is composed of discrete bodies acting in line with regular, linear causes; and that human knowledge of these processes has no impact on the way they behave.
These prejudices, when applied to human experience, resulted in what the Buddha called theories of being, or what we today would call theories of order: that the processes of the universe can be totally explained in terms of physical principles that follow linear causal patterns unaffected by human intervention.
The various conclusions that developed out of this approach differed primarily in how one's soul — viewed in various ways either as a discrete thing or as a more abstract principle — was to look for release from this vast cosmic machine.
Some insisted that action was illusory; others, that action was real but totally determined by fixed rules, serving only to bind one to the impersonal cycle.
In reaction to the theories of being, the Lokayatans proposed a theory of non-being or absolute chaos that, like all reactionary ideologies, was defined largely by what it denied.
Although it admitted the primacy of the physical universe, it denied that any causal laws operated on the observable, human level.
Everything, the Lokayatans said, was totally spontaneous, random, and chaotic.
No personal souls were observable, and thus human identity was composed only of the temporary conjunction of elements that made up the body, terminating when those elements separated at death.
In a manner typical of his approach to problems, the Buddha avoided both sides of this argument by focusing directly on the level of immediate experience and exploring the implications of truths that both sides overlooked.
Instead of fixing on the content of the views expressed, he considered the actions of those who were expressing the views.
The logic either of total determinism or of total chaos must end in the conclusion that purposeful action is pointless, and yet adherents of both schools continued to act in purposeful ways.
The fact that each side advanced an interpretation of reality implied that both agreed that there were skillful and unskillful ways of approaching the truth, for each insisted that the other used unskillful forms of observation and argumentation to advance its views.
Thus the Buddha looked directly at skillful action in and of itself, worked out its implications in viewing knowledge itself as a skill — rather than a body of facts — and found that those implications carried him all the way to release.
We have already touched on how implications drawn from the fact of skillful action shaped the major outlines of the Buddha's teachings.
It will be useful to review those implications here.
To begin with, the fact that skills can be developed implies that action is not illusory, that it actually gives results.
Otherwise, there would be no such thing as skill, for no actions would be more effective than others.
The fact of skillfulness also implies that some results are preferable to others, for otherwise there would be no point in trying to develop skills.
In addition, the fact that it is possible to learn from mistakes in the course of developing a skill, so that one's future actions may be more skillful, implies that the cycle of action, result, and reaction is not entirely deterministic, and that acts of perception, attention, and intention can actually provide new input as the cycle goes through successive turns.
The important element in this input is attention.
Anyone who has mastered a skill will realize that the process of attaining mastery requires attention to three things: to pre-existing conditions, to what one is doing in relation to those conditions, and to the results that come from one's actions.
This threefold focus enables one to monitor one's actions and adjust them accordingly.
In this way, one's attention to conditions, actions, and effects allows the results of an action to feed back into future action, thus allowing for refinement in one's skill.
By working out the implications of these requirements, the Buddha arrived at the principle of this/that conditionality, in which multiple feedback loops — sensitive to pre-existing conditions, to present input, and to their combined outcome — account for the incredible complexity of the world of experience in a way similar to that of modern theories of “deterministic chaos.” In this sense, even though this/that conditionality may seem somewhat alien when viewed in the abstract, it is actually a very familiar but overlooked assumption that underlies all conscious, purposeful action.
The Buddha simply explored the implications of this assumption much further than anyone else, all the way to the disbanding of space, time, and the present, together with their inherent stress.
These implications of the fact of skillfulness account for the main framework of the Buddha's doctrine as expressed in the teachings on the four noble truths, dependent co-arising, and this/that conditionality.
Other facets of skillful action also account for more detailed points within this framework.
For instance, the Buddha's exploration of stress and its origination, in the light of skillful action, provided the analysis of mental and physical events that played a central role in the second noble truth as expressed in terms of dependent co-arising.
The first lesson of skillfulness is that the essence of an action lies in the intention motivating it: an act motivated by the intention for greater skillfulness will give results different from those of an act motivated by greed, aversion, or delusion.
Intention, in turn, is influenced by the appropriateness or inappropriateness of the act of attention to one's circumstances.
The less an act of attention is clouded by delusion, the more clearly it will see things in appropriate terms.
The combination of attention and intention in turn determines the quality of the feeling and the physical events that result from the act.
The more skilled the action, the more refined the feelings and physical events that result.
Perceptions arise with regard to those results, some more appropriate than others.
The act of attention selects which ones to focus on, thus feeding back into another round in the cycle of action, with all its inherent instabilities and uncertainties.
Underlying the entire cycle is the fact that all its factors are in contact with consciousness.
This constellation of factors came to form the central causal connection in one of the Buddha's most basic formulations of dependent co-arising, in which the mutual dependence of “name” and “form” on the one hand, and consciousness on the other, accounted for the arising of all stress.
The interplay of name, form, and consciousness also plays a role in the formulation of the third and fourth noble truths, providing an answer to the quandary of how the stress and suffering inherent in the cycle of action can be ended.
If one tried simply to stop the cycle through a direct intention, the intention itself would count as a factor to keep the cycle going.
This double bind can be dissolved, however, if one can watch as the contact between consciousness and the cycle naturally falls away.
This possibility requires, not an attempt at inaction, but even greater skillfulness in all the factors of action.
Convinced that the only way to true happiness would be to find a way out of the cycle, that there had to be such a way, and that this was it, the Bodhisatta developed each of the factors of skillful action to an even higher degree of skill.The most skillful form of attention, he discovered, was to view all of experience in terms of the four noble truths: stress, its origination, its cessation, and the path of practice leading to its cessation.
These truths not only formed his most basic teaching, but also played a role in the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress, as the factor of right view.
The most skillful form of intention was to engage in the directed thoughts and evaluations that would lead the mind to the stillness of mental absorption.
These factors played a role both as aspects of the path factor of right concentration and as the highest form of path factor of right resolve.
The most refined forms of feeling and perception were the feelings of pleasure and equanimity and their accompanying levels of perception in the highest states of mental absorption, later included in the path factor of right concentration as well.
The Wings to Awakening — as alternate expressions of the path to the cessation of stress — are also shaped by the implications of the fact of skillfulness.
These implications account directly for the main factors in the Wings — the qualities of equanimity, concentration, and discernment that are needed to develop skillfulness — and indirectly for all the other qualities on which these qualities depend.
As expressed in the non-linear pattern of this/that conditionality, these implications also account for the way in which the factors in the Wings must act as supports for one another in a pattern of mutual feedback.
And, in the most general terms, the fact that skillfulness leads ultimately to a dimension where skillfulness is transcended, accounts for a paradoxical dynamic common to all seven sets that form the Wings: the meditator must intentionally make use of qualities from which he/she wants to escape, gaining familiarity with them in the course of mastering them to the point where they are naturally stilled.
There the transcendent paths and their fruitions take over.
This is the sense in which even the path of right practice must eventually be abandoned, but only after it has been brought to the culmination of its development.
Many people have misunderstood this point, believing that the Buddha's teachings on non-attachment require that one relinquish one's attachment to the path of practice as quickly as possible.
Actually, to make a show of abandoning the path before it is fully developed is to abort the entire practice.
As one teacher has put it, a person climbing up to a roof by means of a ladder can let go of the ladder only when safely on the roof.
In terms of the famous raft simile, one abandons the raft only after crossing the flood.
If one were to abandon it in mid-flood, to make a show of going spontaneously with the flow of the flood's many currents, one could drown.
When the factors of the path are mutually brought to a state of consummation, however, there occurs a point of equipoise called “non-fashioning”, in which their contact with consciousness — still fully conscious — naturally becomes disengaged.
In terms of chaos theory, this compares to a point of “resonance,” where the equations defining a non-linear system interact in such a way that one of their members is divided by zero, meaning that anything entering such a point would be undefined in terms of the system, and so released.
The moon, for instance, if it entered one of the resonances in the combined gravitational fields of the earth and the sun, would be freed from its orbit around both.
And just as the forces of gravity would be required to bring the moon to this freedom from gravity, in the same way the path of skillful action would be required to bring the mind to the point of non-fashioning, where the cycle of action is brought to an end.
This is how all experience of stress, suffering, and the entire cosmos conditioned by time and the present is brought to an end as well, leaving the limitless freedom of “consciousness without feature”, the endpoint of all human striving.
Thus we can say that the Dhamma — in terms of doctrine, practice, and attainment — derives from the fully explored implications of one observation: that it is possible to master a skill.
This point is reflected not only in the content of the Buddha's teachings, but also in the way they are expressed.
The Buddha used many metaphors, explicit and implicit, citing the skills of craftsmen, artists, and athletes to illustrate his points.
The texts abound with explicit similes referring to acrobats, archers, bathmen, butchers, carpenters, farmers, fletchers, herdsmen, musicians, painters, etc., pointing out how their skills correspond either to the way the mind fashions stress and suffering for itself, or to the skills a meditator needs to develop in order to master the path to release.
On the implicit level, the passages dealing with meditation are filled with terms derived from music theory.
In his younger days as a prince, the Bodhisatta — like other young aristocrats of his time — was undoubtedly a connoisseur of the musical arts, and so was naturally familiar with the theory that lay behind them.
Because the terminology of this theory is so pervasive in the teachings he formulated as a Buddha, it will be useful to discuss it here briefly.
Unfortunately, we do not have a full treatise on the theory of musical performance as practiced during the Buddha's time, but there are enough references to music scattered through the texts for us to piece together the outlines of that theory.
The first step in performance was to tune one's instrument, “establishing” one's tonic note to make it on-pitch, then to fine-tune or attune the remaining notes of the scale in relation to the tonic.
This required a great deal of skill, sensitivity, and some mathematical knowledge, as the well-tempered scale had not yet been developed, and many different ways of calculating the scale were in use, each appropriate to a different emotion.
The musician then picked up the theme of the composition.
The theme functioned in several ways, and thus the word “theme” carried several meanings.
On the one hand it was the essential message of the piece, the image or impression that the performer wanted to leave in the listener's mind.
On the other hand, it was the governing principle that determined what ornamentation or variations would be suitable to the piece.
These musical terms recur throughout the Buddha's discussion of meditation.
For instance, in one context the Buddha says that one should establish one's persistence to the right pitch, attune the remaining faculties to that pitch, and then pick up one's theme.
In other contexts, he says that one should become attuned to a particular theme, or that one should develop meditation in tune with a particular object.
Impossibilities are said to be “non-base,” analogous to tones that cannot function as musical notes.
There are enough passages to show that the Buddha used this terminology conscious of its musical connotations, and that he wanted to make the point that the practice of meditation was similar to the art of musical performance.
We should thus try to be sensitive to these terms and their implications, for the comparison between music and meditation is a useful one.
In the most general sense, this comparison underlines the fact that the knowledge needed for release from suffering is the same sort as that involved in mastering a skill — a continued focus on the present, a sensitivity to one's context, one's own actions, and their combined consequences, rather than a command of an abstract body of facts.
To develop the path is to become more and more sensitive to the present — in particular, more sensitive to one's own sensitivity and its consequences.
This is similar to the way in which a musician must learn to listen to his/her own performance, a process that ultimately involves listening to the quality of one's listening itself.
The greater one's sensitivity in listening, the more profound one's performances become.
In the same way, the greater one's sensitivity to one's own mind in the development of skillful qualities, the more one abandons the causes of suffering and realizes its cessation.
In addition to this general observation, the comparison between music and meditation highlights a number of practical points in the development of meditative skill.
First, it underscores the need for flexibility and ingenuity in the practice, tempered by an awareness of the limits of how far that flexibility can go.
A skilled musician in the Buddha's time had to master not one but many tuning systems so as to handle a full range of musical themes, while simultaneously knowing which ways of tuning were unworkable.
In the same way, a skilled meditator should know of many valid ways of tuning the mind to the theme of its meditation — and should have a command of them all so as to deal with various contingencies as they arise — but at the same time must be aware that some varieties of meditation simply do not lead to Awakening.
In this light, the seven sets of the Wings to Awakening can be viewed as the Buddha's complete list of workable systems for tuning the mind.
recognized in the Buddha's time.) The implication here is that any path of practice deviating from these systems would be like an instrument tuned to a discordant scale, and would not be in harmony with the way of the contemplative who aims at a life in tune with the Dhamma.
A second point is that the musical analogy makes vivid the need for balance in meditative practice, a lesson that appears repeatedly in the texts.
Just as a musical instrument should neither be too sharp nor too flat, the mind on the path has to find a balance between excessive energy and excessive stillness.
At the same time, it must constantly watch out for the tendency for its energy to slacken in the same way that stringed instruments tend to go flat.
The “rightness” of right view and other factors of the path thus carries the connotation not only of being correct, but also of being “just right.
A third point is that this analogy helps clarify passages in the texts that speak of attaining the goal without effort.
Taken out of context, these passages seem to contradict or totally negate the many other passages that focus on the need for effort in the practice.
Viewed in context of the music analogy, however, they make perfect sense.
Like a musical virtuoso, one develops skill to the point where it becomes effortless, but the perfection of the skill does not negate the fact that it took a great deal of effort to reach that level of mastery.
In fact, the Buddha's path is a meta-skill — the full art or science of skillfulness, in and of itself — in which one focuses on the mind as the source of what is skillful and unskillful, learns to deal skillfully with unskillful states of mind, then to deal more skillfully even with skillful states to the point of focusing not on the skill, but on the skill of acquiring a skill, so that one ultimately sees what lies both in the skillfulness and beyond.
The passages included in this first section cover three themes: how the distinction between what is skillful and not is fundamental to the practice; how to determine what is skillful and not; and how to become skillful in developing skillful states of mind.
Because these issues are so basic, the passages are fairly self-explanatory.
A few of their facets, however, are easy to overlook.
First, it is important to note that the definition of skillful states of mind as free of greed, aversion, and delusion, provides a convenient rule of thumb for distinguishing between intentions that are merely good and those that are actually skillful.
Sometimes good intentions are colored by ignorance, as when one tries to help another person without knowing the true source of that person's problem.
This would qualify as a good but not a skillful intention.
As we have noted, the processes of causality are sensitive and complex.
Thus there is no getting by on well-meaning intentions alone.
One must monitor one's actions continually to make sure that they are, in fact, appropriate to the present situation and not based on ignorance.
Delusion, even well-meaning delusion, is a source for unskillful acts.
For this reason, one needs to be constantly observant of one's actions and their effects so that one's good intentions can truly become skillful, and one's actions can actually do justice to the specific conditions in the here and now produced by the process of this/that conditionality.
Second, the distinction between skillful and unskillful provides an insightful explanation for the causes for good and evil behavior.
This distinction is not limited to the values of any particular society, and it avoids the issue of whether beings are inherently good or bad.
When people act in evil ways, it is because they lack skill in the way they think; when they think in skillful ways, they naturally will do good.
Because skill is something that can be acquired, the way to goodness is open for all people who want to be good, no matter how badly they have behaved in the past.
The Canon tells of people who had committed misdeeds and, upon realizing their mistakes, confessed them to the Buddha.
The most striking instance was King Ajatasattu, who had killed his father in order to secure his position on the throne.
In spite of the gross nature of the deed, the Buddha approved of the king's confession, and — instead of playing on any feelings of guilt the king might have had — encouraged him in his determination to mend his ways, adding that it is a cause for progress in the noble way if one realizes one's mistakes as such and resolves not to repeat them.
Thus it is always possible to make a fresh start in life, aware of one's past bad kamma and resolving to mend one's ways, unburdened with any feelings that one might be inherently unworthy or bad.
Third, it is important to note the two basic factors, internal and external, that enable one to tell what is skillful and unskillful.
The main internal factor is “appropriate attention,” which is well illustrated in §.
One learns to view one's thoughts objectively, without partiality, in terms of their actual consequences.
As this factor develops from a sense of conviction in the principle of kamma, it turns into the ability to view all of experience in terms of the four noble truths.
The main external factor is friendship with admirable people, defined as those who live by the principle of kamma.
From their teachings, one can learn the advisability of trying to develop skillfulness in the first place; in their behavior, one can see skillfulness in action.
These internal and external factors reinforce one another, in that skillful attitudes lead one to seek out admirable people to begin with, and admirable people lead one by word and example to see the less obvious advantages of skillful attitudes.
Fortunately, every human being alive has some skillful qualities in his or her mind, as well as access to people who are admirable on at least some level.
Thus no one consciously starting on the Buddhist path is starting from scratch.
Rather, each person is advised to make the most of opportunities that have already been present and to search for further opportunities to develop the mind in a skillful direction.
The two prerequisites for skillfulness are amplified in §.
The discourse from which this passage comes — the Discourse to the Kalamas — is often referred to as the Buddha's charter of free inquiry, because of the emphasis it lays on seeing the truth for oneself, without reliance on outside authority.
This interpretation, however, misses one of the important clauses in the discourse, where the Buddha says that one must take note of what wise people censure and praise.
In other words, one must check one's own perceptions against those of people of upright character and solid experience, for until one gains Awakening, one's perceptions are bound to be partial and biased.
This is why the Buddha says that friendship with admirable people — which begins with the ability to recognize admirable people — is the whole of the life of practice.
The interaction between appropriate attention and friendship with admirable people in mastering skillful mental qualities is well-illustrated in §.
This passage, in which the Buddha shortly after his Awakening is instructing his seven-year-old son, shows very explicitly how one develops appropriate attention by reflecting on the consequences of one's actions before, while, and after acting.
If one realizes, after acting, that what looked like a proper action before and while acting actually turned out to have unfavorable consequences, one should confess the mistake to one's experienced friends on the path.
This allows one to benefit from their counsel and also to make public one's resolve not to make the same mistake again.
In this way, although one is responsible for treading the path oneself, one can benefit from the wisdom and encouragement of those already familiar with the way.
Before my self-awakening, when I was still just an unawakened Bodhisatta, the thought occurred to me: 'Why don't I keep dividing my thinking into two classes?' So I made thinking imbued with sensuality, thinking imbued with ill will, & thinking imbued with harmfulness one class, and thinking imbued with renunciation, thinking imbued with non-ill will, & thinking imbued with harmlessness another class.
And as I remained thus heedful, ardent, & resolute, thinking imbued with sensuality arose in me.
I discerned that 'Thinking imbued with sensuality has arisen in me; and that leads to my own affliction or to the affliction of others or to the affliction of both.
It obstructs discernment, promotes vexation, & does not lead to Unbinding.'
As I noticed that it leads to my own affliction, it subsided.
As I noticed that it leads to the affliction of others… to the affliction of both… it obstructs discernment, promotes vexation, & does not lead to Unbinding, it subsided.
Whenever thinking imbued with sensuality had arisen, I simply abandoned it, destroyed it, dispelled it, wiped it out of existence.

Whatever a monk keeps pursuing with his thinking & pondering, that becomes the inclination of his awareness.
If a monk keeps pursuing thinking imbued with sensuality, abandoning thinking imbued with renunciation, his mind is bent by that thinking imbued with sensuality.

Just as in the last month of the Rains, in the autumn season when the crops are ripening, a cowherd would look after his cows: he would tap & poke & check & curb them with a stick on this side & that.
Why is that?
Because he foresees flogging or imprisonment or a fine or public censure arising from that.
In the same way I foresaw in unskillful qualities drawbacks, degradation, & defilement, and I foresaw in skillful qualities rewards related to renunciation & promoting cleansing.
And as I remained thus heedful, ardent, & resolute, thinking imbued with renunciation arose in me.
I discerned that 'Thinking imbued with renunciation has arisen in me; and that leads neither to my own affliction, nor to the affliction of others, nor to the affliction of both.
It fosters discernment, promotes lack of vexation, & leads to Unbinding.
If I were to think & ponder in line with that even for a night… even for a day… even for a day & night, I do not envision any danger that would come from it, except that thinking & pondering a long time would tire the body.
When the body is tired, the mind is disturbed; and a disturbed mind is far from concentration.' So I steadied my mind right within, settled, unified, & concentrated it.
Why is that?
So that my mind would not be disturbed.

Whatever a monk keeps pursuing with his thinking & pondering, that becomes the inclination of his awareness.
If a monk keeps pursuing thinking imbued with renunciation, abandoning thinking imbued with sensuality, his mind is bent by that thinking imbued with renunciation.

Just as in the last month of the hot season, when all the crops have been gathered into the village, a cowherd would look after his cows: while resting under the shade of a tree or out in the open, he simply keeps himself mindful of 'those cows.' In the same way, I simply kept myself mindful of 'those mental qualities.'
Unflagging persistence was aroused in me, and unmuddled mindfulness established.
My body was calm & unaroused, my mind concentrated & single.
Quite secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful qualities, I entered & remained in the first jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
With the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, I entered & remained in the second jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
With the fading of rapture I remained equanimous, mindful, & alert, and sensed pleasure with the body.
I entered & remained in the third jhāna, of which the noble ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' With the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of joys & distresses — I entered & remained in the fourth jhāna: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor pain.
When the mind was thus concentrated, purified, bright, unblemished, rid of defilement, pliant, malleable, steady, & attained to imperturbability, I directed it to the knowledge of recollecting my past lives.
I recollected my manifold past lives, i.e., one birth, two… five, ten… fifty, a hundred, a thousand, a hundred thousand, many aeons of cosmic contraction, many aeons of cosmic expansion, many aeons of cosmic contraction & expansion: 'There I had such a name, belonged to such a clan, had such an appearance.
Such was my food, such my experience of pleasure & pain, such the end of my life.
Passing away from that state, I re-arose there.
There too I had such a name, belonged to such a clan, had such an appearance.
Such was my food, such my experience of pleasure & pain, such the end of my life.
Passing away from that state, I re-arose here.' Thus I remembered my manifold past lives in their modes & details.
This was the first knowledge I attained in the first watch of the night.
Ignorance was destroyed; knowledge arose; darkness was destroyed; light arose — as happens in one who is heedful, ardent, & resolute.
When the mind was thus concentrated, purified, bright, unblemished, rid of defilement, pliant, malleable, steady, & attained to imperturbability, I directed it to the knowledge of the passing away & reappearance of beings.
I saw — by means of the divine eye, purified & surpassing the human — beings passing away & re-appearing, and I discerned how they are inferior & superior, beautiful & ugly, fortunate & unfortunate in accordance with their kamma: 'These beings — who were endowed with bad conduct of body, speech & mind, who reviled the noble ones, held wrong views and undertook actions under the influence of wrong views — with the breakup of the body, after death, have re-appeared in the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, in hell.
But these beings — who were endowed with good conduct of body, speech, & mind, who did not revile the noble ones, who held right views and undertook actions under the influence of right views — with the breakup of the body, after death, have re-appeared in the good destinations, in the heavenly world.' Thus — by means of the divine eye, purified & surpassing the human — I saw beings passing away & re-appearing, and I discerned how they are inferior & superior, beautiful & ugly, fortunate & unfortunate in accordance with their kamma.
This was the second knowledge I attained in the second watch of the night.
Ignorance was destroyed; knowledge arose; darkness was destroyed; light arose — as happens in one who is heedful, ardent, & resolute.
When the mind was thus concentrated, purified, bright, unblemished, rid of defilement, pliant, malleable, steady, & attained to imperturbability, I directed it to the knowledge of the ending of the effluents.
I discerned, as it had come to be, that 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the way leading to the cessation of stress… These are effluents… This is the origination of effluents… This is the cessation of effluents… This is the way leading to the cessation of effluents.' My heart, thus knowing, thus seeing, was released from the effluent of sensuality, released from the effluent of becoming, released from the effluent of ignorance.
With release, there was the knowledge, 'Released.' I discerned that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'
This was the third knowledge I attained in the third watch of the night.
Ignorance was destroyed; knowledge arose; darkness was destroyed; light arose — as happens in one who is heedful, ardent, & resolute.
As they were sitting to one side, the Kālāmas of Kesaputta said to the Blessed One, 'Venerable sir, there are some contemplatives & brahmans who come to Kesaputta.
They expound & glorify their own doctrines, but as for the doctrines of others, they deprecate them, revile them, show contempt for them, & disparage them.
And then other contemplatives & brahmans come to Kesaputta.
They expound & glorify their own doctrines, but as for the doctrines of others, they deprecate them, revile them, show contempt for them, & disparage them.
They leave us simply uncertain & doubtful: Which of these venerable contemplatives & brahmans are speaking the truth, and which ones are lying?'
'Of course you're uncertain, Kālāmas.
Of course you're doubtful.
When there are reasons for doubt, uncertainty is born.
So in this case, Kālāmas, don't go by reports, by legends, by traditions, by scripture, by conjecture, by inference, by analogies, by agreement through pondering views, by probability, or by the thought, “This contemplative is our teacher.” When you know for yourselves that, “These qualities are unskillful; these qualities are blameworthy; these qualities are criticized by the wise; these qualities, when undertaken & carried out, lead to harm & to suffering” — then you should abandon them…
'What do you think, Kālāmas?
When greed arises in a person, does it arise for welfare or for harm?'
'For harm, lord.'
'And this greedy person, overcome by greed, his mind possessed by greed: Doesn't he kill living beings, take what is not given, go after another person's wife, tell lies, and induce others to do likewise, all of which is for long-term harm & suffering?'
'Yes, lord.'
So what do you think, Kālāmas?
Are these qualities skillful or unskillful?'
'Unskillful, lord.'
'Blameworthy or blameless?'
'Blameworthy, lord.'
'Criticized by the wise or praised by the wise?'
'Criticized by the wise, lord.'
'When undertaken & carried out, do they lead to harm & to suffering, or not?'
'When undertaken & carried out, they lead to harm & to suffering…'
'…Now, Kālāmas, don't go by reports, by legends, by traditions, by scripture, by conjecture, by inference, by analogies, by agreement through pondering views, by probability, or by the thought, “This contemplative is our teacher.” When you know for yourselves that, “These qualities are skillful; these qualities are blameless; these qualities are praised by the wise; these qualities, when undertaken & carried out, lead to welfare & to happiness” — then you should enter & remain in them.
'What do you think, Kālāmas?
When lack of greed arises in a person, does it arise for welfare or for harm?'
'For welfare, lord.'
'And this ungreedy person, not overcome by greed, his mind not possessed by greed: He doesn't kill living beings, take what is not given, go after another person's wife, tell lies, or induce others to do likewise, all of which is for long-term welfare & happiness — right?'
'Yes, lord.'
So what do you think, Kālāmas?
Are these qualities skillful or unskillful?'
'Skillful, lord.'
'Blameworthy or blameless?'
'Blameless, lord.'
'Criticized by the wise or praised by the wise?'
'Praised by the wise, lord.'
'When undertaken & carried out, do they lead to welfare & to happiness, or not?'
'When undertaken & carried out, they lead to welfare & to happiness…'
Now what is unskillful?
Taking life is unskillful, taking what is not given… sexual misconduct… lying… abusive speech… divisive tale-bearing… idle chatter is unskillful.
Covetousness… ill will… wrong views are unskillful.
These things are termed unskillful.
And what are the roots of what is unskillful?
Greed is a root of what is unskillful, aversion is a root of what is unskillful, delusion is a root of what is unskillful.
These are termed the roots of what is unskillful.
And what is skillful?
Abstaining from taking life is skillful, abstaining from taking what is not given… from sexual misconduct… from lying… from abusive speech… from divisive tale-bearing… abstaining from idle chatter is skillful.
Lack of covetousness… lack of ill will… right views are skillful.
These things are termed skillful.
And what are the roots of what is skillful?
Lack of greed is a root of what is skillful, lack of aversion is a root of what is skillful, lack of delusion is a root of what is skillful.
These are termed the roots of what is skillful.
The Tathāgata, the Worthy one, the Rightly Self-awakened One has two Dhamma discourses given in sequence.
Which two?
'See evil as evil.' This is the first Dhamma discourse.
'Having seen evil as evil, become disenchanted there, dispassionate there, released.' This is the second Dhamma discourse…
Abandon what is unskillful, monks.
It is possible to abandon what is unskillful.
If it were not possible to abandon what is unskillful, I would not say to you, 'Abandon what is unskillful.' But because it is possible to abandon what is unskillful, I say to you, 'Abandon what is unskillful.' If this abandoning of what is unskillful were conducive to harm and pain, I would not say to you, 'Abandon what is unskillful.' But because this abandoning of what is unskillful is conducive to benefit and pleasure, I say to you, 'Abandon what is unskillful.'
Develop what is skillful, monks.
It is possible to develop what is skillful.
If it were not possible to develop what is skillful, I would not say to you, 'Develop what is skillful.' But because it is possible to develop what is skillful, I say to you, 'Develop what is skillful.' If this development of what is skillful were conducive to harm and pain, I would not say to you, 'Develop what is skillful.' But because this development of what is skillful is conducive to benefit and pleasure, I say to you, 'Develop what is skillful.'
The Buddha: What do you think, Rāhula: What is a mirror for?
Rāhula: For reflection, sir.
The Buddha: In the same way, Rāhula, bodily actions, verbal actions, & mental actions are to be done with repeated reflection.
Whenever you want to perform a bodily action, you should reflect on it: 'This bodily action I want to perform — would it lead to self-affliction, to the affliction of others, or to both?
Is it an unskillful bodily action with painful consequences, painful results?' If, on reflection, you know that it would lead to self-affliction, to the affliction of others, or to both; it would be an unskillful bodily action with painful consequences, painful results, then any bodily action of that sort is absolutely unfit for you to do.
But if on reflection you know that it would not cause affliction… it would be a skillful bodily action with happy consequences, happy results, then any bodily action of that sort is fit for you to do.
While you are performing a bodily action, you should reflect on it: 'This bodily action I am doing — is it leading to self-affliction, to the affliction of others, or to both?
Is it an unskillful bodily action, with painful consequences, painful results?' If, on reflection, you know that it is leading to self-affliction, to affliction of others, or both… you should give it up.
But if on reflection you know that it is not… you may continue with it.
Having performed a bodily action, you should reflect on it… If, on reflection, you know that it led to self-affliction, to the affliction of others, or to both; it was an unskillful bodily action with painful consequences, painful results, then you should confess it, reveal it, lay it open to the Teacher or to a knowledgeable companion in the holy life.
Having confessed it… you should exercise restraint in the future.
But if on reflection you know that it did not lead to affliction… it was a skillful bodily action with happy consequences, happy results, then you should stay mentally refreshed & joyful, training day & night in skillful qualities.
Having performed a mental action, you should reflect on it… If, on reflection, you know that it led to self-affliction, to the affliction of others, or to both; it was an unskillful mental action with painful consequences, painful results, then you should feel horrified, humiliated, & disgusted with it.
Feeling horrified… you should exercise restraint in the future.
But if on reflection you know that it did not lead to affliction… it was a skillful mental action with happy consequences, happy results, then you should stay mentally refreshed & joyful, training day & night in skillful qualities.
Rāhula, all the contemplatives & brahmans in the course of the past who purified their bodily actions, verbal actions, & mental actions, did it through repeated reflection on their bodily actions, verbal actions, & mental actions in just this way.
All the contemplatives & brahmans in the course of the future… All the contemplatives & brahmans at present who purify their bodily actions, verbal actions, & mental actions, do it through repeated reflection on their bodily actions, verbal actions, & mental actions in just this way.
Therefore, Rāhula, you should train yourself: 'I will purify my bodily actions through repeated reflection.
I will purify my verbal actions through repeated reflection.
I will purify my mental actions through repeated reflection.' Thus you should train yourself.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Glad at heart, Ven.
Rāhula delighted in the Blessed One's words.
§.
The Buddha's doctrine of kamma takes the fact of skillful action, which can be observed on the ordinary sensory level, and gives it an importance that, for a person pursuing the Buddhist goal, must be accepted on faith.
According to this doctrine, skillful action is not simply one factor out of many contributing to happiness: it is the primary factor.
It does not lead simply to happiness within the dimensions of time and the present: if developed to the ultimate level of refinement, it can lead to an Awakening totally released from those dimensions.
These assertions cannot be proven prior to an experience of that Awakening, but they must be accepted as working hypotheses in the effort to develop the skillfulness needed for Awakening.
This paradox — which lies at the heart of the act of taking refuge in the Triple Gem — explains why the serious pursuit of the Buddhist path is a sustained act of faith that can become truly firm and verified only with the first glimpse of Awakening, called stream-entry.
It also explains why a strong desire to gain release from the stress and suffering inherent in conditioned existence is needed for such a pursuit, for without that desire it is very difficult to break through this paradox with the necessary leap of faith.
The basic context for the doctrine of kamma was provided by the first two insights on the night of the Buddha's Awakening — remembrance of previous lives, and insight into the death and rebirth of beings throughout the cosmos.
This context was expressed in terms of personal narrative and cosmology.
The possibility of rebirth accounted for the way in which kamma could shape experiences in life, such as the situation into which a young child is born, for which no kammic cause in the present lifetime could be found.
The pattern of death and rebirth for all beings, in which the quality of the state of rebirth depends on the moral quality of actions performed in previous lifetimes, presented the possibility that moral standards, instead of being mere social conventions, were intrinsic to the workings of any and all experience of the cosmos.
Essential to the Buddha's second insight was his realization of the mind's role in determining the moral quality of actions.
His analysis of the process of developing a skill showed him that skillfulness depended not so much on the physical performance of an act as on the mental qualities of perception, attention, and intention that played a part in it.
Of these three qualities, the intention formed the essence of the act — as it constituted the decision to act — while attention and perception informed it.
Thus the skillfulness of these mental phenomena accounted for the act's kammic consequences.
The less greed, aversion, and delusion motivating the act, the better its results.
Unintentional acts would have kammic consequences only when they resulted from carelessness in areas where one would reasonably be held responsible.
Intentional actions performed under the influence of right view — which on this level means conviction in the principle of kamma conviction in the principle of kamma — led inherently to pleasant states of rebirth, while those performed under the influence of wrong view led to unpleasant states.
Thus the quality of the views on which one acts — i.e., the quality of the perception and attention informing the intention — is a major factor in shaping experience.
This observation undercuts the radical distinction between mind and material reality that is taken for granted in our own culture and was also assumed by many of the Samana schools of the Buddha's time.
From the Buddha's viewpoint, mental and physical phenomena are two sides of a single coin, with the mental side of prior importance.
Most descriptions of the Buddha's teachings on kamma tend to stop here, but there are many passages on kamma in the Canon — and included in this section — that do not fit into the neat picture based merely the first two insights on the night of the Awakening.
The only way to account for these passages is to note the simple fact that Buddha's teachings on kamma were shaped not only by these two insights, but also by the third insight and the resulting knowledge of Unbinding.
The third insight explored the possibility of a fourth kind of kamma — in addition to good, bad, and a mixture of the two — that was skillful enough to bring about the ending of kamma.
At the same time, in the course of developing the level of skillfulness needed to bring kamma to an end, the Buddha learned a great deal about the nature of action that forced him to recast his understanding of kamma in much more subtle terms.
The knowledge of Unbinding — which followed on the full development of this fourth type of kamma and the realizations that accompanied it — acted as proof that the understandings comprising the three insights were true.
To explore these points will not only help give us a more complete understanding of the Buddha's teachings on kamma, but will also show why conviction in the principle of skillful kamma is essential to Buddhist practice.
In his effort to master kamma in such a way as to bring kamma to an end, the Buddha discovered that he had to abandon the contexts of personal narrative and cosmology in which the issue of kamma first presented itself.
Both these forms of understanding deal in categories of being and non-being, self and others, but the Buddha found that it was impossible to bring kamma to an end if one thought in such terms.
For example, narrative and cosmological modes of thinking would lead one to ask whether the agent who performed an act of kamma was the same as the person experiencing the result, someone else, both, or neither.
If one answered that it was the same person, then the person experiencing the result would have to identify not only with the actor, but also with the mode of action, and thus would not be able to gain release from it.
If one answered that it was another person, both oneself and another, or neither, then the person experiencing the result would see no need to heighten the skill or understanding of his/her own kamma in the present, for the experience of pleasure and pain was not his or her own full responsibility.
In either case, the development of the fourth type of kamma would be aborted.
To avoid the drawbacks of the narrative and cosmological mind-sets, the Buddha pursued an entirely different tack — what he called “entry into emptiness,” and what modern philosophy calls radical phenomenology: a focus on the events of present consciousness, in and of themselves, without reference to questions of whether there are any entities underlying those events.
In the Buddha's case, he focused simply on the process of kammic cause and result as it played itself out in the immediate present, in the process of developing the skillfulness of the mind, without reference to who or what lay behind those processes.
On the most basic level of this mode of awareness, there was no sense even of “existence” or “non-existence”, but simply the events of stress, its origination, its cessation, and the path to its cessation, arising and passing away.
Through this mode he was able to pursue the fourth type of kamma to its end, at the same time gaining heightened insight into the nature of action itself and its many implications, including questions of rebirth, the relationship of mental to physical events, and the way kamma constructs all experience of the cosmos.
Because the Buddha gained both understanding of and release from kamma by pursuing the phenomenological mode of attention, his full-dress systematic analysis of kamma is also expressed in that mode.
This analysis is included in his teachings on this/that conditionality, dependent co-arising, and the four noble truths: the three levels of refinement in the type of right view without effluents that underlay his mastery of the fourth type of kamma.
Here we will consider, in turn, how each of these teachings shaped the Buddha's teachings on kamma, how the knowledge of Unbinding confirmed those teachings, and how the success of the phenomenological mode of analysis shaped the Buddha's use of narrative and cosmological modes in instructing others.
We will conclude with a discussion of how these points show the need for conviction in the principle of kamma as a working hypothesis for anyone who wants to gain release from suffering and stress.
To begin with this/that conditionality: This principle accounts not only for the complexity of the kammic process, but also for its being regular without at the same time being rigidly deterministic.
The non-linearity of this/that conditionality also accounts for the fact that the process can be successfully dismantled by radical attention to the present moment.
Unlike the theory of linear causality — which led the Vedists and Jains to see the relationship between an act and its result as predictable and tit-for-tat — the principle of this/that conditionality makes that relationship inherently complex.
The results of kamma experienced at any one point in time come not only from past kamma, but also from present kamma.
This means that, although there are general patterns relating habitual acts to corresponding results, there is no set one-for-one, tit-for-tat, relationship between a particular action and its results.
Instead, the results are determined by the context of the act, both in terms of actions that preceded or followed it and in terms one's state of mind at the time of acting or experiencing the result.
As we noted in the Introduction, the feedback loops inherent in this/that conditionality mean that the working out of any particular cause-effect relationship can be very complex indeed.
This explains why the Buddha says in § that the results of kamma are imponderable.
Only a person who has developed the mental range of a Buddha — another imponderable itself — would be able to trace the intricacies of the kammic network.
The basic premise of kamma is simple — that skillful intentions lead to favorable results, and unskillful ones to unfavorable results — but the process by which those results work themselves out is so intricate that it cannot be fully mapped.
We can compare this with the Mandelbrot set, a mathematical set generated by a simple equation, but whose graph is so complex that it will probably never be completely explored.
Although the precise working out of the kammic process is somewhat unpredictable, it is not chaotic.
The relationship between kammic causes and their effects is entirely regular: when an action is of the sort that it will be felt in such and such a way, that is how its result will be experienced.
Skillful intentions lead to favorable results, unskillful ones to unfavorable results.
Thus, when one participates in the kammic process, one is at the mercy of a pattern that one's actions put into motion but that is not entirely under one's present control.
Despite the power of the mind, one cannot reshape the basic laws of cosmic causality at whim.
These laws include the physical laws, within which one's kamma must ripen and work itself out.
This is the point of passage §, in which the Buddha explains that present pain can be explained not only by past kamma but also by a host of other factors; the list of alternative factors he gives comes straight from the various causes for pain that were recognized in the medical treatises of his time.
If we compare this list with his definition of old kamma in §, we see that many if not all of the alternative causes are actually the result of past actions.
The point here is that old kamma does not override other causal factors operating in the universe — such as those recognized by the physical sciences — but instead finds its expression within them.
However, the fact that the kammic process relies on input from the present moment means that it is not totally deterministic.
Input from the past may place restrictions on what can be done and known in any particular moment, but the allowance for new input from the present provides some room for free will.
This allowance also opens the possibility for escape from the cycle of kamma altogether by means of the fourth type of kamma: the development of heightened skillfulness through the pursuit of the seven factors for Awakening and the noble eightfold path — and, by extension, all of the Wings to Awakening.
The non-linearity of this/that conditionality explains why heightened skillfulness, when focused on the present moment, can succeed in leading to the end of the kamma that has formed the experience of the entire cosmos.
All non-linear processes exhibit what is called scale invariance, which means that the behavior of the process on any one scale is similar to its behavior on smaller or larger scales.
To understand, say, the large-scale pattern of a particular non-linear process, one need only focus on its behavior on a smaller scale that is easier to observe, and one will see the same pattern at work.
In the case of kamma, one need only focus on the process of kamma in the immediate present, in the course of developing heightened skillfulness, and the large-scale issues over the expanses of space and time will become clear as one gains release from them.
The teaching on dependent co-arising helps to provide more detailed instructions on this point, showing precisely where the cycle of kamma provides openings for more skillful present input.
In doing so, it both explains the importance of the act of attention in developing the fourth type of kamma, and acts as a guide for focusing attention on present experience in appropriate ways.
Dependent co-arising shows how the cosmos, when viewed in the context of how it is directly experienced by a person developing skillfulness, is subsumed entirely under factors that are immediately present to awareness: the five aggregates of form, feeling, perception, mental fabrication, and consciousness, and the six sense media.
Included in this description is the Buddha's ultimate analysis of kamma and rebirth.
The nexus of kamma, clinging, becoming, and birth accounts for the realm in which birth takes place, whereas the nexus of name-and-form with consciousness accounts for the arising and survival of the kammically active organism within that realm.
Also included in dependent co-arising is a detailed analysis of the way in which kamma can — but does not necessarily have to — lead to bondage to the cycle of rebirth.
Unlike the Jains, the Buddha taught that this bondage was mental rather than physical.
It was caused not by sticky substances created by the physical violence of an act, but by the fact that, when there is ignorance of the four noble truths, the feeling that results from kamma gives rise to craving, clinging, and becoming; and these, in turn, form the conditions for further kamma.
Thus the results of action, in the presence of ignorance, breed the conditions for more action, creating feedback loops that keep the kammic processes in motion.
For this reason, the Buddha defined the effluents as clinging — expressed in some lists as sensuality, in others as sensuality and views — together with becoming and the ignorance that underlies them all.
If ignorance of the four truths can be ended, however, feeling does not form a condition for craving or clinging, and thus there is no becoming to provide a realm for further kamma.
Thus the mastery of the fourth type of kamma requires discernment of the four noble truths.
It is important to note that dependent co-arising makes no statements as to the existence or lack of existence of any entity to which these events pertain or to whom they belong.
As we noted above, such terms of analysis as “being,” “non-being,” “self,” or “other,” pertain properly to the modes of cosmology and personal narrative, and have no place in a radically phenomenological analysis.
Questions and terms that derive from the conventions of narrative and the construction of a worldview have no place in the direct awareness of experience in and of itself.
This is one reason why people who have not mastered the path of practice and who thus function primarily in terms of a worldview or a sense of their own personal story, find the teaching of dependent co-arising so inscrutable.
Even though the Buddha's phenomenological approach answered his questions as to the nature of kamma, it also reshaped his questions so that they had little in common with the questions that most people bring to the practice.
As with all insights gained on the phenomenological level, dependent co-arising is expressed in terms closest to the actual experience of events.
Only when a person has become thoroughly familiar with that level of experience is the analysis fully intelligible.
Thus, although the detailed nature of dependent co-arising is one of its strengths, it is also one of its weaknesses as a teaching tool, for the subtlety and complexity of the analysis can be intimidating even to advanced practitioners.
For this reason, the Buddha most often expressed the right view underlying the fourth type of kamma in terms of the four noble truths.
These truths provide a more congenial entry point into the phenomenological mode of awareness for they focus the analysis of kamma directly on the question of stress and suffering: issues that tie in immediately with the narratives that people make of their own life experiences.
As the Buddha noted in his second insight, his memory of previous lives included his experience of pleasure and pain in each life, and most people — when recounting their own lives — tend to focus on these issues as well.
The four truths, however, do not stop simply with tales about stress: they approach it from the problem-solving perspective of a person engaged in developing a skill.
What this means for the meditator trying to master the fourth type of kamma is that these truths cannot be fully comprehended by passive observation.
Only by participating sensitively in the process of developing skillfulness and gaining a practical feel for the relationship of cause and effect among the mental factors that shape that process, can one eradicate the effluents that obstruct the ending of kamma.
This point is underscored by a fact noted above: the ignorance and craving that are needed to keep the cycle of kamma in motion are subtle forms of the roots of unskillfulness.
Thus, only through developing skillfulness to the ultimate degree can the cycle be brought to equilibrium and, as a result, disband.
The truth of the Buddha's understanding of the processes of kamma — as informed by this/that conditionality, dependent co-arising, and the four noble truths — was proven by the knowledge of Unbinding that followed immediately on his mastery of the fourth type of kamma.
He found that when skillfulness is intentionally brought to a point of full consummation, as expressed in the direct awareness of this/that conditionality, it leads to a state of non-action, or non-fashioning, that forms the threshold to a level of consciousness in which all experience of the cosmos has fallen away.
When one's experience of the cosmos resumes after the experience of Awakening, one sees clearly that it is composed entirely of the results of old kamma; with no new kamma being added to the process, all experience of the cosmos will eventually run out — or, in the words of the texts, “will grow cold right here.” This discovery proved the basic premise that kamma not only plays a role in shaping experience of the cosmos, it plays the primary role.
If this were not so, then even when kamma was ended there would still remain the types of experience that came from other sources.
But because no experience of the cosmos remained when all present kamma disbanded, and none would resume after all old kamma ran out, kamma would have to be the necessary factor accounting for all such experience.
This fact implies that even the limiting factors that one encounters in terms of sights, sounds, etc., are actually the fruit of past kamma in thought, word, and deed — committed not only in this, but also in many preceding lifetimes.
Thus, even though the Buddha's development of the fourth type of kamma focused on the present moment, the resulting Awakening gave insights that encompassed not only the present but also all of time.
Having used the phenomenological mode to solve the problem of kamma and reach Unbinding, however, the Buddha was not limited to that mode.
After his Awakening, he was free to return at will to the narrative and cosmological modes of thought and speech, without being caught up in their presuppositions.
For most people, he found, even the four noble truths were too alien to form an entry point into the teaching.
Thus he had to use the narrative and cosmological modes of discourse to bring such people, step by step, to the point where they were ready to comprehend those truths.
What he had learned in the final stage of his Awakening did not negate the validity of the first and second insights into kamma and rebirth; instead, it perfected them.
The main change that the experience of Awakening made in his view of personal narrative and cosmology is that it opened them both to the dimension of release.
The drama of kamma in the cosmos is not a closed cycle; the principles of kamma can be mastered to the point where they open to the way out, just as the gravity of the sun and earth could bring the moon to a point of resonance where it is freed from their power.
The narrative of a person's course through the cosmos is not doomed to aimless and endlessly repeated death and rebirth; the person can tread the path of practice to Unbinding and so bring the narrative to an end.
Thus the Buddha used narrative and cosmological explanations to persuade his listeners to explore the phenomenology of skillful action so that they too might gain release; his descriptions of the role of action in shaping the vast expanses of space, time, and existence was designed to focus the listener's attention on the liberating potential of what he/she was doing in the here and now.
Some of his most poignant teachings are narratives devoted to just this purpose:
What do you think, monks?
Which is greater, the tears you have shed while transmigrating & wandering this long time — crying & weeping from being joined with what is displeasing, from being separated from what is pleasing — or the water in the four great oceans?… This is the greater: The tears you have shed… Why is that?
From an inconceivable beginning, monks, comes transmigration.
A beginning point is not evident, although beings hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving are transmigrating & wandering on.
Long have you thus experienced stress, experienced pain, experienced loss, swelling the cemeteries — long enough to become disenchanted with all fabrications, enough to become dispassionate, enough to be released.
The cosmological discourses — such as DN, DN, MN, and MN — are aimed at a similar point.
DN describes how the evolution and devolution of the cosmos derive from the skillful and unskillful kamma of the beings who inhabit it, and ends with the admonition that one should make an island for oneself, safe from the process of the ups and downs of the cosmos.
This island is nothing other than the practice of the four frames of reference, which, as we will see in II/B, are precisely the training aimed at familiarizing oneself with the phenomenology of skillful action.
DN shows how kamma accounts for the evolution of human society, ending with the statement that the most exalted member of society is the Arahant who has gained release through highest discernment.
MN and MN give graphic descriptions of the levels of heaven and hell into which beings may be reborn after death through the power of good and bad kamma, MN ending with a verse on the need to practice the path to non-clinging to escape the dangers of birth and death entirely.
Thus the experience of his Awakening gave a new purpose to narrative and cosmology in the Buddha's eyes: they became tools for persuading his listeners to adopt the training that would lead them to the phenomenological mode.
This accounts for the ad hoc and fragmentary nature of the narratives and cosmological sketches in his teachings.
They are not meant to be analyzed in a systematic way.
It is a mistake to tease out their implications to see what they may say about such metaphysical questions as the existence or lack of existence of entities or identities underlying the process of kamma and rebirth, the relationship between the laws of kamma and the laws of the physical sciences, or the nature of the mechanism by which kamma makes its results felt over time.
The search for systematic answers to such issues is not only invalid or irrelevant from the Buddhist point of view, it is actually counterproductive in that it blocks one from entering the path to release.
And, we should note, none of the modes of discourse — narrative, cosmological, or phenomenological — is capable of describing or even framing proper questions about what happens after Awakening, for such issues, which lie beyond the conditions of time and the present, cannot be properly expressed by the conventions of language and analysis, which are bound by those conditions.
Only a person who has mastered the skill of release has the mental skills needed to comprehend such matters.
The Buddha reserved his systematic explanations for the particular phenomenological mode to be used in viewing the process of kamma in its own terms, as it is being mastered, so that the actual problem of kamma and its retribution will be solved.
The right way to listen to the narratives and cosmological sketches, then, is to see what they imply about one's own need to master the kammic process on the level of awareness in and of itself.
From these points it should become clear why kamma, as an article of faith, is a necessary factor in the path of Buddhist practice.
The teaching on kamma, in its narrative and cosmological forms, provides the context for the practice, giving it direction and urgency.
Because the cosmos is governed by the laws of kamma, those laws provide the only mechanism by which happiness can be found.
But because good and bad kamma, consisting of good and bad intentions, simply perpetuate the ups and downs of experience in the cosmos, a way must be found out of the mechanism of kamma by mastering it in a way that allows it to disband in an attentive state of non-intention.
And, because there is no telling what sudden surprises the results of one's past kamma may still hold in store, one should try to develop that mastery as quickly as possible.
In its phenomenological mode, the teaching on kamma accounts for the focus and the terms of analysis used in the practice.
It also accounts for the mental qualities needed to attain and maintain that level of focus and analysis.
In terms of focus, the principle of scale invariance at work in the complexities of kamma means that their essential processes can be mastered by focusing total attention on them right at the mind in the immediate present.
This focus accounts for the practice of frames-of-reference meditation, in which attention is directed at present phenomena in and of themselves.
These phenomena are then analyzed in terms of the four noble truths, the phenomenological terms in which appropriate attention and discernment direct and observe the experience of developing the qualities of skillful action.
The most immediate skillful kamma that can be observed on this level is the mastery of the very same mental qualities that are supporting this refined level of focus and analysis: mindfulness, concentration, and discernment, together with the more basic qualities on which they are based.
Thus, these mental qualities act not only as supports to the focus and analysis, but also as their object.
Ultimately, discernment becomes so refined that the focus and analysis take as their object the act of focusing and analyzing, in and of themselves.
The cycle of action then short-circuits as it reaches culmination, and Unbinding occurs.
These elements of focus, analysis, and mental qualities, together with the dynamic of their development to a point of culmination, are covered by the teachings on the Wings to Awakening discussed in detail in Parts II and Thus the Wings can be viewed as a direct expression of the role of skillful kamma in the path to release.
It is entirely possible that a person with no firm conviction in the principle of kamma can follow parts of the Buddhist path, including mindfulness and concentration practices, and gain positive results from them.
For instance, one can pursue mindfulness practice for the sense of balance, equanimity, and peace it gives to one's daily life, or for the sake of bringing the mind to the present for the purpose of spontaneity and “going with the flow.” The full practice of the path, however, is a skillful diverting of the flow of the mind from its habitual kammic streams to the stream of Unbinding.
As the Buddha said, this practice requires a willingness to “develop and abandon” to an extreme degree.
The developing requires a supreme effort aimed at full and conscious mastery of mindfulness, concentration, and discernment to the point of non-fashioning and on to release.
A lack of conviction in the principle of kamma would undercut the patience and commitment, the desire, persistence, intent, and refined powers of discrimination needed to pursue concentration and discernment to the most heightened levels, beyond what is needed for a general sense of peace or spontaneity.
The abandoning involves uprooting the most deeply buried forms of clinging and attachment that keep one bound to the cycle of rebirth.
Some of these forms of clinging — such as views and theories about self-identity — are so entrenched in the narrative and cosmological modes in which most people function that only firm conviction in the benefits to be had by abandoning them will be able to pry them loose.
This is why the Buddha insisted repeatedly — and we will have occasion to return to this theme at several points in this book — that conviction in the fact of his Awakening necessarily involves conviction in the principle of kamma, and that both forms of conviction are needed for the full mastery of the kamma of heightened skillfulness leading to release.
The Canon contains many well-known passages where the Buddha asks his listeners not to accept his teachings simply on faith, but these remarks were directed to people just beginning the practice.
Such people need only accept the general principles of skillful action on a trial basis, focusing on the input of their actions into the causal system at the present moment, and exploring the connection between skillful intentions and favorable results.
The more complex issues of kamma come into play at this level only in forcing one to be patient with the practice.
Many times skillful intentions do not produce their favorable results immediately, aside from the sense of well-being — sometimes clearly perceptible, sometimes barely — that comes with acting skillfully.
Were it not for this delay, the principle of kamma would be self-evident, no one would dare act on unskillful intentions, and there would be no need to take the principle on faith.
As we noted in the Introduction, the complexity of this/that conditionality is the major cause for the confusion and lack of skill with which most people live their lives.
The ability to master this process takes time.
As one progresses further on the path, however — and as the process of developing skillfulness in and of itself comes more and more to take center stage in one's awareness — the actual results of developing skillfulness should give greater and greater reason for conviction in the principle of kamma.
Except in cases where people fall into the trap of heedlessness or complacency, these results can spur and inspire one to hold to the principle of kamma with the increasing levels of firmness, focus, and refinement needed for Awakening.
§.
Beings are owners of kamma, heir to kamma, born of kamma, related through kamma, and have kamma as their arbitrator.
Kamma is what creates distinctions among beings in terms of coarseness & refinement…
There is the case where a certain woman or man is one who takes life — brutal, bloody-handed, violent, cruel, merciless to living beings.
From performing & undertaking such kamma, then on the breakup of the body, after death, this person re-appears in the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, in hell.
Or, if he/she does not reappear in the plane of deprivation… in hell, but instead returns to the human state, then wherever he/she is reborn, he/she is short-lived.
This is the way leading to short life, namely being one who takes life…
But there is the case where a certain woman or man, abandoning the taking of life, abstains from the taking of life, dwelling with rod laid down, knife laid down, scrupulous, merciful, compassionate for the welfare of all living beings.
From performing & undertaking such kamma, then on the breakup of the body, after death, this person re-appears in the good destinations, in the heavenly world.
Or, if he/she does not reappear… in the heavenly world, but instead returns to the human state, then wherever he/she is reborn, he/she is long-lived.
This is the way leading to long life, namely being one who, abandoning the taking of life, abstains from the taking of life…
Furthermore, there is the case where a certain woman or man has a tendency to injure living beings with the hand, with a clod, with a stick, or with a knife… On the breakup of the body, after death, this person re-appears in the plane of deprivation… in hell.
Or, if he/she… instead returns to the human state, then wherever he/she is reborn, he/she is sickly.
This is the way leading to being sickly, namely being one who has a tendency to injure living beings…
But there is the case where a certain woman or man does not have a tendency to injure living beings… This is the way leading to being healthy…
Furthermore, there is the case where a certain woman or man has an angry & irritable nature.
Even when lightly criticized, he/she gets offended, provoked, hostile, & resentful, and displays annoyance, aversion, & bitterness… This is the way leading to being ugly…
But there is the case where a certain woman or man does not have an angry & irritable nature.
Even when heavily criticized, he/she does not get offended, provoked, hostile, or resentful, and displays no annoyance, aversion, or bitterness… This is the way leading to being beautiful…
Furthermore, there is the case where a certain woman or man has an envious nature — envying, resenting, & begrudging the fortune, honor, respect, reverence, salutations, & veneration received by others… This is the way leading to having little authority…
But there is the case where a certain woman or man does not have an envious nature — neither envying, resenting, nor begrudging the fortune, honor, respect, reverence, salutations, & veneration received by others… This is the way leading to having great authority…
Furthermore, there is the case where a certain woman or man does not give food, drink, clothing, vehicles, garlands, scents, ointments, beds, dwellings, or lamps to contemplatives or brahmans… This is the way leading to being poor…
But there is the case where a certain woman or man gives food, drink, clothing, vehicles, garlands, scents, ointments, beds, dwellings, & lamps to contemplatives & brahmans… This is the way leading to being wealthy…
Furthermore, there is the case where a certain woman or man is obstinate & arrogant, not paying homage to those who deserve homage, not rising up for those in whose presence one should rise up, not offering a seat to those who deserve a seat, not making way for those for whom one should make way, not honoring, respecting, revering, or venerating those who should be honored… venerated.
This is the way leading to being reborn in a low birth…
But there is the case where a certain woman or man is not obstinate or arrogant, who pays homage to those who deserve homage, rises up for those in whose presence one should rise up, offers a seat to those who deserve a seat, makes way for those for whom one should make way, honors, respects, reveres, & venerates those who should be honored… venerated.
This is the way leading to being reborn in a high birth…
Furthermore, there is the case where a certain woman or man, having approached a contemplative or brahman, does not ask, “What, venerable sir, is skillful?
What is unskillful?
What is blameworthy?
What is blameless?
What is to be cultivated?
What is not to be cultivated?
What kind of action will lead to my long-term harm & suffering?
What kind of action will lead to my long-term welfare & happiness?”… This is the way leading to having weak discernment…
But there is the case where a certain woman or man, having approached a contemplative or brahman, asks, “What, venerable sir, is skillful?
What is unskillful?
What is blameworthy?
What is blameless?
What is to be cultivated?
What is not to be cultivated?
What kind of action will lead to my long-term harm & suffering?
What kind of action will lead to my long-term welfare & happiness?”… This is the way leading to having great discernment…
Beings are owners of kamma, heir to kamma, born of kamma, related through kamma, and have kamma as their arbitrator.
Kamma is what creates distinctions among beings in terms of coarseness & refinement.
'Kamma should be known.
The cause by which kamma comes into play should be known.
The diversity in kamma should be known.
The result of kamma should be known.
The cessation of kamma should be known.
The path of practice leading to the cessation of kamma should be known.' Thus it has been said.
Why was it said?
Intention, I tell you, is kamma.
Intending, one does kamma by way of body, speech, & intellect.
And what is the cause by which kamma comes into play?
Contact…
And what is the diversity in kamma?
There is kamma to be experienced in hell, kamma to be experienced in the realm of common animals, kamma to be experienced in the realm of the hungry shades, kamma to be experienced in the human world, kamma to be experienced in the heavenly worlds….
And what is the result of kamma?
The result of kamma is of three sorts, I tell you: that which arises right here & now, that which arises later, and that which arises following that…
And what is the cessation of kamma?
From the cessation of contact is the cessation of kamma; and just this noble eightfold path — right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration — is the path of practice leading to the cessation of kamma.
Now when a disciple of the noble ones discerns kamma in this way, the cause by which kamma comes into play in this way, the diversity of kamma in this way, the result of kamma in this way, the cessation of kamma in this way, & the path of practice leading to the cessation of kamma in this way, then he discerns this penetrative holy life as the cessation of kamma.
'Kamma should be known.
The cause by which kamma comes into play… The diversity in kamma… The result of kamma… The cessation of kamma… The path of practice for the cessation of kamma should be known.' Thus it has been said, and this is why it was said.
There are four kinds of persons to be found in the world.
Which four?
There is the case where a certain person takes life, takes what is not given, engages in illicit sex, lies, speaks divisively, speaks harshly, engages in idle chatter; is covetous, has a hostile mind, & holds wrong views.
On the breakup of the body, after death, he reappears in the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, in hell.
But there is also the case where a certain person takes life… holds wrong views, on the breakup of the body, after death, he reappears in the good destinations, in the heavenly world.
And there is the case where a certain person abstains from taking life, abstains from taking what is not given… is not covetous, does not have a hostile mind, & holds right views.
On the breakup of the body, after death, he reappears in the good destinations, in the heavenly world.
But there is also the case where a certain person abstains from taking life, abstains from taking what is not given… is not covetous, does not have a hostile mind, & holds right views, on the breakup of the body, after death, he reappears in the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, in hell…
In the case of the person who takes life… on the breakup of the body, after death, reappears in the good destinations, in the heavenly world: either earlier he performed fine kamma that is to be felt as pleasant, or later he performed fine kamma that is to be felt as pleasant, or at the time of death he acquired & adopted right views.
Because of that, on the breakup of the body, after death, he reappears in the good destinations, in the heavenly world.
But as for the results of taking life… holding wrong views, he will feel them either right here & now, or later, or following that…
In the case of the person who abstains from taking life… on the breakup of the body, after death, reappears in the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, in hell: either earlier he performed evil kamma that is to be felt as painful, or later he performed evil kamma that is to be felt as painful, or at the time of death he acquired & adopted wrong views.
Because of that, on the breakup of the body, after death, he reappears in the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, in hell.
But as for the results of abstaining from taking life… holding right views, he will feel them either right here & now, or later, or following that…
These four imponderables are not to be speculated about.
Whoever speculates about them would go mad & experience vexation.
Which four?
The Buddha-range of the Buddhas… The jhāna-range of one absorbed in jhāna… The results of kamma… Speculation about the cosmos is an imponderable that is not to be speculated about.
Whoever speculates about these things would go mad & experience vexation.
The Buddha: 'For anyone who says, “In whatever way a person makes kamma, that is how it is experienced,” there is no living of the holy life, there is no opportunity for the right ending of stress.
But for anyone who says, “When a person makes kamma to be felt in such & such a way, that is how its result is experienced,” there is the living of the holy life, there is the opportunity for the right ending of stress.
'There is the case where a trifling evil act done by a certain individual takes him to hell.
There is the case where the very same sort of trifling act done by another individual is experienced in the here & now, and for the most part barely appears for a moment.
'Now, a trifling evil act done by what sort of individual takes him to hell?
There is the case where a certain individual is undeveloped in the body, undeveloped in virtue, undeveloped in mind, undeveloped in discernment: restricted, small-hearted, dwelling with suffering.
A trifling evil act done by this sort of individual takes him to hell.
'Now, a trifling evil act done by what sort of individual is experienced in the here & now, and for the most part barely appears for a moment?
There is the case where a certain individual is developed in the body, developed in virtue, developed in mind, developed in discernment: unrestricted, large-hearted, dwelling with the unlimited.
A trifling evil act done by this sort of individual is experienced in the here & now, and for the most part barely appears for a moment.
'Suppose that a man were to drop a salt crystal into a small amount of water in a cup.
What do you think?
Would the water in the cup become salty because of the salt crystal, and unfit to drink?'
'Yes, lord…'
'Now suppose that a man were to drop a salt crystal into the River Ganges.
What do you think?
Would the water in the River Ganges become salty because of the salt crystal, and unfit to drink?'
'No, lord…'
'In the same way, there is the case where a trifling evil act done by one individual takes him to hell; and there is the case where the very same sort of trifling act done by the other individual is experienced in the here & now, and for the most part barely appears for a moment.'
Moḷiyasīvaka: There are some contemplatives & brahmans who are of this doctrine, this view: 'Whatever an individual feels — pleasure, pain, neither-pleasure-nor-pain — is entirely caused by what was done before.' Now what does Master Gotama say to that?
The Buddha: There are cases where some feelings arise based on bile.
You yourself should know how some feelings arise based on bile.
Even the world is agreed on how some feelings arise based on bile.
So any contemplatives & brahmans who are of the doctrine & view that whatever an individual feels — pleasure, pain, neither-pleasure-nor-pain — is entirely caused by what was done before — slip past what they themselves know, slip past what is agreed on by the world.
Therefore I say that those contemplatives & brahmans are wrong.
There are cases where some feelings arise based on phlegm… based on internal winds… based on a combination of bodily humors… from the change of the seasons… from uneven care of the body… from attacks… from the result of kamma.
You yourself should know how some feelings arise from the result of kamma.
Even the world is agreed on how some feelings arise from the result of kamma.
So any contemplatives & brahmans who are of the doctrine & view that whatever an individual feels — pleasure, pain, neither pleasure-nor-pain — is entirely caused by what was done before — slip past what they themselves know, slip past what is agreed on by the world.
Therefore I say that those contemplatives & brahmans are wrong.
What, monks, is old kamma?
The eye is to be seen as old kamma, fabricated & willed, capable of being felt.
The ear… The nose… The tongue… The body… The intellect is to be seen as old kamma, fabricated & willed, capable of being felt.
This is called old kamma.
And what is new kamma?
Whatever kamma one does now with the body, with speech, or with the intellect.
This is called new kamma.
And what is the cessation of kamma?
Whoever touches the release that comes from the cessation of bodily kamma, verbal kamma, & mental kamma.
That is called the cessation of kamma.
And what is the path of practice leading to the cessation of kamma?
Just this noble eightfold path… This is called the path of practice leading to the cessation of kamma.
These four types of kamma have been understood, realized, & made known by me.
Which four?
There is kamma that is black with black result; kamma that is white with white result; kamma that is black & white with black & white result; and kamma that is neither black nor white with neither black nor white result, leading to the ending of kamma.
And what is kamma that is black with black result?
There is the case where a certain person fabricates an injurious bodily fabrication… an injurious verbal fabrication… an injurious mental fabrication… He rearises in an injurious world where he is touched by injurious contacts… He experiences feelings that are exclusively painful, like those of the beings in hell.
This is called kamma that is black with black result.
And what is kamma that is white with white result?
There is the case where a certain person fabricates an uninjurious bodily fabrication… an uninjurious verbal fabrication… an uninjurious mental fabrication… He rearises in an uninjurious world where he is touched by uninjurious contacts… He experiences feelings that are exclusively pleasant, like those of the Ever-radiant Devas.
This is called kamma that is white with white result.
And what is kamma that is black & white with black & white result?
There is the case where a certain person fabricates a bodily fabrication that is injurious & uninjurious… a verbal fabrication that is injurious & uninjurious… a mental fabrication that is injurious & uninjurious… He rearises in an injurious & uninjurious world where he is touched by injurious & uninjurious contacts… He experiences injurious & uninjurious feelings, pleasure mingled with pain, like those of human beings, some devas, and some beings in the lower realms.
This is called kamma that is black & white with black & white result.
And what is kamma that is neither black nor white with neither black nor white result, leading to the ending of kamma?
The intention right there to abandon this kamma that is black with black result, the intention right there to abandon this kamma that is white with white result, the intention right there to abandon this kamma that is black & white with black & white result.
This is called kamma that is neither black nor white with neither black nor white result, leading to the ending of kamma.
And what is kamma that is neither black nor white with neither black nor white result, leading to the ending of kamma?
Right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
My topic today is the role that meditation can play in facing issues of pain, illness & death — not a pleasant topic, but an important one.
Sadly, it's only when people are face to face with a fatal illness that they start thinking about these issues, and often by that point it's too late to get fully prepared.
Although today's conference centers around what medicine can do for AIDS, we shouldn't be complacent.
Even if AIDS or its adventitious infections don't get you, something else will, so it's best to be prepared, to practice the skills you'll need when medicine — Chinese, Western or whatever — can no longer help you, and you're on your own.
As far as I've been able to determine, the only way to develop these skills is to train the mind.
At the same time, if you are caring for someone with a fatal disease, meditation offers you one of the best ways to restore your own spiritual and emotional batteries so that you can keep going even when things are tough.
A lot has appeared in the media — books, newspapers, magazines, TV — about the role of meditation in treating illness and emotional burnout.
As usually happens when the media get hold of a topic, they have tended to over- or under-estimate what meditation is and what it can do for you.
This is typical of the media.
Listening to them is like listening to a car salesman.
He doesn't have to know how to drive the car or care for it.
His only responsibility is to point out its selling points, what he thinks he can get you to believe and shell out your money for.
But if you're actually going to drive the car, you have to study the owner's manual.
So that's what I'd like to present today: a user's manual for meditation to help you when the chips are down.
I've had a fair amount of first-hand experience in this area.
The year before I left Thailand I was stricken with malaria — a very different sort of disease from AIDS, but still the number one killer in the world.
At present, every year, more people die of malaria than any other disease, this in spite of the massive WHO campaign to wipe it out back in the 's.
Huge supplies of chloroquine were handed out to Third World villagers.
Swamps and homes were sprayed with lethal doses of DDT to kill off the mosquitoes.
But now new strains of the malaria parasite have developed for which Western medicine has no cure, the mosquitoes have become resistant to DDT, and the malaria death rate is back on the rise.
Remember this when you think of pinning your hopes on NIH or the Salk Institute to come up with a cure or vaccine for AIDS.
I was fortunate.
As you can see, I survived, but only after turning to traditional medicine when the best treatment that tropical disease specialists could offer me failed.
At the same time, while I was sick I was able to fall back on the meditation I had been practicing for the past several years to help get me through the worst bouts of pain and disorientation.
This is what convinced me of its value in cases like this.
In addition to my own experience, I've been acquainted with a number of meditators both here and in Thailand who have had to live with cancer and other serious illnesses, and from them I have learned how the meditation helped them to handle both the illness and the cures — which are often more dreadful than the cancer itself.
I'll be drawing on their experiences in the course of this talk.
But first I'd like us all to sit in meditation for a few minutes, so that you can have a firsthand taste of what I'm talking about, and so you can have a little practical experience to build on when you go back home.
The technique I'll be teaching is breath meditation.
It's a good topic no matter what your religious background.
As my teacher once said, the breath doesn't belong to Buddhism or Christianity or anyone at all.
It's common property that anyone can meditate on.
At the same time, of all the meditation topics there are, it's probably the most beneficial to the body, for when we're dealing with the breath, we're dealing not only with the air coming in and out of the lungs, but also with all the feelings of energy that course throughout the body with each breath.
If you can learn to become sensitive to these feelings, and let them flow smoothly and unobstructed, you can help the body function more easily, and give the mind a handle for dealing with pain.
So let's all meditate for a few minutes.
Sit comfortably erect, in a balanced position.
You don't have to be ramrod straight like a soldier.
Just try not to lean forward or back, to the left or the right.
Close your eyes and say to yourself, 'May I be truly happy and free from suffering.' This may sound like a strange, even selfish, way to start meditating, but there are good reasons for it.
One, if you can't wish for your own happiness, there is no way that you can honestly wish for the happiness of others.
Some people need to remind themselves constantly that they deserve happiness — we all deserve it, but if we don't believe it, we will constantly find ways to punish ourselves, and we will end up punishing others in subtle or blatant ways as well.
Two, it's important to reflect on what true happiness is and where it can be found.
A moment's reflection will show that you can't find it in the past or the future.
The past is gone and your memory of it is undependable.
The future is a blank uncertainty.
So the only place we can really find happiness is in the present.
But even here you have to know where to look.
If you try to base your happiness on things that change — sights, sounds, sensations in general, people and things outside — you're setting yourself up for disappointment, like building your house on a cliff where there have been repeated landslides in the past.
So true happiness has to be sought within.
Meditation is thus like a treasure hunt: to find what has solid and unchanging worth in the mind, something that even death cannot touch.
To find this treasure we need tools.
The first tool is to do what we're doing right now: to develop good will for ourselves.
The second is to spread that good will to other living beings.
Tell yourself: 'All living beings, no matter who they are, no matter what they have done to you in the past — may they all find true happiness too.' If you don't cultivate this thought, and instead carry grudges into your meditation, that's all you'll be able to see when you look inside.
Only when you have cleared the mind in this way, and set outside matters aside, are you ready to focus on the breath.
Bring your attention to the sensation of breathing.
Breathe in long and out long for a couple of times, focusing on any spot in the body where the breathing is easy to notice, and your mind feels comfortable focusing.
This could be at the nose, at the chest, at the abdomen, or any spot at all.
Stay with that spot, noticing how it feels as you breathe in and out.
Don't force the breath, or bear down too heavily with your focus.
Let the breath flow naturally, and simply keep track of how it feels.
Savor it, as if it were an exquisite sensation you wanted to prolong.
If your mind wanders off, simply bring it back.
Don't get discouraged.
If it wanders times, bring it back times.
Show it that you mean business, and eventually it will listen to you.
If you want, you can experiment with different kinds of breathing.
If long breathing feels comfortable, stick with it.
If it doesn't, change it to whatever rhythm feels soothing to the body.
You can try short breathing, fast breathing, slow breathing, deep breathing, shallow breathing — whatever feels most comfortable to you right now…
Once you have the breath comfortable at your chosen spot, move your attention to notice how the breathing feels in other parts of the body.
Start by focusing on the area just below your navel.
Breathe in and out, and notice how that area feels.
If you don't feel any motion there, just be aware of the fact that there's no motion.
If you do feel motion, notice the quality of the motion, to see if the breathing feels uneven there, or if there's any tension or tightness.
If there's tension, think of relaxing it.
If the breathing feels jagged or uneven, think of smoothing it out… Now move your attention over to the right of that spot — to the lower right-hand corner of the abdomen — and repeat the same process… Then over to the lower left-hand corner of the abdomen… Then up to the navel… right… left… to the solar plexus… right… left… the middle of the chest… right… left… to the base of the throat… right… left… to the middle of the head… 
If you were meditating at home, you could continue this process through your entire body — over the head, down the back, out the arms & legs to the tips of your finger & toes — but since our time is limited, I'll ask you to return your focus now to any one of the spots we've already covered.
Let your attention settle comfortably there, and then let your conscious awareness spread to fill the entire body, from the head down to the toes, so that you're like a spider sitting in the middle of a web: It's sitting in one spot, but it's sensitive to the entire web.
Keep your awareness expanded like this — you have to work at this, for its tendency will be to shrink to a single spot — and think of the breath coming in & out your entire body, through every pore.
Let your awareness simply stay right there for a while — there's no where else you have to go, nothing else you have to think about… And then gently come out of meditation.
After my talk we'll have time to answer any questions you may have, but right now I'd like to return to a point I made earlier: the ways meditation and its role in dealing with illness and death tend to be under and over-estimated, for only when you have a proper estimation of your tools can you put them to use in a precise and beneficial way.
I'll divide my remarks into two areas: what meditation is, and what it can do for you.
First, what meditation is: This is an area where popular conceptions tend to under-estimate it.
Books that deal with meditation in treating illness tend to focus on only two aspects of meditation as if that were all it had to offer.
Those two aspects are relaxation and visualization.
It's true that these two processes form the beginning stages of meditation — you probably found our session just now very relaxing, and may have done some visualization when you thought of the breath coursing through the body — but there's more to meditation than just that.
The great meditators in human history did more than simply master the relaxation response.
Meditation as a complete process involves three steps.
The first is mindful relaxation, making the mind comfortable in the present — for only when it feels comfortable in the present can it settle down and stay there.
The important word in this description, though, is mindful.
You have to be fully aware of what you're doing, of whether or not the mind is staying with its object, and of whether or not it's drifting off to sleep.
If you simply relax and drift off, that's not meditation, and there's nothing you can build on it.
If, however, you can remain fully aware as the mind settles comfortably into the present, that develops into the next step.
As the mind settles more and more solidly into the present, it gains strength.
You feel as if all the scattered fragments of your attention — worrying about this, remembering that, anticipating, whatever — come gathering together and the mind takes on a sense of wholeness and unification.
This gives the mind a sense of power.
As you let this sense of wholeness develop, you find that it becomes more and more solid in all your activities, regardless of whether you're formally meditating or not, and this is what leads to the third step.
As you become more and more single-minded in protecting this sense of wholeness, you become more and more sensitive, and gain more and more insight into the things that can knock it off balance.
On the first level, you notice that if you do anything hurtful to yourself or others, that destroys it.
Then you start noticing how the simple occurrence in the mind of such things as greed, lust, anger, delusion and fear can also knock it off balance.
You begin to discern ways to reduce the power that these things have over the mind, until you can reach a level of awareness that is untouched by these things — or by anything at all — and you can be free from them.
As I will show in a few moments, it's these higher stages in meditation that can be the most beneficial.
If you practice meditation simply as a form of relaxation, that's okay for dealing with the element of your disease that comes from stress, but there's a lot more going on in AIDS, physically and mentally, than simply stress, and if you limit yourself to relaxation or visualization, you're not getting the full benefits that meditation has to offer.
Now we come to the topic of what meditation can do for you as you face serious illness and death.
This is an area where the media engage both in over-estimation and under-estimation.
On the one hand, there are books that tell you that all illness comes from your mind, and you simply have to straighten out your mind and you'll get well.
Once a young woman, about, suffering from lung cancer, came to visit my monastery, and she asked me what I thought of these books.
I told her that there are some cases where illness comes from purely mental causes, in which case meditation can cure it, but there are also cases where it comes from physical causes, and no amount of meditation can make it go away.
If you believe in karma, there are some diseases that come from present karma — your state of mind right now — and others that come from past karma.
If it's a present-karma disease, meditation might be able to make it go away.
If it's a past-karma disease, the most you can hope from meditation is that it can help you live with the illness and pain without suffering from it.
At the same time, if you tell ill people that they are suffering because their minds are in bad shape, and that it's entirely up to them to straighten out their minds if they want to get well, you're laying an awfully heavy burden on them, right at the time when they're feeling weak, miserable, helpless and abandoned to begin with.
When I came to this point, the woman smiled and said that she agreed with me.
As soon as she had been diagnosed with cancer, her friends had given her a whole slew of books on how to will illness away, and she said that if she had believed in book-burning she would have burned them all by now.
I personally know a lot of people who believe that the state of their health is an indication of their state of mind, which is fine and good when they're feeling well.
As soon as they get sick, though, they feel that it's a sign that they're failures in meditation, and this sets them into a tailspin.
You should be very clear on one point: The purpose of meditation is to find happiness and well-being within the mind, independent of the body or other things going on outside.
Your aim is to find something solid within that you can depend on no matter what happens to the body.
If it so happens that through your meditation you are able to effect a physical cure, that's all fine and good, and there have been many cases where meditation can have a remarkable effect on the body.
My teacher had a student — a woman in her fifties — who was diagnosed with cancer more than years ago.
The doctors at the time gave her only a few months to live, and yet through her practice of meditation she is still alive today.
She focused her practice on the theme that, 'although her body may be sick, her mind doesn't have to be.' A few years ago I visited her in the hospital the day after she had had a kidney removed.
She was sitting up in bed, bright and aware, as if nothing happened at all.
I asked her if there was any pain, and she said yes, hours a day, but that she didn't let it make inroads on her mind.
In fact, she was taking her illness much better than her husband, who didn't meditate, and who was so concerned about the possibility of losing her that he became ill, and she had to take care of him.
Cases like this are by no means guaranteed, though, and you shouldn't really content yourself just with physical survival — for as I said earlier, if this disease doesn't get you, something else will, and you're not really safe until you've found the treasure in the mind that is unaffected even by death.
Remember that your most precious possession is your mind.
If you can keep it in good shape no matter what else happens around you, then you have lost nothing, for your body goes only as far as death, but your mind goes beyond it.
So in examining what meditation can do for you, you should focus more on how it can help you to maintain your peace of mind in the face of pain, aging, illness and death, for these are things you're going to have to face someday no matter what.
Actually, they are a normal part of life, although we have come to regard them as abnormalities.
We've been taught that our birthright is eternal youth, health and beauty.
When these things betray us, we feel that something is horribly wrong, and that someone is at fault — either ourselves or others.
Actually, though, there's no one at fault.
Once we are born, there is no way that aging, illness and death can't happen.
Only when we accept them as inevitable can we begin to deal with them intelligently in such a way that we won't suffer from them.
Look around you.
The people who try hardest to deny their aging — through exercise, diet, surgery, makeup, whatever — they are the ones who suffer most from aging.
The same holds true with illness and death.
So now I would like to focus on how to use meditation to face these things and transcend them.
First, pain.
When it happens, you first have to accept that it's there.
This in itself is a major step, since most people, when they encounter pain, try to deny it its right to exist.
They think they can avoid it by pushing it away, but that's like trying to avoid paying taxes by throwing away your tax return: You may get away with it for a little while, but then the authorities are bound to catch on, and you'll be worse off than you were before.
So the way to transcend pain is first to understand it, to get acquainted with it, and this means enduring it.
However, meditation can offer a way of detaching yourself from the pain while you are living with it, so even though it's there, you don't have to suffer from it.
First, if you master the technique of focusing on the breath and adjusting it so that it's comfortable, you find that you can choose where to focus your awareness in the body.
If you want, you can focus it on the pain, but in the earlier stages its best to focus on the parts of the body that are comfortable.
Let the pain have the other part.
You're not going to drive it out, but at the same time you don't have to move in with it.
Simply regard it as a fact of nature, an event that is happening, but not necessarily happening to you.
Another technique is to breathe through the pain.
If you can become sensitive to the breath sensations that course through the body each time you breathe, you will notice that you tend to build a tense shell around the pain, where the energy in the body doesn't flow freely.
This, although it's a kind of avoidance technique, actually increases the pain.
So think of the breath flowing right through the pain as you breathe in and out, to dissolve away this shell of tension.
In most cases, you will find that this can relieve the pain considerably.
For instance, when I had malaria, I found this very useful in relieving the mass of tension that would gather in my head and shoulders.
At times it would get so great that I could scarcely breath, so I just thought of the breath coming in through all the nerve centers in my body — the middle of the chest, the throat, the middle of the forehead and so forth — and the tension would dissolve away.
However, there are some people though who find that breathing through the pain increases the pain, which is a sign that they are focusing improperly.
The solution in that case is to focus on the opposite side of the body.
In other words, if the pain is in the right side, focus on the left.
If it's in front, focus on the back.
If it's in your head — literally — focus on your hands and feet.

As your powers of concentration become stronger and more settled, you can begin analyzing the pain.
The first step is to divide it into its physical and mental components.
Distinguish between the actual physical pain, and the mental pain that comes along with it: The sense of being persecuted — justly or unjustly — the fear that the pain may grow stronger or signal the end, whatever.
Then remind yourself that you don't have to side with those thoughts.
If the mind is going to think them, you don't have to fall in with them.
Then, when you stop feeding them, you'll find that after a while they'll begin to go away, just like a crazy person coming to talk with you.
If you talk with the crazy person, after a while you'll go crazy too.
If however, you let the crazy person chatter away, but don't join in the conversation, after a while the crazy person will leave you alone.
It's the same with all the garbage thoughts in your mind.
As you strip away all the mental paraphernalia surrounding your pain — including the idea that the pain is yours or is happening to you — you find that you finally come down to the label that simply says, This is a pain and it's right there.
When you can get past this, that's when your meditation undergoes a breakthrough.
One way is to simply notice that this label will arise and then pass away.
When it comes, it increases the pain.
When it goes, the pain subsides.
Then try to see that the body, the pain and your awareness are all three separate things — like three pieces of string that have been tied into a knot, but which you now untie.
When you can do this, you find that there is no pain that you cannot endure.
Another area where meditation can help you is to live with the simple fact of your body being ill.
For some people, accepting this fact is one of the hardest parts of illness.
But once you have developed a solid center in your mind, you can base your happiness there, and begin to view illness with a lot more equanimity.
We have to remember that illness is not cheating us out of any-thing.
It's simply a part of life.
As I said earlier, illness is normal; health is miracle.
The idea of all the complex systems of the body functioning properly is so improbable that we shouldn't be surprised when they start breaking down.
Many people complain that the hardest part of living with a disease like AIDS or cancer is the feeling that they have lost control over their bodies, but once you gain more control over you mind, you begin to see that the control you thought you had over you body was illusory in the first place.
The body has never entered into an agreement with you that it would do as you liked.
You simply moved in, forced it to eat, walk, talk, etc., and then thought you were in charge.
But even then it kept on doing as it liked — getting hungry, urinating, defecating, passing wind, falling down, getting injured, getting sick, growing old.
When you reflect on the people who think they have the most control over their bodies, like bodybuilders, they're really the most enslaved, having to eat enough each day to keep ten Somalians alive, having to push and pull on metal bars for hours, expending all their energy on exercises that don't go anywhere at all.
If they don't, their pumped-up bodies will deflate in no time flat.
So an important function of meditation — in giving you a solid center that provides you a vantage point from which to view life in its true colors — is that it keeps you from feeling threatened or surprised when the body begins to reassert its independence.
Even if the brain starts to malfunction, the people who have developed mindfulness through meditation can be aware of the fact, and let go of that part of their bodies too.
One of my teacher's students had to undergo heart surgery, and apparently the doctors cut off one of the main arteries going to his brain.
When he came to, he could tell that his brain wasn't working right, and it wasn't long before he realized that it was affecting his perception of things.
For instance, he would think that he had said something to his wife, would get upset when she didn't respond, when actually he had only thought of what he wanted to say without really saying anything at all.
When he realized what was happening, he was able to muster enough mindfulness to keep calm and simply watch what was going on in his brain, reminding himself that it was a tool that wasn't working quite right, and not getting upset when things didn't jive.
Gradually he was able to regain his normal use of his faculties, and as he told me, it was fascinating to be able to observe the functioning and malfunctioning of his brain, and to realize that the brain and the mind were two separate things.
And finally we come to the topic of death.
As I said earlier, one of the important stages of meditation is when you discover within the mind a knowing core that does not die at the death of the body.
If you can reach this point in your meditation, then death poses no problem at all.
Even if you haven't reached that point, you can prepare yourself for death in such a way that you can die skillfully, and not in the messy way that most people die.
When death comes, all sorts of thoughts are going to come crowding into your mind — regret about things you haven't yet been able to do, regret about things you did do, memories of people you have loved and will have to leave.
I was once almost electrocuted, and although people who saw it happening said that it was only a few seconds before the current was cut off, to me it felt like five minutes.
Many things went through my mind in that period, beginning with the thought that I was going to die of my own stupidity.
Then I made up my mind that, if the time had come to go, I'd better do it right, so I didn't let my mind fasten on any of the feelings of regret, etc., that came flooding through the mind.
I seemed to be doing OK, and then the current ceased.
If you haven't been practicing meditation, this sort of experience can be overwhelming, and the mind will latch on to whatever offers itself and then will get carried away in that direction.
If, though, you have practiced meditation, becoming skillful at letting go of your thoughts, or knowing which thoughts to hang onto and which ones to let pass, you'll be able to handle the situation, refusing to fall in line with any mental states that aren't of the highest quality.
If your concentration is firm, you can make this the ultimate test of the skill you have been developing.
If there's pain, you can see which will disappear first: the pain or the core of your awareness.
You can rest assured that no matter what, the pain will go first, for that core of awareness cannot die.
What all this boils down to is that, as long as you are able to survive, meditation will improve the quality of your life, so that you can view pain and illness with equanimity and learn from them.
When the time comes to go, when the doctors have to throw up their hands in helplessness, the skill you have been developing in your meditation is the one thing that won't abandon you.
It will enable to handle your death with finesse.
Even though we don't like to think about it, death is going to come no matter what, so we should learn how to stare it down.
Remember that a death well handled is one of the surest signs of a life well lived.
So far I've been confining my remarks to the problems faced by people with AIDS and other life threatening illnesses, and haven't directly addressed the problems of people caring for them.
Still, you should have been able to gather some useful points for handling such problems.
Meditation offers you a place to rest and gather your energies.
It also can help give you the detachment to view your role in the proper light.
When an ill person relapses or dies, it's not a sign of failure on the part of the people caring for him.
Your duty, as long as your patient is able to survive, is to do what you can to improve the quality of his/her life.
When the time comes for the patient to go, your duty is to help improve the quality of his death.
An old man who had been meditating for many years once came to say farewell to my teacher soon after he had learned that he had an advanced case of cancer.
His plan was to go home and die, but my teacher told him to stay and die in the monastery.
If he went home, he would hear nothing but his nieces and nephews arguing over the inheritance, and it would put him in a bad frame of mind.
So we arranged a place for him to stay, and had his daughter, who was also a meditator, look after him.
It wasn't long before his body systems started breaking down, and on occasion it looked like the pain was beginning to overwhelm him, so I had his daughter whisper meditation instructions into his ear, and to chant his favorite Buddhist chants by his bedside.
This had a calming effect on him, and when he did die — at a.m.
one night — he seemed calm and fully aware.
As the daughter told me the next morning, she didn't feel any sadness or regret, for she had done her very best to make his death as smooth a transition as possible.
If you can have a situation where both the patient and the caregiver are meditators, it makes things a lot easier on both sides, and the death of the patient does not necessarily have to mean the death of the caregiver's ability to care for anyone else.
That covers the topics I wanted to deal with.
I'm afraid that some of you will find my remarks somewhat downbeat, but my purpose has been to help you look clearly at the situation facing you, either as an ill person or as someone caring for one.
If you avoid taking a good, hard look at things like pain and death, they can only make you suffer more, since you've refused to prepare yourself for them.
Only when you see them clearly, get a strong sense of what's important and what's not, and hold firmly to your priorities: only then can you transcend them.
Many people find that the diagnosis of a fatal illness enables them to look at life clearly for the first time, to get some sense of what their true priorities are.
This in itself can make a radical improvement in the quality of their lives — its simply a shame that they had to wait to this point to see things clearly.
But whatever your situation, I ask that you try to make the most of it in terms of improving the state of your mind, for when all else leaves you, that will stay.
If you haven't invested your time in developing it, it won't have much to offer you in return.
If you've trained it and cared for it well, it will repay you many times over.
And, as I hope I have shown, meditation has much to offer as a tool in helping you to solidify your state of mind and enable it to transcend everything else that may come its way.
Thank you for your attention.
When you go to study meditation with any group or teacher who is experienced in a particular form of meditation, you should first make your heart confident that your teacher is fully experienced in that form of meditation, and be confident that the form of meditation he teaches is the right path for sure.
At the same time, show respect for the place in which you are to meditate.
Only then should you begin practicing.
Teachers in the past used to require a dedication ceremony as a means of inspiring confidence before you were to study meditation.
They would have you make an offering of five pairs of beeswax candles and five pairs of white flowers — this was called the five khandha — or eight pairs of beeswax candles and eight pairs of white flowers — this was called the eight khandha — or one pair of beeswax candles each weighing grams and an equal number of white flowers.
Then they would teach you their particular form of meditation.
This ancient custom has its good points.
There are many other ceremonies as well, but I won't go into them.
I'll mention only a very simple, easy-to-follow ceremony a little further on.
Only after you have inspired confidence in your heart as already mentioned should you go to the teacher experienced in that form of meditation.
If he is experienced in repeating samma araham, he will teach you to repeat samma araham, samma araham, samma araham.
Then he'll have you visualize a bright, clear jewel two inches above your navel, and tell you to focus your mind right there as you continue your repetition, without letting your mind slip away from the jewel.
In other words, you take the jewel as the focal point of your mind.
If you go to a teacher experienced in meditating on the rising and falling of the abdomen, he'll have you meditate on rising and falling, and focus your mind on the different motions of the body.
For instance, when you raise your foot, you think raising.
When you place your foot, you think placing, and so on; or else he'll have you focus continually on being preoccupied with the phenomenon of arising and passing away in every motion or position of the body.
If you go to a teacher experienced in psychic powers, he'll have you repeat na ma ba dha, na ma ba dha, and focus the mind on a single object until it takes you to see heaven and hell, deities and brahmas of all sorts, to the point where you get carried away with your visions.
If you go to a teacher experienced in breath meditation, he'll have you focus on your in-and-out breath, and have you keep your mind firmly preoccupied with nothing but the in-and-out breath.
If you go to a teacher experienced in meditating on buddho, he'll have you repeat buddho, buddho, buddho, and have you keep the mind firmly in that meditation word until you're fully skilled at it.
Then he'll have you contemplate buddho and what it is that's saying buddho.
Once you see that they are two separate things, focus on what's saying buddho.
As for the word buddho, it will disappear, leaving only what it is that was saying buddho.
You then focus on what it is that was saying buddho as your object.
People of our time — or of any time, for that matter — regardless of how educated or capable they may be and especially those of us who are Buddhists: Buddhism teaches causes and effects that are entirely true, but why is it that we have to fall for the claims and advertisements we hear everywhere?
It must be because people at present are impatient and want to see results before they've completed the causes, in line with the fact that we're supposed to be in an atomic age.
Buddhism teaches us to penetrate into the heart and mind, which are mental phenomena.
As for the body, it's a physical phenomenon.
Physical phenomena have to lie under the control of mental phenomena.
When we begin to practice meditation and train the mind to be quiet and untroubled, I can't see that we're creating any problems at that moment for anyone at all.
If we keep practicing until we're skilled, then we'll be calm and at peace.
If more and more people practice this way, there will be peace and happiness all over the world.
As for the body, we can train it to be peaceful only as long as the mind is in full control.
The minute mindfulness lapses, the body will get back to its old affairs.
So let's try training the mind by repeating buddho.
Before practicing meditation on the word buddho, you should start out with the preliminary steps.
In other words, inspire confidence in your mind, as already mentioned, and then bow down three times, saying:
Namo tassa bhagavato arahato samma-sambuddhassa.

Note: These preliminary steps are simply an example.
There's nothing wrong with chanting more than this if you have more to chant, but you should bow down to the Buddha as the first step each time you meditate, unless the place in which you're meditating is unconducive.
Now, sit in meditation, your right leg on top of left, your hands palm-up in your lap, your right hand on top of your left.
Sit straight.
Repeat the word buddho in your mind, focusing your attention in the middle of your chest, at the heart.
Don't let your attention stray out ahead or behind.
Be mindful to keep your mind in place, steady in its one-pointedness, and you'll enter into a state of concentration.
When you enter into concentration, the mind may go so blank that you don't even know how long you are sitting.
By the time you come out of concentration, many hours may have passed.
For this reason, you shouldn't fix a time limit for yourself when sitting in meditation.
Let things follow their own course.
The mind in true concentration is the mind in a state of one-pointedness.
If the mind hasn't reached a state of one-pointedness, it isn't yet in concentration, because the true heart is only one.
If there are many mental states going on, you haven't penetrated into the heart.
You've only reached the mind.
Before you practice meditation, you should first learn the difference between the heart and the mind, for they aren't the same thing.
The mind is what thinks and forms perceptions and ideas about all sorts of things.
The heart is what simply stays still and knows that it's still, without forming any further thoughts at all.
Their difference is like that between a river and waves on the river.
All sciences and all defilements are able to arise because the mind thinks and forms ideas and strays out in search of them.
You'll be able to see these things clearly with your own heart once the mind becomes still and reaches the heart.
Water is something clean and clear by its very nature.
If anyone puts dye into the water, it will change in line with the dye.
But once the water is filtered and distilled, it will become clean and clear as before.
This is an analogy for the heart and the mind.
Actually, the Buddha taught that the mind is identical with the heart.
If there is no heart, there is no mind.
The mind is a condition.
The heart itself has no conditions.
In practicing meditation, no matter what the teacher or method: If it's correct, it'll have to penetrate into the heart.
When you reach the heart, you will see all your defilements, because the mind gathers all defilements into itself.
So now how you deal with them is up to you.
When doctors are going to cure a disease, they first have to find the cause of the disease.
Only then can they treat it with the right medicine.
As we start meditating longer and longer, repeating buddho, buddho, buddho, the mind will gradually let go of its distractions and restlessness, and gather in to stay with buddho.
It will stay firm, with buddho its sole preoccupation, until you see that the state of mind that says buddho is identical with the mind itself at all times, regardless of whether you're sitting, standing, walking, or lying down.
No matter what your activity, you'll see the mind bright and clear with buddho.
Once you've reached this stage, keep the mind there as long as you can.
Don't be in a hurry to want to see this or be that — because desire is the most serious obstacle to the concentrated mind.
Once desire arises, your concentration will immediately deteriorate, because the basis of your concentration — buddho — isn't solid.
When this happens, you can't grab hold of any foundation at all, and you get really upset.
All you can think of is the state of concentration in which you used to be calm and happy, and this makes the mind even more agitated.
Practice meditation the same way farmers grow rice.
They're in no hurry.
They scatter the seed, plow, harrow, plant the seedlings, step by step, without skipping any of the steps.
Then they wait for the plants to grow.
Even when they don't yet see the rice appearing, they're confident that the rice is sure to appear some day in the future.
Once the rice appears, they're convinced that they're sure to reap results.
They don't pull on the rice plants to make them come out with rice when they want it.
Anyone who did that would end up with no results at all.
The same holds true with meditation.
You can't be in a hurry.
You can't skip any of the steps.
You have to make yourself firmly confident that, “This is the meditation word that will make my mind concentrated for sure.” Don't have any doubts as to whether the meditation word is right for your temperament, and don't think that, “That person used this meditation word with these or those results, but when I use it, my mind doesn't settle down.
It doesn't work for me at all.” Actually, if the mind is firmly set on the meditation word you're repeating, then no matter what the word, it's sure to work — because you repeat the word simply to make the mind steady and firm, that's all.
As for any results apart from that, they all depend on each person's individual potential and capabilities.
Once in the Buddha's time there was a monk sitting in meditation near a pond who saw a heron diving down to catch fish and eat them.
He took that as his meditation subject until he succeeded in becoming an arahant.
I've never seen a heron eating fish mentioned as a subject in any of the meditation manuals, but he was able to use it to meditate until he attained arahantship — which illustrates what I've just said.
When the mind is intent on staying within the bounds of its meditation word buddho, with mindfulness in control, it's sure to grow out of its rebelliousness.
We have to train and restrain it, because we're looking for peace and contentment for the mind.
Ordinarily, the mind tends to be preoccupied with looking for distraction, as I've already explained, and for the most part it strays off to this sort of distraction: When we start meditating buddho, buddho, buddho, as soon as we focus the mind on buddho, it won't stay there.
It'll run out to think of whatever work we are about to start or have left undone.
It thinks about doing this and doing that until it gets all worked up, afraid that the work won't come out well or won't succeed.
The work we've been assigned by other people or that we're doing on our own will be a waste of time or will cause us to lose face if we don't do as we've been told…
This is one of the distractions that prevent new meditators from attaining concentration.
You have to pull your mind back to buddho, buddho, buddho, and tell yourself, “Thoughts of this sort aren't the path to peace; the true path to peace is to keep the mind with buddho and nothing else” — and then keep on repeating buddho, buddho, buddho…
After a moment, the mind will go straying out again, this time to your family — your children, your wife or husband: How are they getting along?
Are they healthy?
Are they eating well?
If you're far apart, you wonder about where they're staying, what they're eating.
Those who have left home think about those at home.
Those at home think about those who have gone far away — afraid that they aren't safe, that other people will molest them, that they have no friends, that they're lonely — thinking in different ways, whatever the mind can imagine, all of which exaggerate the truth.
Or if you're still young and single, you think about having fun with your friends — the places you used to go together, the good times you had, the things you used to do — to the point where you actually say something or laugh out loud.
This sort of defilement is the worst of the bunch.
When you're meditating buddho, buddho, buddho, your defilements see that the situation is getting out of hand and that you'll escape from their control, so they look for things to tie you down even more tightly all the time.
Never from the day of your birth have you ever practiced concentration at all.
You've simply let the mind follow the moods of the defilements.
Only now have you begun to practice, so when you repeat buddho, buddho, buddho to get the mind to settle down with buddho, it's going to wriggle away in the same way that fish try to wriggle back into the water when they're tossed up on land.
So you have to pull the mind back to buddho.
Buddho is something cool and calm.
It's the path for giving rise to peace and contentment — the only path that will release us from the suffering and stress in this world.
So you pull the mind back to buddho.
This time it begins to settle down.
As soon as you feel that it's staying put, you begin to get a sense that when the mind stays put, it's rested and at ease in a way different from when it's not still, when it's restless and upset.
You make up your mind to be careful and alert to keep the mind in that state and… Oops.
There it goes again.
Now it's taking your financial interests as an excuse, saying that if you don't do this or search for that, you'll miss out on a really great opportunity.
So you focus your mind on that instead of your meditation word.
As for where buddho has gone, you haven't the least idea.
By the time you realize that buddho has disappeared, it's already too late — which is why they say that the mind is restless, slippery, and hard to control, like a monkey that can never sit still.
Sometimes, after you've been sitting in meditation a long time, you begin to worry that your blood won't be flowing properly, that your nerves will die from lack of blood, that you'll grow numb and end up paralyzed.
If you're meditating far from home or in a forest, it's even worse: You're afraid that snakes will bite you, tigers will eat you, or ghosts will haunt you, making all kinds of scary faces.
Your fear of death can whisper to you in all sorts of way, all of which are simply instances of you yourself scaring yourself.
The truth is nothing at all like what you imagine.
Never from the day of your birth have you ever seen a tiger eat even a single person.
You've never once seen a ghost — you don't even know what it would look like, but you fashion up pictures to scare yourself.
The obstacles to meditation mentioned here are simply examples.
There are actually many, many more.
Those who meditate will find this out for themselves.
If you hold buddho close to the heart, and use your mindfulness to keep the mind with nothing but buddho, no dangers will come your way.
So have firm faith in buddho.
I guarantee that there will be no dangers at all — unless you've done bad kamma in the past, which is something beyond anyone's power to protect you from.
Even the Buddha himself can't protect you from it.
When people begin meditating, their confidence tends to be weak.
No matter what their meditation subject, these sorts of defilements are sure to interfere, because these defilements form the basis of the world and of the mind.
The minute we meditate and make the mind one-pointed, the defilements see that we're going to get away from them, so they come thronging around so that we won't be able to escape from the world.
When we see how really serious and harmful they are, we should make our minds forthright and our confidence solid and strong, telling ourselves that we've let ourselves be deceived into believing the defilements for many lifetimes; it's time now that we be willing to believe the Buddha's teachings and take buddho as our refuge.
We then make mindfulness solid and fix the mind firmly in buddho.
We give our lives to buddho and won't let our minds slip away from it.
When we make this sort of commitment, the mind will drop straight into one-pointedness and enter concentration.
When you first enter concentration, this is what it's like: You'll have no idea at all of what concentration or one-pointedness of mind is going to feel like.
You're simply intent on keeping mindfulness firmly focused on one object — and the power of a mind focused firmly on one object is what will bring you to a state of concentration.
You won't be thinking at all that concentration will be like this or like that, or that you want it to be like this or like that.
It will simply take its own way, automatically.
No one can force it.
At that moment you'll feel as if you are in another world, with a sense of ease and solitude to which nothing else in the world can compare.
When the mind withdraws from concentration, you'll regret that that mood has passed, and you'll remember it clearly.
All that we say about concentration comes from the mind that has withdrawn from that state.
As long as it's still gathered in that state, we aren't interested in what anyone else says or does.
You have to train the mind to enter this sort of concentration often, so as to become skilled and adept, but don't try to remember your past states of concentration, and don't let yourself want your concentration to be like it was before — because it won't be that way, and you'll just be making more trouble for yourself.
Simply contemplate buddho, buddho, and keep your mind with your mental repetition.
What it does then is its own business.
After the mind has first attained to concentration, it won't be the same way the next time around, but don't worry about it.
Whatever it's like, don't worry about it.
Just make sure that you get it centered.
When the results come out in many different ways, your understanding will broaden and you'll come to develop many different techniques for dealing with the mind.
What I've mentioned here is simply to be taken as an example.
When you follow these instructions, don't give them too much weight, or they will turn into allusions to the past, and your meditation won't get anywhere.
Simply remember them as something to use for the sake of comparison after your meditation has begun to progress.
No matter what method you use — buddho, rising & falling, or samma araham — when the mind is about to settle down in concentration, you won't be thinking that the mind is about to settle down, or is settling down, or anything at all.
It'll settle down automatically on its own.
You won't even know when you let go of your meditation word.
The mind will simply have a separate calm and peace that isn't in this world or another world or anything of the sort.
There's no one and nothing at all, just the mind's own separate state, which is called the world of the mind.
In that state there won't be the word 'world' or anything else.
The conventional realities of the world won't appear there, and so no insight of any sort will arise in there at all.
The point is simply that you train the mind to be centered and then compare it to the state of mind that isn't centered, so that you can see how they differ, how the mind that has attained concentration and then withdraws to contemplate matters of the world and the Dhamma differs from the mind that hasn't attained concentration.
The heart and the mind.
Let's talk some more about the heart and mind so that you'll understand.
After all, we're talking about training the mind in concentration: If you don't understand the relationship between the heart and the mind, you won't know where or how to practice concentration.
Everyone born — human or animal — has a heart and mind, but the heart and mind have different duties.
The mind thinks, wanders, and forms ideas of all sorts, in line with where the defilements lead it.
As for the heart, it's simply what knows.
It doesn't form any ideas at all.
It's neutral — in the middle — with regard to everything.
The awareness that's neutral: That's the heart.
The heart doesn't have a body.
It's a mental phenomenon.
It's simply awareness.
You can place it anywhere at all.
It doesn't lie inside or outside the body.
When we call the heart-muscle the heart, that's not the true heart.
It's simply an organ for pumping blood throughout the body so as to keep it alive.
If the heart-muscle doesn't pump blood throughout the body, life can't last.
People in general are always talking about the heart: “My heart feels happy… sad… heavy… light… down…” Everything is a matter of the heart.
Abhidhamma experts, however, speak in terms of the mind: the mind in a wholesome state, the mind in an unwholesome state, the mind in a neutral state, the mind on the level of form, the mind on the formless level, the mind on the transcendent level, and so on, but none of them know what the real heart and mind are like.
The mind is what thinks and forms ideas.
It has to make use of the six senses as its tools.
As soon as the eye sees a visual object, the ear hears a sound, the nose smells an aroma, the tongue tastes a flavor, the body comes into contact with a tactile sensation — cold, hot, hard or soft — or the intellect thinks of an idea in line with its defilements, good or bad: If any of these things are good, the mind is pleased; if they're bad, it's displeased.
All of this is an affair of the mind, or of defilement.
Aside from these six senses, there's nothing the mind can make use of.
In the texts they are analyzed into the six faculties, the six elements, the six forms of contact, and all sorts of other things, but all these things lie within the six senses.
So these are characteristics of the mind: that which can never sit still.
When you train the mind — or, in other words, practice concentration — you have to get control over the mind that's wriggling after the six senses, as already explained, and make it stop still with one thing: its meditation word, buddho.
Don't let it go straying out ahead or behind.
Make it stay still, and know that it's staying still: That's the heart.
The heart has nothing to do with any of the six senses, which is why it's called the heart.
When people in general talk about the heart of something, they're referring to its center.
Even when they talk about their own hearts, they point to the center of the chest.
Actually, the heart doesn't lie in any particular place at all — as I have already explained — although it lies right in the center of everything.
If you want to understand what the heart is, you can try an experiment.
Breathe in deeply and hold your breath for a moment.
At that point there won't be anything at all except for one thing: neutral awareness.
That's the heart, or 'what knows.' But if you try to catch hold of the heart in this way, you can't hold on to it for very long — only as long as you can hold your breath — but you can give it a try just to see what the true heart is like.
Once you realize that the heart and mind have different duties and characteristics like this, you'll find it easier to train the mind.
Actually, the heart and the mind are really the same thing.
As the Buddha said, the mind is identical with the heart.
When we practice concentration, it's enough just to train the mind; once the mind is trained, that's where we'll see the heart.
Once the mind has been fully trained by using mindfulness to keep it with buddho as its only preoccupation, it won't go straying after different things, and instead will gather into oneness.
The meditation word will disappear without your being aware of it, and you'll feel a sense of peace and ease that nothing else can equal.
Those who have never experienced this ease before, when they first experience it, won't be able to describe it, because no one else in the world has ever experienced that kind of peace and ease.
Even though other people have experienced it, it's not the same.
For this reason, you find it hard to describe — although you can describe it to yourself.
If you try to describe it to others, you have to use similes and analogies before they'll understand you.
Things of this sort are personal: Only you can know them for yourself.
In addition, if you've developed a lot of potential in previous lifetimes, all sorts of amazing things can happen.
For example, you may gain knowledge of heavenly beings or hungry ghosts.
You may learn about your own past and future, and that of other people: In that particular lifetime you were like this; in the future you'll be like that.
Even though you didn't intend to know these things, when the mind attains concentration it can know on its own in a very amazing way.
This sort of thing is something that really fascinates beginning meditators.
When it happens to them, they like to brag to other people.
When those people try to meditate, but don't get the knowledge or abilities, they become discouraged, thinking that they don't have the merit or potential to meditate, and they begin to lose faith in the practice.
As for those who see these sorts of things, when that knowledge or ability deteriorates — because they've been carried away by external things and haven't taken the heart as their foundation — they won't be able to grab hold of anything at all.
When they think of the things they used to know, their minds become even more stirred up.
People who like to brag will take the old things they used to see and talk about them in glowing terms.
Avid listeners really love to listen to this sort of thing, but avid meditators are unimpressed — because true meditators like to listen only to things that are present and true.
The Buddha taught that whether his teachings will flourish or degenerate depends on those who practice them.
The teachings degenerate when meditators get just a little bit of knowledge and then go bragging to other people, talking about external matters with no substance at all, instead of explaining the basic principles of meditation.
When they do this, they make the religion degenerate without their even realizing it.
Those who make the religion flourish are those who speak about things that are useful and true.
They don't speak just for the fun of it.
They speak in terms of cause and effect: “When you meditate like this, repeating the meditation word in this way, it will make the mind gather into one and snuff out its defilements and restlessness like this… When you meditate on buddho, be patient.
Don't be in a hurry.
Be confident in your meditation word and use mindfulness to keep the mind with its buddho.
Your confidence is what will make the mind firm and unwavering, able to let go of all its doubts and uncertainties.
The mind will gather in on its meditation word, and mindfulness will keep it solely with buddho at all times.
Whether you sit, stand, walk, lie down, or whatever work you do, mindfulness will be alert to nothing but buddho.
If your mindfulness is still weak, and your techniques still few, you have to hold on to buddho as your foundation.
Otherwise your meditation won't progress; or even if it does progress, it won't have any foundation.
For concentration to be strong, the mind has to be resolute.
When mindfulness is strong and the mind resolute, you decide that this is what you want: “If I can't catch hold of buddho, or see buddho in my heart, or get the mind to stay put solely with buddho, I won't get up from my meditation.
Even if my life will end, I don't care.” When you do this, the mind will gather into one faster than you realize it.
The meditation word buddho, or whatever it is that may have been bothering or perplexing you, will vanish in the flash of an eye.
Even your body, which you've been attached to for so long, won't appear to you.
All that remains is the heart — simple awareness — cool, calm, and at ease.
People who practice meditation really like it when this happens.
The next time around, they want it to happen again, and so it doesn't happen again.
That's because the desire keeps it from happening.
Concentration is something very subtle and sensitive.
You can't force it to be like this or that — and at the same time you can't force the mind not to enter concentration, either.
If you're impatient, things get even more fouled up.
You have to be very patient.
Whether or not the mind is going to attain concentration, you've meditated on buddho in the past, so you just keep meditating on buddho.
Act as if you had never meditated on buddho before.
Make the mind neutral and even, let the breath flow gently, and use mindfulness to focus the mind on buddho and nothing else.
When the time comes for the mind to enter concentration, it will do it on its own.
You can't arrange the way it will happen.
If it were something you could arrange, all the people in the world would have become arahants long ago.
Knowing how to meditate, but not doing it right; having done it right once, and wanting it to be that way again, and yet it doesn't happen: All of these things are obstacles in practicing concentration.
In meditating on buddho, you have to get so that you're quick and adept.
When a good or a bad mood strikes you, you have to be able to enter concentration immediately.
Don't let the mind be affected by that mood.
Whenever you think of buddho, the mind gathers immediately: When you can do this, your mind will be solid and able to rely on itself.
When you've practiced so that you're adept and experienced in this way, after a while you'll find that your defilements and attachments to all things will gradually disappear on their own.
You don't have to go clearing away this or that defilement, telling yourself that this or that defilement has to be removed with this or that teaching or this or that method.
Be content with whatever method you find works for you.
That's plenty enough.
To have the defilements gradually disappear with the method I've just explained is better than trying to arrange things, entering the four levels of absorption, abandoning directed thought, evaluation, rapture and pleasure, leaving just one-pointedness and equanimity; or trying to arrange the first stage of the path to nibbana by abandoning self-identity views, uncertainty, and attachment to precepts & practices; or by looking at your various defilements, telling yourself, “With that defilement, I was able to contemplate in such-and-such a way, so I've gone beyond that defilement.
I have so-and-so many defilements left.
If I can contemplate in such-and-such a way, my defilements will be finished” — but you don't realize that the state of mind that wants to see and know and attain these things is a defilement fixed firmly in the mind.
When you finish your contemplation, the mind is back in its original state and hasn't gained anything at all.
On top of that, if someone comes along and says something that goes against the way you see things, you start disagreeing violently, like a burning fire into which someone pours kerosene.
So hold firmly to your meditation word, buddho.
Even if you don't attain anything else, at least you've got your meditation word as your foundation.
The various preoccupations of the mind will lessen or may even disappear, which is better than not having any foundation to hold to at all.
Actually, all meditators have to hold firmly to their meditation word.
Only then can they be said to be meditating with a foundation.
When their meditation deteriorates, they'll be able to use it as something to hold to.
The Buddha taught that people who make the effort to abandon defilement have to act like old-time warriors.
In the past, they'd have to build a fortress with strong walls, moats, gates, and towers to protect themselves from enemy attack.
When an intelligent warrior went out to battle and saw that he was no match for the enemy, he would retreat into his fortress and defend it so that the enemy couldn't destroy it.
At the same time, he'd gather enough troops, weapons, and food and then go out to resume his fight with the enemy.
Concentration is a very important strength.
If you don't have concentration, where will your discernment gain any strength?
The discernment of insight meditation isn't something that can be fashioned into being by arrangement.
Instead, it arises from concentration that has been mastered until it is good and solid.
Even those who are said to attain Awakening with 'dry insight': If they don't have any mental stillness, where will they get any insight?
It's simply that their stillness isn't fully mastered.
Only when we put the matter this way does it make any sense.
When your concentration is solid and steady to the point where you can enter and leave it at will, you'll be able to stay with it long and contemplate the body in terms of its unattractiveness or in terms of its physical elements.
Or, if you like, you can contemplate the people of the world until you see them all as skeletons.
Or you can contemplate the entire world as empty space…
Once the mind is fully centered, then no matter whether you are sitting, standing, walking, or lying down, the mind will be centered at all times.
You'll be able to see clearly how your own defilements — greed, anger, and delusion, which arise from the mind — arise from this and that cause, how they remain in this or that way, and you'll be able to find means to abandon them with this or that technique.
This is like the water in a lake that has been muddy for hundreds and hundreds of years suddenly becoming clear so that you can see all the things lying along the lake-bottom — things you never dreamed were there before.
This is called insight — seeing things as they truly are.
Whatever sort of truth they have, that's the truth you see, without deviating from that truth.
Forcing the mind to be still can make it let go of defilement, but it lets go in the same way a person cuts grass, cutting just the part above ground, without digging up the roots.
The roots are sure to send up new shoots when rain falls again.
In other words, you do see the harm of the preoccupations that arise from the six senses, but as soon as you see it, you retreat into stillness without contemplating those preoccupations as carefully as you do when the mind is in concentration.
In short, you simply want stillness, without wanting to spend any time in contemplation — like a ground lizard that relies on its hole for safety.
As soon as it sees an enemy coming, it runs into its hole, escaping danger only for a while.
If you want to uproot your defilements, then when you see that defilement springs from the six senses — for instance, the eye sees a visual object or the ear hears a sound, contact is made that causes you to be pleased or displeased, happy or sad, and then you grab onto it as your preoccupation, making the mind murky, disturbed, and upset, sometimes to the point where you can't eat or sleep, and can even commit suicide — when you see this clearly, make your concentration firm and then focus your mind exclusively on examining that particular preoccupation.
For instance, if the eye sees an attractive visual object that makes you feel pleased, focus on examining just that sense of pleasure, to find out whether it arises from the eye or from the visual object.
If you examine the visual object, you see that it's just a physical phenomenon.
Whether it's good or bad, it doesn't try to persuade you to be pleased or displeased, or to make you love it or hate it.
It's simply a visual object that appears and then disappears in line with its own nature.
When you turn to examine the eye that sees the visual object, you find that the eye goes looking for objects and, as soon as it finds one, light gets reflected into the optic nerves so that all kinds of visible forms appear.
The eye doesn't try to persuade you to be pleased or displeased, to love or to hate anything.
Its duty is simply to see.
Once it has seen a visible form, the form disappears.
As for the other senses and their objects, attractive or unattractive, they should be examined in just the same way.
When you contemplate in this way, you'll see clearly that all the things in the world that become objects of defilement do so because of these six senses.
If you contemplate the six senses so that you don't tag along after them, defilements won't arise within you.
On the contrary: Insight and discernment will arise instead, all because of these same six senses.
The six senses are the media of goodness and evil.
We'll head for a good or a bad destination in the next life because of the way we use them.
The world seems broad because the mind isn't centered and is left free to wander among the objects of the six senses.
The world will narrow down when the mind has been trained in concentration so that it lies under your control and can contemplate the six senses exclusively within it.
In other words, when the mind is fully concentrated, the outer senses — the eye seeing forms, the ear hearing sounds, and so on — won't appear at all.
All that will appear are the forms and sounds that are mental phenomena present exclusively in that concentration.
You won't be paying any attention to the outer senses at all.
When your concentration is fully solid and strong, you'll be able to contemplate this world of the mind, which gives rise to sensory contact, perceptions, preoccupations, and all defilements.
The mind will withdraw from everything leaving just the heart, or simple awareness.
The heart and the mind have different characteristics.
The mind is what thinks, forming perceptions and preoccupations to the point of latching on, holding them to itself.
When it sees the suffering, harm, and stress that come from holding onto all the defilements, it will go and withdraw from all preoccupations and defilements.
The mind will then be the heart.
This is how the heart and mind differ.
The heart is what's neutral and still.
It doesn't think anything at all.
It's simply aware of its stillness.
The heart is a genuinely neutral or central phenomenon.
Neutral with no past, no future, no good, no evil: That's the heart.
When we talk about the heart of anything, we mean its center.
Even the human heart, which is a mental phenomenon, we say lies in the center of the chest.
But where the real heart is, we don't know.
Try focusing your attention on any part of the body and you'll feel the awareness of that spot.
Or you can focus your attention outside the body — on a post or the wall of a house, for example — and that's the spot you'll be aware of.
So we can conclude that the true heart is still and neutral awareness.
Wherever there's neutral awareness, that's where the heart is.
When people in general talk about the heart, that's not the true heart.
It's simply a set of muscles and valves for pumping blood throughout the body to keep it alive.
If this pump doesn't send blood throughout the body, the body can't live.
It'll have to die.
The same holds true with the brain.
The mind thinks of good and evil by using the brain as its tool.
The nervous system of the brain is a physical phenomenon.
When its various causal factors are cut off, this physical phenomenon can't last.
It has to stop.
But as for the mind, which is a mental phenomenon, Buddhism teaches that it continues to exist and can take birth again.
This mental phenomenon will stop only when insight discerns its causal factors and uproots their underlying causes.
None of the various subjects and sciences of the world have an end point.
The more you study them, the more they fan out.
Only Buddhism can teach you to reach an end.
In the first stage, it teaches you to acquaint yourself with your body, to see how it's made up of various things put together, and what their duties are.
At the same time, Buddhism teaches you to see that the body is inherently unattractive.
It teaches you to acquaint yourself with this world, which is made up of suffering and stress, and which will ultimately have to fall apart by its very nature.
So now that we've received this body — even though it's full of foul and unattractive things, and even though it's made up of all kinds of suffering and stress — we're still able to depend on it for a while, so we should use it to do good to repay our debts to the world before we leave it at death.
The Buddha teaches that although the nature of a person is to fall apart and die, the mind — the overseer of this world — must come back to be reborn as long as it still has defilements.
Thus he teaches us to practice concentration, which is an affair exclusively of the mind.
Once we have practiced concentration, we will feel every sensory contact inside, just at the mind.
We won't be concerned with our seeing and hearing at the eye or the ear.
Instead, we'll be aware of the sensory contact right at the mind.
This is what it means to narrow down the world.
The senses are the best means for taking the measure of your own mind.
When sensory contact strikes the mind, does it have an impact on you?
If it has a lot of impact, that shows that your mindfulness is weak and your foundation is still shaky.
If it has only a little impact, or no impact at all, that shows that your mindfulness is strong and you're fully able to care for yourself.
These things are like Devadatta, who created trouble for the Bodhisattva all along.
If not for Devadatta, the Bodhisattva wouldn't have been able to bring his character to full perfection.
Once his character had been fully perfected, he was able to gain Awakening and become the Buddha.
Before gaining Awakening, he had to withstand the massive armies of temptation; and right after his Awakening, the three daughters of temptation came to test him once more.
As a result, the people of the world have praised him ever since for having conquered defilement in this world once and for all.
As long as the inner senses still exist, mental contact is still a preoccupation.
Thus those who know, having seen the harm of these things, are willing to withdraw from them, leaving just the heart that's neutral… neutral… neutral, with no thinking, no imagining, no fashioning of anything at all.
When this is the case, where will this world be formed?
This is how the Buddha teaches us to reach the world's end.
Back in the days of the Buddha, nirvana had a verb of its own: nibbuti.
It meant to “go out,” like a flame.
Because fire was thought to be in a state of entrapment as it burned — both clinging to and trapped by the fuel on which it fed — its going out was seen as an unbinding.
To go out was to be unbound.
Sometimes another verb was used — parinibbuti — with the “pari-” meaning total or all-around, to indicate that the person unbound, unlike fire unbound, would never again be trapped.
Now that nirvana has become an English word, it should have its own English verb to convey the sense of “being unbound” as well.
At present, we say that a person “reaches” nirvana or “enters” nirvana, implying that nibbana is a place where you can go.
But nirvana is most emphatically not a place.
It's realized only when the mind stops defining itself in terms of place: of here, or there, or between the two.
This may seem like a word-chopper's problem — what can a verb or two do to your practice?
— but the idea of nirvana as a place has created severe misunderstandings in the past, and it could easily create misunderstandings now.
There was a time when some philosophers in India reasoned that if nirvana is one place and samsara another, then entering into nirvana leaves you stuck: you've limited your range of movement, for you can't get back to samsara.
Thus to solve this problem they invented what they thought was a new kind of nirvana: an unestablished nirvana, in which one could be in both places — nirvana and samsara — at once.
However, these philosophers misunderstood two important points about the Buddha's teachings.
The first was that neither samsara nor nirvana is a place.
Samsara is a process of creating places, even whole worlds, and then wandering through them.
Nirvana is the end of this process.
You may be able to be in two places at once — or even develop a sense of self so infinite that you can occupy all places at once — but you can't feed a process and experience its end at the same time.
You're either feeding samsara or you're not.
If you feel the need to course freely through both samsara and nirvana, you're simply engaging in more samsara-ing and keeping yourself trapped.
The second point is that nirvana, from the very beginning, was realized through unestablished consciousness — one that doesn't come or go or stay in place.
There's no way that anything unestablished can get stuck anywhere at all, for it's not only non-localized but also undefined.
The idea of a religious ideal as lying beyond space and definition is not exclusive to the Buddha's teachings, but issues of locality and definition, in the Buddha's eyes, had a specific psychological meaning.
This is why the non-locality of nirvana is important to understand.
Just as all phenomena are rooted in desire, consciousness localizes itself through passion.
Passion is what creates the “there” on which consciousness can land or get established, whether the “there” is a form, feeling, perception, thought-construct, or a type of consciousness itself.
Once consciousness gets established on any of these aggregates, it becomes attached and then proliferates, feeding on everything around it and creating all sorts of havoc.
Wherever there's attachment, that's where you get defined as a being.
You create an identity there, and in so doing you're limited there.
Even if the “there” is an infinite sense of awareness grounding, surrounding, or permeating everything else, it's still limited, for “grounding” and so forth are aspects of place.
Wherever there's place, no matter how subtle, passion lies latent, looking for more food to feed on.
If, however, the passion can be removed, there's no more “there” there.
One sutta illustrates this with a simile: the sun shining through the eastern wall of a house and landing on the western wall.
If the western wall, the ground beneath it, and the waters beneath the ground were all removed, the sunlight wouldn't land.
In the same way, if passion for form, etc., could be removed, consciousness would have no “where” to land, and so would become unestablished.
This doesn't mean that consciousness would be annihilated, simply that — like the sunlight — it would now have no locality.
With no locality, it would no longer be defined.
This is why the consciousness of nirvana is said to be “without surface”, for it doesn't land.
Because the consciousness-aggregate covers only consciousness that is near or far, past, present, or future — i.e., in connection with space and time — consciousness without surface is not included in the aggregates.
It's not eternal because eternity is a function of time.
And because non-local also means undefined, the Buddha insisted that an awakened person — unlike ordinary people — can't be located or defined in any relation to the aggregates in this life; after death, he/she can't be described as existing, not existing, neither, or both, because descriptions can apply only to definable things.
The essential step toward this non-localized, undefined realization is to cut back on the proliferations of consciousness.
This first involves contemplating the drawbacks of keeping consciousness trapped in the process of feeding.
This contemplation gives urgency to the next steps: bringing the mind to oneness in concentration, gradually refining that oneness, and then dropping it to zero.
The drawbacks of feeding are most graphically described in SN., A Son's Flesh.
The process of gradually refining oneness is probably best described in MN, The Lesser Discourse on Emptiness, while the drop to zero is best described in the Buddha's famous instructions to Bahiya: “'In reference to the seen, there will be only the seen.
In reference to the heard, only the heard.
In reference to the sensed, only the sensed.
In reference to the cognized, only the cognized.' That is how you should train yourself.
When for you there will be only the seen in reference to the seen, only the heard in reference to the heard, only the sensed in reference to the sensed, only the cognized in reference to the cognized, then, Bahiya, there is no you in connection with that.
When there is no you in connection with that, there is no you there.
When there is no you there, you are neither here nor yonder nor between the two.
This, just this, is the end of stress.
With no here or there or between the two, you obviously can't use the verb “enter” or “reach” to describe this realization, even metaphorically.
Maybe we should make the word nirvana into a verb itself: “When there is no you in connection with that, you nirvana.” That way we can indicate that unbinding is an action unlike any other, and we can head off any mistaken notion about getting “stuck” in total freedom.
“All beings subsist on nutriment.” 
Then Ven.
Radha went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “'A being,' lord.
'A being,' it's said.
To what extent is one said to be 'a being'?
“Any desire, passion, delight, or craving for form, Radha: when one is caught up there, tied up there, one is said to be 'a being.'
“Any desire, passion, delight, or craving for feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness, Radha: when one is caught up there, tied up there, one is said to be 'a being.'
“If one stays obsessed with form, that's what one is measured by.
Whatever one is measured by, that's how one is classified.
“If one stays obsessed with feeling…
“If one stays obsessed with perception…
“If one stays obsessed with fabrications…
“If one stays obsessed with consciousness, that's what one is measured by.
Whatever one is measured by, that's how one is classified.
“But if one doesn't stay obsessed with form, that's not what one is measured by.
Whatever one isn't measured by, that's not how one is classified.
“If one doesn't stay obsessed with feeling…
“If one doesn't stay obsessed with perception…
“If one doesn't stay obsessed with fabrications…
“If one doesn't stay obsessed with consciousness, that's not what one is measured by.
Whatever one isn't measured by, that's not how one is classified.
“If one stays obsessed with form, that's what one is measured by.
“One attached is unreleased; one unattached is released.
Should consciousness, when standing, stand attached to form, supported by form, established on form, watered with delight, it would exhibit growth, increase, & proliferation.
“If a monk abandons passion for the property of form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness, then owing to the abandonment of passion, the support is cut off, and there is no base for consciousness.
Consciousness, thus unestablished, not proliferating, not performing any function, is released.
Owing to its release, it is steady.
Owing to its steadiness, it is contented.
Owing to its contentment, it is not agitated.
Not agitated, he is totally unbound right within.
He discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'
“What one intends, what one arranges, and what one obsesses about: This is a support for the stationing of consciousness.
There being a support, there is a landing of consciousness.
When that consciousness lands and grows, there is the production of renewed becoming in the future.
When there is the production of renewed becoming in the future, there is future birth, aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of suffering & stress.
“If one doesn't intend and doesn't arrange, but one still obsesses, this is a support for the stationing of consciousness.
There being a support, there is a landing of consciousness.
When that consciousness lands and grows, there is the production of renewed becoming in the future.
When there is the production of renewed becoming in the future, there is future birth, aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of suffering & stress.
“But when one doesn't intend, arrange, or obsess, there is no support for the stationing of consciousness.
There being no support, there is no landing of consciousness.
When that consciousness doesn't land & grow, there is no production of renewed becoming in the future.
When there is no production of renewed becoming in the future, there is no future birth, aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, or despair.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of suffering & stress.
“There are these four nutriments for the maintenance of beings who have come into being or for the support of those in search of a place to be born.
Which four?
Physical food, gross or refined; contact as the second, intellectual intention the third, and consciousness the fourth.
These are the four nutriments for the maintenance of beings who have come into being or for the support of those in search of a place to be born.
“Where there is passion, delight, & craving for the nutriment of physical food, consciousness lands there and grows.
Where consciousness lands and grows, name-&-form alights.
Where name-&-form alights, there is the growth of fabrications.
Where there is the growth of fabrications, there is the production of renewed becoming in the future.
Where there is the production of renewed becoming in the future, there is future birth, aging, & death, together, I tell you, with sorrow, affliction, & despair.
“Just as — when there is dye, lac, yellow orpiment, indigo, or crimson — a dyer or painter would paint the picture of a woman or a man, complete in all its parts, on a well-polished panel or wall, or on a piece of cloth; in the same way, where there is passion, delight, & craving for the nutriment of physical food… contact… intellectual intention… consciousness, consciousness lands there and grows.
Where consciousness lands and grows, name-&-form alights.
Where name-&-form alights, there is the growth of fabrications.
Where there is the growth of fabrications, there is the production of renewed becoming in the future.
Where there is the production of renewed becoming in the future, there is future birth, aging, & death, together, I tell you, with sorrow, affliction, & despair.
“Where there is no passion for the nutriment of physical food, where there is no delight, no craving, then consciousness does not land there or grow.
Where consciousness does not land or grow, name-&-form does not alight.
Where name-&-form does not alight, there is no growth of fabrications.
Where there is no growth of fabrications, there is no production of renewed becoming in the future.
Where there is no production of renewed becoming in the future, there is no future birth, aging, & death.
That, I tell you, has no sorrow, affliction, or despair.
“Just as if there were a roofed house or a roofed hall having windows on the north, the south, or the east.
When the sun rises, and a ray has entered by way of the window, where does it land?
“On the western wall, lord.
“And if there is no western wall, where does it land?
“On the ground, lord.
“And if there is no ground, where does it land?
“On the water, lord.
“And if there is no water, where does it land?
“It does not land, lord.
“In the same way, where there is no passion for the nutriment of physical food… contact… intellectual intention… consciousness, where there is no delight, no craving, then consciousness does not land there or grow.
Where consciousness does not land or grow, name-&-form does not alight.
Where name-&-form does not alight, there is no growth of fabrications.
Where there is no growth of fabrications, there is no production of renewed becoming in the future.
Where there is no production of renewed becoming in the future, there is no future birth, aging, & death.
That, I tell you, has no sorrow, affliction, or despair.
“One neither fabricates nor mentally fashions for the sake of becoming or un-becoming.
This being the case, one is not sustained by anything in the world.
Unsustained, one is not agitated.
Unagitated, one is totally unbound right within.
One discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'
“Sensing a feeling of pleasure, one discerns that it is fleeting, not grasped at, not relished.
Sensing a feeling of pain… Sensing a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, one discerns that it is fleeting, not grasped at, not relished.
Sensing a feeling of pleasure, one senses it disjoined from it.
Sensing a feeling of pain… Sensing a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, one senses it disjoined from it.
Nandaka: “Just as if a skilled butcher or butcher's apprentice, having killed a cow, were to carve it up with a sharp carving knife so that — without damaging the substance of the inner flesh, without damaging the substance of the outer hide — he would cut, sever, & detach only the skin muscles, connective tissues, & attachments in between.
Having cut, severed, & detached the outer skin, and then covering the cow again with that very skin, if he were to say that the cow was joined to the skin just as it had been: would he be speaking rightly?
“No, venerable sir.
Why is that?
Because if the skilled butcher or butcher's apprentice, having killed a cow, were to… cut, sever, & detach only the skin muscles, connective tissues, & attachments in between; and… having covered the cow again with that very skin, then no matter how much he might say that the cow was joined to the skin just as it had been, the cow would still be disjoined from the skin.
“This simile, sisters, I have given to convey a message.
The message is this: The substance of the inner flesh stands for the six internal media; the substance of the outer hide, for the six external media.
The skin muscles, connective tissues, & attachments in between stand for passion & delight.
And the sharp knife stands for noble discernment — the noble discernment that cuts, severs, & detaches the defilements, fetters, & bonds in between.
Then the Blessed One went with a large number of monks to the Black Rock on the slope of Isigili.
From afar he saw Ven.
Vakkali lying dead on a couch.
Now at that time a smokiness, a darkness was moving to the east, moved to the west, moved to the north, the south, above, below, moved to the intermediate directions.
The Blessed One said, “Monks, do you see that smokiness, that darkness…?
“Yes, Lord.
“That is Mara, the Evil One.
He is searching for the consciousness of Vakkali the clansman: “Where is the consciousness of Vakkali the clansman established?” But, monks, it is through unestablished consciousness that Vakkali the clansman has become totally unbound.
The Buddha:
“What do you think, Anuradha: Do you regard form as the Tathagata?
“No, lord.
“Do you regard feeling as the Tathagata?
“No, lord.
“Do you regard perception as the Tathagata?
“No, lord.
“Do you regard fabrications as the Tathagata?
“No, lord.
“Do you regard consciousness as the Tathagata?
“No, lord.
“What do you think, Anuradha: Do you regard the Tathagata as being in form?… Elsewhere than form?… In feeling?… Elsewhere than feeling?… In perception?… Elsewhere than perception?… In fabrications?… Elsewhere than fabrications?… In consciousness?… Elsewhere than consciousness?
“No, lord.
“What do you think, Anuradha: Do you regard the Tathagata as form-feeling-perception-fabrications-consciousness?
“No, lord.
“Do you regard the Tathagata as that which is without form, without feeling, without perception, without fabrications, without consciousness?
“No, lord.
“And so, Anuradha — when you can't pin down the Tathagata as a truth or reality even in the present life — is it proper for you to declare, 'Friends, the Tathagata — the supreme man, the superlative man, attainer of the superlative attainment — being described, is described otherwise than with these four positions: The Tathagata exists after death, does not exist after death, both does & does not exist after death, neither exists nor does not exist after death'?
“No, lord.
“Very good, Anuradha.
Very good.
Both formerly & now, it is only stress that I describe, and the cessation of stress.
“But, Master Gotama, the monk whose mind is thus released: Where does he reappear?
“'Reappear,' Vaccha, doesn't apply.
“In that case, Master Gotama, he does not reappear.
“'Does not reappear,' Vaccha, doesn't apply.
“…both does & does not reappear.
“…doesn't apply.
“…neither does nor does not reappear.
“…doesn't apply.
“How is it, Master Gotama, when Master Gotama is asked if the monk reappears… does not reappear… both does & does not reappear… neither does nor does not reappear, he says, '… doesn't apply' in each case.
At this point, Master Gotama, I am befuddled; at this point, confused.
The modicum of clarity coming to me from your earlier conversation is now obscured.
“Of course you're befuddled, Vaccha.
Of course you're confused.
Deep, Vaccha, is this phenomenon, hard to see, hard to realize, tranquil, refined, beyond the scope of conjecture, subtle, to-be-experienced by the wise.
For those with other views, other practices, other satisfactions, other aims, other teachers, it is difficult to know.
That being the case, I will now put some questions to you.
Answer as you see fit.
How do you construe this, Vaccha: If a fire were burning in front of you, would you know that, 'This fire is burning in front of me'?
“…yes… “And suppose someone were to ask you, Vaccha, 'This fire burning in front of you, dependent on what is it burning?' Thus asked, how would you reply?
“…I would reply, 'This fire burning in front of me is burning dependent on grass & timber as its sustenance.' “If the fire burning in front of you were to go out, would you know that, 'This fire burning in front of me has gone out'?
“…yes… “And suppose someone were to ask you, 'This fire that has gone out in front of you, in which direction from here has it gone?
East?
West?
North?
Or south?' Thus asked, how would you reply?
“That doesn't apply, Master Gotama.
Any fire burning dependent on a sustenance of grass & timber, being unnourished — from having consumed that sustenance and not being offered any other — is classified simply as 'out'.
“Even so, Vaccha, any physical form by which one describing the Tathagata would describe him: That the Tathagata has abandoned, its root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
Freed from the classification of form, Vaccha, the Tathagata is deep, boundless, hard to fathom, like the sea.
'Reappears' doesn't apply.
'Does not reappear' doesn't apply.
'Both does & does not reappear' doesn't apply.
'Neither reappears nor does not reappear' doesn't apply.
“Any feeling… Any perception… Any mental fabrication…
“Any consciousness by which one describing the Tathagata would describe him: That the Tathagata has abandoned, its root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
Freed from the classification of consciousness, Vaccha, the Tathagata is deep, boundless, hard to fathom, like the sea.
'Reappears' doesn't apply.
'Does not reappear' doesn't apply.
'Both does & does not reappear' doesn't apply.
'Neither reappears nor does not reappear' doesn't apply.
“Consciousness without surface, without end, luminous all around, does not partake of the solidity of earth, the liquidity of water, the radiance of fire, the windiness of wind, the divinity of devas the allness of the All.
Is a mountain heavy?
It may be heavy in and of itself, but as long as we don't try to lift it up, it won't be heavy for us.
This is a metaphor that one of my teachers, Ajaan Suwat, often used when explaining how to stop suffering from the problems of life.
You don't deny their existence — the mountains are heavy — and you don't run away from them.
As he would further explain, you deal with problems where you have to and solve them where you can.
You simply learn how not to carry them around.
That's where the art of the practice lies: in living with real problems without making their reality burden the heart.
As a beginning step in mastering that art, it's useful to look at the source for Ajaan Suwat's metaphor — the Buddha's teachings on dukkha — to get a fuller idea of how far the metaphor extends.
Dukkha is a word notoriously hard to translate into English.
In the Pali canon, it applies both to physical and to mental pain and dis-ease, ranging from intense anguish to the subtlest sense of being burdened or confined.
The Pali commentaries explain dukkha as “that which is hard to bear.” Ajaan MahaBoowa, a Thai forest master, translates it as “whatever puts a squeeze on the heart.” Although no single English term covers all of these meanings, the word “stress” — as a strain on body or mind — seems as close as English can get to the Pali term; “suffering” can be used in places where “stress” seems too mild.
The Buddha focused his teachings on the issue of stress because he had found a method for transcending it.
To understand that method, we have to see which parts of our experience are marked by stress.
From his perspective, experience falls into two broad categories: compounded — put together from causal forces and processes — and uncompounded.
All ordinary experience is compounded.
Even such a simple act as looking at a flower is compounded, in that it depends on the physical conditions supporting the flower's existence together with all the complex physical and mental factors involved in the act of seeing.
The only experience that isn't compounded is extraordinary — nirvana — for it doesn't depend on causal factors of any kind.
Stress is totally absent from uncompounded experience.
Its relation to compounded experience, though, is more complex.
When the Buddha talked about dukkha in terms of the three common characteristics — inconstancy, stress, and not-self — he said that all compounded experiences are innately stressful.
From this point of view, even flower-gazing is stressful despite the obvious pleasure it provides, for it relies on a fragile tension among the combined factors making up the experience.
Thus if we want to go beyond stress we'll have to go beyond compounded experience.
But this presents a problem: what will we use to reach the uncompounded?
We can't use uncompounded experience to get us there, because — by definition — it can't play a role in any causal process.
It can't be used as a tool.
So we need a way of using compounded experience to transcend itself.
To meet this need, the Buddha talked about dukkha in another context: the four noble truths.
Here, for strategic purposes, he divided compounded experience into three truths — stress, its cause, and the way to its cessation.
Uncompounded experience he left as the remaining truth: the cessation of stress.
In defining the first truth he said that compounded experiences were stressful only when accompanied by clinging.
In this sense, flower-gazing isn't stressful unless we cling to the experience and try to base our happiness on it.
So it's obvious that in these two contexts the Buddha is speaking of dukkha in two different senses.
Ajaan Suwat's mountain metaphor helps to explain how they are related.
The heaviness of the mountain stands for dukkha as a common characteristic: the stress inherent in all compounded experiences.
The fact that the mountain is heavy only for those who try to lift it stands for dukkha as a noble truth: the stress that comes only with clinging — the clinging that turns physical pain into mental pain, and turns aging, illness, and death into mental distress.
The Buddha taught dukkha as a common characteristic to make us reflect on the things we cling to: are they really worth holding onto?
If not, why keep holding on?
If life offered no pleasures better than those we already get from clinging, the Buddha's insistence on the stress in things like flower-gazing might seem churlish and negative.
But his purpose in getting us to reflect on the flip side of ordinary pleasures is to open our hearts to something very positive: the higher form of happiness, totally devoid of suffering and stress, that comes only with total letting go.
So he also taught dukkha as a noble truth in order to focus our attention on where the real problem lies: not in the stressfulness of experiences, but in our ignorance in thinking we have to cling to them.
And it's a good thing, too, that this is where the issue lies.
As long as there are mountains, there's not much we can do about their inherent weight, but we can learn to break our habit of lifting them up and carrying them around.
We can learn to stop clinging.
That will put an end to our sufferings.
To understand how to let go effectively, it's helpful to look at the Pali word for clinging — upadana — for it has a second meaning as well: the act of taking sustenance, as when a plant takes sustenance from the soil, or a fire from its fuel.
This second meaning for upadana applies to the mind as well.
When the mind clings to an object, it's feeding on that object.
It's trying to gain nourishment from sensory pleasures, possessions, relationships, recognition, status, whatever, to make up for the gnawing sense of emptiness it feels inside.
Unfortunately, this mental nourishment is temporary at best, so we keep hungering for more.
Yet no matter how much the mind may try to possess and control its food sources to guarantee a constant supply, they inevitably break down.
The mind is then burdened with searching for new places to feed.
So the issue of stress comes down to the feeding habits of the mind.
If the mind didn't have to feed, it wouldn't suffer.
At the same time, it would no longer create hardships for the people and things it consumes — through possession and control — as food.
If we want to end suffering for ourselves and at the same time relieve the hardships of others, we thus have to strengthen the mind to the point where it doesn't have to feed, and then sharpen its discernment so that it doesn't want to feed.
When it neither needs nor wants to feed, it will let go without our having to tell it to.
The practice to end dukkha would be quick and easy if we could simply go straight for the discernment that puts an end to clinging.
The feeding analogy, though, helps to explain why simply seeing the drawbacks of clinging isn't enough to make us let go.
If we're not strong enough to go without sustenance, the mind will keep finding new ways to feed and cling.
So we first have to learn healthy feeding habits that will strengthen the mind.
Only then will it be in a position where it no longer needs to feed.
How does the mind feed and cling?
The Pali canon lists four ways:
There's rarely a moment when the ordinary mind isn't clinging in at least one of these ways.
Even when we abandon one form of clinging, it's usually in favor of another.
We may abandon a puritanical view because it interferes with sensual pleasure; or a sensual pleasure because it conflicts with a view about what we should do to stay healthy and fit.
Our view of who we are may vary depending on which of our many senses of “I” is most pained, expanding into a sense of cosmic oneness when we feel confined by our small mind-body complex; and contracting into a small shell when we feel wounded from identifying with a cosmos so filled with cruelty and waste.
When the insignificance of our finite self becomes oppressive again, we may jump at the idea that we have no self, but then that becomes oppressive.
So our minds jump from clinging to clinging like a bird trapped in a cage.
When we realize we're captive, we naturally search for a way out, but everywhere we turn seems to be another side of the cage.
We may begin to wonder whether there is a way out, or whether talk of full release is simply an old archetypal ideal that has nothing to do with human reality.
But the Buddha was a great strategist: he realized that one of the walls of the cage is actually a door, and that if we grasp it skillfully, it'll swing wide open.
In other words, he found that the way to go beyond clinging is to turn our four ways of clinging into the path to their own abandoning.
We'll need a certain amount of sensory pleasure — in terms of adequate food, clothing, and shelter — to find the strength to go beyond sensual passion.
We'll need right view — seeing all things, including views, in terms of the four noble truths — to undermine our clinging to views.
And we'll need a regimen of the five ethical precepts and the practice of meditation to put the mind in a solid position where it can drop its clinging to precepts and practices.
Underlying all this, we'll need a healthy sense of self-love, self-responsibility, and self-discipline to master the practices leading to the insight that cuts through our clinging to doctrines of the self.
So we start the path to the end of suffering, not by trying to drop our clingings immediately, but by learning to cling more strategically.
In terms of the feeding analogy, we don't try to starve the mind.
We simply change its diet, weaning it away from junk food in favor of health food, developing inner qualities that will make it so strong that it won't need to feed ever again.
The canon lists these qualities as five:
Of these, concentration — at the level of jhana, or intense absorption — is the strength that the Buddhist tradition most often compares to good, healthy food.
A discourse in the Anguttara Nikaya compares the four levels of jhana to the provisions used to stock a frontier fortress.
Ajaan Lee, one of the Thai forest masters, compares them to the provisions needed on a journey through a lonely, desolate forest.
Or as Dhammapada says about the rapture of jhana,
As for discernment: When the mind is strengthened with the food of good concentration, it can begin contemplating the drawbacks of having to feed.
This is the part of the Buddha's teaching that — for many of us — goes most directly against the grain, because feeding, in every sense of the word, is our primary way of relating to and enjoying the world around us.
Our most cherished sense of inter-connectedness with the world — what some people call our interbeing — is, at its most basic level, inter-eating.
We feed on others, and they feed on us.
Sometimes our relationships are mutually nourishing, sometimes not, but either way it's hard to imagine any lasting relationship where some kind of physical or mental nourishment wasn't being consumed.
At the same time, feeding is the activity in which we experience the most intimate sense of ourselves.
We define ourselves through the pleasures, people, ideas, and activities we keep returning to for nourishment.
So it's hard for us to imagine a world, any possibility of enjoyment — even our very self — where we wouldn't inter-eat.
Our common resistance to the idea of no longer feeding — one of the Buddha's most radically uncommon teachings — comes largely from a failure of the imagination.
We can hardly conceive of what he's trying to tell us.
So he has to prescribe some strong medicine to jog our minds into new perspectives.
This is where his teachings on dukkha, or stress, come into play.
When the mind is strong and well fed, it can begin to look objectively at the stress involved in having to feed.
The teachings on dukkha as a common characteristic focus on the drawbacks of what the mind takes for food.
Sometimes it latches onto out-and-out suffering.
It clings to the body even when racked with pain.
It clings to its preferences and relationships even when these bring anguish, grief, and despair.
Sometimes the mind latches onto pleasures and joys, but pleasures and joys turn stressful when they deteriorate and change.
In any event, everything the mind latches onto is by its very nature compounded, and there's always at least a subtle level of stress inherent in keeping the compound going.
This applies not only to gross, external conditions, but even to the most subtle levels of concentration in the mind.
When we see stress as a characteristic common to all the things we latch onto, it helps dispel their allure.
Pleasures begin to ring hollow and false.
Even our sufferings — which we can often glamorize with a perverse pride — begin to seem banal when reduced to their common characteristic of stress.
This helps cut them down to size.
Of course, some people object to the idea of contemplating the dukkha inherent in the mind's food, on the grounds that this contemplation doesn't do justice to the many joys and satisfactions in life.
The Buddha, however, never denies the existence of pleasure.
He simply points out that if you focus on the allure of your food, you'll never be able to outgrow your eating addictions.
It would be like asking an alcoholic to muse on the subtle good flavors of scotch and wine.
Dukkha is inherent not only in the things on which we feed, but also in the very act of feeding.
This is the focal point for the Buddha's teaching on dukkha as a noble truth.
If we have to feed, we're a slave to our appetites.
And can we trust ourselves to behave in honorable ways when the demands of these slave drivers aren't met?
Inter-eating is not always a pretty thing.
At the same time, as long as we need to feed we're prey to any uncertainties in our food sources, at the mercy of any people or forces with power over them.
If we can't do without them, we're chained to them.
The mind isn't free to go places where there isn't any food.
And, as the Buddha guarantees, those are precisely the places — beyond our ordinary mental horizons — where the greatest happiness lies.
The purpose of these two contemplations — on the stress inherent both in the mind's food and in the way it feeds — is to sensitize us to limitations that we otherwise accept, sometimes blithely, always blindly, without thought.
Once the realization finally hits home that they're not worth the price they entail, we lose all infatuation with our desire to feed.
And, unlike the body, the mind can reach a level of strength where it no longer needs to cling or take in sustenance, even from the path of practice.
When it becomes strong enough in conviction, persistence, mindfulness, concentration, and discernment, it can open to a dimension — the deathless — where there is neither feeding nor being fed upon.
That puts an end to the “feeder,” and there's no more suffering with regard to food.
In other words, once we've fully penetrated the deathless, dukkha as a common characteristic is no longer an issue; dukkha as a noble truth no longer exists.
This is where you discover something unexpected: the mountains you've been trying to lift are all a by-product of your feeding.
When you stop feeding, no new mountains are formed.
Although there may still be some past-karma mountains remaining around you, they'll eventually wear away and no new ones will take their place.
In the meantime, their weight is no longer a problem.
Once you've finally stopped trying to lift them up, there's nothing to hold you down.
Upasika Kee Nanayon, also known by her penname, K.
Khao-suan-luang, was arguably the foremost woman Dhamma teacher in twentieth-century Thailand.
Born in to a Chinese merchant family in Rajburi, a town to the west of Bangkok, she was the eldest of five children — or, counting her father's children by a second wife, the eldest of eight.
Her mother was a very religious woman and taught her the rudiments of Buddhist practice, such as nightly chants and the observance of the precepts, from an early age.
In later life she described how, at the age of six, she became so filled with fear and loathing at the miseries her mother went through in being pregnant and giving birth to a younger sibling that, on seeing the newborn child for the first time — “sleeping quietly, a little red thing with black, black hair” — she ran away from home for three days.
This experience, plus the anguish she must have felt when her parents separated, probably lay behind her decision, made when she was still quite young, never to submit to what she saw as the slavery of marriage.
During her teens she devoted her spare time to Dhamma books and to meditation, and her working hours to a small business to support her father in his old age.
Her meditation progressed well enough that she was able to teach him meditation, with fairly good results, in the last year of his life.
After his death she continued her business with the thought of saving up enough money to enable herself to live the remainder of her life in a secluded place and give herself fully to the practice.
Her aunt and uncle, who were also interested in Dhamma practice, had a small home near a forested hill, Khao Suan Luang, outside of Rajburi, where she often went to practice.
In, as life disrupted by World War II had begun to return to normal, she gave up her business, joined her aunt and uncle in moving to the hill, and there the three of them began a life devoted entirely to meditation.
The small retreat they made for themselves in an abandoned monastic dwelling eventually grew to become the nucleus of a women's practice center that has flourished to this day.
Life at the retreat was frugal, in line with the fact that outside support was minimal in the early years.
However, even now that the center has become well-known and well-established, the same frugal style has been maintained for its benefits in subduing greed, pride, and other mental defilements, as well as for the pleasure it offers in unburdening the heart.
The women practicing at the center are all vegetarian and abstain from such stimulants as tobacco, coffee, tea, and betel nut.
They meet daily for chanting, group meditation, and discussion of the practice.
In the years when Upasika Kee's health was still strong, she would hold special meetings at which the members would report on their practice, after which she would give a talk touching on any important issues that had been brought up.
It was during such sessions that most of the talks recorded in this volume were given.
In the center's early years, small groups of friends and relatives would visit on occasion to give support and to listen to Upasika Kee's Dhamma talks.
As word spread of the high standard of her teachings and practice, larger and larger groups came to visit, and more women began to join the community.
When tape recording was introduced to Thailand in the mid-'s, friends began recording her talks and, in, a group of them printed a small volume of her transcribed talks for free distribution.
By the mid-'s, the stream of free Dhamma literature from Khao Suan Luang — Upasika Kee's poetry as well as her talks — had grown to a flood.
This attracted even more people to her center and established her as one of the best-known Dhamma teachers, male or female, in Thailand.
Upasika Kee was something of an autodidact.
Although she picked up the rudiments of meditation during her frequent visits to monasteries in her youth, she practiced mostly on her own without any formal study under a meditation teacher.
Most of her instruction came from books — the Pali canon and the works of contemporary teachers — and was tested in the crucible of her own relentless honesty.
Her later teachings show the influence of the writings of Buddhadasa Bhikkhu, although she transformed his concepts in ways that made them entirely her own.
In the later years of her life she developed cataracts that eventually left her blind, but she still continued a rigorous schedule of meditating and receiving visitors interested in the Dhamma.
She passed away quietly in after entrusting the center to a committee she appointed from among its members.
Her younger sister, Upasika Wan, who up to that point had played a major role as supporter and facilitator for the center, joined the community within a few months of Upasika Kee's death and soon became its leader, a position she held until her death in.
Now the center is once again being run by committee and has grown to accommodate members.
Much has been written recently on the role of women in Buddhism, but it is interesting to note that, for all of Upasika Kee's accomplishments in her own personal Dhamma practice and in providing opportunities for other women to practice as well, socio-historical books on Thai women in Buddhism make no mention of her name or of the community she founded.
This underscores the distinction between Buddhism as practice and mainstream Buddhism as a socio-historical phenomenon, a distinction that is important to bear in mind when issues related to the place of women in Buddhism are discussed.
Study after study has shown that mainstream Buddhism, both lay and monastic, has adapted itself thoroughly to the various societies into which it has been introduced — so thoroughly that the original teachings seem in some cases to have been completely distorted.
From the earliest centuries of the tradition on up to the present, groups who feel inspired by the Buddha's teachings, but who prefer to adapt those teachings to their own ends rather than adapting themselves to the teachings, have engaged in creating what might be called designer Buddhism.
This accounts for the wide differences we find when we compare, say, Japanese Buddhism, Tibetan, and Thai, and for the variety of social roles to which many women Buddhists in different countries have found themselves relegated.
The true practice of Buddhism, though, has always been counter-cultural, even in nominally Buddhist societies.
Society's main aim, no matter where, is its own perpetuation.
Its cultural values are designed to keep its members useful and productive — either directly or indirectly — in the on-going economy.
Most religions allow themselves to become domesticated to these values by stressing altruism as the highest religious impulse, and mainstream Buddhism is no different.
Wherever it has spread, it has become domesticated to the extent that the vast majority of monastics as well as lay followers devote themselves to social services of one form or another, measuring their personal spiritual worth in terms of how well they have loved and served others.
However, the actual practice enjoined by the Buddha does not place such a high value on altruism at all.
In fact, he gave higher praise to those who work exclusively for their own spiritual welfare than to those who sacrifice their spiritual welfare for the welfare of others — a teaching that the mainstream, especially in Mahayana traditions, has tended to suppress.
The true path of practice pursues happiness through social withdrawal, the goal being an undying happiness found exclusively within, totally transcending the world, and not necessarily expressed in any social function.
People who have attained the goal may teach the path of practice to others, or they may not.
Those who do are considered superior to those who don't, but those who don't are in turn said to be superior to those who teach without having attained the goal themselves.
Thus individual attainment, rather than social function, is the true measure of a person's worth.
Mainstream Buddhism, because it can become so domesticated, often seems to act at cross-purposes to the actual practice of Buddhism.
Women sense this primarily in the fact that they do not have the same opportunities for ordination that men do, and that they tend to be discouraged from pursuing the opportunities that are available to them.
The Theravadin Bhikkhuni Sangha, the nuns' order founded by the Buddha, died out because of war and famine almost a millennium ago, and the Buddha provided no mechanism for its revival.
Thus the only ordination opportunities open to women in Theravadin countries are as lay nuns, observing eight or ten precepts.
Because there is no formal organization for the lay nuns, their status and opportunities for practice vary widely from location to location.
In Thailand, the situation is most favorable in Rajburi and the neighboring province of Phetburi, both of which — perhaps because of the influence of Mon culture in the area — have a long tradition of highly-respected independent nunneries.
Even there, though, the quality of instruction varies widely with the nunnery, and many women find that they prefer the opportunities for practice offered in nuns' communities affiliated with monasteries, which is the basic pattern in other parts of Thailand.
The opportunities that monasteries offer for lay nuns to practice — in terms of available free time and the quality of the instruction given — again vary widely from place to place.
One major drawback to nuns' communities affiliated with monasteries is that the nuns are relegated to a status clearly secondary to that of the monks, but in the better monasteries this is alleviated to some extent by the Buddhist teachings on hierarchy: that it is a mere social convention, designed to streamline the decision-making process in the community, and based on morally neutral criteria so that one's place in the hierarchy is not an indication of one's worth as a person.
Of course there are sexist monks who mistake the privileged position of men as an indication of supposed male superiority, but fortunately nuns do not take vows of obedience and are free to change communities if they find the atmosphere oppressive.
In the better monasteries, nuns who have advanced far in the practice are publicly recognized by the abbots and can develop large personal followings.
At present, for instance, one of the most active Dhamma teachers in Bangkok is a woman, Amara Malila, who abandoned her career as a medical doctor for a life in a nun's community connected with one of the meditation monasteries in the Northeast.
After several years of practice she began teaching, with the blessings of the abbot, and now has a healthy shelf of books to her name.
Such individuals, though, are a rarity, and many lay nuns find themselves relegated to a celibate version of a housewife's life — considerably freer in their eyes than the life of an actual housewife, but still far from conducive to the full-time practice of the Buddhist path.
Although the opportunities for women to practice in Thailand are far from ideal, it should also be noted that mainstream Buddhism often discourages men from practicing as well.
Opportunities for ordination are widely available to men, but it is a rare monk who finds himself encouraged to devote himself entirely to the practice.
In village monasteries, monks have long been pressured to study medicine so that they can act as the village doctors or to study astrology to become personal counselors.
Both of these activities are forbidden by the disciplinary rules, but are very popular with the laity — so popular that until recent times a village monk who did not take up either of these vocations was regarded as shirking his duties.
Scholarly monks in the cities have long been told that the path to nibbana is no longer open, that full-time practice would be futile, and that a life devoted to administrative duties, with perhaps a little meditation on the side, is the most profitable use of one's monastic career.
On top of this, parents who encourage their sons from early childhood to take temporary ordination often pressure them to disrobe soon after ordination if they show any inclination to stay in the monkhood permanently and abandon the family business.
Even families who are happy to have their sons stay in the monkhood often discourage them from enduring the hardships of a meditator's life in the forest.
In some cases the state of mainstream Buddhism has become so detrimental to the practice that institutional reforms have been attempted.
In the Theravada tradition, such reforms have succeeded only if introduced from the top down, when senior monks have received the support of the political powers that be.
The Canonical example for this pattern is the First Council, called with royal patronage in the first year after the Buddha's passing away, for the express purpose of standardizing the record of the Buddha's teachings for posterity.
During the days of absolute monarchy, reforms that followed this pattern could be quite thorough-going and on occasion were nothing short of draconian.
In more recent years, though, they have been much more limited in scope, gaining a measure of success only when presented not as impositions but as opportunities: access to more reliable texts, improved standards and facilities for education, and greater support for stricter observance of the disciplinary rules.
And, of course, however such reforms may be carried out, they are largely limited to externals, because the attainment of the Deathless is not something that can be decreed by legislative fiat.
A modern example of such a reform movement is the Lay Nun Association of Thailand, an attempt to provide an organizational structure for all lay nuns throughout the country, sponsored by Her Majesty the Queen and senior monks in the national hierarchy.
This has succeeded chiefly in providing improved educational opportunities for a relatively small number of nuns, while its organizational aims have been something of a failure.
Even though the association is run by highly educated nuns, most of the nuns I know personally have avoided joining it because they do not find the leaders personally inspiring and because they feel they would be sacrificing their independence for no perceivable benefit.
This view may be based on a common attitude in the outlying areas of Thailand: the less contact with the bureaucratic powers at the center, the better.
As for confrontational reforms introduced from the bottom up, these have never been sanctioned by the tradition, and Theravadin history has no record of their ever succeeding.
The only such reform mentioned in the Canon was Devadatta's attempted schism, introduced as a reform to tighten up the disciplinary rules.
The Canon treats his attempt in such strongly negative terms that its memory is still very much alive in the Theravada mind set, making the vast majority of Buddhists reluctant to take up with confrontational reforms no matter how reasonable they might seem.
And with good reason: Anyone who has to fight to have his/her ideas accepted inevitably loses touch with the qualities of dispassion, self-effacement, unentanglement with others, contentment with little, and seclusion — qualities the Buddha set forth as the litmus test for gauging whether or not a proposed course of action, and the person proposing it, were in accordance with the Dhamma.
In addition, there have been striking instances where people have proposed religious reforms as a camouflage for their political ambitions, leaving their followers in a lurch when their ambitions are thwarted.
And even in cases where a confrontational reformer seems basically altruistic at heart, he or she tends to play up the social benefits to be gained from the proposed reform in the effort to win support, thus compromising the relationship of the reform to true practice.
Experiences with cases such as this have tended to make Theravadin Buddhists in general leery of confrontational reforms.
Thus, given the limited opportunities for institutional reform, the only course left open to those few men and women prepared to break the bonds of mainstream Buddhism in their determination to practice is to follow the example of the Buddha himself by engaging in what might be called personal or independent reform: to reject the general values of society, go off on their own, put up with society's disapproval and the hardships of living on the frontier, and search for whatever reliable meditation teachers may be living and practicing outside of the mainstream.
If no such teachers exist, individuals intent on practice must strike out on their own, adhering as closely as they can to the teachings in the texts — to keep themselves from being led astray by their own defilements — and taking refuge in the example of the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha in a radical way.
In a sense, there is a sort of folk wisdom to this arrangement.
Anyone who would take on the practice only when assured of comfortable material support, status, and praise — which the Buddha called the baits of the world — would probably not be up to the sacrifices and self-discipline the practice inherently entails.
Thus from the perspective of the practice, mainstream Buddhism serves the function of inspiring individuals truly intent on the practice to leave the mainstream and to go into the forest, which was where the religion was originally discovered.
As for those who prefer to stay in society, the mainstream meets their social/religious needs while at the same time making them inclined to view those who leave society in search of the Dhamma with some measure of awe and respect, rather than viewing them simply as drop-outs.
What this has meant historically is that the true practice of Buddhism has hovered about the edges of society and history — or, from another perspective, that the history of Buddhism has hovered about the edges of the practice.
When we look at the historical record after the first generation of the Buddha's disciples, we find only a few anecdotal references to practicing monks or nuns.
The only teachers recorded were scholarly monks, participants in controversies, and missionaries.
Some people at present have taken the silence on the nuns as an indication that there were no prominent nun teachers after the first generation of disciples.
However, inscriptions at the Theravada stupa at Sañci in India list nuns among the prominent donors to its construction, and this would have been possible only if the nuns had large personal followings.
Thus it seems fair to assume that there were prominent nun teachers, but that they were devoted to meditation rather than scholarship, and that — like the monks devoted to meditation — their names and teachings slipped through the cracks in the historical record inasmuch as true success at meditation is something that historians are in no position to judge.
So, for the period from Canonical up to modern times, one can only make conjectures about the opportunities for practice open to men and women at any particular time.
Still, based on observations of the situation in Thailand before Western influences made themselves strongly felt, the following dynamic seems likely: Meditation traditions tend to last only two or three generations at most.
They are started by charismatic pioneers willing to put up with the hardships of clearing the Buddhist path.
Because the integrity of their efforts takes years to be tested — not all pioneers are free from delusion and dishonesty — their role requires great sacrifices.
In fact, if large-scale support comes too early, it may abort the movement.
If, over time, the pioneers do embody the practice faithfully, then as word of their teachings and practices spread, they begin to attract a following of students and supporters.
With the arrival of support, the hardships become less demanding; and as life softens, so does the practice, and within a generation or two it has deteriorated to the extent that it no longer inspires support and eventually dies out, together with any memory of the founder's teachings.
In some cases, before the tradition dies out, its example may have a reforming influence at large, shaming or inspiring the mainstream at least temporarily into becoming more favorable to true practice.
In other cases, the practice tradition may influence only a limited circle and then disappear without a ripple.
For those who benefit from it, of course, the question of its historical repercussions is of no real consequence.
Even if only one person has benefited by realizing the Deathless, the tradition is a success.
At present in Thailand we are watching this process work itself out in several strands, with the major difference being that modern media have given us a record of the teachings and practices of many figures in the various meditation traditions.
Among the monks, the most influential practice tradition is the Forest Tradition, which was started against great odds at the end of the last century by Phra Ajaan Sao Kantasilo and Phra Ajaan Mun Bhuridatto, sons of peasants, at a time when the central Thai bureaucracy was very active in stamping out independent movements of any sort, political or religious.
We have no direct record of Ajaan Sao's teachings, only a booklet or two of Ajaan Mun's, but volume upon volume of their students' teachings.
Among women, the major practice tradition is Upasika Kee Nanayon's.
Although she herself has passed away, the women at her center still listen to her tapes nightly and keep her teachings alive throughout society by printing and reprinting books of her talks for free distribution.
Both traditions are fragile: The Forest Tradition is showing signs that its very popularity may soon lead to its demise, and the women at Khao Suan Luang are faced with the problem of seeing how long they can maintain their standard of practice without charismatic leadership.
On top of this, the arrival of the mass media — and especially television with its tendency to make image more consequential than substance, and personality more important than character — is sure to change the dynamic of Buddhist mainstream and the practice, not necessarily for the better.
Still, both traditions have at least left a record — part of which is presented in this book — to inspire future generations and to show how the Buddhist path of practice may be reopened by anyone, male or female, no matter what forms of designer Buddhism may take over the mainstream and inevitably lead it astray.
Buddhism takes a familiar American principle — the pursuit of happiness — and inserts two important qualifiers.
The happiness it aims at is true: ultimate, unchanging, and undeceitful.
Its pursuit of that happiness is serious, not in a grim sense, but dedicated, disciplined, and willing to make intelligent sacrifices.
What sort of sacrifices are intelligent?
The Buddhist answer to this question resonates with another American principle: an intelligent sacrifice is any in which you gain a greater happiness by letting go of a lesser one, in the same way you'd give up a bag of candy if offered a pound of gold in exchange.
In other words, an intelligent sacrifice is like a profitable trade.
This analogy is an ancient one in the Buddhist tradition.
“I'll make a trade,” one of the Buddha's disciples once said, “aging for the Ageless, burning for the Unbound: the highest peace, the unexcelled safety from bondage.
There's something in all of us that would rather not give things up.
We'd prefer to keep the candy and get the gold.
But maturity teaches us that we can't have everything, that to indulge in one pleasure often involves denying ourselves another, perhaps better, one.
Thus we need to establish clear priorities for investing our limited time and energies where they'll give the most lasting returns.
That means giving top priority to the mind.
Material things and social relationships are unstable and easily affected by forces beyond our control, so the happiness they offer is fleeting and undependable.
But the well-being of a well-trained mind can survive even aging, illness, and death.
To train the mind, though, requires time and energy.
This is one reason why the pursuit of true happiness demands that we sacrifice some of our external pleasures.
Sacrificing external pleasures also frees us of the mental burdens that holding onto them often entails.
A famous story in the Canon tells of a former king who, after becoming a monk, sat down at the foot of a tree and exclaimed, “What bliss!
What bliss!” His fellow monks thought he was pining for the pleasures he had enjoyed as king, but he later explained to the Buddha exactly what bliss he had in mind:
“Before… I had guards posted within and without the royal apartments, within and without the city, within and without the countryside.
But even though I was thus guarded, thus protected, I dwelled in fear — agitated, distrustful, and afraid.
But now, on going alone to a forest, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty dwelling, I dwell without fear, unagitated, confident, and unafraid — unconcerned, unruffled, my wants satisfied, with my mind like a wild deer.
A third reason for sacrificing external pleasures is that in pursuing some pleasures — such as our addictions to eye-candy, ear-candy, nose-, tongue-, and body-candy — we foster qualities of greed, anger, and delusion that actively block the qualities needed for inner peace.
Even if we had all the time and energy in the world, the pursuit of these pleasures would lead us further and further away from the goal.
They are spelled out in the path factor called Right Resolve: the resolve to forego any pleasures involving sensual passion, ill will, and harmfulness.
“Sensual passion” covers not only sexual desire, but also any hankering for the pleasures of the senses that disrupts the peace of the mind.
“Ill will” covers any wish for suffering, either for oneself or for others.
And “harmfulness” is any activity that would bring that suffering about.
Of these three categories, the last two are the easiest to see as worth abandoning.
They're not always easy to abandon, perhaps, but the resolve to abandon them is obviously a good thing.
The first resolve, though — to renounce sensual passion — is difficult even to make, to say nothing of following it through.
Part of our resistance to this resolve is universally human.
People everywhere relish their passions.
Even the Buddha admitted to his disciples that, when he set out on the path of practice, his heart didn't leap at the idea of renouncing sensual passion, didn't see it as offering peace.
But an added part of our resistance to renunciation is peculiar to Western culture.
Modern pop psychology teaches that the only alternative to a healthy indulgence of our sensual passions is an unhealthy, fearful repression.
Yet both of these alternatives are based on fear: repression, on a fear of what the passion might do when expressed or even allowed into consciousness; indulgence, on a fear of deprivation and of the under-the-bed monster the passion might become if resisted and driven underground.
Both alternatives place serious limitations on the mind.
The Buddha, aware of the drawbacks of both, had the imagination to find a third alternative: a fearless, skillful approach that avoids the dangers of either side.
To understand his approach, though, we have to see how Right Resolve relates to other parts of the Buddhist path, in particular Right View and Right Concentration.
In the formal analysis of the path, Right Resolve builds on Right View; in its most skillful manifestation, it functions as the directed thought and evaluation that bring the mind to Right Concentration.
Right View provides a skillful understanding of sensual pleasures and passions, so that our approach to the problem doesn't go off-target; Right Concentration provides an inner stability and bliss so that we can clearly see the roots of passion and at the same time not fear deprivation at the prospect of pulling them out.
There are two levels to Right View, focusing on the results of our actions in the narrative of our lives and on the issues of stress and its cessation within the mind.
The first level points out the drawbacks of sensual passion: sensual pleasures are fleeting, unstable, and stressful; passion for them lies at the root of many of the ills of life, ranging from the hardships of gaining and maintaining wealth, to quarrels within families and wars between nations.
This level of Right View prepares us to see the indulgence of sensual passion as a problem.
The second level — viewing things in terms of the four noble truths — shows us how to solve this problem in our approach to the present moment.
It points out that the root of the problem lies not in the pleasures but in the passion, for passion involves attachment, and any attachment for pleasures based on conditions leads inevitably to stress and suffering, in that all conditioned phenomena are subject to change.
In fact, our attachment to sensual passion tends to be stronger and more constant than our attachments to particular pleasures.
This attachment is what has to be renounced.
How is this done?
By bringing it out into the open.
Both sides of sensual attachment — as habitual patterns from the past and our willingness to give into them again in the present — are based on misunderstanding and fear.
As the Buddha pointed out, sensual passion depends on aberrant perceptions: we project notions of constancy, ease, beauty, and self onto things that are actually inconstant, stressful, unattractive, and not-self.
These misperceptions apply both to our passions and to their objects.
We perceive the expression of our sensuality as something appealing, a deep expression of our self-identity offering lasting pleasure; we see the objects of our passion as enduring and alluring enough, as lying enough under our control, to provide us with a satisfaction that won't turn into its opposite.
Actually, none of this is the case, and yet we blindly believe our projections because the power of our passionate attachments has us too intimidated to look them straight in the eye.
Their special effects thus keep us dazzled and deceived.
As long as we deal only in indulgence and repression, attachment can continue operating freely in the dark of the sub-conscious.
But when we consciously resist it, it has to come to the surface, articulating its threats, demands, and rationalizations.
So even though sensual pleasures aren't evil, we have to systematically forego them as a way of drawing the agendas of attachment out into the open.
This is how skillful renunciation serves as a learning tool, unearthing latent agendas that both indulgence and repression tend to keep underground.
At the same time, we need to provide the mind with strategies to withstand those agendas and to cut through them once they appear.
This is where Right Concentration comes in.
As a skillful form of indulgence, Right Concentration suffuses the body with a non-sensual rapture and pleasure that can help counteract any sense of deprivation in resisting sensual passions.
In other words, it provides higher pleasures — more lasting and refined — as a reward for abandoning attachment to lower ones.
At the same time it gives us the stable basis we need so as not to be blown away by the assaults of our thwarted attachments.
This stability also steadies the mindfulness and alertness we need to see through the misperceptions and delusions that underlie sensual passion.
And once the mind can see through the processes of projection, perception, and misperception to the greater sense of freedom that comes when they are transcended, the basis for sensual passion is gone.
At this stage, we can then turn to analyze our attachment to the pleasures of Right Concentration.
When our understanding is complete, we abandon all need for attachment of any sort, and thus meet with the pure gold of a freedom so total that it can't be described.
The question remains: how does this strategy of skillful renunciation and skillful indulgence translate into everyday practice?
People who ordain as monastics take vows of celibacy and are expected to work constantly at renouncing sensual passion, but for many people this is not a viable option.
The Buddha thus recommended that his lay followers observe day-long periods of temporary renunciation.
Four days out of each month — traditionally on the new-, full-, and half-moon days — they can take the eight precepts, which add the following observances to the standard five: celibacy, no food after noon, no watching of shows, no listening to music, no use of perfumes and cosmetics, and no use of luxurious seats and beds.
The purpose of these added precepts is to place reasonable restraints on all five of the senses.
The day is then devoted to listening to the Dhamma, to clarify Right View; and to practicing meditation, to strengthen Right Concentration.
Although the modern work-week can make the lunar scheduling of these day-long retreats impractical, there are ways they can be integrated into weekends or other days off from work.
In this way, anyone interested can, at regular intervals, trade the cares and complexities of everyday life for the chance to master renunciation as a skill integral to the serious pursuit of happiness in the truest sense of the word.
And isn't that an intelligent trade?
Nowhere in the Canon does the Buddha list the seven sets of teachings under the name of Wings to Awakening.
He mentions the seven sets as a group many times when he is summarizing his main teachings, but there is no firm evidence as to whether he ever actually gave a name to the group.
In one passage he applies the term “wings to self-Awakening” to the five faculties; and in two passages he makes reference to the seven Wings to Awakening, which may or may not denote the seven sets.
Nevertheless, given the fact that the Buddha called the five faculties wings to self-Awakening, and all seven sets are equivalent to the five faculties, the name “Wings to Awakening” for all seven seems appropriate.
This was the name that they definitely had in early post-canonical texts, such as the Petakopadesa, and that they have maintained ever since.
The seven sets have played an important role throughout the history of Buddhism in all of its various branches.
They provided the framework for the earliest Abhidhamma texts, systematic presentations of the doctrine that were added to the early Canons a few centuries after the Buddha's passing away.
They were also part of the first Buddhist text translated into Chinese, and later came to exemplify “Hinayana” teachings in T'ien-t'ai and other Chinese doctrinal systems.
Tantric Buddhism features mandalas containing deities, symbolic of the factors making up the seven sets.
Tibetan architecture, probably following the treatises of the medieval Indian universities, identifies the various parts of standard stupa design as symbols of the seven sets.
Thus the Wings provide one of the few common threads that, in actual or symbolic form, run through all the traditions claiming descent from the Buddha.
One of the peculiarities of the Wings, viewed as a whole, is that two sets are duplicates: the five faculties and the five strengths contain the same five factors.
Several theories have been advanced as to why the Buddha included what is essentially the same set twice.
One is that he wanted to indicate that the five factors that make up each set could exist in the mind in two distinct levels of intensity, one sufficient for the path to stream-entry, the first level of Awakening, and the other needed for Arahantship, the highest level.
This may parallel the passage where the Buddha makes a similar distinction between the noble eightfold path of stream-entry and the tenfold path of Arahantship.
There is some disagreement among later writers as to which of the two sets, the faculties or the strengths, should be considered the more intense, although there is one canonical passage where the term “faculty” seems to rank on a higher level than “strength.
Another hypothesis — not necessarily at odds with the first — is that the Buddha wanted the number of factors to total because the number had symbolic meaning.
In ancient times, before the development of the decimal system, multiplication tables were arranged in hexagonal patterns.
The complete table used to calculate the ratios used in tuning musical instruments to reciprocal scales — scales that played the same notes going up as going down — had one member in the middle surrounded by three hexagonal rings containing, in ascending order, six, twelve, and eighteen members, giving a total of members.
The table of whole-number ratios that formed the basis for trigonometry, and thus for the study of astronomy, contained members.
Thus the number carried connotations of basic completeness.
This principle is at work in Plato's Laws, where the ideal city has guardians, and it may also be at work here.
A related consideration may be that the number seven, in the seven sets, was symbolic of treasure.
The universal monarch was said to have seven treasures that formed his spontaneous regalia, and noble wealth consists of seven qualities.
The Buddha explicitly borrows this number symbolism when he states that the seven sets are the treasures of his teaching.
Another possibility, which we have already noted, is that musicians in the Buddha's time recognized seven systems for tuning the musical scale — all other systems being rejected as discordant — and the Buddha may have borrowed this numerical symbolism to suggest that his teachings formed a complete guide to all the possible ways in which a Samana — a person in tune — could tune his or her mind to the truth.
From a less historical and more practical point of view, the important question about the seven sets is how they fit into the general plan of Buddhist practice.
Their role is most succinctly stated in §: the development of the seven sets follows on the development of virtue and leads naturally into the development of transcendent discernment, thus filling the role that other passages assign to concentration practice.
This suggests — and again, the suggestion is borne out by passages that deal with the issue in more detail — that the seven sets are to be developed in the course of a concentration practice based on a moral life and aimed at the development of discernment.
When § ends its list of preconditions for the practice of the seven sets with four meditation practices — actually three, as the perception of inconstancy is an integral part of mindfulness of in-and-out breathing — it is simply listing the concentration practices most frequently recommended in the texts as focal points for developing the skills of the seven sets.
Nevertheless, although the seven sets focus most specifically on the practice of concentration, the close interconnections among virtue, concentration, and discernment mean that the sets include the factors of virtue and discernment as well, thus encompassing the entire path of Buddhist practice.
A virtuous and moral life is an absolute prerequisite for practicing the sets.
This is a point that cannot be overstated, a fact reflected in the large number of canonical passages that hammer it home: far too many to include in this anthology.
Some of the sets — the five faculties/strengths and the noble eightfold path — actually include the practice of a virtuous life in their factors, under the faculty/strength of conviction, and under the factors of right speech, right action, and right livelihood in the eightfold path.
The remaining sets, the texts tell us, are meant to follow on the development of personal virtue in the same way that sunrise follows on the pre-dawn colors in the eastern sky.
The texts explain the precepts that underline a virtuous life, not as rules imposed by an outside authority, but as guidelines for action that a person would voluntarily undertake when accepting the importance of the principles of kamma and skillful action in shaping the course of one's experiences.
Killing, for instance, is obviously an unskillful action when viewed in the full light of its kammic consequences.
The same holds true with other actions forbidden by the precepts, such as drinking alcohol, stealing, illicit sex, lying, and abusive language.
Passage § shows that the Buddha's teachings on virtue consist not only of the “don't's” of the precepts, but also of the “do's” of such positive standards as sympathy, reliability, and genuine helpfulness.
Skillfulness is not simply a matter of avoiding bad consequences; it also actively cultivates the good.
In keeping with the teaching that kamma is essentially intention, the precepts are designed to focus on the state of mind motivating the act.
A precept is broken only when one does so intentionally.
Thus the practice of observing the precepts requires constant attention to the factor of intention in one's actions; it also requires that one develop the “sublime attitudes” of good will, compassion, empathetic joy, and equanimity, which strengthen one's ability to side with skillful intentions.
In this way, the Buddha's approach to morality is to use the realm of personal action as an arena for the comprehensive training of the mind.
These three aspects of the Buddhist approach to morality — the avoidance of bad kamma, the development of skillful mental states, and the purification of intention — follow the pattern of the heart of the Buddha's teachings as presented in the first verse of §.
They also explain why virtue is a necessary foundation for the practice of concentration: A moral life brings about absence of remorse; people who, in all honesty, have no reason for remorse over their actions or for anxiety over the consequences of those actions, feel a natural sense of inner joy.
This joy is intensified when they reflect on the positive acts of kindness and generosity that they have performed for others.
Thus intensified, this joy then provides the basis for the inner pleasure that allows for concentration.
In this way, a healthy sense of self-worth is a necessary precondition for a stable mind.
In addition, the practice of virtue forces one to develop a number of the “concentration” factors in the sets themselves, on a preliminary level of skill, thus making them strong and fit for formal concentration practice.
To maintain a precept, one must keep it constantly in mind: this strengthens mindfulness.
One must stick to one's determination to abide by one's principles: this strengthens persistence.
One must pay attention to the present moment, for that is where the decision to keep or break a precept is made; and one must remain firm in one's cultivation of the sublime attitudes: these factors strengthen concentration.
One must be clear about one's motives for acting, and at the same time be sensitive in knowing how to apply a particular precept to one's present situation: e.g., being quick to see how to avoid an issue in which telling the truth might be harmful, yet without telling a lie.
This strengthens one's ability to analyze the mind in the present moment, intensifying one's powers of discernment in general.
These four factors — mindfulness, effort, concentration, and discernment — are the central elements in all of the seven sets.
Thus, the practice of virtue exercises, on a rudimentary level, the qualities of mind needed for concentration practice.
A close look at the seven sets will show that a similar relationship exists between these qualities, as they are developed in concentration practice, and the transcendent discernment toward which they lead.
On the one hand, concentration is needed as a basis for discernment; on the other hand, discernment is exercised in developing concentration, becoming more precise and penetrating as a result.
To understand how this happens, we must first note that the seven sets fall into two types.
The first type consists of the four frames of reference, the four right exertions, and the four bases of power.
Each of these sets focuses on a single factor in the “concentration aggregate” of the noble eightfold path: the frames of reference on mindfulness, the right exertions on effort, and the bases of power on concentration.
Their factors are defined in such a way that the proper development of any one set involves the other two sets, together with the factor of discernment.
In this sense they point out the “holographic” nature of the path: each part must include the whole, just as every piece of a hologram can reproduce the entire holographic image.
The sets included in the second type are the five faculties, the five strengths, the seven factors for Awakening, and the noble eightfold path.
Each of these sets lists its factors in a causal chain progressing through a spiraling loop.
The five faculties and strengths start with conviction, which then leads naturally to persistence, mindfulness, concentration, and then discernment.
Discernment, in turn, provides a basis for even firmer conviction.
Similarly, the seven factors for Awakening start with mindfulness, which develops into an analysis of mental qualities, persistence, rapture, serenity, concentration, and finally equanimity.
Equanimity, in turn, provides a steady basis for the further development of mindfulness.
The noble eightfold path starts out with right view and right resolve, which together constitute discernment, leading to right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration.
Concentration, in turn, forms a basis for the clearer development of discernment.
In this way the various factors of the path are mutually reinforcing in an upward spiral that leads to Awakening.
Comparing the sets in the second type with one another, however, we find a certain complexity in their feedback loops.
In terms of their most important factors, we see that the faculties and strengths depict the causal sequence as:
Although the sequences differ, they have one pattern in common: concentration always follows after right effort and mindfulness.
This suggests not only that concentration depends on these two factors, but also that effort and mindfulness, when properly developed, are meant to lead to concentration.
This suggestion is borne out in the texts that deal with these factors in detail.
The two factors with the most variegated roles in these lists are mindfulness and discernment.
Mindfulness is essential at every step along the way.
There are passages teaching that mindfulness is a prerequisite for virtue, which — together with right view — is in turn a prerequisite for right mindfulness.
Similarly, mindfulness is necessary for concentration, which in turn can be devoted to the development of greater mindfulness, which can lead further to discernment.
As for discernment: If we look at the lists placing discernment after the other factors, we find that certain aspects of discernment are presumed by the earlier factors.
In the five faculties, for instance, conviction includes belief in the principle of kamma, which is one of the elements of right discernment.
In the lists that place discernment toward the beginning of the process, we find transcendent discernment added on to the end: the seven factors for Awakening, when fully developed, lead to clear knowing and release; when the noble eightfold path reaches the point of full Awakening, it leads to right knowledge and right release.
The implication here is that discernment, functioning on different levels, keeps adding feedback loops of ever greater sensitivity every step along the way.
This point is made explicit in §.
For this reason, skillfulness — as a constant, sensitive mindfulness and discernment toward one's own actions — lies at the essence of every moment in the continued development of the path.
On the one hand it creates the conditions necessary for the path to develop: knowledge of what is skillful and unskillful must necessarily precede right effort and mindfulness, and must help mindfulness lead to concentration.
On the other hand, the factors of mindfulness and concentration are necessary for discernment to become even more sensitive to the present moment.
Thus, as the path spirals through its many feedback loops, it exercises discernment, making it stronger in the same way that muscles are strengthened with exercise.
At the same time, the development of the path steadies the conditions that provide discernment with the solid basis it needs to become more and more precise, just as a solid foundation is necessary for sensitive measuring equipment.
In this way discernment develops from a knowledge of what is skillful and unskillful, first gained through the advice and example of others, on through a more intuitive understanding of skillfulness gained through repeated action and reflection on one's actions, to a knowledge in terms of the four noble truths and the duties appropriate to each, and finally to the knowledge that those duties have been fulfilled.
The Wings thus put mundane discernment to use, and in so doing make it transcendent.
All of this explains why the Buddha said that of all the wings to self-Awakening, discernment is chief.
In its more rudimentary forms it provides the conditions and feedback necessary for each step along the way; its transcendent form, at the culmination of the path, leads directly to Awakening.
The experience of Awakening, according to the texts, can take any one of four levels:
In all four levels, the basic dynamic is the same: virtue, concentration, and discernment bring the mind skillfully to a state of “non-fashioning” where all present input into the cycle of kamma is suspended.
This state of non-fashioning then opens the way for the experience of the Unfabricated.
To put this in terms of the two knowledges that constitute Awakening, the skillful mastery of the processes of kamma to the point of non-fashioning corresponds to the knowledge of the regularity of the Dhamma; the experience of the Unfabricated corresponds to the knowledge of Unbinding.
Although all four levels require mature levels of the path factors of virtue, concentration, and discernment to bring about the two knowledges that constitute Awakening, they differ in the relative maturity of the path factors that lead up to them.
Stream-entry occurs at the full maturation of virtue; non-returning, at the full maturation of concentration; and Arahantship, at the full maturation of discernment.
Thus they also differ in the depth to which they penetrate the two knowledges of Awakening and in their ability to cut the fetters that perpetuate bondage to the cycle of kamma and rebirth.
The texts report a few cases where meditators go straight through all four levels to the level of Arahantship, but in most cases the meditator will pass through the four levels step-by-step, sometimes over course of many years or even several lifetimes.
In this book, except where otherwise noted, discussions of the Awakening experience as described in the discourses focus on the level where virtue, concentration, and discernment are all fully mature, the Awakening total, and the resulting freedom absolutely unlimited.
This is the point where all seven sets of the Wings to Awakening ultimately aim.
Pahārāda, just as the ocean has these many treasures of various kinds — pearls, sapphires, lapis lazuli, shells, quartz, coral, silver, gold, rubies, & cat's eyes — in the same way, this doctrine & discipline has these many treasures of various kinds: the four frames of reference, the four right exertions, the four bases of power, the five faculties, the five strengths, the seven factors for Awakening, the noble eightfold path.
This is the seventh wonder & marvel… that the monks, having seen again & again in this doctrine & discipline, delight in.
Then the Blessed One went to the audience hall and on arrival sat down on the seat prepared for him.
When he was seated, he addressed the monks: 'The qualities I have pointed out, having known them directly: You should grasp them thoroughly, cultivate them, develop them, & pursue them so that this holy life may long endure & remain steadfast for the benefit, welfare, & happiness of the multitude, out of sympathy for the world, for the benefit, welfare, & happiness of human & celestial beings.
And what are those qualities?
The four frames of reference, the four right exertions, the four bases of power, the five faculties, the five strengths, the seven factors for Awakening, the noble eightfold path.
These are the qualities I have pointed out, having known them directly, that you should grasp thoroughly, cultivate, develop, & pursue… for the benefit, welfare, & happiness of human & celestial beings.' Then the Blessed One addressed the monks, 'I exhort you, monks: All fabrications are subject to decay.
Bring about completion by means of heedfulness.
It will not be long before the Tathāgata's total Unbinding.
He will attain total Unbinding in three month's time.'
That is what the Blessed One said.
Then… he said further:
Then the Master said further:
Suppose a hen has eight, ten, or twelve eggs: If she doesn't cover them rightly, warm them rightly, or incubate them rightly, then even though this wish may occur to her — 'O that my chicks might break through the egg shells with their spiked claws or beaks and hatch out safely!' — still it is not possible that the chicks will break through the egg shells with their spiked claws or beaks and hatch out safely.
Why is that?
Because the hen has not covered them rightly, warmed them rightly, or incubated them rightly.
In the same way, even though this wish may occur to a monk who dwells without devoting himself to development — 'O that my mind might be released from effluents through lack of clinging!' — still his mind is not released from the effluents through lack of clinging.
Why is that?
From lack of developing, it should be said.
Lack of developing what?
The four frames of reference, the four right exertions, the four bases of power, the five faculties, the five strengths, the seven factors for Awakening, the noble eightfold path…
But suppose a hen has eight, ten, or twelve eggs that she covers rightly, warms rightly, & incubates rightly: Even though this wish may not occur to her — 'O that my chicks might break through the egg shells with their spiked claws or beaks and hatch out safely!' — still it is possible that the chicks will break through the egg shells with their spiked claws or beaks and hatch out safely.
Why is that?
Because the hen has covered them, warmed them, & incubated them rightly.
In the same way, even though this wish may not occur to a monk who dwells devoting himself to development — 'O that my mind might be released from effluents through lack of clinging!' — still his mind is released from the effluents through lack of clinging.
Why is that?
From developing, it should be said.
Developing what?
The four frames of reference, the four right exertions, the four bases of power, the five faculties, the five strengths, the seven factors for Awakening, the noble eightfold path.
Just as when a carpenter or carpenter's apprentice sees the marks of his fingers or thumb on the handle of his adze but does not know, 'Today my adze handle wore down this much, or yesterday it wore down that much, or the day before yesterday it wore down this much,' still he knows it is worn through when it is worn through.
In the same way, when a monk dwells devoting himself to development, he does not know, 'Today my effluents wore down this much, or yesterday they wore down that much, or the day before yesterday they wore down this much,' still he knows they are worn through when they are worn through.
Just as when an ocean-going ship, rigged with masts & stays, after six months on the water, is left on shore for the winter: Its stays, weathered by the heat & wind, moistened by the clouds of the rainy season, easily wither & rot away.
In the same way, when a monk dwells devoting himself to development, his fetters easily wither & rot away.
A certain monk went to his preceptor and on arrival said to him, 'My body, sir, now feels like it's drugged.
I've lost my bearings.
Things are unclear to me.
Sloth & drowsiness surround my mind at all times.
I am unhappy in leading the holy life.
I have doubts about mental qualities.'
Then the preceptor, taking his student, went to see the Buddha 
'That's the way it is for a person who doesn't guard the doors to his sense faculties, who doesn't know moderation in eating, who isn't devoted to wakefulness, who doesn't clearly understand skillful qualities, and who isn't devoted day after day to the development of the wings to Awakening… Thus you should train yourself, monk: “I will guard my senses, will know moderation in eating, will devote myself to wakefulness, will clearly understand skillful qualities, and will devote myself day after day to the development of the wings to awakening.” That's how you should train yourself.'
Then the monk, having received this instruction from the Blessed One, got up from his seat, bowed down, circled the Blessed One, keeping him on his right, and then went away.
Dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute, he in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the holy life, for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing it & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew, 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.' And thus he became another one of the Arahants.
Endowed with three qualities, a monk is one who follows the way that cannot be faulted and he has aroused the basis for ending the effluents.
Which three?
There is the case where a monk guards the doors to his sense faculties, knows moderation in eating, & is devoted to wakefulness.
And how does a monk guard the doors to his sense faculties?
There is the case where a monk, on seeing a form with the eye, does not grasp at any theme or variations by which — if he were to dwell without restraint over the faculty of the eye — evil, unskillful qualities such as greed or distress might assail him.
He practices with restraint.
He guards the faculty of the eye.
He achieves restraint with regard to the faculty of the eye.
This is how a monk guards the doors to his sense faculties.
And how does a monk know moderation in eating?
There is the case where a monk, considering it appropriately, takes his food not playfully, nor for intoxication, nor for putting on bulk, nor for beautification, but simply for the survival & continuance of this body, for ending its afflictions, for the support of the holy life, thinking, 'I will destroy old feelings & not create new feelings.
Thus I will maintain myself, be blameless, & live in comfort.' This is how a monk knows moderation in eating.
And how is a monk devoted to wakefulness?
There is the case where a monk during the day, sitting & pacing back & forth, cleanses his mind of any qualities that would hold the mind in check.
During the first watch of the night, sitting & pacing back & forth, he cleanses his mind of any qualities that would hold the mind in check.
During the second watch of the night, reclining on his right side, he takes up the lion's posture, one foot placed on top of the other, mindful, alert, with his mind set on getting up.
During the last watch of the night, sitting & pacing back & forth, he cleanses his mind of any qualities that would hold the mind in check.
This is how a monk is devoted to wakefulness.
Endowed with these three qualities, a monk is one who follows the way that cannot be faulted and he has aroused the basis for ending the effluents.
Monks, if wanderers who are members of other sects should ask you, 'What, friend, are the prerequisites for the development of the wings to self-awakening?'… you should answer, 'There is the case where a monk has admirable people as friends, companions, & colleagues.
This is the first prerequisite for the development of the wings to self-awakening.
'Furthermore, the monk is virtuous.
He dwells restrained in accordance with the Pāṭimokkha, consummate in his behavior & sphere of activity.
He trains himself, having undertaken the training rules, seeing danger in the slightest faults.
This is the second prerequisite for the development of the wings to self-awakening.
'Furthermore, he gets to hear at will, easily & without difficulty, talk that is truly sobering & conducive to the opening of awareness, i.e., talk on having few wants, on contentment, on seclusion, on non-entanglement, on arousing persistence, on virtue, on concentration, on discernment, on release, and on the knowledge & vision of release.
This is the third prerequisite for the development of the wings to self-awakening.
'Furthermore, he keeps his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful mental qualities and for taking on skillful mental qualities.
He is steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful mental qualities.
This is the fourth prerequisite for the development of the wings to self-awakening.
'Furthermore, he is discerning, endowed with the discernment of arising & passing away — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress.
This is the fifth prerequisite for the development of the wings to self-awakening.'
Monks, when a monk has admirable people as friends, companions, & colleagues, it is to be expected that he will be virtuous, will dwell restrained in accordance with the Pāṭimokkha, consummate in his behavior & sphere of activity, and will train himself, having undertaken the training rules, seeing danger in the slightest faults.
When a monk has admirable people as friends, companions, & colleagues, it is to be expected that he will get to hear at will, easily & without difficulty, talk that is truly sobering and conducive to the opening of awareness, i.e., talk on having few wants, on contentment, on seclusion, on non-entanglement, on arousing persistence, on virtue, on concentration, on discernment, on release, and on the knowledge & vision of release… that he will keep his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful mental qualities, and for taking on skillful mental qualities — steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful qualities… that he will be discerning, endowed with discernment of arising & passing away — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress.
And furthermore, monks, when the monk is established in these five qualities, there are four additional qualities he should develop: He should develop the unattractive so as to abandon lust.
He should develop good will so as to abandon ill will.
He should develop mindfulness of in-&-out breathing so as to cut off distractive thinking.
He should develop the perception of inconstancy so as to uproot the conceit, 'I am.' For a monk perceiving inconstancy, the perception of not-self is made firm.
One perceiving not-self attains the uprooting of the conceit, 'I am' — Unbinding in the here & now.
These three divine sounds sound forth among the devas on appropriate occasions.
Which three?
When a disciple of the noble ones, shaving off his hair & beard, clothing himself in the ochre robe, makes up his mind to go forth from the home life into homelessness, on that occasion the divine sound sounds forth among the devas: 'This disciple of the noble ones has made up his mind to do battle with Māra'…
When a disciple of the noble ones lives engaged in developing the seven qualities that are wings to awakening, on that occasion the divine sound sounds forth among the devas: 'This disciple of the noble ones is doing battle with Māra'…
When a disciple of the noble ones, through the ending of effluents dwells in the effuent-free awareness-release & discernment-release, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now, on that occasion the divine sound sounds forth among the devas: 'This disciple of the noble ones has won the battle.
Having been in the front lines of the battle, he now dwells victorious'… These are the three divine sounds that sound forth among the devas on appropriate occasions.
A monk who has admirable virtue, admirable qualities, & admirable discernment is called, in this doctrine & discipline, one who is complete, fulfilled, supreme among men.
And how is a monk a person with admirable virtue?
There is the case where a monk is virtuous.
He dwells restrained in accordance with the Pāṭimokkha, consummate in his behavior & sphere of activity.
He trains himself, having undertaken the training rules, seeing danger in the slightest faults.
In this way a monk is a person with admirable virtue.
Thus he is of admirable virtue.
And how is a monk a person with admirable qualities?
There is the case where a monk lives engaged in developing of the seven qualities that are wings to awakening.
In this way a monk is a person with admirable qualities.
Thus he is of admirable virtue & admirable qualities.
And how is a monk a person with admirable discernment?
There is the case where a monk, through the ending of effluents, dwells in the effluent-free awareness-release & discernment-release, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
In this way a monk is a person with admirable discernment.
Thus he is of admirable virtue, admirable qualities, admirable discernment.
In this doctrine & discipline he is called one who is complete, fulfilled, supreme among men.
The four frames of reference are a set of teachings that show where a meditator should focus attention and how.
This dual role — the “where” and the “how” — is reflected in the fact that the term satipatthana can be explained etymologically in two ways.
On the one hand, it can be regarded as a compound of sati and patthana, thus referring to the object kept in mind as a frame of reference for giving context to one's experience.
Alternatively, satipatthana can be seen as a compound of sati and upatthana, thus referring to the approach of keeping something closely in mind, of establishing and maintaining a solid frame of reference.
Scholars are divided as to which interpretation is right, but for all practical purposes they both are.
The Buddha was more a poet than a strict etymologist, and he may have deliberately chosen an ambiguous term that would have fruitful meanings on more than one level.
In the practice of the frames of reference, both the proper object and the proper approach are crucial for getting the proper results.
In fact, as we shall see, the taking of a proper object entails the beginning of the proper approach, and the approach ends by taking as its objects the qualities of mind developed in the course of pursuing the approach itself.
In other words, as we mentioned in the Introduction concerning the Buddha's Awakening, the “what” merges with the “how” as the “how” of the investigation ultimately becomes what gets investigated.
The texts give two different pictures of the role that the frames of reference play in the practice.
Some state that developing the frames of reference is a precondition for jhāna, which then forms a basis for transcendent discernment.
Others make no mention of jhāna, stating that one goes directly from the frames of reference to the transcendent.
On the surface, this would seem to indicate that there are two alternate paths: one with and one without jhāna.
This reading, though, contradicts the many passages maintaining that jhāna is necessary for the development of transcendent discernment.
Thus we must look for an alternative reading, and we find one suggested by passages indicating that the development of the frames of reference implicitly entails the full development of the seven factors for Awakening.
Because these factors are closely associated with jhāna, this would indicate that the proper development of the frames of reference necessarily incorporates, in and of itself, the practice of jhāna.
This reading is confirmed by §, which states that the way to develop the frames of reference is through the noble eightfold path, which includes jhāna.
It is also confirmed by §, which describes how the frames of reference relate to the sixteen steps of breath meditation.
As we shall see in III/E, these sixteen steps are also a description of how jhāna is developed and then used as a vehicle for fostering discernment and ending the effluents of the mind.
Thus, we can view the outline of frames-of-reference practice as a description of the stages in the mindful mastery of jhāna and its application to the ending of the effluents.
The proper objects that act as frames of reference are four: the body in and of itself, feelings in and of themselves, the mind in and of itself, and mental qualities in and of themselves.
The “in and of itself” here is important.
To take the body as a frame of reference in this way, for instance, means that one views it not in terms of its function in the world — for then the world would be the frame of reference — but simply on its own terms, as it is directly experienced.
In other words, one is not concerned with its relative worth or utility in terms of the values of the world — its beauty, strength, agility, etc.
— but simply how it appears when regarded in and of itself.
The four objects that act as frames of reference fall into two classes.
The first class — the body, feelings, and the mind — act as the “given” objects of meditation practice: what experience presents, on its own, as an object for meditation.
The meditator takes any one of these objects as a frame of reference, relating all of experience to his/her chosen frame.
For example, although one will experience feelings and mind states in the course of taking the body as a frame of reference, one tries to relate them to the experience of the body as their primary frame.
A feeling is viewed as it affects the body, or the body affects it.
The same holds for a mind state.
An analogy for this practice is holding an object in one's hand.
When other objects come into contact with the hand, one is aware that they are making contact, but one does not let go of the object in one's hand in order to grasp after them.
The second class of objects — mental qualities — denotes the qualities of mind that are developed and abandoned as one masters the meditation.
The list of “dhammas” given in § would seem to belie the translation “mental qualities” here, as they include not only the five hindrances and seven factors for Awakening, which are obviously mental qualities, but also the five aggregates, the six sense media, and the four noble truths, which would seem to fit better with another meaning of the word dhamma, i.e., “phenomena.” However, if we look more closely at each of these other classes, we will see that they actually deal with variant forms of abandoning the hindrances and developing the factors for Awakening.
The section on the sense media focuses less on the media than on the abandoning of the fetters — passion and delight — associated with those media.
The section on the aggregates describes a state of practice that is elsewhere identified as a developed form of concentration, in which the aggregates that comprise the state of jhāna form the object of analysis.
The section on the noble truths describes a state of practice that elsewhere is said to require the sort of mental stability and clarity found only in jhāna.
Thus all the approaches to “dhammas in and of themselves” would appear to be variations on the abandoning of the hindrances and the development of the factors for Awakening.
Because the stated function of the frames of reference is to bring about the culmination of the factors for Awakening, and through them the development of clear knowing and release, the translation of dhamma as “mental quality” seems an appropriate way to keep that function in mind and to avoid getting lost in the details of its different aspects.
There is historical support for this interpretation as well.
The Vibhanga, an ancient Abhidhamma text, includes only the hindrances and the factors for Awakening in its discussion of this heading.
The same holds true with the Sarvastivadin version of this discourse, preserved in Chinese translation.
Scholars have questioned whether these two texts should be taken as evidence that the original discussion of dhamma here included only these two topics.
The issue is impossible to decide from the texts available to us, but a case can be made for concluding that, regardless of what the original version may have been, the early tradition regarded the abandoning of the hindrances and the development of the factors for Awakening as encompassing all the factors that might be included under this heading.
Each of the four objects of mindfulness is said to be sufficient for bringing about Awakening.
This point is easy to understand if we look at the approach taken to each of the objects, for then it becomes clear that the approach ultimately involves the development of mental qualities in and of themselves, regardless of what object is first taken up for meditation.
That approach falls into three stages.
The first stage — here taking the body as an example — is simply called the frame of reference:
Four terms in this passage are key.
“Remaining focused” can also be translated as “keeping track.” This denotes the element of concentration in the practice, as one tries to stay with one particular theme in the midst of the welter of experience.
“Ardent” denotes the factor of effort or exertion in the practice; the Commentary equates this with right exertion, which contains an element of discernment in its ability to distinguish skillful from unskillful mental qualities.
“Alert” means being clearly aware of what is happening in the present.
This, too, relates to discernment.
“Mindful” literally means being able to remember or recollect.
Here it means keeping one's task in mind.
The task here is a dual one — remaining focused on one's frame of reference, and putting aside the distractions of greed and distress that would come from shifting one's frame of reference back to the world.
In other words, one tries to stay with the phenomenology of immediate experience, without slipping back into the narratives and world views that make up one's sense of the world.
In essence, this is a concentration practice, with the three qualities of ardency, alertness, and mindfulness devoted to attaining concentration.
Mindfulness keeps the theme of the meditation in mind, alertness observes the theme as it is present to awareness, and also is aware of when the mind has slipped from its theme.
Mindfulness then remembers where the mind should be focused, and ardency tries to return the mind to its proper theme — and to keep it there — as quickly and skillfully as possible.
In this way, these three qualities help to seclude the mind from sensual preoccupations and unskillful mental qualities, thus bringing it to the first jhāna.
Passage § confirms this reading by equating the successful performance of this first stage in the practice with the first jhāna, whereas §§- give advice on how to bring the mind to concentration if this method does not work: focus on the problem of the mind's not settling down, and bring the mind to an inspiring theme that will accomplish the desired end.
When the method does work, § describes the next step as a variation on the basic exercise:
This, it says, takes the mind to the second jhāna, where directed thoughts and evaluations are abandoned.
From there the mind can go up to the third jhāna and the fourth.
These points may be illustrated with some meditation techniques that are currently popular in the West: In a “mental noting” practice, mindfulness is a matter of remembering to keep up the noting, alertness means seeing whatever phenomena arise to be noted, and ardency is a matter of sticking with the noting relentlessly and being ever more quick and precise in one's alertness.
In terms of the factors constituting jhāna practice, the mindfulness and alertness here would be related to directed thought, ardency to singleness of preoccupation, while alertness aimed at evaluating the results of the noting — and ardency in keeping the “pressure” of the noting just right — would be related to evaluation.
If this practice is then conducted in line with the texts, it should reach a stage where the mind settles down into the singleness of the first jhāna.
Then the meditator would be encouraged to stop the noting, so that the mind could engage in the subtler mindfulness and alertness leading to the second jhāna.
In a “scanning” or “body sweep” practice, mindfulness means remembering to stick with the process of scanning the body, while alertness would mean seeing the subtle sensations of the body being scanned.
Ardency would mean sticking with the scanning process and trying to be ever more sensitive to the subtlest sensations.
As in the previous case, these activities are related to factors of jhāna, and the process, if conducted in line with the texts, should culminate in a state of full-bodied singleness, at which time the motion of the scanning can be brought to stillness, and the mind can enter deeper concentration.
In “breath” practice, mindfulness means keeping the breath in mind as the theme of the meditation, alertness means being sensitive to the sensations of the breath.
Ardency means sticking with the process relentlessly, as well as taking up the stages of “training”, in which one tries to be aware of the entire body with each in and out breath, and to let the breath sensations grow calm.
In terms of jhāna factors, mindfulness would be related to directed thought, alertness to evaluation, and ardency to singleness of preoccupation.
As awareness fills the body and the breath grows calm, one's alertness stays steadily with the breath, and the mind enters the singleness of jhāna.
At this point, one no longer needs consciously to direct the mind to the breath or to enlarge one's awareness any further.
Thus the mind, as above, can develop subtler mindfulness and alertness to enter the second jhāna.
According to §, once concentration has been established on one's own body in this way, it may give rise to a similar “knowledge and vision” of the bodies of other people.
Knowledge and vision, here, seems to denote intuitive knowledge through the psychic powers that some people develop through concentration.
If used properly, this knowledge can help develop a sense of dispassion toward the processes of existence, as one sees that all bodies, even the most desirable, are subject to the same common shortcomings of being inconstant, stressful, and not-self.
Whether one pursues this meditation with one's own body or the bodies of others, it comes under the first stage of practice, as indicated by the following phrase:
In this way he remains focused internally on the body in & of itself, or externally on the body in & of itself, or both internally & externally on the body in & of itself.
Once the first stage has produced a solid state of concentration, the second stage — the development of the frame of reference — can begin:
One remains focused on the phenomenon of origination with regard to the body, on the phenomenon of passing away with regard to the body, or on the phenomenon of origination & passing away with regard to the body.
The “phenomenon of origination and passing away” covers three sorts of events: conditioned occurrences in the object that forms one's frame of reference itself; events in the other two “object” frames of reference; or events in the “approach” frame of reference, i.e., the mental qualities that are developed in the process of taking a frame of reference to begin with.
For instance, when focused on the body, one may notice the arising and passing away of breath sensations in the body.
Or one might notice the arising and passing away of feelings of pleasure or mental states of irritation while one remains anchored in the body.
Or one might notice lapses of mindfulness in one's focus on the body.
In each of these cases, if the origination and passing away is of neutral events, such as the aggregates, one is directed simply to be aware of them as events and to let them follow their natural course unimpeded so as to see what factors accompany them and lead to their origination.
As for events connected with the presence or absence of skillfulness, however, one is encouraged to manipulate and experiment with them so as to observe and further understand their causal interrelationships.
This will enable one to become skillful in maximizing skillful mental qualities and minimizing unskillful ones.
In other words, one develops insight into the process of origination and passing away by taking an active and sensitive role in the process, just as one learns about eggs by trying to cook with them, gathering experience from one's successes and failures in attempting increasingly difficult dishes.
The need for active participation in the practice explains why meditation must begin by mastering a particular technique, rather than passively watching whatever may arise in the present.
The technique gives shape to one's present input into the present moment and makes one more sensitive to this aspect of this/that conditionality.
It also provides an active context for appreciating mental qualities as they help or hinder one's success in the technique.
Eventually, when one's sensitivity is sufficiently well developed, one can go beyond the technique to explore and master the process of causality as it functions in developing skillful qualities in the mind.
This process can be illustrated with the passage devoted to equanimity.
In the first step, as one is still in the beginning stages of observing the mind in its attempts at meditation, one simply discerns the presence and absence of equanimity.
There is the case where, there being equanimity as a factor for Awakening present within, he discerns that 'Equanimity as a factor for Awakening is present within me.' Or, there being no equanimity as a factor for Awakening present within, he discerns that 'Equanimity as a factor for Awakening is not present within me.'
In watching the course of this arising and passing away as one tries to bring the mind to the equanimity of jhāna, one should begin to see patterns of cause and effect in what does and doesn't work.
This enables one skillfully to give rise to equanimity even when it is not present of its own accord, and — once it is present — can strengthen it until it reaches the point of utmost development:
He discerns how there is the arising of unarisen equanimity as a factor for Awakening.
And he discerns how there is the culmination of the development of equanimity as a factor for Awakening once it has arisen.
A similar process is recommended for events in the “object” frames of reference.
This is shown by the standard description of the sixteen steps of breath meditation.
One trains oneself to breathe conscious of the entire body, or to breathe sensitive to feelings of rapture and pleasure, as this training fosters the factors of jhāna.
One trains oneself to satisfy, steady, and release the mind, as this training brings mastery over the stages of jhāna.
Passage § makes a similar point, directing the meditator to replace unskillful forms of distress, joy, and equanimity with more skillful versions of the same emotions, and then replacing skillful distress with skillful joy, and skillful joy with skillful equanimity.
As this process leads to stronger and more refined states of concentration, it refines one's sensitivity to the fact that the grosser one's participation in the process of origination and passing away in the mind, the grosser the level of stress that results.
This leads one to let go of the grosser levels of one's participation as one is able to detect them.
This can have one of two results.
It may lead to even more refined states of concentration, as one abandons the factors that obscure equanimity, or as one focuses one's equanimity on ever more refined objects.
Or, as one becomes able to focus on the activity involved even in refining equanimity, one comes to realize that it, too, is a process of input into the present, fabricated for the sake of non-becoming.
Thus, as a sense of dispassion develops toward equanimity, one goes beyond it to the state of non-fashioning, through the third and final stage of frames-of-reference practice:
Or his mindfulness that 'There is a body ' is maintained to the extent of knowledge & recollection.
And he remains independent, unsustained by anything in the world.
This stage corresponds to a mode of perception that the Buddha in MN terms “entry into emptiness”:
Thus he regards it as empty of whatever is not there.
Whatever remains, he discerns as present: “there is this.
This is the culminating equipoise where the path of the practice leads unmediated to a state of non-fashioning and from there to the fruit of Awakening and release.
Some meditators, reading the two preceding passages, try to step immediately to the stage of non-fashioning without first having gained the inner sensitivity to cause and effect, action and non-action, that comes from developing concentration.
In practice, though, this doesn't work.
Only through that sensitivity can the basic causal relationships of dependent co-arising and this/that conditionality be discovered.
This discovery is needed to give rise to a sense of dispassion, as one grows more and more disenchanted with the inconstant and artificial nature of all mental phenomena and develops a strong desire to gain release from them.
It is also needed to uncover the precise point of non-fashioning between becoming and non-becoming where that release can be found.
As we shall see in later sections, the basic pattern of the three stages in frames-of-reference meditation —
is basic to all aspects of Buddhist meditation practice.
Among other things, it underlies the stages in breath meditation, the mastery of concentration, and the strategy of discernment leading to the transcendent.
Thus it should be kept firmly in mind when reading passages not only in this section but also throughout the entire book.
The texts contained in this section, for the most part, provide added details to the outline sketched here.
For example, §§- provide a variation on stage two by showing how mindfulness can be developed into equanimity by manipulating perceptions, viewing loathsome objects as unloathsome, and unloathsome objects as loathsome, etc.
Anyone attempting these perception games needs firm powers of concentration and sharp discernment so as not to become obsessed with perceptual distortions.
If handled properly, though, the process of manipulation gives important insights into the way the mind labels its objects, and can drive home lessons on the arbitrary nature of perception and the need not to be deceived by it.
The same point holds true for the contemplation of body parts mentioned in §.
This contemplation has been denounced in Western circles for promoting a negative self-image, but here it is necessary to distinguish between healthy and unhealthy negative images of one's own body.
An unhealthy negative image is one that views the bodies of other people as attractive, and one's own as unattractive.
This is unhealthy in that it creates feelings of inferiority concerning one's own body, compounded by lust and desire for the bodies of others.
A healthy negative image sees that all bodies, no matter how attractive, young, or healthy they may seem at the skin level, are composed of the very same parts, all equally unattractive.
The livers and intestines of even the most attractive people, if paraded down a walkway, would never capture a title in a beauty contest; if featured in an advertisement, they wouldn't sell.
Thus there is no real reason to feel that one's body is inherently inferior to theirs.
This perception of the equality of all bodies, if handled properly, is healthy in that it helps liberate one not only from feelings of inferiority and superiority, but also from the disease of lust and desire, promoting a sense of dispassion toward lustful thoughts in general.
As this theme of contemplation is developed through hands-on manipulation of one's perception of the body, it enables one to realize that, when reduced to their simple “bodyness,” as bodies in and of themselves, all bodies are on a par, and that questions of attractiveness and unattractiveness derive ultimately from the context of one's frame of reference.
One sees that the obstacles to equanimity and higher insights in the practice are not so much the objects of lust or hatred as they are the terms and contexts in which those objects are perceived.
This insight can form the basis for perceptual skills that can act as a very liberating antidote to the mind's tendency to self-delusion.
One passage contained here that does not deal with the stages of frames-of-reference meditation is §.
This passage focuses on a charge that has been often leveled at Early Buddhism: that the practice it recommends is essentially selfish, in that one is striving simply for one's own welfare.
The Buddha answers this charge by denying any radical distinction between one's own true welfare and that of others.
To work for the true welfare of others is to work for one's own true welfare; to work for one's own is to work for theirs.
The first point can be illustrated by a number of passages in this collection — showing, for example, how expressions of gratitude to one's parents can foster one's own true happiness, how support for contemplatives enables one to hear the Dhamma, how virtuous conduct toward other people and their possessions strengthens mindfulness, and how attitudes of good will, compassion, empathetic joy, and equanimity foster concentration and release the mind from obstructive mental qualities.
Thus, the quality of one's assistance to others cannot help but have an effect on the development of one's own mind.
As for the reverse dynamic — the way in which working for one's own welfare also works for the welfare of others — the Buddha illustrates this point with a perceptive analogy for the interaction of living beings: two acrobats balancing on the end of a pole.
If one acrobat loses balance, both will fall.
For both to stay balanced, each must maintain his or her own balance.
This analogy indicates that the act of developing good qualities in one's own mind is, in itself, an act of kindness to others.
One protects them from the detrimental effects of one's uncontrolled anger, etc., and exposes them to the beneficial effects of one's own mindfulness, equanimity, and other skillful qualities.
Thus it is not possible to practice the frames of reference properly without the rest of the world's benefiting to a greater or lesser degree.
And in a world where no one can keep the balance of another person, the example of one's own skill in keeping balance is an instructive gift for those with the eyes to see and the intelligence to take one's example to heart.
Once one has attained full Awakening and needs to do nothing more for one's own welfare, one continues to act for the welfare of others within the framework of three frames of reference, different from the four discussed in this section.
The three are: the ability to remain untroubled, mindful, and alert when others do not respond to one's teachings; equanimous, mindful, and alert when some do and some do not respond to one's teachings; and untroubled, mindful, and alert when others do respond to one's teachings.
In other words, one's mental balance is so firm that others' success or failure in responding to one's help cannot disturb the mind.
It is only in this context — the three frames of reference following full Awakening — that the Buddha allows for the possibility of helping others with no thought for one's own welfare, for at that point one's true welfare has no further needs.
The Awakened person lives out the remainder of his/her life, insofar as his/her kamma allows, for “the welfare of the many, the happiness of the many, out of compassion for the world”.
Imagine a tree devoid of branches & leaves: Its buds don't grow to maturity, its bark doesn't grow to maturity, its sapwood doesn't grow to maturity, its heartwood doesn't grow to maturity.
In the same way, when — there being no mindfulness or alertness — a person is devoid of mindfulness or alertness, the prerequisite for a sense of shame & compunction becomes spoiled.
There being no sense of shame & compunction… the prerequisite for restraint of the senses becomes spoiled.
There being no restraint of the senses… the prerequisite for virtue becomes spoiled.
There being no virtue… the prerequisite for right concentration becomes spoiled.
There being no right concentration… the prerequisite for knowledge & vision of things as they have come to be becomes spoiled.
There being no knowledge & vision of things as they have come to be, the prerequisite for disenchantment & dispassion becomes spoiled.
There being no disenchantment & dispassion, the prerequisite for knowledge & vision of release becomes spoiled…
Now imagine a tree abundant in its branches & leaves: Its buds grow to maturity, its bark grows to maturity, its sapwood grows to maturity, its heartwood grows to maturity.
In the same way, when — there being mindfulness & alertness — a person is abundant in mindfulness & alertness, the prerequisite for a sense of shame & compunction becomes abundant.
There being a sense of shame & compunction… the prerequisite for restraint of the senses becomes abundant.
There being restraint of the senses… the prerequisite for virtue becomes abundant.
There being virtue… the prerequisite for right concentration becomes abundant.
There being right concentration… the prerequisite for knowledge & vision of things as they have come to be becomes abundant.
There being knowledge & vision of things as they have come to be, the prerequisite for disenchantment & dispassion becomes abundant.
There being disenchantment & dispassion, the prerequisite for knowledge & vision of release becomes abundant.
Ven.
Uttiya: It would be good, Venerable Sir, if the Blessed One would teach me the Dhamma in brief so that, having heard the Dhamma from the Blessed One, I might dwell alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute.
The Buddha: In that case, Uttiya, you should purify what is most basic with regard to skillful mental qualities.
And what is the basis of skillful mental qualities?
Well-purified virtue & views made straight.
Then, when your virtue is well-purified and your views made straight, in dependence on virtue, established in virtue, you should develop the four frames of reference… Then, when in dependence on virtue, relying on virtue, you develop the four frames of reference, you will go beyond the realm of Death.
Mindful & Alert.
Stay mindful, monks, and alert.
This is our instruction to you all.
And how is a monk mindful?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
He remains focused on feelings… mind… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
This is how a monk is mindful.
And how is a monk alert?
There is the case where feelings are known to the monk as they arise, known as they persist, known as they subside.
Thoughts are known to him as they arise, known as they persist, known as they subside.
Discernment is known to him as it arises, known as it persists, known as it subsides.
This is how a monk is alert.
So stay mindful, monks, and alert.
This is our instruction to you all.
Analysis.
I will teach you the frames of reference, their development, and the path of practice leading to their development.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
Now, what are the frames of reference?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
He remains focused on feelings… mind… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
These are called the frames of reference.
And what is the development of the frames of reference?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on the phenomenon of origination with regard to the body, remains focused on the phenomenon of passing away with regard to the body, remains focused on the phenomenon of origination & passing away with regard to the body — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
He remains focused on the phenomenon of origination with regard to feelings… with regard to the mind… with regard to mental qualities, remains focused on the phenomenon of passing away with regard to mental qualities, remains focused on the phenomenon of origination & passing away with regard to mental qualities — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
This is called the development of the frames of reference.
And what is the path of practice to the development of the frames of reference?
Just this noble eightfold path: right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
This is called the path of practice to the development of the frames of reference.
In Detail.
This is the direct path for the purification of beings, for the overcoming of sorrow & lamentation, for the disappearance of pain & distress, for the attainment of the right method, & for the realization of Unbinding — in other words, the four frames of reference.
Which four?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
He remains focused on feelings… mind… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
And how does the monk remain focused on the body in & of itself?
There is the case where a monk — having gone to the wilderness, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty building — sits down folding his legs crosswise, holding his body erect and setting mindfulness to the fore.
Always mindful, he breathes in; mindful he breathes out.
Breathing in long, he discerns, 'I am breathing in long'; or breathing out long, he discerns, 'I am breathing out long.' Or breathing in short, he discerns, 'I am breathing in short'; or breathing out short, he discerns, 'I am breathing out short.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to the entire body.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to the entire body.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in calming bodily fabrication.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out calming bodily fabrication.' Just as a skilled turner or his apprentice, when making a long turn, discerns, 'I am making a long turn'; or when making a short turn discerns, 'I am making a short turn'; in the same way the monk, when breathing in long, discerns, 'I am breathing in long'; or breathing out long, he discerns, 'I am breathing out long'… He trains himself, 'I will breathe in calming bodily fabrication.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out calming bodily fabrication.'
In this way he remains focused internally on the body in & of itself, or externally on the body in & of itself, or both internally & externally on the body in & of itself.
Or he remains focused on the phenomenon of origination with regard to the body, on the phenomenon of passing away with regard to the body, or on the phenomenon of origination & passing away with regard to the body.
Or his mindfulness that 'There is a body' is maintained to the extent of knowledge & recollection.
And he remains unsustained by anything in the world.
This is how a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself.
Furthermore, when walking, the monk discerns, 'I am walking.' When standing, he discerns, 'I am standing.' When sitting, he discerns, 'I am sitting.' When lying down, he discerns, 'I am lying down.' Or however his body is disposed, that is how he discerns it.
In this way he remains focused internally on the body in & of itself, or focused externally… unsustained by anything in the world.
This is how a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself.
Furthermore, when going forward & returning, he makes himself fully alert; when looking toward & looking away… when bending & extending his limbs… when carrying his outer cloak, his upper robe & his bowl… when eating, drinking, chewing, & savoring… when urinating & defecating… when walking, standing, sitting, falling asleep, waking up, talking, & remaining silent, he makes himself fully alert.
In this way he remains focused internally on the body in & of itself, or focused externally… unsustained by anything in the world.
This is how a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself.
Furthermore… just as if a sack with openings at both ends were full of various kinds of grain — wheat, rice, mung beans, kidney beans, sesame seeds, husked rice — and a man with good eyesight, pouring it out, were to reflect, 'This is wheat.
This is rice.
These are mung beans.
These are kidney beans.
These are sesame seeds.
This is husked rice,' in the same way, monks, a monk reflects on this very body from the soles of the feet on up, from the crown of the head on down, surrounded by skin and full of various kinds of unclean things: 'In this body there are head hairs, body hairs, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, tendons, bones, bone marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, pleura, spleen, lungs, large intestines, small intestines, gorge, feces, bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat, tears, skin-oil, saliva, mucus, fluid in the joints, urine.' 
In this way he remains focused internally on the body in & of itself, or focused externally… unsustained by anything in the world.
This is how a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself.
Furthermore… just as a skilled butcher or his apprentice, having killed a cow, would sit at a crossroads cutting it up into pieces, the monk contemplates this very body — however it stands, however it is disposed — in terms of properties: 'In this body there is the earth property, the liquid property, the fire property, & the wind property.'
In this way he remains focused internally on the body in & of itself, or focused externally… unsustained by anything in the world.
This is how a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself.
Furthermore, as if he were to see a corpse cast away in a charnel ground — one day, two days, three days dead — bloated, livid, & festering, he applies it to this very body, 'This body, too: Such is its nature, such is its future, such its unavoidable fate'…
Or again, as if he were to see a corpse cast away in a charnel ground, picked at by crows, vultures, & hawks, by dogs, hyenas, & various other creatures… a skeleton smeared with flesh & blood, connected with tendons… a fleshless skeleton smeared with blood, connected with tendons… a skeleton without flesh or blood, connected with tendons… bones detached from their tendons, scattered in all directions — here a hand bone, there a foot bone, here a shin bone, there a thigh bone, here a hip bone, there a back bone, here a rib, there a chest bone, here a shoulder bone, there a neck bone, here a jaw bone, there a tooth, here a skull… the bones whitened, somewhat like the color of shells… piled up, more than a year old… decomposed into a powder: He applies it to this very body, 'This body, too: Such is its nature, such is its future, such its unavoidable fate.'
In this way he remains focused internally on the body in & of itself, or externally on the body in & of itself, or both internally & externally on the body in & of itself.
Or he remains focused on the phenomenon of origination with regard to the body, on the phenomenon of passing away with regard to the body, or on the phenomenon of origination & passing away with regard to the body.
Or his mindfulness that 'There is a body' is maintained to the extent of knowledge & recollection.
And he remains unsustained by anything in the world.
This is how a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself.
And how does a monk remain focused on feelings in & of themselves?
There is the case where a monk, when feeling a painful feeling, discerns, 'I am feeling a painful feeling.' When feeling a pleasant feeling, he discerns, 'I am feeling a pleasant feeling.' When feeling a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling, he discerns, 'I am feeling a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling.'
When feeling a painful feeling of the flesh, he discerns, 'I am feeling a painful feeling of the flesh.' When feeling a painful feeling not of the flesh, he discerns, 'I am feeling a painful feeling not of the flesh.' When feeling a pleasant feeling of the flesh, he discerns, 'I am feeling a pleasant feeling of the flesh.' When feeling a pleasant feeling not of the flesh, he discerns, 'I am feeling a pleasant feeling not of the flesh.' When feeling a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling of the flesh, he discerns, 'I am feeling a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling of the flesh.' When feeling a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling not of the flesh, he discerns, 'I am feeling a neither-painful-nor-pleasant feeling not of the flesh.'
In this way he remains focused internally on feelings in & of themselves, or externally on feelings in & of themselves, or both internally & externally on feelings in & of themselves.
Or he remains focused on the phenomenon of origination with regard to feelings, on the phenomenon of passing away with regard to feelings, or on the phenomenon of origination & passing away with regard to feelings.
Or his mindfulness that 'There are feelings' is maintained to the extent of knowledge & recollection.
And he remains unsustained by anything in the world.
This is how a monk remains focused on feelings in & of themselves.
And how does a monk remain focused on the mind in & of itself?
There is the case where a monk, when the mind has passion, discerns that the mind has passion.
When the mind is without passion, he discerns that the mind is without passion.
When the mind has aversion, he discerns that the mind has aversion.
When the mind is without aversion, he discerns that the mind is without aversion.
When the mind has delusion, he discerns that the mind has delusion.
When the mind is without delusion, he discerns that the mind is without delusion.
When the mind is constricted, he discerns that the mind is constricted.
When the mind is scattered, he discerns that the mind is scattered.
When the mind is enlarged, he discerns that the mind is enlarged.
When the mind is not enlarged, he discerns that the mind is not enlarged.
When the mind is surpassed, he discerns that the mind is surpassed.
When the mind is unsurpassed, he discerns that the mind is unsurpassed.
When the mind is concentrated, he discerns that the mind is concentrated.
When the mind is not concentrated, he discerns that the mind is not concentrated.
When the mind is released, he discerns that the mind is released.
When the mind is not released, he discerns that the mind is not released.
In this way he remains focused internally on the mind in & of itself, or externally on the mind in & of itself, or both internally & externally on the mind in & of itself.
Or he remains focused on the phenomenon of origination with regard to the mind, on the phenomenon of passing away with regard to the mind, or on the phenomenon of origination & passing away with regard to the mind.
Or his mindfulness that 'There is a mind' is maintained to the extent of knowledge & recollection.
And he remains unsustained by anything in the world.
This is how a monk remains focused on the mind in & of itself.
MENTAL QUALITIES
And how does a monk remain focused on mental qualities in & of themselves?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on mental qualities in & of themselves with reference to the five hindrances.
And how does a monk remain focused on mental qualities in & of themselves with reference to the five hindrances?
There is the case where, there being sensual desire present within, a monk discerns, 'There is sensual desire present within me.' Or, there being no sensual desire present within, he discerns, 'There is no sensual desire present within me.' He discerns how there is the arising of unarisen sensual desire.
And he discerns how there is the abandoning of sensual desire once it has arisen.
And he discerns how there is no further arising in the future of sensual desire that has been abandoned.

In this way he remains focused internally on mental qualities in & of themselves, or externally on mental qualities in & of themselves, or both internally & externally on mental qualities in & of themselves.
Or he remains focused on the phenomenon of origination with regard to mental qualities, on the phenomenon of passing away with regard to mental qualities, or on the phenomenon of origination & passing away with regard to mental qualities.
Or his mindfulness that 'There are mental qualities' is maintained to the extent of knowledge & recollection.
And he remains unsustained by anything in the world.
This is how a monk remains focused on mental qualities in & of themselves with reference to the five hindrances.

Furthermore, the monk remains focused on mental qualities in & of themselves with reference to the five clinging-aggregates.
And how does he remain focused on mental qualities in & of themselves with reference to the five clinging-aggregates?
There is the case where a monk, 'Such is form, such its origination, such its disappearance.
Such is feeling… Such is perception… Such are fabrications… Such is consciousness, such its origination, such its disappearance.'
In this way he remains focused internally on mental qualities in & of themselves, or focused externally… unsustained by anything in the world.
This is how a monk remains focused on mental qualities in & of themselves with reference to the five clinging-aggregates.

Furthermore, the monk remains focused on mental qualities in & of themselves with reference to the sixfold internal & external sense media.
And how does he remain focused on mental qualities in & of themselves with reference to the sixfold internal & external sense media?
There is the case where he discerns the eye, he discerns forms, he discerns the fetter that arises dependent on both.
He discerns how there is the arising of an unarisen fetter.
And he discerns how there is the abandoning of a fetter once it has arisen.
And he discerns how there is no further appearance in the future of a fetter that has been abandoned.

In this way he remains focused internally on mental qualities in & of themselves, or focused externally… unsustained by anything in the world.
This is how a monk remains focused on mental qualities in & of themselves with reference to the sixfold internal & external sense media.
Furthermore, the monk remains focused on mental qualities in & of themselves with reference to the seven factors for Awakening.
And how does he remain focused on mental qualities in & of themselves with reference to the seven factors for Awakening?
There is the case where, there being mindfulness as a factor for Awakening present within, he discerns, 'Mindfulness as a factor for Awakening is present within me.' Or, there being no mindfulness as a factor of Awakening present within, he discerns, 'Mindfulness as a factor for Awakening is not present within me.' He discerns how there is the arising of unarisen mindfulness as a factor for Awakening.
And he discerns how there is the culmination of the development of mindfulness as a factor for Awakening once it has arisen.

In this way he remains focused internally on mental qualities in & of themselves, or externally… unsustained by anything in the world.
This is how a monk remains focused on mental qualities in & of themselves with reference to the seven factors for Awakening.
Furthermore, the monk remains focused on mental qualities in & of themselves with reference to four noble truths.
And how does he remain focused on mental qualities in & of themselves with reference to the four noble truths?
There is the case where he discerns, as it has come to be, that 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the way leading to the cessation of stress.
In this way he remains focused internally on mental qualities in & of themselves, or externally on mental qualities in & of themselves, or both internally & externally on mental qualities in & of themselves.
Or he remains focused on the phenomenon of origination with regard to mental qualities, on the phenomenon of passing away with regard to mental qualities, or on the phenomenon of origination & passing away with regard to mental qualities.
Or his mindfulness that 'There are mental qualities' is maintained to the extent of knowledge & recollection.
And he remains unsustained by anything in the world.
This is how a monk remains focused on mental qualities in & of themselves with reference to the four noble truths.

Now, if anyone would develop these four frames of reference in this way for seven years, then one of two fruits can be expected for him: either gnosis right here & now, or — if there be any remnant of clinging/sustenance — non-return.
Let alone seven years.
If anyone would develop these four frames of reference in this way for six years… five… four… three… two years… one year… seven months… six months… five… four… three… two months… one month… half a month, then one of two fruits can be expected for him: either gnosis right here & now, or — if there be any remnant of clinging/sustenance — non-return.
Let alone half a month.
If anyone would develop these four frames of reference in this way for seven days, then one of two fruits can be expected for him: either gnosis right here & now, or — if there be any remnant of clinging/sustenance — non-return.
'This is the direct path for the purification of beings, for the overcoming of sorrow & lamentation, for the disappearance of pain & distress, for the attainment of the right method, & for the realization of Unbinding — in other words, the four frames of reference.' Thus was it said, and in reference to this was it said.
In practice.
Now, how does mindfulness of in-&-out breathing, when developed & pursued, bring the four frames of reference to culmination?
On whatever occasion a monk breathing in long discerns, 'I am breathing in long'; or breathing out long, discerns, 'I am breathing out long'; or breathing in short, discerns, 'I am breathing in short'; or breathing out short, discerns, 'I am breathing out short'; trains himself, 'I will breathe in…&…out sensitive to the entire body'; trains himself, 'I will breathe in…&…out calming bodily fabrication': On that occasion the monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
I tell you, monks, that this — the in-&-out breath — is classed as a body among bodies, which is why the monk on that occasion remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
On whatever occasion a monk trains himself, 'I will breathe in…&…out sensitive to rapture'; trains himself, 'I will breathe in…&…out sensitive to pleasure'; trains himself, 'I will breathe in…&…out sensitive to mental fabrication'; trains himself, 'I will breathe in…&…out calming mental fabrication': On that occasion the monk remains focused on feelings in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
I tell you, monks, that this — close attention to in-&-out breaths — is classed as a feeling among feelings, which is why the monk on that occasion remains focused on feelings in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
On whatever occasion a monk trains himself, 'I will breathe in…&…out sensitive to the mind'; trains himself, 'I will breathe in…&…out gladdening the mind'; trains himself, 'I will breathe in…&…out steadying the mind'; trains himself, 'I will breathe in…&…out releasing the mind': On that occasion the monk remains focused on the mind in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
I don't say that there is mindfulness of in-&-out breathing in one of confused mindfulness and no alertness, which is why the monk on that occasion remains focused on the mind in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
On whatever occasion a monk trains himself, 'I will breathe in…&…out focusing on inconstancy'; trains himself, 'I will breathe in…&…out focusing on dispassion'; trains himself, 'I will breathe in…&…out focusing on cessation'; trains himself, 'I will breathe in…&…out focusing on relinquishment': On that occasion the monk remains focused on mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
He who sees clearly with discernment the abandoning of greed & distress is one who oversees with equanimity, which is why the monk on that occasion remains focused on mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
This is how mindfulness of in-&-out breathing, when developed & pursued, brings the four frames of reference to culmination.
Internal & External.
There is the case where a monk remains focused internally on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
As he remains focused internally on the body in & of itself, he becomes rightly concentrated there, and rightly clear.
Rightly concentrated there and rightly clear, he gives rise to knowledge & vision externally of the bodies of others.
He remains focused internally on feelings in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
As he remains focused internally on feelings in & of themselves, he becomes rightly concentrated there, and rightly clear.
Rightly concentrated there and rightly clear, he gives rise to knowledge & vision externally of the feelings of others.
He remains focused internally on the mind in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
As he remains focused internally on the mind in & of itself, he becomes rightly concentrated there, and rightly clear.
Rightly concentrated there and rightly clear, he gives rise to knowledge & vision externally of the minds of others.
He remains focused internally on mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
As he remains focused internally on mental qualities in & of themselves, he becomes rightly concentrated there, and rightly clear.
Rightly concentrated there and rightly clear, he gives rise to knowledge & vision externally of the mental qualities of others.
Having abandoned the five hindrances — imperfections of awareness that weaken discernment — the monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
He remains focused on feelings… mind… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
Just as if an elephant trainer were to plant a large post in the ground and were to bind a forest elephant to it by the neck in order to break it of its forest habits, its forest memories & resolves, its distraction, fatigue, & fever over leaving the forest, to make it delight in the town and to inculcate in it habits congenial to human beings; in the same way, these four frames of reference are bindings for the awareness of the disciple of the noble ones, to break him of his household habits, his household memories & resolves, his distraction, fatigue, & fever over leaving the household life, for the attainment of the right method and the realization of Unbinding.
Then the Tathāgata trains him further: 'Come, monk, remain focused on the body in & of itself, but do not think any thoughts connected with the body.
Remain focused on feelings in & of themselves, but do not think any thoughts connected with feelings.
Remain focused on the mind in & of itself, but do not think any thoughts connected with mind.
Remain focused on mental qualities in & of themselves, but do not think any thoughts connected with mental qualities.' With the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters the second jhāna…
Monks, those who are new, not long gone-forth, only recently come to this doctrine & discipline, should be roused, encouraged, & exhorted by you to develop the four frames of reference:
'Come, friends, remain focused on the body in & of itself — being ardent, alert, unified, clear-minded, concentrated, & single-minded for knowledge of the body as it has come to be.
Remain focused on feelings in & of themselves… on the mind in & of itself… on mental qualities in & of themselves — being ardent, alert, unified, clear-minded, concentrated, & single-minded for knowledge of mental qualities as they have come to be.'
Monks, even those who are learners — who have yet to attain their hearts' desire, who stay resolved on the unexcelled security from bondage — even they remain focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, unified, clear-minded, concentrated, & single-minded for complete comprehension of the body.
They remain focused on feelings in & of themselves… on the mind in & of itself… on mental qualities in & of themselves — being ardent, alert, unified, clear-minded, concentrated, & single-minded for complete comprehension of mental qualities.
Even those who are Arahants — whose mental effluents are ended, who have reached fulfillment, done the task, laid down the burden, attained the true goal, totally destroyed the fetter of becoming, and who are released through right gnosis — even they remain focused on the body in & of itself — being ardent, alert, unified, clear-minded, concentrated, & single-minded, disjoined from the body.
They remain focused on feelings in & of themselves… on the mind in & of itself… on mental qualities in & of themselves — being ardent, alert, unified, clear-minded, concentrated, & single-minded, disjoined from mental qualities.
So even those who are new, not long gone-forth, only recently come to this doctrine & discipline, should be roused, encouraged, & exhorted by you to develop the four frames of reference.
Taking Note.
Suppose that there is a foolish, inexperienced, unskillful cook who has presented a king or a king's minister with various kinds of curry: mainly sour, mainly bitter, mainly peppery, mainly sweet, alkaline or non-alkaline, salty or non-salty.
He does not take note of his master, thinking, 'Today my master likes this curry, or he reaches out for that curry, or he takes a lot of this curry, or he praises that curry'… As a result, he is not rewarded with clothing or wages or gifts.
Why is that?
Because the foolish, inexperienced, unskillful cook does not pick up on the theme of his own master.
In the same way, there are cases where a foolish, inexperienced, unskillful monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
As he remains thus focused on the body in & of itself, his mind does not become concentrated, his defilements are not abandoned.
He does not take note of that fact.
He remains focused on feelings in & of themselves… the mind in & of itself… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
As he remains thus focused on mental qualities in & of themselves, his mind does not become concentrated, his defilements are not abandoned.
He does not take note of that fact.
As a result, he is not rewarded with a pleasant abiding here & now, nor with mindfulness & alertness.
Why is that?
Because the foolish, inexperienced, unskillful monk does not take note of his own mind.
Now suppose that there is a wise, experienced, skillful cook who has presented a king or a king's minister with various kinds of curry… He takes note of his master, thinking, 'Today my master likes this curry, or he reaches out for that curry, or he takes a lot of this curry or he praises that curry'… As a result, he is rewarded with clothing, wages, & gifts.
Why is that?
Because the wise, experienced, skillful cook picks up on the theme of his own master.
In the same way, there are cases where a wise, experienced, skillful monk remains focused on the body in & of itself… feelings in & of themselves… the mind in & of itself… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
As he remains thus focused on mental qualities in & of themselves, his mind becomes concentrated, his defilements are abandoned.
He takes note of that fact.
As a result, he is rewarded with a pleasant abiding here & now, together with mindfulness & alertness.
Why is that?
Because the wise, experienced, skillful monk picks up on the theme of his own mind.
Directing & Not Directing the Mind.
Ānanda, if a monk or nun remains with mind well established in the four frames of reference, he/she may be expected to realize greater-than-ever distinction.
There is the case of a monk who remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
As he remains thus focused on the body in & of itself, a fever based on the body arises within his body, or there is sluggishness in his awareness, or his mind becomes scattered externally.
He should then direct his mind to any inspiring theme.
As his mind is directed to any inspiring theme, delight arises within him.
In one who feels delight, rapture arises.
In one whose mind is enraptured, the body grows serene.
His body serene, he feels pleasure.
As he feels pleasure, his mind grows concentrated.
He reflects, 'I have attained the aim to which my mind was directed.
Let me withdraw.' He withdraws & engages neither in directed thought nor in evaluation.
He discerns, 'I am not thinking or evaluating.
I am inwardly mindful & at ease.'
Furthermore, he remains focused on feelings… mind… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
As he remains thus focused on mental qualities in & of themselves, a fever based on mental qualities arises within his body, or there is sluggishness in his awareness, or his mind becomes scattered externally.
He should then direct his mind to any inspiring theme.
As his mind is directed to any inspiring theme, delight arises within him.
In one who feels delight, rapture arises.
In one whose mind is enraptured, the body grows serene.
His body serene, he is sensitive to pleasure.
As he feels pleasure, his mind grows concentrated.
He reflects, 'I have attained the aim to which my mind was directed.
Let me withdraw.' He withdraws & engages neither in directed thought nor in evaluation.
He discerns, 'I am not thinking or evaluating.
I am inwardly mindful & at ease.'
This, Ānanda, is development based on directing.
And what is development based on not directing?
A monk, when not directing his mind to external things, discerns, 'My mind is not directed to external things.
It is unconstricted front & back — released & undirected.
And furthermore I remain focused on the body in & of itself.
I am ardent, alert, mindful, & at ease.'
When not directing his mind to external things, he discerns, 'My mind is not directed to external things.
It is unconstricted front & back — released & undirected.
And furthermore I remain focused on feelings… mind… mental qualities in & of themselves.
I am ardent, alert, mindful, & at ease.'
This, Ānanda, is development based on not directing.
Now, Ānanda, I have taught you development based on directing and development based on not directing.
What a teacher should do out of compassion for his disciples, seeking their welfare, that I have done for you.
Over there are the foot of trees.
Over there are empty dwellings.
Practice jhāna, Ānanda.
Do not be heedless.
Do not be remorseful in the future.
That is our instruction to you all.
Proper Range.
Once a hawk suddenly swooped down on a quail and seized it.
Then the quail, as it was being carried off by the hawk, lamented, 'O, just my bad luck and lack of merit that I was wandering out of my proper range and into the territory of others!
If only I had kept to my proper range today, to my own ancestral territory, this hawk would have been no match for me in battle.'
'But what is your proper range?' the hawk asked.
'What is your own ancestral territory?'
'A newly plowed field with clumps of earth all turned up.'
So the hawk, without bragging about its own strength, without mentioning its own strength, let go of the quail.
'Go, quail, but even when you have gone there you won't escape me.'
Then the quail, having gone to a newly plowed field with clumps of earth all turned up and climbing up on top of a large clump of earth, stood taunting the hawk, 'Now come and get me, you hawk!
Now come and get me, you hawk!'
So the hawk, without bragging about its own strength, without mentioning its own strength, folded its two wings and suddenly swooped down toward the quail.
When the quail knew, 'The hawk is coming at me full speed,' it slipped behind the clump of earth, and right there the hawk shattered its breast.
This is what happens to anyone who wanders into what is not his proper range and is the territory of others.
For this reason, you should not wander into what is not your proper range and is the territory of others.
In one who wanders into what is not his proper range and is the territory of others, Māra gains an opening, Māra gains a foothold.
And what, for a monk, is not his proper range and is the territory of others?
The five strings of sensuality.
Which five?
Forms cognizable by the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
Sounds cognizable by the ear… Smells cognizable by the nose… Tastes cognizable by the tongue… Tactile sensations cognizable by the body — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
These, for a monk, are not his proper range and are the territory of others.
Wander, monks, in what is your proper range, your own ancestral territory.
In one who wanders in what is his proper range, his own ancestral territory, Māra gains no opening, Māra gains no foothold.
And what, for a monk, is his proper range, his own ancestral territory?
The four frames of reference… This, for a monk, is his proper range, his own ancestral territory.
Proper Range.
There are in the Himalayas, the king of mountains, difficult, uneven areas where neither monkeys nor human beings wander.
There are difficult, uneven areas where monkeys wander, but not human beings.
There are level stretches of land, delightful, where both monkeys and human beings wander.
In such spots hunters set a tar trap in the monkeys' tracks, in order to catch some monkeys.
Those monkeys who are not foolish or careless by nature, when they see the tar trap, avoid it from afar.
But any monkey who is foolish & careless by nature comes up to the tar trap and grabs it with its paw.
He gets stuck there.
Thinking, 'I'll free my paw,' he grabs it with his other paw.
He gets stuck there.
Thinking, 'I'll free both of my paws,' he grabs it with his foot.
He gets stuck there.
Thinking, 'I'll free both of my paws and my foot,' he grabs it with his other foot.
He gets stuck there.
Thinking, 'I'll free both of my paws and my feet as well,' he grabs it with his mouth.
He gets stuck there.
So the monkey, snared in five ways, lies there whimpering, having fallen on misfortune, fallen on ruin, a prey to whatever the hunter wants to do with him.
Then the hunter, without releasing the monkey, skewers him right there, picks him up, and goes off as he likes.
This is what happens to anyone who wanders into what is not his proper range and is the territory of others.
For this reason, you should not wander into what is not your proper range and is the territory of others…
Mindfulness of the Body.
There is the case where a monk, seeing a form with the eye, is obsessed with pleasing forms, is repelled by unpleasing forms, and remains with body-mindfulness unestablished, with limited awareness.
He does not discern, as it has come to be, the awareness-release, the discernment-release, where any evil, unskillful mental qualities that have arisen utterly cease without trace.

Just as if a person, catching six animals of different ranges, of different habitats, were to bind them with a strong rope.
Catching a snake, he would bind it with a strong rope.
Catching a crocodile… a bird… a dog… a hyena… a monkey, he would bind it with a strong rope.
Binding them all with a strong rope, and tying a knot in the middle, he would set chase to them.
Then those six animals, of different ranges, of different habitats, would each pull toward its own range & habitat.
The snake would pull, thinking, 'I'll go into the anthill.' The crocodile would pull, thinking, 'I'll go into the water.' The bird would pull, thinking, 'I'll fly up into the air.' The dog would pull, thinking, 'I'll go into the village.' The hyena would pull, thinking, 'I'll go into the charnel ground.' The monkey would pull, thinking, 'I'll go into the forest.' And when these six animals became internally exhausted, they would submit, they would surrender, they would come under the sway of whichever among them was the strongest.
In the same way, when a monk whose mindfulness immersed in the body is undeveloped & unpursued, the eye pulls toward pleasing forms, while unpleasing forms are repellent; the ear pulls toward pleasing sounds… the nose pulls toward pleasing smells… the tongue pulls toward pleasing tastes… the body pulls toward pleasing tactile sensations… the intellect pulls toward pleasing ideas, while unpleasing ideas are repellent.
This, monks, is lack of restraint.
And what is restraint?
There is the case where a monk, seeing a form with the eye, is not obsessed with pleasing forms, is not repelled by unpleasing forms, and remains with body-mindfulness established, with immeasurable awareness.
He discerns, as it has come to be, the awareness-release, the discernment-release, where all evil, unskillful mental qualities that have arisen utterly cease without trace.

Just as if a person, catching six animals of different ranges, of different habitats, were to bind them with a strong rope… and tether them to a strong post or stake.
Then those six animals, of different ranges, of different habitats, would each pull toward its own range & habitat… And when these six animals became internally exhausted, they would stand, sit, or lie down right there next to the post or stake.
In the same way, when a monk whose mindfulness immersed in the body is developed & pursued, the eye does not pull toward pleasing forms, and unpleasing forms are not repellent; the ear does not pull toward pleasing sounds… the nose does not pull toward pleasing smells… the tongue does not pull toward pleasing tastes… the body does not pull toward pleasing tactile sensations… the intellect does not pull toward pleasing ideas, and unpleasing ideas are not repellent.
This, monks, is restraint.
The strong post or stake is a term for mindfulness immersed in the body.
Thus you should train yourselves: 'We will develop mindfulness immersed in the body.
We will pursue it, give it a means of transport, give it a grounding.
We will steady it, consolidate it, and set about it properly.' That's how you should train yourselves.
Suppose, monks, that a large crowd of people comes thronging together, saying, 'The beauty queen!
The beauty queen!' And suppose that the beauty queen is highly accomplished at singing & dancing, so that an even greater crowd comes thronging, saying, 'The beauty queen is singing!
The beauty queen is dancing!' Then a man comes along, desiring life & shrinking from death, desiring pleasure & abhorring pain.
They say to him, 'Now look here, mister.
You must take this bowl filled to the brim with oil and carry it on your head in between the great crowd & the beauty queen.
A man with a raised sword will follow right behind you, and wherever you spill even a drop of oil, right there will he cut off your head.' Now what do you think, monks?
Will that man, not paying attention to the bowl of oil, let himself get distracted outside?
I have given you this parable to convey a meaning.
The meaning is this: The bowl filled to the brim with oil stands for mindfulness immersed in the body.
Thus you should train yourselves: 'We will develop mindfulness immersed in the body.
We will pursue it, give it a means of transport, give it a grounding.
We will steady it, consolidate it, and set about it properly.' That's how you should train yourselves.
§.
Whoever pervades the great ocean with his awareness encompasses whatever rivulets flow down into the ocean.
In the same way, whoever develops & pursues mindfulness immersed in the body encompasses whatever skillful qualities are on the side of clear knowing.
When one thing is practiced & pursued, the body is calmed, the mind is calmed, thinking & evaluating are stilled, and all qualities on the side of clear knowing go to the culmination of their development.
Which one thing?
Mindfulness immersed in the body.
When one thing is practiced & pursued, ignorance is abandoned, clear knowing arises, the conceit 'I am' is abandoned, obsessions are uprooted, fetters are abandoned.
Which one thing?
Mindfulness immersed in the body.
Those who do not taste mindfulness of the body do not taste the Deathless.
Those who taste mindfulness of the body taste the Deathless.
Those who are heedless of mindfulness of the body are heedless of the Deathless.
Those who comprehend mindfulness of the body comprehend the Deathless.
— AN.,,,,, 
The Deathless.
There are these four frames of reference.
Which four?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
As he remains focused on the body in & of itself, he abandons desire with regard to the body.
As he abandons desire with regard to the body, he realizes the Deathless.
He remains focused on feelings in & of themselves… mind in & of itself… mental qualities in & of themselves — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
As he remains focused on mental qualities in & of themselves, he abandons desire with regard to mental qualities.
As he abandons desire with regard to mental qualities, he realizes the Deathless.
§.
It's just as if there were a a great pile of dust at a four-way intersection.
If a cart or chariot came from the east, that pile of dust would be totally leveled.
If a cart or chariot came from the west… from the north… from the south, that pile of dust would be totally leveled.
In the same way, when a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself, then evil, unskillful qualities are totally leveled.
If he remains focused on feelings… mind… mental qualities in & of themselves, then evil, unskillful qualities are totally leveled.
Now when Ven.
Anuruddha was meditating in solitude, this train of thought appeared in his awareness: 'Whoever neglects the four frames of reference neglects the noble path going to the right ending of stress.
Whoever undertakes the four frames of reference undertakes the noble path going to the right ending of stress.'
Then Ven.
Mahā Moggallāna, as soon as he perceived with his awareness the train of thought in Ven.
Anuruddha's awareness — as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm — appeared in front of Ven.
Anuruddha and said to him, 'To what extent, my friend, are the four frames of reference undertaken?'
Ven.
Anuruddha: 'There is the case, my friend, of a monk who internally remains focused on the phenomenon of origination with regard to the body, remains focused on the phenomenon of passing away with regard to the body, remains focused on the phenomenon of origination & passing away with regard to the body — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
'Externally he remains focused on the phenomenon of origination with regard to the body…
'Internally & externally he remains focused on the phenomenon of origination with regard to the body, remains focused on the phenomenon of passing away with regard to the body, remains focused on the phenomenon of origination & passing away with regard to the body — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
'If he wants, he remains percipient of loathsomeness in the presence of what is not loathsome.
If he wants, he remains percipient of unloathsomeness in the presence of what is loathsome.
If he wants, he remains percipient of loathsomeness in the presence of what is not loathsome & what is.
If he wants, he remains percipient of unloathsomeness in the presence of what is loathsome & what is not.
If he wants — in the presence of what is loathsome & what is not — cutting himself off from both, he remains equanimous, alert, & mindful.

'It's to this extent, my friend, that the four frames of reference are undertaken…'
It's good for a monk if, at the appropriate times, he remains percipient of loathsomeness in the presence of what is not loathsome.
It is good if, at the appropriate times, he remains percipient of unloathsomeness in the presence of what is loathsome… percipient of loathsomeness in the presence of what is not loathsome & what is… percipient of unloathsomeness in the presence of what is loathsome & what is not.
It is good if, at the appropriate times — in the presence of what is loathsome & what is not — cutting himself off from both, he remains equanimous, alert, & mindful.
Now, with what purpose should a monk remain percipient of loathsomeness in the presence of what is not loathsome?
'Don't let passion arise within me in the presence of things that excite passion.' With this purpose should a monk remain percipient of loathsomeness in the presence of what is not loathsome.
And with what purpose should a monk remain percipient of unloathsomeness in the presence of what is loathsome?
'Don't let aversion arise within me in the presence of things that excite aversion'…
And with what purpose should a monk remain percipient of loathsomeness in the presence of what is not loathsome & what is?
'Don't let passion arise within me in the presence of things that excite passion.
Don't let aversion arise within me in the presence of things that excite aversion'…
And with what purpose should a monk remain percipient of unloathsomeness in the presence of what is loathsome & what is not?
'Don't let aversion arise within me in the presence of things that excite aversion.
Don't let passion arise within me in the presence of things that excite passion'…
And with what purpose should a monk — in the presence of what is loathsome & what is not — cutting himself off from both, remain equanimous, alert, & mindful?
'Don't let passion — in any object, in any place, in any amount — arise within me in the presence of things that excite passion.
Don't let aversion — in any object, in any place, in any amount — arise within me in the presence of things that excite aversion.
Don't let delusion — in any object, in any place, in any amount — arise within me in the presence of things that excite delusion.' With this purpose should a monk — in the presence of what is loathsome & what is not — cutting himself off from both, remain equanimous, alert, & mindful.

Protecting Oneself & Others.
Once upon a time, monks, a bamboo acrobat, having erected a bamboo pole, addressed his assistant, Frying Pan: 'Come, my dear Frying Pan.
Climb up the bamboo pole and stand on my shoulders.'
'As you say, teacher,' Frying Pan answered the bamboo acrobat and, climbing the bamboo pole, stood on his shoulders.
So then the bamboo acrobat said to his assistant, 'Now you watch after me, my dear Frying Pan, and I'll watch after you.
Thus, protecting one another, watching after one another, we'll show off our skill, receive our reward, and come down safely from the bamboo pole.'
When he had said this, Frying Pan said to him, 'But that won't do at all, teacher.
You watch after yourself, and I'll watch after myself, and thus with each of us protecting ourselves, watching after ourselves, we'll show off our skill, receive our reward, and come down safely from the bamboo pole.'
What Frying Pan, the assistant, said to her teacher was the right way in that case.
Monks, a frame of reference is to be practiced with the thought, 'I'll watch after myself.' A frame of reference is to be practiced with the thought, 'I'll watch after others.' When watching after oneself, one watches after others.
When watching after others, one watches after oneself.
And how does one, when watching after oneself, watch after others?
Through pursuing, through developing it, through devoting oneself to it.
This is how one, when watching after oneself, watches after others.
And how does one, when watching after others, watch after oneself?
Through endurance, through non-violence, and through a mind of good will & sympathy.
This is how one, when watching after others, watches after oneself.
A frame of reference is to be practiced with the thought, 'I'll watch after myself.' A frame of reference is to be practiced with the thought, 'I'll watch after others.' When watching after oneself, one watches after others.
When watching after others, one watches after oneself.
Then, when the Blessed One had entered the Rains Retreat, there arose a severe illness within him.
Sharp & deadly were the pains, but he bore them mindfully, alert, & unperturbed.
The thought occurred to him, 'It would not be proper for me to enter total Unbinding without addressing my attendants & without taking leave of the Community of monks.
Why don't I, suppressing this illness with persistence, remain resolved on the fabrication of life?' So he suppressed the illness with persistence & remained resolved on the fabrication of life.
His illness abated.
Then he recovered from the illness.
Soon after his recovery he came out of his dwelling & sat down in the shade of the building, on a seat prepared for him.
Then Ven.
Ānanda approached him and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat down to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, 'What a happy sight to see the Blessed One in comfort!
What a happy sight to see the Blessed One at ease!
Because of the Blessed One's sickness my own body felt as if it were drugged.
I lost my bearings.
Things were unclear to me.
Yet I still took a measure of comfort in the thought that the Blessed One would not enter total Unbinding as long as he hadn't given at least some pronouncement concerning the Community of monks.'
'What more does the Community of monks want from me, Ānanda?
I have taught the Dhamma without an inner or an outer version.
The Tathāgata has no closed fist with regard to teachings.
Whoever has the thought, 'I will rule the Community of monks,' or 'The Community of monks is dedicated to me,' he should give some pronouncement concerning the Community of monks.
But the Tathāgata has no such thoughts.
So why should he give some pronouncement concerning the Community of monks?
'I am old now, Ānanda, & aged.
My years have turned eighty.
Just as an old cart is kept going with the help of bamboo strips, it seems to me as if the Tathāgata's body is kept going with the help of bamboo strips.
The only time the Tathāgata's body feels at ease is when, not attending to any theme at all, and with the cessation of certain feelings, he enters & remains in the theme-less concentration of awareness.
Therefore each of you should remain with your self as an island, your self as your refuge, without anything else as a refuge.
Remain with the Dhamma as an island, the Dhamma as your refuge, without anything else as a refuge.
And how does a monk remain with his self as an island, his self as his refuge, without anything else as a refuge?
How does he remain with the Dhamma as an island, the Dhamma as his refuge, without anything else as a refuge?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
He remains focused on feelings… mind… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
This is how a monk remains with his self as an island, his self as his refuge, without anything else as a refuge, with the Dhamma as an island, the Dhamma as his refuge, without anything else as a refuge.
For those who — now or after I am gone — remain with their self as an island… the Dhamma as their refuge, without anything else as a refuge, they will be the highest of the monks who desire training.'
The four activities included in this set show how effort can be applied to developing skillful qualities in the mind.
The basic formula runs as follows:
There is the case where a monk generates desire, endeavors, arouses persistence, upholds & exerts his intent:
These four aspects of effort are also termed guarding, abandoning, developing, and maintaining.
All four play a necessary role in bringing the mind to Awakening, although in some cases they are simply four sides to a single process.
The abandoning of unskillful mental qualities can frequently be accomplished simply by focusing on the development of skillful ones, such as mindfulness.
The same principle can also act in reverse: in the skillful eradication of unskillful qualities, the skillfulness of the eradication is in and of itself the development of mindful discernment.
As we will see when we deal with the seven factors for Awakening, the act of nourishing a factor for Awakening can in some cases simultaneously starve a hindrance, while the conscious starving of a hindrance can foster a factor for Awakening.
Ultimately, though, right exertion requires more than simply abstaining from what is unskillful, for it must apply the basic factors of skillfulness — mindfulness and discernment — to gain an understanding of how even skillfulness can be transcended.
Perhaps the most surprising element in right exertion is the role played by desire, which is usually associated with the craving that acts as a cause of suffering.
We will treat this topic in more detail under the bases for success, and simply note here that the Buddha recognized that desire can be either skillful or unskillful, and that he freely admitted that skillful desire is a necessary factor in the path to the end of suffering and stress.
The most important point in developing right exertion is to realize that the effort to abandon unskillful qualities and to develop skillful qualities must be skillful itself.
Unskillful efforts at eradicating unskillful states, even if well intended, can often exacerbate problems instead of solving them.
Treating hatred with hatred, for instance, is less effective than treating it with the kind of understanding developed in the second stage of frames-of-reference meditation, which sees into causes and effects, and learns how to manipulate causes properly so as to get the desired effects.
For this reason, the basic formula for right exertion includes, both implicitly and explicitly, other factors of the path to ensure that the effort is skillfully applied.
Three of the qualities that activate the mind in these exertions — desire, persistence, and intent — are also members of the bases of power, where they function as dominant factors in the attainment of concentration.
The ability to discriminate between skillful and unskillful qualities, implicit in all of these exertions, requires a certain level of mindfulness and discernment.
The skillful qualities that are mentioned most prominently as worthy of development are the seven factors for Awakening, which include mindfulness, analysis of mental qualities, and the factors of jhāna, all of which must be reinvested in the process of right exertion to bring it to higher levels of finesse.
Passage § gives an idea of right exertion's range of application by listing seven ways in which unskillful qualities can be abandoned: seeing, restraining, using, tolerating, avoiding, destroying, and developing.
The passage is deliberately vague as to which types of unskillful qualities respond to which type of treatment, for this is a point that each meditator must discover in practice for him or herself.
This emphasis on personal exploration is crucial to the practice of right effort, for it encourages one to be sensitive to what can be discovered with one's own mindfulness and discernment.
The same point applies to the question of how much effort must be applied to the practice.
The Buddha notes that some meditators will have to undergo painful and slow practice, while others will find that their practice is painful and quick, pleasant and slow, or pleasant and quick.
Thus each has to adjust the effort applied to the practice accordingly.
This need for differing levels of effort depends not only on the individual, but also on the situation.
In some cases, simply watching an unskillful quality with equanimity will be enough to make it go away; in other cases, one has to exert a conscious effort to get rid of it.
Thus, through observation, one will realize that skillful effort has no room for doctrinaire approaches.
The polar extremes of constant exertion to the point of exhaustion and its opposite, a knee-jerk fear of “efforting,” are both misguided here, as is the seemingly “middle” way of moderation in all things.
The true middle way means tuning one's efforts to one's abilities and to the task at hand.
In some cases, this entails an all-out effort; in others, simple watchfulness.
The ability to sense what kind and what level of effort is appropriate in any given situation is an important element in developing the basic requirements for skill — mindfulness and discernment — by putting them to use.
We have already noted that right exertion is equivalent to the factor of ardency in frames-of-reference meditation.
In the first stage of that practice, right exertion functions by keeping the mind with its frame of reference and by warding off unskillful mental qualities that would make it abandon that frame.
In the second stage, the function of exertion becomes more refined: warding off the tendency to get involved with “what” is arising and passing away, and keeping the mind applied to its task of manipulating, observing, and mastering the process of origination and passing away as one steers the mind to the stillness of jhāna.
In the third stage, the function of exertion becomes finer yet, as it maintains a basic “empty” or radically phenomenological awareness of the frame of reference in order to bring the mind to the state of non-fashioning appropriate for the process of Awakening.
The equipoise of this state — beyond the categories of effort or non-effort — explains the paradox expressed in §, which states that the mind crosses the flood of rebirth by neither “pushing forward” nor “staying in place,” an equipoise that embodies the ultimate skillfulness of right exertion in bringing the mind to a point beyond skill.
Implicit in this discussion of the effort involved in mastering skill to the point of its own transcendence is the fact that the goal of the practice is not an effort to return to a supposedly pure state of childlike awareness prior to social conditionings.
Passage § makes this fact explicit.
According to Buddhist analysis, the state of a child's mind is one, not of purity, but of ignorance filled with the potential for many unskilled qualities.
These qualities show themselves in seemingly innocent ways simply because the infant's intellectual and physical powers are weak.
Once those powers are strengthened, the mind's potentials become manifest.
As one modern teacher has stated, the childlike mind is the source for the round of rebirth.
If it were truly pure and fully aware, it would not be susceptible to unskillful social conditioning.
Thus the way to purity lies, not in renouncing one's developed intellectual powers, but in developing those powers to higher levels of mastery and skill.
This explains why right exertion is a necessary part of the practice.
There are these four right exertions.
Which four?
There is the case where a monk generates desire, endeavors, arouses persistence, upholds & exerts his intent for the sake of the non-arising of evil, unskillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the sake of the abandoning of evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen… for the sake of the arising of skillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the maintenance, non-confusion, increase, plenitude, development, & culmination of skillful qualities that have arisen.
These are the four right exertions.
Just as the River Ganges flows to the east, slopes to the east, inclines to the east, in the same way when a monk develops & pursues the four right exertions, he flows to Unbinding, slopes to Unbinding, inclines to Unbinding.
There are these four exertions.
Which four?
The exertion to guard, the exertion to abandon, the exertion to develop, & the exertion to maintain.
And what is the exertion to guard?
There is the case where a monk, on seeing a form with the eye, does not grasp at any theme or variations by which — if he were to dwell without restraint over the faculty of the eye — evil, unskillful qualities such as greed or distress might assail him.
He practices with restraint.
He guards the faculty of the eye.
He achieves restraint with regard to the faculty of the eye.
This is called the exertion to guard.
And what is the exertion to abandon?
There is the case where a monk does not acquiesce to a thought of sensuality that has arisen.
He abandons it, destroys it, dispels it, wipes it out of existence.
He does not acquiesce to a thought of ill will… a thought of violence… any evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen.
He abandons them, destroys them, dispels them, wipes them out of existence.
This is called the exertion to abandon.

And what is the exertion to develop?
There is the case where a monk develops mindfulness as a factor for Awakening dependent on seclusion… dispassion… cessation, resulting in letting go.
He develops investigation of qualities… persistence… rapture… serenity… concentration… equanimity as factor for Awakening dependent on seclusion… dispassion… cessation, resulting in letting go.
This is called the exertion to develop.

And what is the exertion to maintain?
There is the case where a monk maintains a favorable theme of concentration — the skeleton perception, the worm-eaten perception, the livid perception, the festering perception, the falling-apart perception, the bloated perception.
This is called the exertion to maintain.

These are the four exertions.
The ending of the effluents is for one who knows & sees, I tell you, not for one who does not know & does not see.
For one who knows what & sees what?
Appropriate attention & inappropriate attention.
When a monk attends inappropriately, unarisen effluents arise, and arisen effluents increase.
When a monk attends appropriately, unarisen effluents do not arise, and arisen effluents are abandoned.
There are effluents that are to be abandoned by seeing, those that are to be abandoned by restraining, those that are to be abandoned by using, those that are to be abandoned by tolerating, those that are to be abandoned by avoiding, those that are to be abandoned by destroying, and those that are to be abandoned by developing.
And what are the effluents that are to be abandoned by seeing?
There is the case where an uninstructed, run-of-the-mill person… doesn't discern what ideas are fit for attention, or what ideas are unfit for attention.
This being so, he doesn't attend to ideas fit for attention, and attends to ideas unfit for attention.
And what are the ideas unfit for attention that he attends to?
Whatever ideas such that, when he attends to them, the unarisen effluent of sensuality arises, and the arisen effluent of sensuality increases; the unarisen effluent of becoming… the unarisen effluent of ignorance arises, and the arisen effluent of ignorance increases… This is how he attends inappropriately: 'Was I in the past?
Was I not in the past?
What was I in the past?
How was I in the past?
Having been what, what was I in the past?
Shall I be in the future?
Shall I not be in the future?
What shall I be in the future?
How shall I be in the future?
Having been what, what shall I be in the future?' Or else he is inwardly perplexed about the immediate present: 'Am I?
Am I not?
What am I?
How am I?
Where has this being come from?
Where is it bound?'
As he attends inappropriately in this way, one of six kinds of view arises in him: The view I have a self arises in him as true & established, or the view I have no self… or the view It is precisely by means of self that I perceive self… or the view It is precisely by means of self that I perceive not-self… or the view It is precisely by means of not-self that I perceive self arises in him as true & established, or else he has a view like this: This very self of mine — the knower that is sensitive here & there to the ripening of good & bad actions — is the self of mine that is constant, everlasting, eternal, not subject to change, and will endure as long as eternity.
This is called a thicket of views, a wilderness of views, a contortion of views, a writhing of views, a fetter of views.
Bound by a fetter of views, the uninstructed run-of-the-mill person is not freed from birth, aging, & death, from sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
He is not freed, I tell you, from stress 
The well-taught disciple of the noble ones… discerns what ideas are fit for attention, and what ideas are unfit for attention.
This being so, he doesn't attend to ideas unfit for attention, and attends to ideas fit for attention… And what are the ideas fit for attention that he attends to?
Whatever ideas such that, when he attends to them, the unarisen effluent of sensuality doesn't arise, and the arisen effluent of sensuality is abandoned; the unarisen effluent of becoming… the unarisen effluent of ignorance doesn't arise, and the arisen effluent of ignorance is abandoned… He attends appropriately, This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the way leading to the cessation of stress.
As he attends appropriately in this way, three fetters are abandoned in him: identity-view, doubt, and grasping at habits & practices.
These are called the effluents that are to be abandoned by seeing.
And what are the effluents that are to be abandoned by restraining?
There is the case where a monk, reflecting appropriately, dwells restrained with the restraint of the eye-faculty.
The effluents, vexation, or fever that would arise if he were to dwell unrestrained with the restraint of the eye-faculty do not arise for him when he dwells restrained with the restraint of the eye-faculty.
These are called the effluents that are to be abandoned by restraining.
And what are the effluents that are to be abandoned by using?
There is the case where a monk, reflecting appropriately, uses the robe simply to counteract cold, to counteract heat, to counteract the touch of flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, & reptiles; simply for the purpose of covering the parts of the body that cause shame.
Reflecting appropriately, he uses alms food, not playfully, nor for intoxication, nor for putting on bulk, nor for beautification; but simply for the survival & continuance of this body, for ending its afflictions, for the support of the holy life, thinking, 'Thus will I destroy old feelings and not create new feelings.
I will maintain myself, be blameless, & live in comfort.'
Reflecting appropriately, he uses lodging simply to counteract cold, to counteract heat, to counteract the touch of flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, & reptiles; simply for protection from the inclemencies of weather and for the enjoyment of seclusion.
Reflecting appropriately, he uses medicinal requisites for curing illness simply to counteract any pains of illness that have arisen and for maximum freedom from disease.
The effluents, vexation, or fever that would arise if he were not to use these things do not arise for him when he uses them.
These are called the effluents that are to be abandoned by using.
And what are the effluents that are to be abandoned by tolerating?
There is the case where a monk, reflecting appropriately, endures.
He tolerates cold, heat, hunger, & thirst; the touch of flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, & reptiles; ill-spoken, unwelcome words; & bodily feelings that, when they arise, are painful, racking, sharp, piercing, disagreeable, displeasing, & menacing to life.
The effluents, vexation, or fever that would arise if he were not to tolerate these things do not arise for him when he tolerates them.
These are called the effluents that are to be abandoned by tolerating.
And what are the effluents that are to be abandoned by avoiding?
There is the case where a monk, reflecting appropriately, avoids a wild elephant, a wild horse, a wild bull, a wild dog, a snake, a stump, a bramble patch, a chasm, a cliff, a cesspool, an open sewer.
Reflecting appropriately, he avoids sitting in the sorts of unsuitable seats, wandering to the sorts of unsuitable habitats, and associating with the sorts of bad friends that would make his knowledgeable friends in the holy life suspect him of evil conduct.
The effluents, vexation, or fever that would arise if he were not to avoid these things do not arise for him when he avoids them.
These are called the effluents that are to be abandoned by avoiding.
And what are the effluents that are to be abandoned by destroying?
There is the case where a monk, reflecting appropriately, does not tolerate an arisen thought of sensuality.
He abandons it, destroys it, dispels it, & wipes it out of existence.
The effluents, vexation, or fever that would arise if he were not to destroy these things do not arise for him when he destroys them.
These are called the effluents that are to be abandoned by destroying.
And what are the effluents that are to be abandoned by developing?
There is the case where a monk, reflecting appropriately, develops mindfulness as a factor for Awakening dependent on seclusion… dispassion… cessation, resulting in letting go.
He develops analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening… persistence as a factor for Awakening… rapture as a factor for Awakening… serenity as a factor for Awakening… concentration as a factor for Awakening… equanimity as a factor for Awakening dependent on seclusion… dispassion… cessation, resulting in letting go.
The effluents, vexation, or fever that would arise if he were not to develop these qualities do not arise for him when he develops them.
These are called the effluents that are to be abandoned by developing.
When a monk's effluents that should be abandoned by seeing have been abandoned by seeing,
his effluents that should be abandoned by restraining have been abandoned by restraining,
his effluents that should be abandoned by using have been abandoned by using,
his effluents that should be abandoned by tolerating have been abandoned by tolerating,
his effluents that should be abandoned by avoiding have been abandoned by avoiding,
his effluents that should be abandoned by destroying have been abandoned by destroying,
his effluents that should be abandoned by developing have been abandoned by developing,
then he is called a monk who dwells restrained with the restraint of all the effluents.
He has severed craving, thrown off the fetters, and — through the right penetration of conceit — has made an end of suffering & stress.
These are the five factors for exertion.
Which five?
There is the case where a monk has conviction, is convinced of the Tathāgata's Awakening: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy and rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.' 
The monk is free from illness & discomfort, endowed with good digestion — not too cold, not too hot, of moderate strength — fit for exertion.
He is neither fraudulent nor deceitful.
He declares himself to the Teacher or to his wise friends in the holy life in line with what he actually is.
He keeps his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful mental qualities and taking on skillful mental qualities.
He is steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful mental qualities.
He is discerning, endowed with discernment leading to the arising of the goal — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress.
These are the five factors for exertion.
With regard to internal factors, I do not envision any other single factor like appropriate attention as being so helpful for a monk in training, who has not attained the heart's goal but remains intent on the unexcelled security from bondage.
A monk who attends appropriately abandons what is unskillful and develops what is skillful.

With regard to external factors, I do not envision any other single factor like admirable friendship as being so helpful for a monk in training, who has not attained the heart's the goal but remains intent on the unexcelled security from bondage.
A monk who is a friend with admirable people abandons what is unskillful and develops what is skillful.

A person without ardency, without compunction, is incapable of self-awakening, incapable of Unbinding, incapable of attaining the unexcelled security from bondage.
A person ardent & compunctious is capable of self-awakening, capable of Unbinding, capable of attaining the unexcelled security from bondage.
Ven.
Sāriputta: It is said, friend, that a person without ardency, without compunction, is incapable of self-awakening, incapable of Unbinding, incapable of attaining the unexcelled security from bondage.
Now, how is a person without ardency, without compunction, incapable of self-awakening, incapable of Unbinding, incapable of attaining the unexcelled security from bondage?
And how is a person ardent & compunctious capable of self-awakening, capable of Unbinding, capable of attaining the unexcelled security from bondage?
Ven.
Mahā Kassapa: There is the case, friend, where a monk, 'Unarisen evil, unskillful qualities arising in me would lead to what is unbeneficial,' arouses no ardency.
'Arisen evil, unskillful qualities not being abandoned in me…'… 'Unarisen skillful qualities not arising in me…'… 'Arisen skillful qualities ceasing in me would lead to what is unbeneficial,' he arouses no ardency.
This is how one is without ardency.
And how is one a person without compunction?
There is the case where a monk, 'Unarisen evil, unskillful qualities arising in me would lead to what is unbeneficial,' feels no compunction.
'Arisen evil, unskillful qualities not being abandoned in me…'… 'Unarisen skillful qualities not arising in me…'… 'Arisen skillful qualities ceasing in me would lead to what is unbeneficial,' he feels no compunction.
This is how one is without compunction.
This is how a person without ardency, without compunction, is incapable of self-awakening, incapable of Unbinding, incapable of attaining the unexcelled security from bondage.
And how is one ardent?
There is the case where a monk, 'Unarisen evil, unskillful qualities arising in me would lead to what is unbeneficial,' arouses ardency.
'Arisen evil, unskillful qualities not being abandoned in me…'… 'Unarisen skillful qualities not arising in me…'… 'Arisen skillful qualities ceasing in me would lead to what is unbeneficial,' he arouses ardency.
This is how one is ardent.
And how is one compunctious?
There is the case where a monk, 'Unarisen evil, unskillful qualities arising in me would lead to what is unbeneficial,' feels compunction.
'Arisen evil, unskillful qualities not being abandoned in me…'… 'Unarisen skillful qualities not arising in me…'… 'Arisen skillful qualities ceasing in me would lead to what is unbeneficial,' he feels compunction.
This is how one is compunctious.
This is how a person ardent & compunctious is capable of self-awakening, capable of Unbinding, capable of attaining the unexcelled security from bondage.
Ven.
Sāriputta: Imagine a bronze bowl brought back from a shop or a smith all covered with dust & dirt, that the owners would neither use nor clean, but would throw away in the dust.
Wouldn't that bronze bowl eventually become even more dirty & defiled with time?
Ven.
Mahā Moggallāna: Yes, my friend.
Ven.
Sāriputta: In the same way, when an individual, being blemished, doesn't discern as it has come to be that 'I have an internal blemish,' it can be expected of him that he will not generate desire, endeavor, or arouse persistence for the abandoning of that blemish.
He will die with passion, aversion, delusion — blemished & with a mind defiled….
Now imagine a bronze bowl brought back from a shop or a smith all covered with dust & dirt, that the owners would both use & clean, and would not throw away in the dust.
Wouldn't that bronze bowl eventually become clean & pure with time?
Ven.
Mahā Moggallāna: Yes, my friend.
Ven.
Sāriputta: In the same way, when an individual, being blemished, discerns as it has come to be that 'I have an internal blemish,' it can be expected of him that he will generate desire, endeavor, & arouse persistence for the abandoning of that blemish.
He will die without passion, aversion, delusion — unblemished & with a mind undefiled….
Now imagine a bronze bowl brought back from a shop or a smith all clean & pure, that the owners would neither use nor clean, but would throw away in the dust.
Wouldn't that bronze bowl eventually become dirty & defiled with time?
Ven.
Mahā Moggallāna: Yes, my friend.
Ven.
Sāriputta: In the same way, when an individual, being unblemished, doesn't discern as it has come to be that 'I have no internal blemish,' it can be expected of him that he will attend to the theme of beauty.
As he attends to the theme of beauty, passion will assault his mind.
He will die with passion, aversion, delusion — blemished & with a mind defiled….
Now imagine a bronze bowl brought back from a shop or a smith all clean & pure, that the owners would both use & clean, and would not throw away in the dust.
Wouldn't that bronze bowl eventually become even more clean & pure with time?
Ven.
Mahā Moggallāna: Yes, my friend.
Ven.
Sāriputta: In the same way, when an individual, being unblemished, discerns as it has come to be that 'I have no internal blemish,' it can be expected of him that he will not attend to the theme of beauty.
As he does not attend to the theme of beauty, passion will not assault his mind.
He will die without passion, aversion, delusion — unblemished & with a mind undefiled.
This is the reason, this is the cause why, of the two individuals who are blemished, one is reckoned to be inferior, and the other superior… and why, of the two individuals who are unblemished, one is reckoned to be inferior, and the other superior.
Ven.
Mahā Moggallāna: 'Blemish, blemish,' it's said.
What does 'blemish' stand for?
Ven.
Sāriputta: The influences of evil, unskillful wishes: That's what 'blemish' stands for.
Even if a monk is not skilled in the ways of the minds of others, he should train himself: 'I will be skilled in reading my own mind.'
And how is a monk skilled in reading his own mind?
Imagine a young woman — or man — fond of adornment, examining the image of her own face in a bright, clean mirror or bowl of clear water: If she saw any dirt or blemish there, she would try to remove it.
If she saw no dirt or blemish there, she would be pleased, her resolves fulfilled: 'How fortunate I am!
How clean I am!' In the same way, a monk's self-examination is very productive in terms of skillful qualities: 'Do I usually remain covetous or not?
With thoughts of ill will or not?
Overcome by sloth & drowsiness or not?
Restless or not?
Uncertain or gone beyond uncertainty?
Angry or not?
With soiled thoughts or unsoiled thoughts?
With my body aroused or unaroused?
Lazy or with persistence aroused?
Unconcentrated or concentrated?'
If, on examination, a monk knows, 'I usually remain covetous, with thoughts of ill will, overcome by sloth & drowsiness, restless, uncertain, angry, with soiled thoughts, with my body aroused, lazy, or unconcentrated,' then he should put forth extra desire, effort, diligence, endeavor, relentlessness, mindfulness, & alertness for the abandoning of those very same evil, unskillful qualities, just as when a person whose turban or head was on fire would put forth extra desire, effort, diligence, endeavor, relentlessness, mindfulness, & alertness to put out the fire on his turban or head…
But if, on examination, a monk knows, 'I usually remain uncovetous, without thoughts of ill will… & concentrated,' then his duty is to make an effort in establishing those very same skillful qualities to a higher degree for the ending of the effluents.
'And how is striving fruitful, how is exertion fruitful?
There is the case where a monk, when not loaded down, does not load himself down with pain, nor does he reject pleasure that accords with the Dhamma, although he is not infatuated with that pleasure.
He discerns that “When I exert a fabrication against this cause of stress, then from the fabrication of exertion there is dispassion.
When I look on with equanimity at that cause of stress, then from the development of equanimity there is dispassion.” So he exerts a fabrication against the cause of stress… and develops equanimity with regard to the cause of stress… Thus the stress is exhausted… & the stress is exhausted.
'Suppose that a man is in love with a woman, his mind ensnared with intense desire, intense passion.
He sees her standing with another man, chatting, joking, & laughing.
What do you think, monks?… Would sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair arise in him?
'Yes, lord…'
'Now suppose the thought were to occur to him, “I am in love with this woman… When I see her standing with another man, chatting, joking, & laughing, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair arise in me.
Why don't I abandon my desire & passion for that woman?” So he abandons his desire & passion for that woman, and afterwards sees her standing with another man, chatting, joking, & laughing.
What do you think, monks?… Would sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair arise in him?'
'No, lord…'
'In the same way, the monk, when not loaded down, does not load himself down with pain, nor does he reject pleasure that accords with the Dhamma, although he is not infatuated with that pleasure… He exerts a fabrication against the cause of stress… and develops equanimity with regard to the cause of stress… Thus the stress is exhausted… & the stress is exhausted.
'Furthermore, the monk notices this: “When I live according to my pleasure, unskillful mental qualities increase in me & skillful qualities decline.
When I exert myself with stress & pain, though, unskillful qualities decline in me & skillful qualities increase.
Why don't I exert myself with stress & pain?” So he exerts himself with stress & pain, and while he is exerting himself with stress & pain, unskillful qualities decline in him, & skillful qualities increase.
Then at a later time he would no longer exert himself with stress & pain.
Why is that?
Because he has attained the goal for which he was exerting himself with stress & pain…
'Suppose that a fletcher were to heat & warm an arrow shaft between two flames, making it straight & pliable.
Then at a later time he would no longer heat & warm the shaft between two flames, making it straight & pliable.
Why is that?
Because he has attained the goal for which he was heating & warming the shaft… In the same way, the monk… no longer exerts himself with stress & pain.
Why is that?
Because he has attained the goal for which he was exerting himself with stress & pain.'
Udāyin, there are these four types of people to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
There is the case where a certain person is practicing for the abandoning & relinquishing of acquisitions.
As he is practicing for the abandoning & relinquishing of acquisitions, memories & resolves associated with acquisitions assail him.
He tolerates them.
He does not abandon them, destroy them, dispel them, or wipe them out of existence.
I tell you, Udāyin, that this sort of person is associated, not dissociated.
Why is that?
Because I have known the diversity of faculties with regard to this type of person.
Again, there is the case where a certain person practicing for the abandoning & relinquishing of acquisitions… is assailed by memories & resolves associated with acquisitions.
He does not tolerate them.
He abandons them, destroys them, dispels them, & wipes them out of existence.
I tell you, Udāyin, that this sort of person is associated, not dissociated.
Why is that?
Because I have known the diversity of faculties with regard to this type of person.
Again, there is the case where a certain person is practicing for the abandoning & relinquishing of acquisitions… Owing to lapses in mindfulness from time to time, he is assailed by memories & resolves associated with acquisitions.
Slow is the arising of his mindfulness, but then he quickly abandons, destroys them, dispels them, & wipes them out of existence.
Just as when two or three drops of water fall onto an iron pan heated all day: Slow is the falling of the drops of water, but they quickly vanish & disappear.
In the same way… slow is the arising of his mindfulness, but then he quickly abandons, destroys them, dispels them, & wipes them out of existence.
I tell you, Udāyin, that this sort of person is associated, not dissociated.
Why is that?
Because I have known the diversity of faculties with regard to this type of person.

Again, there is the case where a certain person, realizing that acquisitions are the root of suffering & stress, is without acquisitions, released in the ending of acquisitions.
I tell you, Udāyin, that this sort of person is dissociated, not associated.
Why is that?
Because I have known the diversity of faculties with regard to this type of person.
Then Pañcakaṅga the carpenter went to Uggāhamāna, a follower of Muṇḍikā the contemplative, was staying and, on arrival, greeted him courteously.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, Uggāhamāna said to him, 'I describe an individual endowed with four qualities as being consummate in what is skillful, foremost in what is skillful, an invincible contemplative attained to the highest attainments.
Which four?
There is the case where he does no evil action with his body, speaks no evil speech, resolves on no evil resolve, and maintains himself with no evil means of livelihood.
An individual endowed with these four qualities I describe as being consummate in what is skillful… an invincible contemplative attained to the highest attainments.'
Then Pañcakaṅga the carpenter neither delighted in Uggāhamāna's words nor did he scorn them.
Expressing neither delight nor scorn, he got up from his seat & left, thinking, 'I will learn the meaning of this statement in the presence of the Blessed One.'
Then the carpenter went to where the Blessed One was staying and on arrival, after bowing down to him, sat down to one side.
As he was sitting there, he told the Blessed One the entire conversation he had had with Uggāhamāna.
When this was said, the Blessed One addressed Pañcakaṅga, saying, 'In that case, then according to Uggāhamāna's words a stupid baby boy, lying on its back, is consummate in what is skillful, foremost in what is skillful, an invincible contemplative attained to the highest attainments.
For even the thought “body” does not occur to a stupid baby boy lying on its back, so from where would it do any evil action with its body, aside from a little kicking?
Even the thought “speech” does not occur to it, so from where would it speak any evil speech, aside from a little crying?
Even the thought “resolve” does not occur to it, so from where would it resolve on any evil resolve, aside from a little bad temper?
Even the thought “livelihood” does not occur to it, so from where would it maintain itself with any evil means of livelihood, aside from its mother's milk?
So according to Uggāhamāna's words a stupid baby boy, lying on its back, is… an invincible contemplative attained to the highest attainments.
'If an individual is endowed with these four qualities, I do not describe him as… an invincible contemplative attained to the highest attainments.
Rather, he stands on the same level as a stupid baby boy lying on its back…
'An individual endowed with ten qualities is one who I describe as being consummate in what is skillful, foremost in what is skillful, an invincible contemplative attained to the highest attainments.
With regard to that point one should know that “These are unskillful habits,” I say.
With regard to that point, one should know that “That is the cause of unskillful habits”… “Here unskillful habits cease without trace”… “This sort of practice is the practice leading to the cessation of unskillful habits,” I say.
'With regard to that point, one should know that “These are skillful habits”… “That is the cause of skillful habits”… “Here skillful habits cease without trace”… “This sort of practice is the practice leading to the cessation of skillful habits,” I say.
'With regard to that point, one should know that “These are unskillful resolves”… “That is the cause of unskillful resolves”… “Here unskillful resolves cease without trace”… “This sort of practice is the practice leading to the cessation of unskillful resolves” I say.
'With regard to that point, one should know that “These are skillful resolves”… “That is the cause of skillful resolves”… “Here skillful resolves cease without trace”… “This sort of practice is the practice leading to the cessation of skillful resolves,” I say.
'Now what are unskillful habits?
Unskillful bodily actions, unskillful verbal actions, evil means of livelihood… What is the cause of unskillful habits?… They are said to be mind-caused… Which mind?
— for the mind has many modes & permutations… Any mind with passion, aversion, or delusion: That is the cause of unskillful habits.
Now where do unskillful habits cease without trace?… There is the case where a monk abandons wrong bodily conduct & develops right bodily conduct, abandons wrong verbal conduct & develops right verbal conduct, abandons wrong livelihood & maintains his life with right livelihood.
This is where unskillful habits cease without trace.
And what sort of practice is the practice leading to the cessation of unskillful habits?
There is the case where a monk generates desire, endeavors, arouses persistence, upholds & exerts his intent for the sake of the non-arising of evil, unskillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the sake of the abandoning of evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen… for the sake of the arising of skillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the maintenance, non-confusion, increase, plenitude, development & culmination of skillful qualities that have arisen.
This sort of practice is the practice leading to the cessation of unskillful habits.
'And what are skillful habits?
Skillful bodily actions, skillful verbal actions, purity of livelihood… What is the cause of skillful habits?… The are said to be mind-caused… Which mind?
— for the mind has many modes & permutations… Any mind without passion, without aversion, without delusion: That is the cause of skillful habits.
Now where do skillful habits cease without trace?… There is the case where a monk is virtuous but not fashioned of virtue.
He discerns, as it has come to be, the awareness-release & discernment-release where his skillful habits cease without trace.
And what sort of practice is the practice leading to the cessation of skillful habits?
There is the case where a monk generates desire… for the sake of the non-arising of evil, unskillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the sake of the abandoning of evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen… for the sake of the arising of skillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the… development & culmination of skillful qualities that have arisen.
This sort of practice is the practice leading to the cessation of skillful habits.
'And what are unskillful resolves?
Being resolved on sensuality, on ill will, on violence… What is the cause of unskillful resolves?… They are said to be perception-caused… Which perception?
— for perception has many modes & permutations… Any sensuality-perception, ill will-perception, or violence-perception: That is the cause of unskillful resolves.
Now where do unskillful resolves cease without trace?… There is the case where a monk, quite secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters & remains in the first jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
This is where unskillful resolves cease without trace.
And what sort of practice is the practice leading to the cessation of unskillful resolves?
There is the case where a monk generates desire… for the sake of the non-arising of evil, unskillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the sake of the abandoning of evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen… for the sake of the arising of skillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the… development & culmination of skillful qualities that have arisen.
This sort of practice is the practice leading to the cessation of unskillful resolves.
'And what are skillful resolves?
Being resolved on renunciation, on non-ill will, on non-violence… What is the cause of skillful resolves?… They are said to be perception-caused… Which perception?
— for perception has many modes & permutations… Any renunciation-perception, non-ill will-perception, or non-violence-perception: That is the cause of skillful resolves.
Now where do skillful resolves cease without trace?… There is the case where a monk, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, enters & remains in the second jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
This is where skillful resolves cease without trace.
And what sort of practice is the practice leading to the cessation of skillful resolves?
There is the case where a monk generates desire… for the sake of the non-arising of evil, unskillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the sake of the abandoning of evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen… for the sake of the arising of skillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the… development & culmination of skillful qualities that have arisen.
This sort of practice is the practice leading to the cessation of skillful resolves.
'Now, an individual endowed with which ten qualities is one whom I describe as being consummate in what is skillful, foremost in what is skillful, an invincible contemplative attained to the highest attainments?
One endowed with the right view of an adept, the right resolve of an adept, the right speech… the right action… the right livelihood… the right effort… the right mindfulness… the right concentration… the right knowledge… the right release of an adept.
An individual endowed with these ten qualities I describe as being consummate in what is skillful, foremost in what is skillful, an invincible contemplative attained to the highest attainments.'
That is what the Blessed One said.
Glad at heart, Pañcakaṅga the carpenter delighted in the Blessed One's words.
A deva: Tell me, dear sir, how you crossed over the flood.
The Buddha: I crossed over the flood without pushing forward, without staying in place.
The deva: But how did you cross over the flood without pushing forward, without staying in place?
The Buddha: When I pushed forward, I was whirled about.
When I stayed in place, I sank.
And so I crossed over the flood without pushing forward, without staying in place.
Iddhi, the Pali word translated here as “power,” has so many meanings that no one English equivalent can do them all justice.
Other equivalents that have been suggested include success, accomplishment, and prowess.
In the context of the bases for power, however, the word specifically means the supranormal powers that can be developed through concentration, such as levitation, walking on water, clairaudience, clairvoyance, remembrance of past lives, the ability to read the minds of others, and the ending of mental effluents.
In the Buddhist analysis, only the last of these powers is transcendent.
It is the only one absolutely necessary on the path to Awakening.
The others are optional and not always desirable, for an unawakened person might find that the attainment of any one of them can cause supranormal greed, aversion, or delusion to arise in the mind.
The texts record cases where even Arahants, not fully sensitive to the effect that their actions might have on others, display their powers in inappropriate contexts.
This was why the Buddha forbade his monastic disciples from displaying their powers before the laity.
None of the displayable powers, he said, is any match for the wonder of a teaching that, like his, gave the promised results when put into practice.
Still, there is no denying that some people acquire these powers in the course of their meditation, and they need guidance in how to use them properly so that their powers can actually help, rather than hinder, their practice.
This is the role that the standard formulae for the bases of power play in the teaching.
They show how the mastery of any of the first five powers can be fit into the outline of frame-of-reference meditation so that the process of mastery can lead to the sixth and most important power, the ending of the effluents, thus resulting in release.
The texts explain the bases of power in two standard formulae: brief and extended.
The brief formula runs as follows:
There is the case where a monk develops the base of power endowed with concentration founded on desire & the fabrications of exertion.
He develops the base of power endowed with concentration founded on persistence… concentration founded on intent… concentration founded on discrimination & the fabrications of exertion.
One of the texts states that these formulae define the process whereby the bases of power are developed; another states that they define the bases of power themselves.
The contradiction here can be resolved by noting that the first text defines the bases of power as “whatever practice leads to the attainment of power, the winning of power.” Because these processes definitely lead to the attainment of power, they would count as at least part of the bases of power.
The first text is probably alluding to the fact that there is more to the process, which is included in the extended formula, discussed below.
Each of these four bases has three component parts: the “fabrications of exertion”, concentration, and the mental quality — desire, persistence, intent, or discrimination — on which the concentration is based.
According to §, desire, persistence, and intent are present in all states of jhāna.
Thus the phrase “concentration based on desire” refers to a concentration in which all three qualities are present, but with desire dominant.
We should note here that although the desire here is directed toward a state of concentration — which is a type of becoming — if that becoming is aimed at going beyond becoming, this desire shifts from a cause of stress to part of the path to its ending.
And even though the desire for Awakening, when not yet realized, can be a cause for frustration, that frustration counts as a skillful emotion, as it leads to further efforts along the path.
It is to be transcended, not by abandoning the desire, but by acting on it properly, as explained below, until gaining the desired results.
Discrimination, the fourth mental quality, is not always inherent in jhāna, although when functioning as evaluation it plays a role in the first jhāna, and is definitely present in the fifth factor of noble right concentration, which leads to Awakening.
Furthermore, the extended formula for the bases of power shows that discrimination is necessary for the thorough mastery of concentration based on desire, persistence, intent, or discrimination itself so that — in the course of gaining mastery — one develops mindful discernment into the causal patterns of the mind and so can reach Awakening.
We have already shown that the development of concentration involves the three qualities called for in the first stage of frames-of-reference meditation: ardency, alertness, and mindfulness.
Thus the brief formula for the bases of power, as a description of concentration practice, can be equated with the first stage of frames-of-reference meditation.
Many popular Western writings criticize the four qualities listed in the bases of power — desire, persistence, intent, and discrimination — as enemies of proper meditation, both in that they interfere with the calming of the mind and are antithetical to the goal of the Unfabricated, which lies beyond desire, effort, and the categories of discrimination.
The first part of the extended formula deals with the first of these criticisms.
This passage shows that the problem lies, not in the desire, effort, intent, or discrimination, but in the fact that these qualities can be unskillfully applied or improperly tuned to their task.
If they were absent, the practice — if it could be called a practice — would stagnate from loss of direction or motivation.
If they ran wild, they would interfere with mindful concentration.
So the trick is not to deny them but to tune them skillfully so that they will help focus the mind on the present moment.
Thus, for instance, in the practice of meditation, as with any skill, it is important not to focus desire too strongly on the results one hopes to get, for that would interfere with the mind's ability to focus on giving rise to the causes leading to those results.
If, instead, one focuses desire on putting the causes in proper order in the present moment, desire becomes an indispensable part of the process of mastery.
Passage § deals with the second criticism — that desire, etc., are antithetical to the goal — by showing that these qualities are necessary for anyone who pursues a path, but are automatically abandoned on reaching the goal at the path's end.
The image of the path is important here, for it carries important implications.
First, the path is not the goal; it is simply the way there, just as the road to the Grand Canyon should not be confused with the Grand Canyon itself.
Even though many stretches of the road bear no resemblance to the Grand Canyon, that does not mean that the road does not lead there.
Secondly, the path of practice does not cause the goal, it simply leads there, just as neither the road to the Grand Canyon nor the act of walking to the Grand Canyon can cause the Grand Canyon to be.
The goal at the end of the Buddhist path is unfabricated, so no amount of desire or effort can bring it into being.
Nevertheless, the path to the goal is a fabricated process, and in that process desire, effort, intent, and discrimination all have an important role to play, just as the effort of walking plays a role in arriving at the Grand Canyon.
The final section of the extended formula hints at how these qualities may be directed toward Awakening.
He keeps perceiving what is in front & behind so that what is in front is the same as what is behind, what is behind is the same as what is in front.
What is below is the same as what is above, what is above is the same as what is below.
by night as by day, and by day as by night.
By means of an awareness thus open & unhampered, he develops a brightened mind.
This passage refers to the total mastery of concentration.
Freeing the mind from such distinctions as front/behind, above/below, and day/night, one creates an awareness that is open and bright, unhampered by the normal limitations that come with a conscious sense of being located in time and space.
This is the type of awareness needed for the attainment of the supranormal powers.
Many meditators tend to stop here, satisfied with their new-found powers, but the Buddha urges them to go further.
As § shows, the full perfection of this type of awareness requires extreme sensitivity to the presence of mental defilements that might place subtle limitations on it.
This process of sensitivity is nothing other than the second stage of frames-of-reference meditation, in which one focuses on the phenomenon of origination and passing away of mind states that are limited and unlimited, concentrated and unconcentrated, taking the brightness of one's awareness — the mind in-and-of itself — as one's frame of reference.
The next stage of practice is outlined in a passage that builds on §.
This passage, shows that full mastery of power requires an abandoning even of the notion that “I am” the master of the power, or that “my mind” is concentrated.
The proper attitude, in the face of the power, is to “incline the mind to the Deathless.” Such an attitude, according to MN, involves simply noting what is present as present, without fashioning anything further out of it.
This is the third stage of frames-of-reference meditation, the entry into emptiness that simply notes, “There is this…” When this level of skilled discrimination is reached, the power has been fully mastered at the same time that the mind stands on the verge of non-fashioning and Awakening.
Because of their association with supranormal powers, the bases of power have generally been slighted in Western writings on Buddhism.
If we count the five strengths as identical with the five faculties, the bases of power are the only set in the Wings to Awakening that has not yet been the subject of a book in the English language.
The situation in Asia, however, is very different.
There, the bases of power have been extrapolated from their specific context and are frequently cited as guides to success in general.
In whatever task one may undertake — directed toward worldly ends or toward the Dhamma — one must bring to bear the qualities of desire, persistence, intent, and discrimination, skillfully balanced with concentration and right exertion, if one wants to succeed at one's task.
Monks, whoever neglects these four bases of power neglects the noble path going to the right ending of stress.
Whoever undertakes these four bases of power undertakes the noble path going to the right ending of stress.
Which four?
There is the case where a monk develops the base of power endowed with concentration founded on desire & the fabrications of exertion.
He develops the base of power endowed with concentration founded on persistence… concentration founded on intent… concentration founded on discrimination & the fabrications of exertion.
Whoever neglects these four bases of power neglects the noble path going to the right ending of stress.
Whoever undertakes these four bases of power undertakes the noble path going to the right ending of stress.
Ven.
Ānanda: What, venerable sir, is power?
What is the base of power?
What is the development of the base of power?
And what is the path of practice leading to the development of the base of power?
The Buddha: There is the case, Ānanda, where a monk wields manifold supranormal powers.
Having been one he becomes many; having been many he becomes one.
He appears.
He vanishes.
He goes unimpeded through walls, ramparts, & mountains as if through space.
He dives in & out of the earth as if it were water.
He walks on water without sinking as if it were dry land.
Sitting cross-legged he flies through the air like a winged bird.
With his hand he touches & strokes even the sun & moon, so mighty & powerful.
He exercises influence with his body even as far as the Brahmā worlds.
Just as a skilled potter or his assistant could craft from well-prepared clay whatever kind of pottery vessel he likes, or as a skilled ivory-carver or his assistant could craft from well-prepared ivory any kind of ivory-work he likes, or as a skilled goldsmith or his assistant could craft from well-prepared gold any kind of gold article he likes; in the same way, the monk wields manifold supranormal powers…
He hears — by means of the divine ear-element, purified & surpassing the human — both kinds of sounds: divine & human, whether near or far.
Just as if a man traveling along a highway were to hear the sounds of kettledrums, small drums, conchs, cymbals, & tom-toms.
He would know, 'That is the sound of kettledrums, that the sound of small drums, that the sound of conchs, that the sound of cymbals, & that the sound of tom-toms.' In the same way… the monk hears… both kinds of sounds: divine & human…
He knows the awareness of other beings, other individuals, having encompassed it with his own awareness.
He discerns a mind with passion as a mind with passion, and a mind without passion as a mind without passion.
He discerns a mind with aversion as a mind with aversion, and a mind without aversion as a mind without aversion.
He discerns a mind with delusion as a mind with delusion, and a mind without delusion as a mind without delusion.
He discerns a constricted mind as a constricted mind, and a scattered mind as a scattered mind.
He discerns an enlarged mind as an enlarged mind, and an unenlarged mind as an unenlarged mind.
He discerns an excelled mind as an excelled mind, and an unexcelled mind as an unexcelled mind.
He discerns a concentrated mind as a concentrated mind, and an unconcentrated mind as an unconcentrated mind.
He discerns a released mind as a released mind, and an unreleased mind as an unreleased mind.
Just as if a young woman — or man — fond of ornaments, examining the reflection of her own face in a bright mirror or a bowl of clear water would know 'blemished' if it were blemished, or 'unblemished' if it were not.
In the same way… the monk knows the awareness of other beings…
He recollects his manifold past lives, i.e., one birth, two births, three births, four, five, ten, twenty, thirty, forty, fifty, one hundred, one thousand, one hundred thousand, many aeons of cosmic contraction, many aeons of cosmic expansion, many aeons of cosmic contraction & expansion, 'There I had such a name, belonged to such a clan, had such an appearance.
Such was my food, such my experience of pleasure & pain, such the end of my life.
Passing away from that state, I re-arose there.
There too I had such a name, belonged to such a clan, had such an appearance.
Such was my food, such my experience of pleasure & pain, such the end of my life.
Passing away from that state, I re-arose here.' Thus he remembers his manifold past lives in their modes & details.
Just as if a man were to go from his home village to another village, and then from that village to yet another village, and then from that village back to his home village.
The thought would occur to him, 'I went from my home village to that village over there.
There I stood in such a way, sat in such a way, talked in such a way, & remained silent in such a way.
From that village I went to that village over there, and there I stood in such a way, sat in such a way, talked in such a way, & remained silent in such a way.
From that village I came back home.' In the same way… the monk recollects his manifold past lives…
He sees — by means of the divine eye, purified & surpassing the human — beings passing away and re-appearing, and he discerns how they are inferior & superior, beautiful & ugly, fortunate & unfortunate in accordance with their kamma: 'These beings — who were endowed with bad conduct of body, speech, & mind, who reviled the noble ones, held wrong views and undertook actions under the influence of wrong views — with the breakup of the body, after death, have re-appeared in the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, in hell.
But these beings — who were endowed with good conduct of body, speech, & mind, who did not revile the noble ones, who held right views and undertook actions under the influence of right views — with the breakup of the body, after death, have re-appeared in the good destinations, in the heavenly world.' Thus — by means of the divine eye, purified & surpassing the human — he sees beings passing away and re-appearing, and he discerns how they are inferior & superior, beautiful & ugly, fortunate & unfortunate in accordance with their kamma.
Just as if there were a tall building in the central square, and a man with good eyesight standing on top of it were to see people entering a house, leaving it, walking along the street, & sitting in the central square.
The thought would occur to him, 'These people are entering a house, leaving it, walking along the streets, & sitting in the central square.' In the same way… the monk sees — by means of the divine eye, purified & surpassing the human — beings passing away and re-appearing…
Through the ending of the mental effluents, he remains in the effluent-free awareness-release & discernment-release, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
Just as if there were a pool of water in a mountain glen — clear, limpid, & unsullied — where a man with good eyesight standing on the bank could see shells, gravel, & pebbles, and also shoals of fish swimming about & resting, and it would occur to him, 'This pool of water is clear, limpid, & unsullied.
Here are these shells, gravel, & pebbles, and also these shoals of fish swimming about & resting.' In the same way, the monk discerns, as it has come to be, that 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the way leading to the cessation of stress… These are effluents… This is the origination of effluents… This is the cessation of effluents… This is the way leading to the cessation of effluents.' His heart, thus knowing, thus seeing, is released from the effluent of sensuality, released from the effluent of becoming, released from the effluent of ignorance.
With release, there is the knowledge, 'Released.' He discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'
This is called power.
And what is the base of power?
Whatever path, whatever practice, leads to the attainment of power, the winning of power: That is called the base of power.
And what is the development of the base of power?
There is the case where a monk develops the base of power endowed with concentration founded on desire & the fabrications of exertion.
He develops the base of power endowed with concentration founded on persistence… concentration founded on intent… concentration founded on discrimination & the fabrications of exertion.
This is called the development of the base of power.
And what is the path of practice leading to the development of the base of power?
Just this noble eightfold path: right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
This is called the path of practice leading to the development of the base of power.
If a monk attains concentration, attains singleness of mind founded on desire, that is called concentration founded on desire.
He generates desire, endeavors, arouses persistence, upholds & exerts his intent for the sake of the non-arising of evil, unskillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the sake of the abandoning of evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen… for the sake of the arising of skillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the maintenance, non-confusion, increase, plenitude, development, & culmination of skillful qualities that have arisen.
These are called the fabrications of exertion.
This is desire, this is concentration founded on desire, these are the fabrications of exertion.
This is called the base of power endowed with concentration founded on desire & the fabrications of exertion.
If a monk attains concentration, attains singleness of mind founded on persistence, that is called concentration founded on persistence…
If a monk attains concentration, attains singleness of mind founded on intent, that is called concentration founded on intent…
If a monk attains concentration, attains singleness of mind founded on discrimination, that is called concentration founded on discrimination.
He generates desire, endeavors, arouses persistence, upholds & exerts his intent for the sake of the non-arising of evil, unskillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the sake of the abandoning of evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen… for the sake of the arising of skillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the maintenance, non-confusion, increase, plenitude, development & culmination of skillful qualities that have arisen.
These are called the fabrications of exertion.
This is discrimination, this is concentration founded on discrimination, these are the fabrications of exertion.
This is called the base of power endowed with concentration founded on discrimination & the fabrications of exertion.
Analysis.
These four bases of power, when developed & pursued, are of great fruit & great benefit.
And how are the four bases of power developed & pursued so as to be of great fruit & great benefit?
There is the case where a monk develops the base of power endowed with concentration founded on desire & the fabrications of exertion, thinking, 'This desire of mine will be neither overly sluggish nor overly active, neither inwardly constricted nor outwardly scattered.' He keeps perceiving what is in front & behind so that what is in front is the same as what is behind, what is behind is the same as what is in front.
What is below is the same as what is above, what is above is the same as what is below.
Night is the same as day, day is the same as night.
By means of an awareness thus open & unhampered, he develops a brightened mind.
He develops the base of power endowed with concentration founded on persistence… concentration founded on intent… concentration founded on discrimination & the fabrications of exertion, thinking, 'This discrimination of mine will be neither overly sluggish nor overly active, neither inwardly constricted nor outwardly scattered.' He keeps perceiving what is in front & behind so that what is in front is the same as what is behind, what is behind is the same as what is in front.
What is below is the same as what is above, what is above is the same as what is below.
by night as by day, and by day as by night.
By means of an awareness thus open & unhampered, he develops a brightened mind.
And how is desire overly sluggish?
Whatever desire is accompanied by laziness, conjoined with laziness, that is called overly sluggish desire.
And how is desire overly active?
Whatever desire is accompanied by restlessness, conjoined with restlessness, that is called overly active desire.
And how is desire inwardly constricted?
Whatever desire is accompanied by sloth & drowsiness, conjoined with sloth & drowsiness, that is called inwardly constricted desire.
And how is desire outwardly scattered?
Whatever desire is stirred up by the five strings of sensuality, outwardly dispersed & dissipated, that is called outwardly scattered desire.
And how does a monk dwell perceiving what is in front & behind so that what is in front is the same as what is behind, and what is behind is the same as what is in front?
There is the case where a monk's perception of what is in front & behind is well in hand, well-attended to, well-considered, well-tuned by means of discernment.
This is how a monk keeps perceiving what is in front and behind so that what is in front is the same as what is behind, and what is behind is the same as what is in front.
And how does a monk dwell so that what is below is the same as what is above, and what is above is the same as what is below?
There is the case where a monk reflects on this very body, from the soles of the feet on up, from the crown of the head on down, surrounded by skin, full of various kinds of unclean things: 'In this body there are head hairs, body hairs, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, tendons, bones, bone marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, pleura, spleen, lungs, large intestine, small intestines, gorge, feces, bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat, tears, skin-oil, saliva, mucus, fluid in the joints, urine.' This is how a monk dwells so that what is below is the same as what is above, and what is above is the same as what is below.

And how does a monk dwell by night as by day, and by day as by night?
There is the case where a monk at night develops the base of power endowed with concentration founded on desire & the fabrications of exertion by means of the same modes & signs & themes that he uses by day, and by day he develops the base of power endowed with concentration founded on desire & the fabrications of exertion by means of the same modes & signs & themes that he uses by night.
This is how a monk dwells by night as by day, and by day as by night.
And how does a monk — by means of an awareness open & unhampered — develop a brightened mind?
There is the case where a monk has the perception of light, the perception of daytime well in hand & well-established.
This is how a monk — by means of an awareness open & unhampered — develops a brightened mind.

When a monk has thus developed & pursued the four bases of power, he experiences manifold supranormal powers… He hears — by means of the divine ear-element, purified & surpassing the human — both kinds of sounds: divine & human, whether near or far… He knows the awareness of other beings, other individuals, having encompassed it with his own awareness… He recollects his manifold past lives… He sees — by means of the divine eye, purified & surpassing the human — beings passing away and re-appearing… Through the ending of the mental effluents, he remains in the effluent-free awareness-release & discernment-release, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
This is how these four bases of power, when developed & pursued, are of great fruit & great benefit.
I have heard that on one occasion Ven.
Ānanda was staying in Kosambī, at Ghosita's Park.
Then the brahman Uṇṇābha went to where Ven.
Ānanda was staying and on arrival greeted him courteously.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Ānanda: Master Ānanda, what is the aim of this holy life lived under the contemplative Gotama?
Ven.
Ānanda: The holy life is lived under the Blessed One with the aim of abandoning desire.
Uṇṇābha: But is there a path, is there a practice, for the abandoning of that desire?
Ven.
Ānanda: Yes, there is…
Uṇṇābha: What is the path, the practice, for the abandoning of that desire?
Ven.
Ānanda: There is the case where a monk develops the base of power endowed with concentration founded on desire & the fabrications of exertion.
He develops the base of power endowed with concentration founded on persistence… concentration founded on intent… concentration founded on discrimination & the fabrications of exertion.
This, brahman, is the path, this is the practice for the abandoning of that desire.
Uṇṇābha: If that's so, then it's an endless path, and not one with an end, for it's impossible that one could abandon desire by means of desire.
Ven.
Ānanda: Well then, brahman, I will cross-question you on this matter.
Answer as you see fit… Didn't you first have desire, thinking, 'I'll go to the park,' and then when you reached the park, wasn't the corresponding desire allayed?
Uṇṇābha: Yes, sir.
Ven.
Ānanda: Didn't you first have persistence, thinking, 'I'll go to the park,' and then when you reached the park, wasn't the corresponding persistence allayed?
Uṇṇābha: Yes, sir.
Ven.
Ānanda: Didn't you first have the intent, thinking, 'I'll go to the park,' and then when you reached the park, wasn't the corresponding intent allayed?
Uṇṇābha: Yes, sir.
Ven.
Ānanda: Didn't you first have discrimination, thinking, 'I'll go to the park,' and then when you reached the park, wasn't the corresponding discrimination allayed?
Uṇṇābha: Yes, sir.
Ven.
Ānanda: So it is with an Arahant whose mental effluents are ended, who has reached fulfillment, done the task, laid down the burden, attained the true goal, totally destroyed the fetter of becoming, and who is released through right gnosis.
Whatever desire he first had for the attainment of Arahantship, on attaining Arahantship the corresponding desire is allayed.
Whatever persistence he first had for the attainment of Arahantship, on attaining Arahantship the corresponding persistence is allayed.
Whatever intent he first had for the attainment of Arahantship, on attaining Arahantship the corresponding intent is allayed.
Whatever discrimination he first had for the attainment of Arahantship, on attaining Arahantship the corresponding discrimination is allayed.
So what do you think, brahman?
Is this an endless path, or one with an end?
Uṇṇābha: You're right, Master Ānanda.
This is a path with an end, and not an endless one.
Ven.
Ānanda: Venerable sir, does the Blessed One have direct experience of going to the Brahmā world by means of supranormal power with a mind-made body?
The Buddha: Yes, Ānanda…
Ven.
Ānanda: But does the Blessed One also have direct experience of going to the Brahmā world by means of supranormal power with this very physical body, composed of the four great elements?
The Buddha: Yes…
Ven.
Ānanda: It's amazing & astounding that the Blessed One should have direct experience of going to the Brahmā world by means of supranormal power with a mind-made body, and of going to the Brahmā world by means of supranormal power with this very physical body, composed of the four great elements.
The Buddha: Tathāgatas are both amazing, Ānanda, and endowed with amazing qualities.
They are both astounding and endowed with astounding qualities.
Whenever the Tathāgata merges his body with his mind and his mind with his body, and remains having alighted on the perception of ease and buoyancy with regard to the body, then his body becomes lighter, more pliant, more malleable, & more radiant.
Just as when an iron ball heated all day becomes lighter, more pliant, more malleable, & more radiant; in the same way, whenever the Tathāgata merges his body with his mind and his mind with his body, and remains having alighted on the perception of ease and buoyancy with regard to the body, then his body becomes lighter, more pliant, more malleable, & more radiant.
Now, whenever the Tathāgata merges his body with his mind and his mind with his body, and remains having alighted on the perception of ease and buoyancy with regard to the body, then his body rises effortlessly from the earth up into the sky.
He then experiences manifold supranormal powers.
Having been one he becomes many; having been many he becomes one.
He appears.
He vanishes.
He goes unimpeded through walls, ramparts, & mountains as if through space.
He dives in & out of the earth as if it were water.
He walks on water without sinking as if it were dry land.
Sitting cross-legged he flies through the air like a winged bird.
With his hand he touches & strokes even the sun & moon, so mighty & powerful.
He exercises influence with his body even as far as the Brahmā worlds.
Just as a tuft of cotton seed or a ball of thistle down, lightly wafted by the wind, rises effortlessly from the earth up into the sky, in the same way, whenever the Tathāgata concentrates his body in his mind & his mind in his body, and remains having alighted on the perception of ease and buoyancy, then his body rises effortlessly from the earth up into the sky.
He then experiences manifold supranormal powers… even as far as the Brahmā worlds.
Indriya — the Pali word translated here as “faculty” — is connected with the name of the dominant Vedic god, Indra.
Thus it carries connotations of dominance or control.
Buddhist texts contain several lists of faculties, both physical and mental, but here the word denotes a list of five mental factors that must reach a state of dominance in the mind for Awakening to occur.
This set is one of the most comprehensive in the Wings to Awakening, as it covers all of the factors explicitly mentioned in the sets we have covered so far, and in addition lists conviction, which the other sets imply but never specifically mention.
This is why this set forms the framework for Part III of this book, in which all of the main factors of the Wings to Awakening will be discussed in detail.
As we noted in II/A, the faculties in this set form a loop in the causal progression of the mind along the path, as opposed to the “holographic” formulae of the sets we have discussed so far.
Two of the faculties — the frames of reference and right exertion — we have covered in detail already.
The other three — conviction, concentration, and discernment — we will discuss in detail in Part Here we will limit ourselves to some general observations about the set as a whole.
In the causal loop depicted by five faculties, the emphasis is on how the elements of the “concentration aggregate” in the noble eightfold path — right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration — can lead the mind from a state of conviction to one of discernment.
To borrow terminology from §, this is the process by which the mind goes from the preliminary level to the noble or transcendent level of right view.
This set can also be regarded as a description of how conviction, when put into action, inherently leads through the concentration aggregate to transcendent discernment.
Passage § defines the faculty of conviction as the four factors of stream-entry.
Other passages define these four factors in two separate ways: one listing the factors leading to stream-entry, another giving the factors that characterize the person who has already entered the stream.
Both lists are relevant here, as the person working toward stream-entry must act on conviction, while a person who has entered the stream is endowed with the unwavering conviction that comes with the first glimpse of the Deathless.
In both cases, the factor of conviction has several dimensions: trust in the ability of wise people to know the ideal path of practice, belief in their teachings, and a willingness to put those teachings into practice.
Western analyses of faith tend to separate these aspects of conviction, and some writers have tried to decide which aspect is dominant in the Buddhist tradition.
In practice, however, all three must work together, for in Buddhism the object of conviction inherently involves all three at once.
The primary focus of conviction is the Awakening of the Buddha, and this in turn ultimately comes down to a conviction in the primacy of the mind in creating kamma, a conviction in the efficacy of kamma in shaping experience in the round of rebirth, and a belief that the Buddha made use of mental qualities accessible to all in using the laws of kamma to bring about an end to kamma and thus escape from the round.
Kamma and the use of kamma to transcend kamma constitute both the truth that the Buddha taught and the explanation of how he discovered it.
Thus, trust in the Buddha and belief in his teaching are two sides of the same coin.
At the same time, these truths concerning kamma are also the situation in which the listener is currently placed: the causal nexus that determines both the dynamic of continued life in the cycle of rebirth and the way out of that cycle.
So, by definition, conviction in the Buddha's Awakening is something that must be acted on.
If one is convinced that one is entangled in a kammic web that can nevertheless be unraveled, one will naturally try to learn from the example of the Buddha or his disciples, developing the same mental qualities they did and attaining release oneself.
Thus, unlike a religion where trust involves the belief that the deity will provide for one's salvation — either through grace or as a reward for unquestioning obedience — trust in the Buddha and belief in his teachings means that one's salvation is ultimately one's own responsibility.
In this way, trust, belief, and a willingness to act are inseparably combined.
This is why conviction, the first member of the set of five faculties, leads naturally to persistence, the second.
Persistence here is equal to right exertion, which develops mindfulness as the most essential skillful quality in the mind.
As we saw under the frames of reference, the proper development of mindfulness leads to concentration, or the four jhanas, while the jhanas provide the foundation for the arising of discernment, the fifth and final member of this set.
When discernment is strengthened to the point of transcendence, leading to the attainment of stream-entry, it then confirms the truths that were previously taken as a matter of conviction and faith.
This confirmation feeds back into the causal loop, strengthening conviction, which provides the basis for developing the faculties still further until Arahantship is attained.
At that point there is no need to be convinced that the practice leads to release into the Deathless, for one has fully realized that release through direct experience.
The underlying element throughout the development of this causal loop is the mental quality of heedfulness.
The texts explain heedfulness as a combination of right effort, restraint, and relentless mindfulness, but as a quality of mind it goes deeper than that.
Heedfulness realizes the dangers inherent in the round of rebirth and redeath, and the fact that those dangers are inherent in each careless act of the mind.
It thus fosters conviction in the possibility of a release from those dangers and a sense of urgency and precision in the practice.
This combination of urgency and precision provides the impetus for the full and thorough development of the faculties as one seriously pursues the possibility of release through the skillful development of the mind.
This pattern of heedfulness developing the five faculties in the quest of the security of Deathlessness mirrors Prince Siddhattha's own quest, which began with his conviction that there was no need to resign himself to the tyranny of aging, illness, and death, and ended with the discernment that brought about his actual escape from that tyranny.
This pattern also calls to mind the famous verse from the Dhammapada, that heedfulness is the path to the Deathless.
The five faculties can be taken as an elaboration of that verse.
Because the five faculties are means to Deathlessness — rather than ends in themselves — they must not only be developed skillfully but also used skillfully as they are developed.
The texts emphasizing this point focus on two of the faculties: persistence and discernment.
The passage dealing with persistence is probably the Canon's most explicit analogy between the performance of music and the practice of meditation.
One should tune one's effort so that it is neither too intense nor too slack, just as the main string of a musical instrument should be neither too sharp nor too flat.
One then tunes the remaining faculties to the pitch of one's effort, just as one would tune the notes of one's scale to the tonic.
Only then can one take up the theme of one's meditation — the four frames of reference — just as one would take up and develop the basic theme of one's musical piece.
As for discernment, passage § brings out the point that one's mastery of the faculties is not complete until one discerns the “escape” from them.
Normally the texts make this comment only about deceptively attractive objects or unskillful qualities in the mind, but here they use it in connection with skillful qualities.
What this means is that there comes a point in the practice where one must go beyond even such skillful qualities as concentration and discernment.
They are skillful precisely because their full development allows one to go beyond them.
This point is made explicit in §, which shows exactly why the right view constituting discernment is right: it is the only view that opens the way going beyond attachment to views.
DN adds that an awakened person — through regarding views not in terms of their content, but in terms of the effect they have on the mind — comes to discern what lies beyond views, and yet does not hold even to that act of discernment.
As a result of knowing but not holding, the mind experiences Unbinding in the here and now.
This “knowing but not holding” is yet another reference to the perceptual mode of emptiness verging on non-fashioning: the culminating point for each set in the Wings to Awakening.
Monks, there are these five faculties.
Which five?
The faculty of conviction, the faculty of persistence, the faculty of mindfulness, the faculty of concentration, and the faculty of discernment.
Now where is the faculty of conviction to be seen?
In the four factors of stream-entry…
And where is the faculty of persistence to be seen?
In the four right exertions…
And where is the faculty of mindfulness to be seen?
In the four frames of reference…
And where is the faculty of concentration to be seen?
In the four jhānas…
And where is the faculty of discernment to be seen?
In the four noble truths…
Factors of Stream-entry.
Association with good people is a factor of stream-entry.
Listening to the true Dhamma is a factor of stream-entry.
Appropriate attention is a factor of stream-entry.
Practice in accordance with the Dhamma is a factor of stream-entry.
Now with what four factors of stream-entry is the disciple of the noble ones endowed?
There is the case where the disciple of the noble ones is endowed with verified confidence in the Awakened One: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy and rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.'
He is endowed with verified confidence in the Dhamma: 'The Dhamma is well-expounded by the Blessed One, to be seen here & now, timeless, inviting verification, pertinent, to be realized by the wise for themselves.'
He is endowed with verified confidence in the Saṅgha: 'The Saṅgha of the Blessed One's disciples who have practiced well… who have practiced straight-forwardly… who have practiced methodically… who have practiced masterfully — in other words, the four types of noble disciples when taken as pairs, the eight when taken as individual types — they are the Saṅgha of the Blessed One's disciples: worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of respect, the incomparable field of merit for the world.'
He is endowed with virtues that are appealing to the noble ones: untorn, unbroken, unspotted, unsplattered, liberating, praised by the wise, untarnished, leading to concentration.
Analysis.
And what, is the faculty of conviction?
There is the case where a monk, a disciple of the noble ones, has conviction, is convinced of the Tathāgata's Awakening: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy and rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.' This, monks, is called the faculty of conviction.
And what is the faculty of persistence?
There is the case where a monk, a disciple of the noble ones, keeps his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful mental qualities and taking on skillful mental qualities.
He is steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful mental qualities.
He generates desire, endeavors, arouses persistence, upholds & exerts his intent for the sake of the non-arising of evil, unskillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the sake of the abandoning of evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen… for the sake of the arising of skillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the maintenance, non-confusion, increase, plenitude, development, & culmination of skillful qualities that have arisen.
This is called the faculty of persistence.

And what is the faculty of mindfulness?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones is mindful, is endowed with excellent proficiency in mindfulness, remembering & recollecting what was done and said a long time ago.
He remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & having sati — subduing greed & distress with reference to the world.
He remains focused on feelings in & of themselves… the mind in & of itself… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & having sati — subduing greed & distress with reference to the world.
This is called the faculty of mindfulness.

And what is the faculty of concentration?
There is the case where a monk, a disciple of the noble ones, making it his object to let go, attains concentration, attains singleness of mind.
Quite secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful qualities, he enters & remains in the first jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
With the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
With the fading of rapture he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhāna, of which the noble ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' With the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of joys & distresses — he enters & remains in the fourth jhāna: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor pain.
This is called the faculty of concentration.

And what is the faculty of discernment?
There is the case where a monk, a disciple of the noble ones, is discerning, endowed with discernment of arising & passing away — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress.
He discerns, as it has come to be, 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.' This is called the faculty of discernment.

Just as a royal frontier fortress has a foundation post — deeply rooted, well embedded, immovable, & unshakable — for the protection of those within and to ward off those without; in the same way a disciple of the noble ones has conviction, is convinced of the Tathāgata's Awakening: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy & rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.' With conviction as his foundation post, the disciple of the noble ones abandons what is unskillful & develops what is skillful, abandons what is blameworthy & develops what is blameless, and looks after himself with purity…
Just as a royal frontier fortress has a large army stationed within — elephant soldiers, cavalry, charioteers, bowmen, standard-bearers, billeting officers, soldiers of the supply corps, noted princes, commando heroes, infantry, & slaves — for the protection of those within and to ward off those without; in the same way a disciple of the noble ones keeps his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful mental qualities and taking on skillful mental qualities, is steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful mental qualities.
With persistence as his army, the disciple of the noble ones abandons what is unskillful & develops what is skillful, abandons what is blameworthy & develops what is blameless, and looks after himself with purity…
Just as a royal frontier fortress has a wise, experienced, intelligent gatekeeper to keep out those he doesn't know and to let in those he does, for the protection of those within and to ward off those without; in the same way a disciple of the noble ones is mindful, highly meticulous, remembering & able to call to mind even things that were done & said long ago.
With mindfulness as his gatekeeper, the disciple of the noble ones abandons what is unskillful & develops what is skillful, abandons what is blameworthy & develops what is blameless, and looks after himself with purity…
Just as a royal frontier fortress has ramparts that are high & thick & completely covered with plaster, for the protection of those within and to ward off those without; in the same way a disciple of the noble ones is discerning, endowed with discernment of arising and passing away — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress.
With discernment as his covering of plaster, the disciple of the noble ones abandons what is unskillful & develops what is skillful, abandons what is blameworthy & develops what is blameless, and looks after himself with purity…
Just as a royal frontier fortress has large stores of grass, timber & water for the delight, convenience, & comfort of those within, and to ward off those without; in the same way the disciple of the noble ones… enters & remains in the first jhāna… for his own delight, convenience, & comfort, and to alight on Unbinding…
Just as a royal frontier fortress has large stores of rice & barley for the delight, convenience, & comfort of those within, and to ward off those without; in the same way the disciple of the noble ones… enters & remains in the second jhāna… for his own delight, convenience, & comfort, and to alight on Unbinding…
Just as a royal frontier fortress has large stores of sesame, green gram, & other beans for the delight, convenience, & comfort of those within, and to ward off those without; in the same way the disciple of the noble ones… enters & remains in the third jhāna… for his own delight, convenience, & comfort, and to alight on Unbinding…
Just as a royal frontier fortress has large stores of tonics — ghee, fresh butter, oil, honey, molasses, & salt — for the delight, convenience, & comfort of those within, and to ward off those without; in the same way the disciple of the noble ones… enters & remains in the fourth jhāna… for his own delight, convenience, & comfort, and to alight on Unbinding…
The Buddha: Tell me, Sāriputta: A disciple of the noble ones who is thoroughly inspired by the Tathāgata, who has gone solely to the Tathāgata, could he have any doubt or uncertainty concerning the Tathāgata or the Tathāgata's teachings?
Ven.
Sāriputta: No, venerable sir… With a disciple of the noble ones who has conviction, it may be expected that he will keep his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful mental qualities and taking on skillful mental qualities, that he will be steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful mental qualities.
Whatever persistence he has, is his faculty of persistence.
With a disciple of the noble ones who has conviction, who is resolute & persistent, it may be expected that he will be mindful, highly meticulous, remembering and able to call to mind even things that were done & said long ago.
Whatever mindfulness he has, is his faculty of mindfulness.
With a disciple of the noble ones who has conviction, who is resolute & persistent, and whose mindfulness is established, it may be expected that — making it his object to let go — he will attain concentration & singleness of mind.
Whatever concentration he has, is his faculty of concentration.
With a disciple of the noble ones who has conviction, who is resolute & persistent, whose mindfulness is established, and whose mind is rightly concentrated, it may be expected that he will discern: 'From an inconceivable beginning comes transmigration.
A beginning point is not evident, though beings hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving are transmigrating & wandering on.
The total fading & cessation of ignorance, of this mass of darkness, is this peaceful, exquisite state: the resolution of all fabrications; the relinquishment of all acquisitions; the ending of craving; dispassion; cessation; Unbinding.' Whatever discernment he has, is his faculty of discernment.
And so this convinced disciple of the noble ones, thus striving again & again, recollecting again & again, concentrating his mind again & again discerning again & again, becomes thoroughly convinced: 'Those phenomena that once I had only heard about, I here & now dwell touching them with my body and, through discernment, I see them clear through.' Whatever conviction he has, is his faculty of conviction.
Just as, in a house with a ridged roof, the rafters are not stable or firm as long as the ridge beam is not in place, but are stable & firm when it is; in the same way, four faculties are not stable or firm as long as noble knowledge has not arisen in a disciple of the noble ones, but are stable & firm when it has.
Which four?
The faculty of conviction, the faculty of persistence, the faculty of mindfulness, & the faculty of concentration.
When a disciple of the noble ones is discerning, the conviction that follows from that stands solid.
The persistence that follows from that stands solid.
The mindfulness that follows from that stands solid.
The concentration that follows from that stands solid.
It's through the development & pursuit of two faculties that a monk whose effluents are ended declares gnosis: 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.' Through which two?
Through noble discernment & noble release.
Whatever is his noble discernment is his faculty of dis-cernment.
Whatever is his noble release is his faculty of concentration.
Just as, of all scented woods, red sandalwood is reckoned the chief, even so of all the mental qualities that are wings to self-awakening, the faculty of discernment is reckoned the chief in terms of leading to awakening.
And what are the mental qualities that are wings to self-awakening?
The faculty of conviction is a mental quality that is a wing to self-awakening leading to awakening.
The faculty of persistence… mindfulness… concentration… discernment is a mental quality that is a wing to self-awakening leading to Awakening.
When one quality is established in a monk, the five faculties are developed & developed well.
Which one quality?
Heedfulness.
And what is heedfulness?
There is the case where a monk guards his mind in the midst of mental effluents & their concomitants.
When his mind is guarded in the midst of mental effluents & their concomitants, the faculty of conviction goes to the culmination of its development.
The faculty of persistence… mindfulness… concentration… discernment goes to the culmination of its development.
This is how when one quality is established in a monk, the five faculties are developed & developed well.
Just as the footprints of all legged animals are encompassed by the footprint of the elephant, and the elephant's footprint is reckoned their chief in terms of size; in the same way, all skillful qualities are rooted in heedfulness, lie gathered in heedfulness, and heedfulness is reckoned their chief…
Just as all the light of the constellations does not equal one sixteenth of the light of the moon, and the light of the moon is reckoned their chief; in the same way, all skillful qualities are rooted in heedfulness, lie gathered in heedfulness, and heedfulness is reckoned their chief.
§.
§.
The Buddha: 'Mindfulness of death, when developed & pursued, is of great fruit & great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end.
Therefore you should develop mindfulness of death.'
When this was said, a certain monk addressed the Blessed One, 'I already develop mindfulness of death.'
'And how do you develop mindfulness of death?'
'I think, “O, that I might live for a day & night, that I might attend to the Blessed One's instructions.
I would have accomplished a great deal.” This is how I develop mindfulness of death.'
Then another monk addressed the Blessed One, 'I, too, already develop mindfulness of death.'
'And how do you develop mindfulness of death?'
'I think, “O, that I might live for a day, that I might attend to the Blessed One's instructions.
I would have accomplished a great deal.” This is how I develop mindfulness of death.'
Then another monk addressed the Blessed One, 'I, too, develop mindfulness of death… 'I think, “O, that I might live for the interval that it takes to eat a meal, that I might attend to the Blessed One's instructions.
I would have accomplished a great deal”…
Then another monk addressed the Blessed One, 'I, too, develop mindfulness of death… 'I think, “O, that I might live for the interval that it takes to swallow having chewed up four morsels of food, that I might attend to the Blessed One's instructions.
I would have accomplished a great deal”…
Then another monk addressed the Blessed One, 'I, too, develop mindfulness of death… 'I think, “O, that I might live for the interval that it takes to swallow having chewed up one morsel of food, that I might attend to the Blessed One's instructions.
I would have accomplished a great deal”…
Then another monk addressed the Blessed One, 'I, too, develop mindfulness of death… 'I think, “O, that I might live for the interval that it takes to breathe out after breathing in, or to breathe in after breathing out, that I might attend to the Blessed One's instructions.
I would have accomplished a great deal.” This is how I develop mindfulness of death.'
When this was said, the Blessed One addressed the monks.
'Whoever develops mindfulness of death, thinking, “O, that I might live for a day & night… for a day… for the interval that it takes to eat a meal… for the interval that it takes to swallow having chewed up four morsels of food, that I might attend to the Blessed One's instructions.
I would have accomplished a great deal” — they are said to dwell heedlessly.
They develop mindfulness of death slowly for the sake of ending the effluents.
'But whoever develops mindfulness of death, thinking, “O, that I might live for the interval that it takes to swallow having chewed up one morsel of food… for the interval that it takes to breathe out after breathing in, or to breathe in after breathing out, that I might attend to the Blessed One's instructions.
I would have accomplished a great deal” — they are said to dwell heedfully.
They develop mindfulness of death acutely for the sake of ending the effluents.
'Therefore you should train yourselves: “We will dwell heedfully.
We will develop mindfulness of death acutely for the sake of ending the effluents.” That is how you should train yourselves.'
Then the Blessed One addressed the monks, 'I exhort you, monks: All fabrications are subject to decay.
Attain consummation through heedfulness.' Those were the Tathāgata's last words.
These are the four modes of practice.
Which four?
Painful practice with slow intuition, painful practice with quick intuition, pleasant practice with slow intuition, & pleasant practice with quick intuition.
And what is painful practice with slow intuition?
There is the case where a certain individual is normally of an intensely passionate nature.
He perpetually experiences pain & distress born of passion.
Or he is normally of an intensely aversive nature.
He perpetually experiences pain & distress born of aversion.
Or he is normally of an intensely deluded nature.
He perpetually experiences pain & distress born of delusion.
His five faculties — the faculty of conviction… persistence… mindfulness… concentration… discernment — are present in a weak form.
Because of their weakness, he attains only slowly the immediacy that leads to the ending of the effluents.
This is called painful practice with slow intuition.
And what is painful practice with quick intuition?
There is the case where a certain individual is normally of an intensely passionate… aversive… deluded nature.
He perpetually experiences pain & distress born of delusion.
His five faculties… are present in an intense form.
Because of their intensity, he attains quickly the immediacy that leads to the ending of the effluents.
This is called painful practice with quick intuition.
And what is pleasant practice with slow intuition?
There is the case where a certain individual is normally not of an intensely passionate nature.
He does not perpetually experience pain & distress born of passion.
Or he is normally not of an intensely aversive nature… normally not of an intensely deluded nature.
He does not perpetually experience pain & distress born of delusion.
His five faculties… are present in a weak form.
Because of their weakness, he attains only slowly the immediacy that leads to the ending of the effluents.
This is called pleasant practice with slow intuition.
And what is pleasant practice with quick intuition?
There is the case where a certain individual is normally not of an intensely passionate nature… normally not of an intensely aversive nature… normally not of an intensely deluded nature.
He does not perpetually experience pain & distress born of delusion.
His five faculties… are present in an intense form.
Because of their intensity, he attains quickly the immediacy that leads to the ending of the effluents.
This is called pleasant practice with quick intuition.
These are the four modes of practice.
Which four?
Painful practice with slow intuition, painful practice with quick intuition, pleasant practice with slow intuition, & pleasant practice with quick intuition.
And what is painful practice with slow intuition?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on unattractiveness with regard to the body, percipient of loathsomeness with regard to food, percipient of non-delight with regard to the entire world, focused on inconstancy with regard to all fabrications.
The perception of death is well established within him.
He dwells in dependence on these five strengths of a learner — strength of conviction, strength of shame, strength of compunction, strength of persistence, & strength of discernment — but his five faculties… appear weakly.
Because of their weakness, he attains only slowly the immediacy that leads to the ending of the effluents.
This is called painful practice with slow intuition.
And what is painful practice with quick intuition?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on unattractiveness with regard to the body… focused on inconstancy with regard to all fabrications.
The perception of death is well established within him.
He dwells in dependence on the five strengths of a learner… and his five faculties… are present in an intense form.
Because of their intensity, he attains quickly the immediacy that leads to the ending of the effluents.
This is called painful practice with quick intuition.
And what is pleasant practice with slow intuition?
There is the case where a monk… enters & remains in the first jhāna… second jhāna… third jhāna… fourth jhāna.
He dwells in dependence on the five strengths of a learner… but his five faculties… are present in a weak form.
Because of their weakness, he attains only slowly the immediacy that leads to the ending of the effluents.
This is called pleasant practice with slow intuition.
And what is pleasant practice with quick intuition?
There is the case where a monk… enters & remains in the first jhāna… second jhāna… third jhāna… fourth jhāna.
He dwells in dependence on the five strengths of a learner… and his five faculties… are present in an intense form.
Because of their intensity, he attains quickly the immediacy that leads to the ending of the effluents.
This is called pleasant practice with quick intuition.
These are the four modes of practice.
As Ven.
Soṇa was meditating in seclusion, this train of thought arose in his awareness: 'Of the Blessed One's disciples who have aroused their persistence, I am one, but my mind is not released from the effluents through lack of clinging/sustenance.
Now, my family has enough wealth that it would be possible to enjoy wealth & make merit.
What if I were to disavow the training, return to the lower life, and to enjoy wealth & make merit?'
Then the Blessed One, as soon as he perceived with his awareness the train of thought in Ven.
Soṇa's awareness — as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm — disappeared from Mount Vulture Peak, appeared in the Cool Wood right in front of Ven.
Soṇa, and sat down on a prepared seat.
Ven.
Soṇa, after bowing down to the Blessed One, sat down to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him, 'Just now, as you were meditating in seclusion, didn't this train of thought appear to your awareness: “Of the Blessed One's disciples who have aroused their persistence, I am one, but my mind is not released from the effluents… What if I were to disavow the training, return to the lower life, and to enjoy wealth & make merit?”'
'Yes, lord.'
'Now what do you think, Soṇa?
Before, when you were a house-dweller, were you skilled at playing the vina?'
'Yes, lord.'
'…And when the strings of your vina were too taut, was your vina in tune & playable?'
'No, lord.'
'…And when the strings of your vina were too loose, was your vina in tune & playable?'
'No, lord.'
'…And when the strings of your vina were neither too taut nor too loose, but tuned to be right on pitch, was your vina in tune & playable?'
'Yes, lord.'
'In the same way, Soṇa, over-aroused persistence leads to restlessness, overly slack persistence leads to laziness.
Thus you should determine the right pitch for your persistence, attune the pitch of the faculties, and there pick up your theme.'
'Yes, lord,' Ven.
Soṇa answered the Blessed One.
Then, having given this exhortation to Ven.
Soṇa, the Blessed One — as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm — disappeared from the Cool Wood and appeared on Mount Vulture Peak.
So after that, Ven.
Soṇa determined the right pitch for his persistence, attuned the pitch of the faculties, and there picked up his theme.
Dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute, he in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the holy life for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew, 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.' And thus Ven.
Soṇa became another one of the Arahants.
There is a manner of reckoning whereby a monk who is a learner, standing at the level of a learner, can discern that 'I am a learner,' and whereby a monk who is an adept, standing at the level of an adept, can discern that 'I am an adept.'
…There is the case where a monk is a learner.
He discerns, as it has come to be, that 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.' This is a manner of reckoning whereby a monk who is a learner, standing at the level of a learner, can discern that 'I am a learner.'
Furthermore, the monk who is a learner reflects, 'Is there outside of this any contemplative or brahman who teaches the true, genuine, & accurate Dhamma like the Blessed One?' And he discerns, 'No, there is no contemplative or brahman outside of this who teaches the true, genuine, & accurate Dhamma like the Blessed One.' This too is a manner of reckoning whereby a monk who is a learner, standing at the level of a learner, can discern that 'I am a learner.'
Furthermore, the monk who is a learner discerns the five faculties: the faculty of conviction… persistence… mindfulness… concentration… discernment.
He sees, having penetrated it with discernment, what their destiny, excellence, rewards, & consummation are, but he does not dwell touching them with his body.
This too is a manner of reckoning whereby a monk who is a learner, standing at the level of a learner, can discern that 'I am a learner.'
And what is the manner of reckoning whereby a monk who is an adept, standing at the level of an adept, can discern that 'I am an adept'?
There is the case where a monk who is an adept discerns the five faculties: the faculty of conviction… persistence… mindfulness… concentration… discernment.
He sees, having penetrated it with discernment, what their destiny, excellence, rewards, & consummation are, and he dwells touching them with his body.
This is a manner of reckoning whereby a monk who is an adept, standing at the level of an adept, can discern that 'I am an adept.'
Furthermore, the monk who is an adept discerns the six sense faculties: the faculty of the eye… ear… nose… tongue… body… intellect.
He discerns, 'These six sense faculties will cease entirely, everywhere, & in every way without remainder, and no other set of six sense faculties will arise anywhere or in any way.' This too is a manner of reckoning whereby a monk who is an adept, standing at the level of an adept, can discern that 'I am an adept.'
When a disciple of the noble ones discerns, as they have come to be, the origination, the disappearance, the allure, the drawbacks — and the emancipation from — these five faculties, he is called a disciple of the noble ones who has attained the stream: not subject to perdition, certain, destined for self-awakening… When, having discerned as they have come to be, the origination, the disappearance, the allure, the drawbacks — and the emancipation from — these five faculties, he is released from lack of clinging/sustenance, he is called an Arahant…
The Buddha: Sāriputta, do you take it on conviction that the faculty of conviction, when developed & pursued, gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its goal & consummation?
Do you take it on conviction that the faculty of persistence… mindfulness… concentration… discernment, when developed & pursued, gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its goal & consummation?
Ven.
Sāriputta: It's not that I take it on conviction in the Blessed One that the faculty of conviction… persistence… mindfulness… concentration… discernment, when developed & pursued, gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its goal & consummation.
Those who have not known, seen, penetrated, realized, or attained it by means of discernment would have to take it on conviction in others that the faculty of conviction… discernment… has the Deathless as its goal & consummation; whereas those who have known, seen, penetrated, realized, & attained it by means of discernment would have no doubt or uncertainty that the faculty of conviction… discernment… has the Deathless as its goal & consummation.
And as for me, I have known, seen, penetrated, realized, & attained it by means of discernment.
I have no doubt or uncertainty that the faculty of conviction… discernment… has the Deathless as its goal & consummation.
There are these five strengths.
Which five?
Strength of conviction, strength of persistence, strength of mindfulness, strength of concentration, & strength of discernment.
These are the five strengths.
Just as the River Ganges flows to the east, slopes to the east, inclines to the east, in the same way when a monk develops & pursues the five strengths, he flows to Unbinding, slopes to Unbinding, inclines to Unbinding.
And how is it that when a monk develops & pursues the five strengths, he flows… slopes… inclines to Unbinding?
There is the case where the monk develops strength of conviction dependent on seclusion, dependent on dispassion, dependent on cessation, resulting in letting go.
He develops strength of persistence… mindfulness… concentration… discernment dependent on seclusion… dispassion… cessation, resulting in letting go.
This is how a monk, when developing & pursuing the five strengths, flows… slopes… inclines to Unbinding.
There is a manner of reckoning whereby the five faculties are the same as the five strengths, and the five strengths the same as the five faculties.
And what is that method?
Whatever is the faculty of conviction, that is the strength of conviction.
Whatever is the strength of conviction, that is the faculty of conviction.
Whatever is the faculty of persistence, that is the strength of persistence.
Whatever is the strength of persistence, that is the faculty of persistence.
Whatever is the faculty of mindfulness, that is the strength of mindfulness.
Whatever is the strength of mindfulness, that is the faculty of mindfulness.
Whatever is the faculty of concentration, that is the strength of concentration.
Whatever is the strength of concentration, that is the faculty of concentration.
Whatever is the faculty of discernment, that is the strength of discernment.
Whatever is the strength of discernment, that is the faculty of discernment.
Imagine a river — flowing, sloping, inclining toward the east — in whose midst is an island.
There is a manner of reckoning whereby the river is classified as one current, and another manner of reckoning whereby it is classified as two.
And what is the first manner of reckoning?
Whatever water lies to the east of the island, and whatever water lies to the west.
This is the manner of reckoning whereby the river is classified as one current.
And what is the second manner of reckoning?
Whatever water lies to the north of the island, and whatever water lies to the south.
This is the manner of reckoning whereby the river is classified as two.
In the same way, whatever is the faculty of conviction, that is the strength of conviction.
Whatever is the strength of conviction, that is the faculty of conviction… Whatever is the faculty of discernment, that is the strength of discernment.
Whatever is the strength of discernment, that is the faculty of discernment.
The seven factors for Awakening are closely related to the practice of the four frames of reference.
The texts use two patterns to describe this relationship.
The first pattern is a spiral, showing how the seven factors for Awakening build on the four frames of reference.
This point is reflected in the position of mindfulness — defined as the practice of any one of the four frames of reference — as the first factor in the list.
Discernment, in the role of the analysis of mental qualities into skillful and unskillful, builds on right mindfulness and leads to persistence, which in the form of right effort/exertion maximizes the skillful qualities and minimizes the unskillful ones.
This in turn leads to four factors associated with jhāna: rapture, serenity, concentration, and equanimity.
Equanimity, here, is not a neutral feeling, but rather a balancing or moderation — an evenness of mind — with regard to any feeling or object that arises.
It is identical with the equanimity in the fourth jhāna and with the inherent equanimity in the fifth factor of five-factored noble concentration, which can develop out of any of the four jhanas.
As such it can lead either to greater mastery of meditation — as the purity of mindfulness that accompanies the fourth jhāna provides the basis for even more precise analysis of qualities, thus allowing the causal loop to spiral to a higher level — or to the state of non-fashioning that opens to Awakening.
Abhidhamma texts seem to contradict the point that equanimity feeds back into mindfulness in this way, for they maintain that the factors for Awakening are transcendent — in other words, that they come into play only as one reaches the point of Awakening, where no temporal feedback would take place.
The discourses, however, show that the factors for Awakening can function in the development of mundane concentration as well.
Passage § shows how the “feeding” of the factors for Awakening is needed to “starve” the hindrances, mental qualities that have to be suppressed before mundane concentration can be attained.
Passage § shows how the factors function in developing the four attitudes that lead to “awareness-release” — a mundane form of release — and indicates the highest state to which those attitudes can lead for one who has penetrated no higher, i.e., who has attained none of the transcendent levels.
These passages demonstrate that the factors for Awakening can function on the level of mundane jhāna in addition to the level at the verge of Awakening.
Thus, equanimity as a factor for Awakening on the mundane plane can feed back into the process of meditation, providing a steady basis for more continuous mindfulness and clearer analysis of mental qualities until all the factors of the list ripen to transcendence.
The second pattern for describing the relationship between the factors for Awakening and the four frames of reference is more holographic.
As we have already noted, all the factors in the list are all implicit in the “approach” stage of frames-of-reference meditation.
The texts themselves make this point by saying that the development of any one of the frames of reference brings the factors for Awakening to the culmination of their development.
The differences between these two patterns — a spiraling sequence building on the four frames of reference, and a holographic formula implicit in the frames of reference — is largely one of emphasis.
As the dual nature of this/that conditionality indicates — with mental factors building on one another over time and strengthening one another in the present — both aspects act together in actual practice.
Viewed as a spiraling sequence, the factors for Awakening offer some interesting contrasts to the five faculties.
Both sets depict one of the causal loops in the skillful development of the mind, but here the emphasis is not on how mindfulness and concentration help to develop discernment, but on how mindfulness and discernment help to develop concentration.
This different dynamic is reflected in the mental qualities that act as underlying agents in the development of each set.
As we have seen, heedfulness underlies the development of the faculties; it grows from a sense of conviction in the principle of kamma into members of the “concentration aggregate” — right effort and right mindfulness — in the noble eightfold path.
In the case of the factors for Awakening, appropriate attention is what underlies the development of every element in the set; it grows from a component factor of conviction into a member of the “discernment aggregate”: right view.
Thus, in each set, the agent underlying its development reflects the intermediate members of the set in their role of fostering the final member.
A closer look at the topic of appropriate attention will show how the processes of discernment can foster concentration to the point where both issue in Awakening.
Because this topic is so central to the practice, we will have to treat it in detail.
The term “appropriate attention” can also be rendered as “wise reflection,” “the proper approach,” or “systematic attention.” It is essentially the basic insight that enables one to see which issues are worth paying attention to, and which ones should be ignored.
Passage § gives what is probably the best depiction of this process.
The meditator ignores questions that lead to the proliferation of mental effluents, and pays attention to questions that help weaken them.
As we noted in I/B, the knowledge that puts an end to the effluents deals with experience in the phenomenological mode.
Thus, the best questions for weakening the effluents are ones that lead the mind into that mode.
Now, not all questions are helpful in this way.
Some deal in terms that focus the mind on narrative or cosmological issues in ways that actually obstruct a phenomenological viewpoint.
For this reason, the Buddha found it necessary to divide questions into four classes: those meriting a categorical answer, those meriting an analytical answer, those deserving a counter-question, and those deserving to be put aside.
The first class includes questions that are already well-phrased and can yield straight answers useful in weakening one's mental effluents.
The second class includes those that are poorly phrased but are close enough to becoming useful that they can be clarified by a redefinition of terms.
The third class covers instances where the real issue is not the question as phrased, but the confused line of thinking or hidden agendas behind the asking of the question.
Once these underlying elements are exposed and corrected by the proper counter-question, fruitful questions can then be framed.
The final class of questions covers instances where both the question and the act of asking it are so misguided that any attempt to get involved in the issue would lead only to the proliferation of mental effluents, and so the whole issue should be put aside.
Of these four classes of questions, the class meriting categorical answers is of most interest here, for it's the class that can act as a focal point for appropriate attention.
The vast majority of the questions that the Buddha asks and answers categorically in the texts fall into three general sorts: those that seek to identify terms and categories useful for the task of ending stress and suffering; those that seek to place particular events in their proper category; and those that seek to understand the causal role of events assigned to the various categories: how they condition, and are conditioned by, one another.
A sub-set of consists of questions concerning the effect that one's questions and one's approach to the practice in general have on the mind.
All of these three sorts of question are closely related to the three stages of frames-of-reference meditation: sorts and relate to the first stage, and sort to the second, whereas the sub-set of dealing with the questioning approach itself leads directly to the third.
This last sub-set also forms the overall principle for delineating all four classes of questions mentioned above: the effect that the process of asking and answering has on the mind.
In simple terms, this principle means viewing experience in terms of cause and effect, viewing questions in terms of cause and effect, classifying them according to the results that come from trying to answer them, and treating them only in ways that will help lead to the ending of suffering and stress.
This is the proper function of appropriate attention in its most mature form.
To arrive at this mature level, however, appropriate attention must be developed step by step.
These steps can be shown by taking the passages given in this section and viewing them in the context of the practice of the fourth frame of reference: focusing on the mental qualities of the hindrances and the factors for Awakening in and of themselves in the course of developing concentration.
The first step is simply to identify the hindrances and factors for Awakening as they are experienced, noting their presence and absence in the mind — a movement toward what the Buddha called “entering into emptiness”.
As III/D makes clear, there are several preliminary steps in concentration practice leading up to the ability to do this.
When these are mastered, one can focus on, say, the hindrance of ill-will not in terms of the object of the ill-will but on the quality of ill-will as a mere event in the mind.
The question here is not, “What am I angry about?” or “What did that person do wrong?” but simply “What is happening in my mind?
How can it be classed?
Given the well-known Buddhist teaching on not-self, some people have wondered why the questions of appropriate attention at this step would use such concepts as “me” and “my,” but these concepts are essential at this stage — where the mind is still more at home in the narrative mode of “self” and “others” — in pointing out that the focus of the inquiry should be directed within, rather than without.
This helps to bring one's frame of reference to the experience of mental qualities as phenomena in and of themselves, and away from the narratives that provoked the ill-will to begin with.
Only when this shift in reference is secure can the concepts of “me” and “my” be dispensed with, in the third step below.
The second step in appropriate attention — corresponding to the second stage of frames-of-reference practice — is to inquire into the causal functioning of the hindrances and factors for Awakening, to see how they arise and cease in the course of one's concentration practice.
The aim here is to gain insight into the workings of the hindrances and factors for Awakening as one tries to eliminate the former and bring the latter to full development.
The passages in this section dealing with this step treat the issue in terms of two metaphors — balance on the one hand, feeding and starving on the other — and list the desired results of the meditation as a standard of measurement for gauging the success of one's practice.
We have met with the role of balance already in the four bases of power and the five faculties.
What is special here is that, instead of finding a balance within each factor for Awakening, the meditator is to use different factors to balance out specific hindrances.
The more active members — analysis of qualities, persistence, and rapture — can be used to offset sluggish mind states; the more calming members — serenity, concentration, and equanimity — counteract restless mind states.
Mindfulness is the only member of the set that is inherently skillful at all times, for it is the one that keeps the need for balance in mind.
To combine the portrayals of balance under this set and under the bases of power, we can say that the more active factors for Awakening should be used to prevent specific bases of power — such as desire — from being too sluggish or constricted, whereas the more calming factors for Awakening should be used to prevent desire, etc., from being too active or scattered.
It is interesting also to note that, although analysis of qualities is a potential cause for restlessness, it is also the factor needed to judge when its own activity is going overboard and needs to be calmed with concentration.
Under the metaphor of feeding and starving, the skill of appropriate attention is said to feed all the factors for Awakening, just as inappropriate attention starves them and feeds the hindrances in their place.
As § points out, the role of appropriate attention at this level is to inquire into the property that acts as a foothold for each hindrance or factor for Awakening.
The feeding process is especially direct with analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening — a near equivalent of appropriate attention — and the hindrance of uncertainty.
These two form a pair, in that the feeding of analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening in and of itself starves the hindrance of uncertainty, and vice versa.
Appropriate attention to the effects of skillful and unskillful qualities in the mind — in other words, focusing on questions that identify such qualities as the hindrances and the factors for Awakening, and inquire into their causes and effects — not only feeds this factor for Awakening but also enables one to develop its fellow factors.
Inappropriate attention to issues that excite uncertainty — asking questions that can lead only to doubt and perplexity — not only feeds the hindrance of uncertainty but also leads to a sense of confusion that prevents all the factors for Awakening from developing.
With some of the other factors for Awakening — such as mindfulness, rapture, and equanimity — the texts are vague as to exactly which properties form their potential footholds.
A few of these properties can be inferred from other texts, so they are cross-referenced in the relevant passages.
The remaining instances can serve as challenges for each meditator to explore through practice.
Challenges of this sort are valuable in forcing one to become self-reliant at observing cause and effect and asking the right questions: two skills that are basic to the development of appropriate attention and the path of practice as a whole.
As one becomes more successful in identifying these properties and attending to them in the appropriate way, one's skill at concentration practice improves.
Concentration and equanimity then feed back into the loop by purifying mindfulness in the practice of jhāna, providing a steady basis for discernment in terms of more precise analysis of qualities and more subtlety in one's attention.
This can lead either to improved abilities at concentration or to a more self-referential mode away from the “object” of the practice and turning toward the “approach”, where these activities of discernment become sensitive to themselves as events in the causal network.
In particular, they can begin to ask questions about their own acts of questioning, to see what latent assumptions are still causing them uncertainty and getting in the way of their further development.
In this way, they come to the third step in their development.
According to the texts, the most insidious issues that can excite uncertainty are questions that center on the concept of “I”: “Do I exist?” “Do I not exist?” In the cosmological or metaphysical mode, this concept leads to such questions as: “Does the self exist?” “Does it not exist?” In the psychological or personal narrative mode, it leads to a sense of self-identity, attachment to the object with which one identifies, and all the suffering that inherently results.
In either mode, this concept leads to uncertainty about the past and future: “Did I exist in the past?” “Will I exist in the future?” “What will I be?” All of these questions obviously pull the mind out of the phenomenological mode; passage § shows that the Buddha regarded them as leading to mental effluents and thus unworthy of attention.
The one time he was asked point-blank as to whether or not there is a self, he refused to answer, thus showing that the question deserves to be put aside.
What then of the well-known Buddhist teachings on not-self?
From the way these teachings are expressed in some of the texts, it might be inferred that the Buddha held to the principle that there is no self.
Here, though, it is important to remember the Buddha's own comment on how his teachings are to be interpreted.
With some of them, he said, it's proper to draw inferences, whereas with others it's not.
Unfortunately, he didn't illustrate the distinction between the two types of teachings with specific examples.
However, we're apparently safe in assuming that if we try to draw inferences from his statements to give either a categorical answer or an analytical answer to a question that the Buddha showed by example should not be asked or answered, we are drawing inferences where they should not be drawn.
A more fruitful line of inquiry is to view experience, not in terms of the existence or non-existence of the self, but in terms of the categories of the four noble truths, which § identifies as the truly proper subject of appropriate attention.
If we look at the way the Buddha phrases questions about not-self in the context of the duties appropriate to the four noble truths, we see that they function as tools for comprehending stress and abandoning the craving and clinging that cause it.
Thus this line of questioning helps bring about the ending of the mental effluents.
Rather than asking, “Do I exist?”, one should ask, “Is this mine?
Is this me?
If these things are regarded as me or mine, will there be suffering?” These questions, when properly answered, can lead directly to the phenomenological mode and on to release from clinging and from suffering and stress.
Thus they are worth asking.
When applied to the hindrances and factors for Awakening, this line of inquiry can bring the mind to the third stage of frames-of-reference meditation by calling into question the “me” and “my” assumed in the first step of questioning.
This undermines any sense of self-identification, first with the hindrances — such as “I'm drowsy” — and then with the factors for Awakening — such as “My mind is serene”.
All that then remains is the radically phenomenological mode that enters fully into the emptiness on the verge of non-fashioning, where there are no longer any questions, but simply awareness that “There are mental qualities”… “There is this.” This is the threshold to Awakening.
Throughout the process of developing appropriate attention in the course of the second and third stages of frames-of-reference meditation, the spiraling loop of the factors for Awakening continually feeds back on itself, as the factor of equanimity allows the factors of mindfulness and analysis of qualities to gauge the success of the practice and call for adjustments where needed.
The standard of measurementto be used in this evaluation is given in the formula that frequently accompanies the definition of the factors for Awakening in the texts: each factor ideally should depend on “seclusion… dispassion… cessation, resulting in letting go.” The terms in this list occur both in mundane and in transcendent contexts, which indicates that they have both mundane and transcendent levels of meaning.
On the mundane level, they play a role in the practice of jhāna.
As they develop and reach transcendence, they bring the mind to the state of non-fashioning.
By basing one's practice on the seclusion, dispassion, and cessation found in the jhāna that takes letting go as its object, and by feeding it through the constant evaluation provided by appropriate attention and analysis of qualities to the point of ever more refined levels of letting go, one brings together the mental qualities of attention and intention in a mutually reinforcing way that heads in the direction of Awakening.
At the highest level of letting go — the “knowing but not holding” that we equated with the perceptual mode of emptiness on the verge of non-fashioning in section II/E — appropriate attention gives way to transcendent clear knowing.
The intention underlying the practice of jhāna gives way to the stillness of the resulting transcendent freedom.
This is how the factors for Awakening, in the words of the texts, “when developed & pursued, lead to the culmination of clear knowing & release.
Once the Blessed One was staying at Sāketa, in the Añjana Forest Game Refuge.
Then Kuṇḍaliya the wanderer came to where the Blessed One was staying and on arrival greeted him courteously and, after engaging in pleasant conversation, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, 'Master Gotama, I like to frequent gatherings in parks.
It is my habit at midday, after my morning meal, to go from park to park, from garden to garden.
There I encounter various contemplatives & brahmans discoursing on the rewards of defending their own tenets in debate, and the rewards of condemning those of others.
Now in the experience of what reward does Master Gotama dwell?'
'The Tathāgata dwells experiencing the reward of the fruits of clear knowing & release.'
'But what are the qualities that, when developed & pursued, lead to the culmination of clear knowing & release?'
'The seven factors for Awakening…'
'And what are the qualities that… lead to the culmination of the seven factors for Awakening?'
'The four frames of reference…'
'And what are the qualities that… lead to the culmination of the four frames of reference?'
'The three courses of right conduct…'
'And what are the qualities that… lead to the culmination of the three courses of right conduct?'
'Restraint of the senses… And how does restraint of the senses, when developed & pursued, lead to the culmination of the three courses of right conduct?
There is the case where a monk, on seeing a pleasant form with the eye, doesn't hanker after it, doesn't delight in it, doesn't give rise to passion for it.
Unmoved in body & unmoved in mind, he is inwardly well composed & well released.
On seeing an unpleasant form with the eye, he is not upset, his mind is not unsettled, his feelings are not wounded, his mind does not become resentful.
Unmoved in body & unmoved in mind, he is inwardly well composed & well released.
On hearing a pleasant… unpleasant sound with the ear… On smelling a pleasant… unpleasant smell with the nose… On tasting a pleasant… unpleasant taste with the tongue… On feeling a pleasant… unpleasant tactile sensation with the body…
On cognizing a pleasant idea with the intellect, he doesn't hanker after it, doesn't delight in it, doesn't give rise to passion for it.
Unmoved in body & unmoved in mind, he is inwardly well composed & well released.
On cognizing an unpleasant idea with the intellect, he is not upset, his mind is not unsettled, his feelings are not wounded, his mind does not become resentful.
Unmoved in body & unmoved in mind, he is inwardly well composed & well released.
This, Kuṇḍaliya, is how restraint of the senses, when developed & pursued, leads to the culmination of the three courses of right conduct.
And how are the three courses of right conduct developed & pursued so as to lead to the culmination of the four frames of reference?
There is the case where a monk abandons wrong conduct in terms of his deeds and develops right conduct in terms of his deeds; abandons wrong conduct in terms of his speech and develops right conduct in terms of his speech; abandons wrong conduct in terms of his thoughts and develops right conduct in terms of his thoughts.
This, Kuṇḍaliya, is how the three courses of right conduct, when developed & pursued, lead to the culmination of the four frames of reference.
And how are the four frames of reference developed & pursued so that the seven factors for Awakening come to completion?
On whatever occasion the monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world, on that occasion his mindfulness is steady & without lapse.
When his mindfulness is steady & without lapse, then mindfulness as a factor for Awakening becomes aroused.
He develops it, and for him it goes to the culmination of its development.
Remaining mindful in this way, he examines, analyzes, & comes to a comprehension of that quality with discernment.
When he remains mindful in this way, examining, analyzing, & coming to a comprehension of that quality with discernment, then analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening becomes aroused.
He develops it, and for him it goes to the culmination of its development.
In one who examines, analyzes, & comes to a comprehension of that quality with discernment, unflagging persistence is aroused.
When unflagging persistence is aroused in one who examines, analyzes, & comes to a comprehension of that quality with discernment, then persistence as a factor for Awakening becomes aroused.
He develops it, and for him it goes to the culmination of its development.
In one whose persistence is aroused, a rapture not-of-the-flesh arises.
When a rapture not-of-the-flesh arises in one whose persistence is aroused, then rapture as a factor for Awakening becomes aroused.
He develops it, and for him it goes to the culmination of its development.
For one who is enraptured, the body grows calm and the mind grows calm.
When the body & mind of an enraptured monk grow calm, then serenity as a factor for Awakening becomes aroused.
He develops it, and for him it goes to the culmination of its development.
For one who is at ease — his body calmed — the mind becomes concentrated.
When the mind of one who is at ease — his body calmed — becomes concentrated, then concentration as a factor for Awakening becomes aroused.
He develops it, and for him it goes to the culmination of its development.
He oversees the mind thus concentrated with equanimity.
When he oversees the mind thus concentrated with equanimity, equanimity as a factor for Awakening becomes aroused.
He develops it, and for him it goes to the culmination of its development.
This, Kuṇḍaliya, is how the four frames of reference, when developed & pursued, lead to the culmination of the seven factors for Awakening.
And how are the seven factors for Awakening developed & pursued so as to lead to the culmination of clear knowing & release?
There is the case where a monk develops mindfulness as a factor for Awakening dependent on seclusion… dispassion… cessation, resulting in letting go.
He develops analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening… persistence as a factor for Awakening… rapture as a factor for Awakening… serenity as a factor for Awakening… concentration as a factor for Awakening… equanimity as a factor for Awakening dependent on seclusion… dispassion… cessation, resulting in letting go.
This, Kuṇḍaliya, is how the seven factors for Awakening, when developed & pursued, lead to the culmination of clear knowing & release.'
When this had been said, Kuṇḍaliya the wanderer said to the Blessed One: 'Magnificent, Master Gotama, magnificent!
In many ways has Master Gotama made the Dhamma clear — just as if one were to place upright what has been overturned, to reveal what has been hidden, to point out the way to one who is lost, or to set out a lamp in the darkness so that those with eyes might see forms.
I go to Master Gotama for refuge, to the Dhamma, & to the Community of monks.
May Master Gotama regard me as a lay follower gone for refuge from this day forth as long as life shall last.'
Now in what way does a monk develop & pursue mindfulness of in-&-out breathing so that it bears great fruit & great benefits?
There is the case where a monk develops mindfulness as a factor for Awakening accompanied by mindfulness of in-&-out breathing — dependent on seclusion… dispassion… cessation, resulting in letting go.
He develops analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening… persistence as a factor for Awakening… rapture as a factor for Awakening… serenity as a factor for Awakening… concentration as a factor for Awakening… equanimity as a factor for Awakening dependent on seclusion… dispassion… cessation, resulting in letting go.
This is how mindfulness of in-&-out breathing is developed & pursued so that it bears great fruit & great benefits.
Now what is the manner of reckoning by which the seven factors for Awakening are fourteen?
Any mindfulness with regard to internal qualities is mindfulness as a factor for Awakening.
And any mindfulness with regard to external qualities is also mindfulness as a factor for Awakening.
Thus this forms the definition of 'mindfulness as a factor for Awakening,' and it is in this manner that it is two.
Any time one examines, investigates, & scrutinizes internal qualities with discernment, that is analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening.
And any time one examines, investigates, & scrutinizes external qualities with discernment, that too is analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening.
Thus this forms the definition of 'analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening,' and it is in this manner that it is two.
Any bodily persistence is persistence as a factor for Awakening.
And any mental persistence is also persistence as a factor for Awakening.
Thus this forms the definition of 'persistence as a factor for Awakening,' and it is in this manner that it is two.
Any rapture accompanied by directed thought & evaluation is rapture as a factor for Awakening.
And any rapture unaccompanied by directed thought & evaluation is also rapture as a factor for Awakening.
Thus this forms the definition of 'rapture as a factor for Awakening,' and it is in this manner that it is two.
Any bodily serenity is serenity as a factor for Awakening.
And any mental serenity is also serenity as a factor for Awakening.
Thus this forms the definition of 'serenity as a factor for Awakening,' and it is in this manner that it is two.
Any concentration accompanied by directed thought & evaluation is concentration as a factor for Awakening.
And any concentration unaccompanied by directed thought & evaluation is also concentration as a factor for Awakening.
Thus this forms the definition of 'concentration as a factor for Awakening,' and it is in this manner that it is two.
Any equanimity with regard to internal qualities is equanimity as a factor for Awakening.
And any equanimity with regard to external qualities is also equanimity as a factor for Awakening.
Thus this forms the definition of 'equanimity as a factor for Awakening,' and it is in this manner that it is two.
This is the manner of reckoning by which the seven factors for Awakening are fourteen.
I do not envision any one quality by which unarisen factors for Awakening do not arise, and arisen factors for Awakening do not go to the culmination of their development, like inappropriate attention.
When a person's attention is inappropriate, unarisen factors for Awakening do not arise, and arisen factors for Awakening do not go to the culmination of their development.
I do not envision any one quality by which unarisen factors for Awakening arise, and arisen factors for Awakening go to the culmination of their development, like appropriate attention.
When a person's attention is appropriate, unarisen factors for Awakening arise, and arisen factors for Awakening go to the culmination of their development.

Monks, I will teach you the feeding & starving of the five hindrances & of the seven factors for Awakening.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak…
Feeding the Hindrances.
And what is the food for the arising of unarisen sensual desire, or for the growth & increase of sensual desire once it has arisen?
There is the theme of beauty.
To foster inappropriate attention to it: This is the food for the arising of unarisen sensual desire, or for the growth & increase of sensual desire once it has arisen.
And what is the food for the arising of unarisen ill will, or for the growth & increase of ill will once it has arisen?
There is the theme of irritation.
To foster inappropriate attention to it: This is the food for the arising of unarisen ill will, or for the growth & increase of ill will once it has arisen.
And what is the food for the arising of unarisen sloth & drowsiness, or for the growth & increase of sloth & drowsiness once it has arisen?
There are boredom, weariness, yawning, drowsiness after a meal, & sluggishness of awareness.
To foster inappropriate attention to them: This is the food for the arising of unarisen sloth & drowsiness, or for the growth & increase of sloth & drowsiness once it has arisen.
And what is the food for the arising of unarisen restlessness & anxiety, or for the growth & increase of restlessness & anxiety once it has arisen?
There is non-stillness of awareness.
To foster inappropriate attention to that: This is the food for the arising of unarisen restlessness & anxiety, or for the growth & increase of restlessness & anxiety once it has arisen.
And what is the food for the arising of unarisen uncertainty, or for the growth & increase of uncertainty once it has arisen?
There are phenomena that act as a foothold for uncertainty.
To foster inappropriate attention to them: This is the food for the arising of unarisen uncertainty, or for the growth & increase of uncertainty once it has arisen.
Feeding the Factors for Awakening.
Now, what is the food for the arising of unarisen mindfulness as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of mindfulness… once it has arisen?
There are mental qualities that act as a foothold for mindfulness as a factor for Awakening.
To foster appropriate attention to them: This is the food for the arising of unarisen mindfulness as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of mindfulness… once it has arisen.
And what is the food for the arising of unarisen analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of analysis of qualities… once it has arisen?
There are mental qualities that are skillful & unskillful, blameworthy & blameless, gross & refined, siding with darkness & with light.
To foster appropriate attention to them: This is the food for the arising of unarisen analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of analysis of qualities… once it has arisen.
And what is the food for the arising of unarisen persistence as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of persistence… once it has arisen?
There is the potential for effort, the potential for exertion, the potential for striving.
To foster appropriate attention to them: This is the food for the arising of unarisen persistence as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of persistence… once it has arisen.
And what is the food for the arising of unarisen rapture as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of rapture… once it has arisen?
There are mental qualities that act as a foothold for rapture as a factor for Awakening.
To foster appropriate attention to them: This is the food for the arising of unarisen rapture as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of rapture… once it has arisen.
And what is the food for the arising of unarisen serenity as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of serenity… once it has arisen?
There is physical serenity & there is mental serenity.
To foster appropriate attention to them: This is the food for the arising of unarisen serenity as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of serenity… once it has arisen.
And what is the food for the arising of unarisen concentration as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of concentration… once it has arisen?
There are themes for calm, themes for non-distraction.
To foster appropriate attention to them: This is the food for the arising of unarisen concentration as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of concentration… once it has arisen.
And what is the food for the arising of unarisen equanimity as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of equanimity… once it has arisen?
There are mental qualities that act as a foothold for equanimity as a factor for Awakening.
To foster appropriate attention to them: This is the food for the arising of unarisen equanimity as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of equanimity… once it has arisen.
Starving the Hindrances.
Now, what is lack of food for the arising of unarisen sensual desire, or for the growth & increase of sensual desire once it has arisen?
There is the theme of unattractiveness.
To foster appropriate attention to it: This is lack of food for the arising of unarisen sensual desire, or for the growth & increase of sensual desire once it has arisen.
And what is lack of food for the arising of unarisen ill will, or for the growth & increase of ill will once it has arisen?
There is awareness-release.
To foster appropriate attention to that: This is lack of food for the arising of unarisen ill will, or for the growth & increase of ill will once it has arisen.
And what is lack of food for the arising of unarisen sloth & drowsiness, or for the growth & increase of sloth & drowsiness once it has arisen?
There is the potential for effort, the potential for exertion, the potential for striving.
To foster appropriate attention to them: This is lack of food for the arising of unarisen sloth & drowsiness, or for the growth & increase of sloth & drowsiness once it has arisen.
And what is lack of food for the arising of unarisen restlessness & anxiety, or for the growth & increase of restlessness & anxiety once it has arisen?
There is the stilling of awareness.
To foster appropriate attention to that: This is lack of food for the arising of unarisen restlessness & anxiety, or for the growth & increase of restlessness & anxiety once it has arisen.
And what is lack of food for the arising of unarisen uncertainty, or for the growth & increase of uncertainty once it has arisen?
There are mental qualities that are skillful & unskillful, blameworthy & blameless, gross & refined, siding with darkness & with light.
To foster appropriate attention to them: This is lack of food for the arising of unarisen uncertainty, or for the growth & increase of uncertainty once it has arisen.
Starving the Factors for Awakening.
Now, what is lack of food for the arising of unarisen mindfulness as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of mindfulness… once it has arisen?
There are mental qualities that act as a foothold for mindfulness as a factor for Awakening.
To foster inappropriate attention to them: This is lack of food for the arising of unarisen mindfulness as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of mindfulness… once it has arisen.
And what is lack of food for the arising of unarisen analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of analysis of qualities… once it has arisen?
There are mental qualities that are skillful & unskillful, blameworthy & blameless, gross & refined, siding with darkness & with light.
To foster inappropriate attention to them: This is lack of food for the arising of unarisen analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of analysis of qualities… once it has arisen.
And what is lack of food for the arising of unarisen persistence as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of persistence… once it has arisen?
There is the potential for effort, the potential for exertion, the potential for striving.
To foster inappropriate attention to them: This is lack of food for the arising of unarisen persistence as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of persistence… once it has arisen.
And what is lack of food for the arising of unarisen rapture as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of rapture… once it has arisen?
There are mental qualities that act as a foothold for rapture as a factor for Awakening.
To foster inappropriate attention to them: This is lack of food for the arising of unarisen rapture as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of rapture… once it has arisen.
And what is lack of food for the arising of unarisen serenity as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of serenity… once it has arisen?
There is bodily serenity & there is mental serenity.
To foster inappropriate attention to them: This is lack of food for the arising of unarisen serenity as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of serenity… once it has arisen.
And what is lack of food for the arising of unarisen concentration as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of concentration… once it has arisen?
There are the themes for concentration, themes for non-confusion.
To foster inappropriate attention to them: This is lack of food for the arising of unarisen concentration as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of concentration… once it has arisen.
And what is lack of food for the arising of unarisen equanimity as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of equanimity… once it has arisen?
There are mental qualities that act as a foothold for equanimity as a factor for Awakening.
To foster inappropriate attention to them: This is lack of food for the arising of unarisen equanimity as a factor for Awakening, or for the growth & increase of equanimity… once it has arisen.
Fire.
Monks, on occasions when the mind is sluggish, that is the wrong time to develop serenity as a factor for Awakening, concentration as a factor for Awakening, equanimity as a factor for Awakening.
Why is that?
The sluggish mind is hard to raise up by those mental qualities.
Just as if a man, wanting to make a small fire blaze up, were to place wet grass in it, wet cow dung, & wet sticks; were to give it a spray of water and smother it with dust.
Is it possible that he would make the small fire blaze up?
In the same way, when the mind is sluggish, that is the wrong time to develop serenity as a factor for Awakening, concentration as a factor for Awakening, equanimity as a factor for Awakening.
Why is that?
The sluggish mind is hard to raise up by those mental qualities.
Now, on occasions when the mind is sluggish, that is the right time to develop analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening, persistence as a factor for Awakening, rapture as a factor for Awakening.
Why is that?
The sluggish mind is easy to raise up by those mental qualities.
Just as if a man, wanting to make a small fire blaze up, were to place dry grass in it, dry cow dung, & dry sticks; were to blow on it with his mouth and not smother it with dust.
Is it possible that he would make the small fire blaze up?
In the same way, when the mind is sluggish, that is the right time to develop analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening, persistence as a factor for Awakening, rapture as a factor for Awakening…
Now, on occasions when the mind is restless, that is the wrong time to develop analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening, persistence as a factor for Awakening, rapture as a factor for Awakening.
Why is that?
The restless mind is hard to calm down with those mental qualities.
Just as if a man, wanting to put out a large fire, were to place dry grass in it, dry cow dung, & dry sticks; were to blow on it with his mouth and not smother it with dust.
Is it possible that he would put it out?
In the same way, when the mind is restless, that is the wrong time to develop analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening, persistence as a factor for Awakening, rapture as a factor for Awakening…
Now, on occasions when the mind is restless, that is the right time to develop serenity as a factor for Awakening, concentration as a factor for Awakening, equanimity as a factor for Awakening.
Why is that?
The restless mind is easy to calm down with those mental qualities.
Just as if a man, wanting to put out a large fire, were to place wet grass in it, wet cow dung, & wet sticks; were to give it a spray of water and smother it with dust.
Is it possible that he would put it out?
In the same way, when the mind is restless, that is the right time to develop serenity as a factor for Awakening, concentration as a factor for Awakening, equanimity as a factor for Awakening.
Why is that?
The restless mind is easy to calm down with those mental qualities.
As for mindfulness, I tell you, that is beneficial everywhere.
Awareness-release.
And how is the awareness-release through good will developed, what is its destiny, what is its excellence, its reward, & its consummation?
There is the case where a monk develops mindfulness as a factor for Awakening accompanied by good will, dependent on seclusion… dispassion… cessation, resulting in letting go.
He develops analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening… persistence as a factor for Awakening… rapture as a factor for Awakening… serenity as a factor for Awakening… concentration as a factor for Awakening… equanimity as a factor for Awakening accompanied by good will, dependent on seclusion… dispassion… cessation, resulting in letting go.
If he wants, he remains percipient of loathsomeness in the presence of what is not loathsome.
If he wants, he remains percipient of unloathsomeness in the presence of what is loathsome.
If he wants, he remains percipient of loathsomeness in the presence of what is not loathsome & what is.
If he wants, he remains percipient of unloathsomeness in the presence of what is loathsome & what is not.
If he wants — in the presence of what is loathsome & what is not — cutting himself off from both, he remains equanimous, alert, & mindful.
Or he may enter & remain in the beautiful liberation.
I tell you, monks, the awareness-release through good will has the beautiful as its excellence — in the case of one who has penetrated to no higher release.
And how is the awareness-release through compassion developed, what is its destiny, what is its excellence, its reward, & its consummation?
There is the case where a monk develops mindfulness as a factor for Awakening accompanied by compassion… etc… If he wants — in the presence of what is loathsome & what is not — cutting himself off from both, he remains equanimous, alert, & mindful.
Or, with the complete transcending of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of resistance, and not heeding perceptions of diversity, 'Infinite space,' he enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of space.
I tell you, monks, the awareness-release through compassion has the dimension of the infinitude of space as its excellence — in the case of one who has penetrated to no higher release.
And how is the awareness-release through empathetic joy developed, what is its destiny, what is its excellence, its reward, & its consummation?
There is the case where a monk develops mindfulness as a factor for Awakening accompanied by empathetic joy… etc… If he wants — in the presence of what is loathsome & what is not — cutting himself off from both, he remains equanimous, alert, & mindful.
Or, with the complete transcending of the dimension of infinitude of space, 'Infinite consciousness,' he enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
I tell you, monks, the awareness-release through empathetic joy has the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness as its excellence — in the case of one who has penetrated to no higher release.
And how is the awareness-release through equanimity developed, what is its destiny, what is its excellence, its reward, & its consummation?
There is the case where a monk develops mindfulness as a factor for Awakening accompanied by equanimity… etc… If he wants — in the presence of what is loathsome & what is not — cutting himself off from both, he remains equanimous, alert, & mindful.
Or, with the complete transcending of the dimension of infinitude of consciousness, 'There is nothing,' he enters & remains in the dimension of nothingness.
I tell you, monks, the awareness-release through equanimity has the dimension of nothingness as its excellence — in the case of one who has penetrated to no higher release.
Ven.
Ānanda: Uttiya, suppose that there were a royal frontier city with strong ramparts, strong walls & arches, and a single gate.
In it would be a wise, competent, & knowledgeable gatekeeper to keep out those he didn't know and to let in those he did.
Patrolling the path around the city, he wouldn't see a crack or an opening in the walls big enough for even a cat to slip through.
Although he wouldn't know that 'So-and-so many creatures enter or leave the city,' he would know this: 'Whatever large creatures enter or leave the city all enter or leave it through this gate.'
In the same way, the Tathāgata isn't concerned as to whether all the cosmos or half of it or a third of it led by means of.
But he does know this: 'All those who have been led, are being led, or will be led from the cosmos have done so, are doing so, or will do so after having abandoned the five hindrances — those defilements of awareness that weaken discernment — having well-established their minds in the four frames of reference, and having developed, as they have come to be, the seven factors for Awakening.
§.
The noble eightfold path is the most standard description of the Buddhist way of practice.
The Buddha taught it to his first disciples and to his last, as well as to the majority of those in between.
It is called noble because when all of its factors come together in a fully developed form, they stand on the threshold to stream-entry, the first of the noble or transcendent attainments.
The image of “path” used for the factors of this set has two major implications, which we have already encountered in II/D.
First, the image implies that these factors are means to an end, not an end in themselves; second, they lead to, rather than cause, the goal.
In the context of this set, this image has two levels of meaning: On the beginning level, the path is a series of qualities that one must consciously develop, step by step, in order to bring oneself nearer to the goal.
On the ultimate or “noble” level, it is a convergence of those qualities, fully developed, within the mind at the point of non-fashioning, leading inexorably to the Deathless.
On the beginning level, one must work at following the path, but on the noble level the path becomes a vehicle that delivers one to the goal.
The eight factors of the noble eightfold path fall under the three “aggregates” of discernment, virtue, and concentration: right view and right resolve fall under the discernment aggregate; right speech, right action, and right livelihood under the virtue aggregate; and right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration under the concentration aggregate.
Passage § states that although the factors of the noble path fall under these three aggregates, the three aggregates do not fall under the factors of the noble path.
What this means is that not every instance of discernment, virtue, or concentration within the mind would count as a factor of the noble path.
To begin with, there are such things as wrong virtue, wrong concentration, and wrong discernment.
Secondly, even right virtue, concentration, and discernment count as noble only when brought to a level of advanced development.
This point is reflected in §, which distinguishes mundane and noble levels for each factor of the path.
Even though the mundane factors counteract blatant cases of wrong view, wrong resolve, etc., they still are conjoined with subtle levels of mental effluents and can lead to further becoming.
Nevertheless, one must first nurture the mundane levels of the eight factors before they can develop into their noble counterparts.
On the mundane level, the first five factors of the path correspond to the faculty of conviction.
Right view on this level means believing in the principle of kamma and trusting that those who have practiced properly truly understand the workings of kamma in this life and the next.
In the Buddha's words, this level of right view holds that “There is what is given, what is offered, what is sacrificed.
There are fruits & results of good & bad actions.
There is this world & the next world.
There is mother & father.
There are spontaneously reborn beings; there are contemplatives & brahmans who, faring rightly & practicing rightly, proclaim this world & the next after having directly known & realized it for themselves.” What this passage means is that there is merit in generosity; the moral qualities of good and bad are inherent parts of the cosmos, and not simply social conventions; there is life after death; one has a true moral debt to one's parents; and there are people who have lived the renunciate's life properly in such a way that they have gained true and direct knowledge of these matters.
These beliefs are the minimum prerequisites for following the path to skillfulness, as they necessarily underlie any solid conviction in the principle of kamma.
Mundane levels of right resolve then build on right view, as one resolves to act in ways that will not create bad kamma; mundane right speech, right action, and right livelihood result naturally as one follows through with one's resolve.
Right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration on this level correspond to the faculties of persistence, mindfulness, and concentration.
Right concentration, in turn, provides a basis for insight into the four noble truths, which counts both as the faculty of discernment and the noble level of right view.
Once right view reaches the noble level, it brings the remaining factors of the path up to the noble level as well.
One of the striking features of this level of the path is that it consists primarily of discernment and concentration, with the boundaries between the two increasingly blurred.
The noble level of right resolve, part of the discernment aggregate, consists of directed thought, evaluation, and mental singleness, all of which are factors of jhāna.
The noble level of right speech, right action, and right livelihood differ from the mundane levels of those factors in that the emphasis here is on the state of mind of the person abstaining from wrong speech, action, and livelihood.
Although § does not define the noble levels of right effort, mindfulness, and concentration, it seems safe to assume that they are equivalent to the fifth factor of noble right concentration, to be discussed under III/E and III/F, in which all three of these factors converge with right view and right resolve in a state of full development.
In fact, their mutual reinforcement is what makes these factors all “right.
This point is confirmed by §, which states that when the noble eightfold path goes to the culmination of its development, tranquility and insight act in concert.
This point also explains the statement at the beginning of § to the effect that the path consists primarily of right concentration, with the remaining factors as its supports and requisite conditions: These supports and conditions not only lead to right concentration, but when they all become noble, all eight factors coalesce in the mind in a state of solid oneness.
Whereas on the mundane level the path factors, though interconnected, were separate, on the noble level they form a single, unified path.
When the noble eightfold path is attained, the mind reaches the level of stream-entry, the first of the four levels of Awakening.
Thus the noble eightfold path represents the culmination of all seven sets in the Wings to Awakening.
To attain each of the next two levels of Awakening — once-returning and non-returning — the eight noble path factors must converge again in the mind.
However, to attain the highest level — Arahantship — the eight noble factors must converge together with two more: right knowledge and right release.
Right knowledge is nowhere defined per se in the Canon, but § would seem to indicate the following relationship between it and right view: Right view is realization of the four noble truths and the duties appropriate to each, while right knowledge is the realization that the duties have been brought to fulfillment.
The conjunction of right knowledge and right release reflects, on a higher level, the conjunction of discernment and concentration on the noble level of the eightfold path.
Passage § suggests that release here can be considered as analogous to concentration, albeit totally unshakable.
Right knowledge would include awareness of the unshakability of the release, while the release would remain unshaken even in the face of that knowledge.
At this point, even the path can be abandoned, for one has reached the goal.
Abandoning, here, does not mean that one reverts to wrongs views, wrong action, etc.; rather, one no longer needs to use right view, etc., as a means to a further attainment.
As MN and SN.
state, the Awakened one continues practicing meditation and exercising right view as pleasant dwellings for the mind, conducive to mindfulness and alertness, and leads a moral life both for its inherent pleasure and for the sake of the example it offers to those still on the path.
The noble eightfold path, like the seven factors for Awakening, is explicitly explained both as a causal loop and as a holographic formula.
We have already described the causal loop above, in showing how the development of the mundane and noble path factors follows the pattern of the five faculties.
Passage § presents a holographic pattern, in which the development of each factor needs three main supporting factors: right view, which acts as the leader so as to know what the right and wrong versions of the factors are; right effort, which makes the effort to abandon the wrong version and develop the right; and right mindfulness, which keeps the task of right effort in mind.
Thus three factors that we have identified as essential to the development of skillfulness — discernment, mindfulness, and effort — are involved at each step along the path.
As a result of that involvement, they grow stronger to the point where they can help turn mundane right concentration — the fourth factor essential to the development of skillfulness — into noble right concentration.
In this sense, they play a role analogous to that of heedfulness in the five faculties and appropriate attention in the seven factors for Awakening.
In fact, they seem to be a complete working out of the elements implicit in those two qualities.
A quick review of the seven sets will show that all of them develop both in a linear and in a holographic way.
Even the “holographic” sets — the frames of reference, right exertions, and bases of power — contain implicit versions of causal loops, in that all three must follow the three stages of frames-of-reference meditation.
Even the linear causal-loop sets — the five faculties and strengths, the seven factors for Awakening, and the noble eightfold path — contain implicit holographic formulae, in that the dynamic of their development is inherent in specific qualities or clusters of qualities: heedfulness in the case of the faculties and strengths, appropriate attention in the case of the factors for Awakening, and the cluster of right view, right mindfulness, and right effort in the case of the noble eightfold path.
This combination of linear and holographic patterns grows more complex as we remember that each of the first two stages of frames-of-reference meditation can form linear causal loops within themselves, while two of the factors in the three-part cluster that develops the eightfold path — right mindfulness and right effort — are equivalent to the holographic sets of the frames of reference and the right exertions.
This formal convergence of two causal patterns in the development of the path reflects not only the dual principle of this/that conditionality, but also a very practical point in the task of developing the skills of the mind.
The holographic pattern reflects the fact that all the skillful qualities needed for the path are already there in the mind and continually interact along the path.
All that is needed is for them to be ferreted out and nourished, their coordination fine-tuned, and they can deliver the mind to the goal.
The causal loop pattern reflects the fact that the process must take place over time, as specific qualities are stressed at specific junctures and strengthened by being put to use, and as different skillful qualities need to alternate in helping one another, step by step, along the way.
An analogy can be made with learning how to walk: A child who can't yet walk already has all the muscles needed to walk, but she must locate them and exercise them in a coordinated way so that the right and left leg can help and receive help from each other, in order to move from the first tentative step to the point where walking becomes natural and can be done with grace.
Monks, ignorance is the leader in the attainment of unskillful qualities, followed by lack of shame & lack of compunction.
In a unknowledgeable person, immersed in ignorance, wrong view arises.
In one of wrong view, wrong resolve arises.
In one of wrong resolve, wrong speech… In one of wrong speech, wrong action… In one of wrong action, wrong livelihood… In one of wrong livelihood, wrong effort… In one of wrong effort, wrong mindfulness… In one of wrong mindfulness, wrong concentration arises.
Clear knowing is the leader in the attainment of skillful qualities, followed by shame & compunction.
In a knowledgeable person, immersed in clear knowing, right view arises.
In one of right view, right resolve arises.
In one of right resolve, right speech… In one of right speech, right action… In one of right action, right livelihood… In one of right livelihood, right effort… In one of right effort, right mindfulness… In one of right mindfulness, right concentration arises.
Analysis of the Path.
Monks, what is the noble eightfold path?
Right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
And what is right view?
Knowledge with regard to stress, knowledge with regard to the origination of stress, knowledge with regard to the cessation of stress, knowledge with regard to the way of practice leading to the cessation of stress: This is called right view.

And what is right resolve?
Being resolved on renunciation, on freedom from ill will, on non-violence: This is called right resolve.
And what is right speech?
Abstaining from lying, from divisive speech, from abusive speech, & from idle chatter: This is called right speech.
And what is right action?
Abstaining from taking life, from taking what is not given, & from sexual intercourse: This is called right action.
And what is right livelihood?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones, having abandoned dishonest livelihood, keeps his life going with right livelihood.
This is called right livelihood.
And what is right effort?
There is the case where a monk generates desire, endeavors, arouses persistence, upholds & exerts his intent for the sake of the non-arising of evil, unskillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the sake of the abandoning of evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen… for the sake of the arising of skillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the maintenance, non-confusion, increase, plenitude, development, & culmination of skillful qualities that have arisen.
This is called right effort.

And what is right mindfulness?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
He remains focused on feelings in & of themselves… the mind in & of itself… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
This is called right mindfulness.

And what is right concentration?
There is the case where a monk — quite secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful qualities — enters & remains in the first jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
With the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
With the fading of rapture he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhāna, of which the noble ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' With the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of joys & distresses — he enters & remains in the fourth jhāna: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor pain.
This is called right concentration.

Having thus gone forth, following the training & way of life of the monks, abandoning the taking of life, he abstains from the taking of life.
He dwells with his rod laid down, his knife laid down, scrupulous, merciful, compassionate for the welfare of all living beings.
Abandoning the taking of what is not given, he abstains from taking what is not given.
He takes only what is given, accepts only what is given, lives not by stealth but by means of a self that has become pure.
Abandoning uncelibacy, he lives a celibate life, aloof, refraining from the sexual act that is the villager's way.
Abandoning false speech, he abstains from false speech.
He speaks the truth, holds to the truth, is firm, reliable, no deceiver of the world.
Abandoning divisive speech he abstains from divisive speech.
What he has heard here he does not tell there to break those people apart from these people here.
What he has heard there he does not tell here to break these people apart from those people there.
Thus reconciling those who have broken apart or cementing those who are united, he loves concord, delights in concord, enjoys concord, speaks things that create concord.
Abandoning abusive speech, he abstains from abusive speech.
He speaks words that are soothing to the ear, that are affectionate, that go to the heart, that are polite, appealing, & pleasing to people at large.
Abandoning idle chatter, he abstains from idle chatter.
He speaks in season, speaks what is factual, what is in accordance with the goal, the Dhamma, & the Vinaya.
He speaks words worth treasuring, seasonable, reasonable, circumscribed, connected with the goal.
More on Right Action & Right Speech for Lay People.
Abandoning sensual misconduct, he abstains from sensual misconduct.
He does not get sexually involved with those who are protected by their mothers, their fathers, their brothers, their sisters, their relatives, or their Dhamma; those with husbands, those who entail punishments, or even those crowned with flowers by another man.
Abandoning false speech, he abstains from false speech.
When he has been called to a town meeting, a group meeting, a gathering of his relatives, his guild, or of the royalty, if he is asked as a witness, 'Come & tell, good man, what you know': If he doesn't know, he says, 'I don't know.' If he does know, he says, 'I know.' If he hasn't seen, he says, 'I haven't seen.' If he has seen, he says, 'I have seen.' Thus he doesn't consciously tell a lie for his own sake, for the sake of another, or for the sake of any reward.

Visākha: Is the noble eightfold path fabricated or unfabricated?
Sister Dhammadinnā: The noble eightfold path is fabricated.
Visākha: And are the three aggregates included under the noble eightfold path, or is the noble eightfold path included under the three aggregates?
Sister Dhammadinnā: The three aggregates are not included under the noble eightfold path, but the noble eightfold path is included under the three aggregates.
Right speech, right action, & right livelihood come under the aggregate of virtue.
Right effort, right mindfulness, & right concentration come under the aggregate of concentration.
Right view & right resolve come under the aggregate of discernment.
Of those, right view is the forerunner.
And how is right view the forerunner?
One discerns wrong view as wrong view, and right view as right view.
This is one's right view.
And what is wrong view?
'There is nothing given, nothing offered, nothing sacrificed.
There is no fruit or result of good or bad actions.
There is no this world, no next world, no mother, no father, no spontaneously reborn beings; no contemplatives or brahmans who, faring rightly & practicing rightly, proclaim this world & the next after having directly known & realized it for themselves.' This is wrong view.
And what is right view?
Right view, I tell you, is of two sorts: There is right view with effluents, siding with merit, resulting in acquisitions; there is right view that is noble, without effluents, transcendent, a factor of the path.
And what is the right view with effluents, siding with merit, resulting in acquisitions?
'There is what is given, what is offered, what is sacrificed.
There are fruits & results of good & bad actions.
There is this world & the next world.
There is mother & father.
There are spontaneously reborn beings; there are contemplatives & brahmans who, faring rightly & practicing rightly, proclaim this world & the next after having directly known & realized it for themselves.' This is the right view with effluents, siding with merit, resulting in acquisitions.
And what is the right view that is noble, without effluents, transcendent, a factor of the path?
The discernment, the faculty of discernment, the strength of discernment, analysis of qualities as a factor for awakening, the path factor of right view of one developing the noble path whose mind is noble, whose mind is without effluents, who is fully possessed of the noble path.
This is the right view that is noble, without effluents, transcendent, a factor of the path.
One tries to abandon wrong view & to enter into right view: This is one's right effort.
One is mindful to abandon wrong view & to enter & remain in right view: This is one's right mindfulness.
Thus these three qualities — right view, right effort, & right mindfulness — run & circle around right view.
Of those, right view is the forerunner.
And how is right view the forerunner?
One discerns wrong resolve as wrong resolve, and right resolve as right resolve.
And what is wrong resolve?
Being resolved on sensuality, on ill will, on violence.
This is wrong resolve.
And what is right resolve?
Right resolve, I tell you, is of two sorts: There is right resolve with effluents, siding with merit, resulting in acquisitions; there is right resolve that is noble, without effluents, transcendent, a factor of the path.
And what is the right resolve with effluents, siding with merit, resulting in acquisitions?
Being resolved on renunciation, on freedom from ill will, on non-violence.
This is the right resolve with effluents, siding with merit, resulting in acquisitions.
And what is the right resolve that is noble, without effluents, transcendent, a factor of the path?
The thinking, directed thinking, resolve, fixity, transfixion, focused awareness, & verbal fabrications of one developing the noble path whose mind is noble, whose mind is without effluents, who is fully possessed of the noble path.
This is the right resolve that is noble, without effluents, transcendent, a factor of the path.
One tries to abandon wrong resolve & to enter into right resolve: This is one's right effort.
One is mindful to abandon wrong resolve & to enter & remain in right resolve: This is one's right mindfulness.
Thus these three qualities — right view, right effort, & right mindfulness — run & circle around right resolve.
Of those, right view is the forerunner.
And how is right view the forerunner?
One discerns wrong speech as wrong speech, and right speech as right speech.
And what is wrong speech?
Lying, divisive tale-bearing, abusive speech, & idle chatter.
This is wrong speech.
And what is right speech?
Right speech, I tell you, is of two sorts: There is right speech with effluents, siding with merit, resulting in acquisitions; there is right speech that is noble, without effluents, transcendent, a factor of the path.
And what is the right speech with effluents, siding with merit, resulting in acquisitions?
Abstaining from lying, from divisive tale-bearing, from abusive speech, & from idle chatter.
This is the right speech with effluents, siding with merit, resulting in acquisitions.
And what is the right speech that is noble, without effluents, transcendent, a factor of the path?
The abstaining, desisting, abstinence, avoidance of the four forms of verbal misconduct of one developing the noble path whose mind is noble, whose mind is without effluents, who is fully possessed of the noble path.
This is the right speech that is noble, without effluents, transcendent, a factor of the path.
One tries to abandon wrong speech & to enter into right speech: This is one's right effort.
One is mindful to abandon wrong speech & to enter & remain in right speech: This is one's right mindfulness.
Thus these three qualities — right view, right effort, & right mindfulness — run & circle around right speech.
Of those, right view is the forerunner.
And how is right view the forerunner?
One discerns wrong action as wrong action, and right action as right action.
And what is wrong action?
Killing, taking what is not given, illicit sex.
This is wrong action.
And what is right action?
Right action, I tell you, is of two sorts: There is right action with effluents, siding with merit, resulting in acquisitions; there is right action that is noble, without effluents, transcendent, a factor of the path.
And what is the right action with effluents, siding with merit, resulting in acquisitions?
Abstaining from killing, from taking what is not given, & from illicit sex.
This is the right action with effluents, siding with merit, resulting in acquisitions.
And what is the right action that is noble, without effluents, transcendent, a factor of the path?
The abstaining, desisting, abstinence, avoidance of the three forms of bodily misconduct of one developing the noble path whose mind is noble, whose mind is without effluents, who is fully possessed of the noble path.
This is the right action that is noble, without effluents, transcendent, a factor of the path.
One tries to abandon wrong action & to enter into right action: This is one's right effort.
One is mindful to abandon wrong action & to enter & remain in right action: This is one's right mindfulness.
Thus these three qualities — right view, right effort, & right mindfulness — run & circle around right action.
Of those, right view is the forerunner.
And how is right view the forerunner?
One discerns wrong livelihood as wrong livelihood, and right livelihood as right livelihood.
And what is wrong livelihood?
Scheming, persuading, hinting, belittling, & pursuing gain with gain.
This is wrong livelihood.
And what is right livelihood?
Right livelihood, I tell you, is of two sorts: There is right livelihood with effluents, siding with merit, resulting in acquisitions; there is right livelihood that is noble, without effluents, transcendent, a factor of the path.
And what is the right livelihood with effluents, siding with merit, resulting in acquisitions?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones abandons wrong livelihood and maintains his life with right livelihood.
This is the right livelihood with effluents, siding with merit, resulting in acquisitions.
And what is the right livelihood that is noble, without effluents, transcendent, a factor of the path?
The abstaining, desisting, abstinence, avoidance of wrong livelihood of one developing the noble path whose mind is noble, whose mind is without effluents, who is fully possessed of the noble path.
This is the right livelihood that is noble, without effluents, transcendent, a factor of the path.
One tries to abandon wrong livelihood & to enter into right livelihood: This is one's right effort.
One is mindful to abandon wrong livelihood & to enter & remain in right livelihood: This is one's right mindfulness.
Thus these three qualities — right view, right effort, & right mindfulness — run & circle around right livelihood.
Of those, right view is the forerunner.
And how is right view the forerunner?
In one of right view, right resolve comes into being.
In one of right resolve, right speech comes into being.
In one of right speech, right action… In one of right action, right livelihood… In one of right livelihood, right effort… In one of right effort, right mindfulness… In one of right mindfulness, right concentration… In one of right concentration, right knowledge… In one of right knowledge, right release comes into being.
Thus the learner is endowed with eight factors, and the Arahant with ten.
Of those, right view is the forerunner.
And how is right view the forerunner?
In one of right view, wrong view is abolished.
The many evil, unskillful qualities that come into play with wrong view as their condition are also abolished, while the many skillful qualities that have right view as their condition go to the culmination of their development.
In one of right release, wrong release is abolished.
The many evil, unskillful qualities that come into play with wrong release as their condition are also abolished, while the many skillful qualities that have right release as their condition go to the culmination of their development.
The Buddha: 'The stream, the stream,' it is said.
Now what is the stream?
Ven.
Sāriputta: Just this noble eightfold path is the stream: right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
The Buddha: Well said, Sāriputta, well said.
Just this noble eightfold path is the stream… 'Streamwinner, streamwinner,' it is said.
Now what is a streamwinner?
Ven.
Sāriputta: Whoever is endowed with this noble eightfold path is called a 'streamwinner.'
The Buddha: Well said, Sāriputta, well said.
Whoever is endowed with this noble eightfold path is called a 'streamwinner.'
Monks, just as a pot without a stand is easy to tip over, and a pot with a stand is hard to tip over, so too the mind without a stand is easy to tip over, and a mind with a stand is hard to tip over.
And what is the mind's stand?
Just this noble eightfold path.
It's possible that a well aimed spike of bearded wheat or bearded barley, if pressed by a hand or foot, will cut into the hand or foot and draw blood.
Why is that?
Because the spike is well aimed.
In the same way, it is possible that if one's views are well aimed, one's development of the path is well aimed, they will cut into ignorance, give rise to clear knowing, and lead to the realization of Unbinding.
Why is that?
Because one's views are well aimed.
And how do well-aimed views and a well-aimed development of the path cut into ignorance, give rise to clear knowing, and lead to the realization of Unbinding?
There is the case where a monk develops right view dependent on seclusion, dependent on dispassion, dependent on cessation, resulting in letting go.
He develops right resolve… right speech… right action… right livelihood… right effort… right mindfulness… right concentration dependent on seclusion… dispassion… cessation, resulting in letting go.
This is how well aimed views and a well aimed development of the path cut into ignorance, give rise to clear knowing, and lead to the realization of Unbinding.
Just as many kinds of wind blow in the air — east winds, west winds, north winds, south winds, dusty winds, dustless winds, cold winds, warm winds, gentle winds, & strong winds — in the same way, when a monk develops the noble eightfold path, pursues the noble eightfold path, the four frames of reference go to the culmination of their development, the four right exertions… the four bases of power… the five faculties… the five strengths… the seven factors for Awakening go to the culmination of their development.
Knowing & seeing the eye as it has come to be, knowing & seeing forms… eye-consciousness… eye-contact as they have come to be, knowing & seeing whatever arises conditioned by eye-contact — experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure-nor-pain — as it has come to be, one is not infatuated with the eye… forms… eye-consciousness… eye-contact… whatever arises conditioned by eye-contact and is experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure- nor-pain…
Knowing & seeing the ear… Knowing & seeing the nose… Knowing & seeing the tongue… Knowing & seeing the body…
Knowing & seeing the intellect as it has come to be, knowing & seeing ideas… intellect-consciousness… intellect-contact as they have come to be, knowing & seeing whatever arises conditioned by intellect-contact — experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure-nor-pain — as it has come to be, one is not infatuated with the intellect… ideas… intellect-consciousness… intellect-contact… whatever arises conditioned by intellect-contact and is experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
For him — uninfatuated, unattached, unconfused, remaining focused on their drawbacks — the five clinging-aggregates head toward future diminution.
The craving that makes for further becoming — accompanied by passion & delight, relishing now here & now there — is abandoned by him.
His bodily disturbances & mental disturbances are abandoned.
His bodily torments & mental torments are abandoned.
His bodily distresses & mental distresses are abandoned.
He is sensitive both to ease of body & ease of awareness.
Any view belonging to one who has come to be like this is his right view.
Any resolve, his right resolve.
Any effort, his right effort.
Any mindfulness, his right mindfulness.
Any concentration, his right concentration: just as earlier his actions, speech, & livelihood were already well-purified.
Thus for him, having thus developed the noble eightfold path, the four frames of reference go to the culmination of their development.
The four right exertions… the four bases of power… the five faculties… the five strengths… the seven factors for Awakening go to the culmination of their development.
for him these two qualities occur in tandem: tranquility & insight.
He comprehends through direct knowledge whatever qualities are to be comprehended through direct knowledge, abandons through direct knowledge whatever qualities are to be abandoned through direct knowledge, realizes through direct knowledge whatever qualities are to be realized through direct knowledge, and develops through direct knowledge whatever qualities are to be developed through direct knowledge.
And what qualities are to be comprehended through direct knowledge?
'The five clinging-aggregates,' should be the reply.
Which five?
The form clinging-aggregate… the feeling clinging-aggregate… the perception clinging-aggregate… the fabrication clinging-aggregate… the consciousness clinging-aggregate…
And what qualities are to be abandoned through direct knowledge?
Ignorance & craving for becoming…
And what qualities are to be developed through direct knowledge?
Tranquility & insight…
And what qualities are to be realized through direct knowledge?
Clear knowing & release…
Just as when there is a guest house where people come from the east to take up residence, from the west… the north… the south to take up residence: noble warriors come there to take up residence, brahmans… commoners… vassals come there to take up residence.
In the same way, when a monk develops the noble eightfold path, pursues the noble eightfold path, he comprehends through direct knowledge whatever qualities are to be comprehended through direct knowledge, abandons through direct knowledge whatever qualities are to be abandoned through direct knowledge, realizes through direct knowledge whatever qualities are to be realized through direct knowledge, and develops through direct knowledge whatever qualities are to be developed through direct knowledge.
'Suppose a man were traveling along a path.
He would see a great expanse of water, with the near shore dubious & risky, the further shore secure & free from risk, but with neither a ferryboat nor a bridge going from this shore to the other.
The thought would occur to him, “Here is this great expanse of water, with the near shore dubious & risky, the further shore secure & free from risk, but with neither a ferryboat nor a bridge going from this shore to the other.
What if I were to gather grass, twigs, branches, & leaves and, having bound them together to make a raft, were to cross over to safety on the further shore in dependence on the raft, making an effort with my hands & feet?” Then the man, having gathered grass, twigs, branches, & leaves, having bound them together to make a raft, would cross over to safety on the further shore in dependence on the raft, making an effort with his hands & feet.
Having crossed over to the further shore, he might think, “How useful this raft has been to me!
For it was in dependence on this raft that, making an effort with my hands & feet, I have crossed over to safety on the further shore.
Why don't I, having hoisted it on my head or carrying it on my back, go wherever I like?” What do you think, monks?
Would the man, in doing that, be doing what should be done with the raft?'
'No, lord.'
'And what should the man do in order to be doing what should be done with the raft?
There is the case where the man, having crossed over, would think, “How useful this raft has been to me!
For it was in dependence on this raft that, making an effort with my hands & feet, I have crossed over to safety on the further shore.
Why don't I, having dragged it on dry land or sinking it in the water, go wherever I like?” In doing this, he would be doing what should be done with the raft.
Even so monks, I have taught you the Dhamma like a raft, for the purpose of crossing over, not for the purpose of holding onto.
Understanding the Dhamma to be taught like a raft, you should let go even of dhammas, to say nothing of non-dhammas.'
The great expanse of water stands for the fourfold flood: the flood of sensuality, the flood of becoming, the flood of views, & the flood of ignorance.
The near shore, dubious & risky, stands for self-identity.
The further shore, safe and free from risk, stands for Unbinding.
The raft stands for just this noble eightfold path: right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
Making an effort with hands & feet stands for the arousing of persistence.
If the ways of the mind were simple, its problems would be simple and easy to solve.
The Buddha, in showing how to put an end to its problems, could have kept his instructions simple and short — a single, blanket approach to whatever happens in the present, a noble one-fold path: just mindfulness, just concentration, or just non-reactive awareness.
Or he might not have bothered to teach much at all, knowing that people could easily solve their problems on their own.
“Trust,” he might have said, “your innate nature, your innate understanding,” and left it at that.
But that's not how the mind works, and that's not how he taught.
Even just a few minutes spent observing the ways of the mind can show how complex and convoluted they are.
And this means that its problems are complex as well.
In particular, the problem of suffering: As the Buddha noted, the causes of suffering are knotted and tangled like a bird's nest, like the thread in a tangled skein.
As anyone who has solved a complex problem knows, the trick to finding its solution lies in how you frame the issue: identifying the problem and sorting out the pattern of factors related to it.
Seeing the pattern, you can decide which factors to focus on as crucial to its solution, and which ones you have to ignore so as not to get led down blind alleys.
Framing the issue also means deciding how to approach each of the crucial factors so that instead of maintaining or exacerbating the problem, they aid with its solution.
What this boils down to is, when faced with a problem, knowing which questions are helpful to ask about it, and which questions aren't.
If, for example, you're a doctor in an emergency room faced with a patient complaining of chest pains, you have many quick decisions to make.
You have to decide which tests to conduct, which questions to ask the patient, and which physical symptoms to look for, before you can diagnose the pains as a sign of indigestion, an incipient heart attack, or something else entirely.
You also have to decide which questions not to ask, so as not to get waylaid by extraneous information.
If you focus on the wrong symptoms, the patient might die — or might spend a needless night in the intensive care unit, depriving a patient with a genuine heart attack of a bed.
Once you've made your diagnosis, you have to decide which course of treatment to follow and how to keep tabs on that treatment to see if it's really working.
If you frame the symptoms in the wrong light, you can do more harm than good.
If you frame them in the right light, you can save lives.
The same principle applies in solving the problem of suffering, which is why the Buddha gave prime importance to the ability to frame the issue of suffering in the proper way.
He called this ability yoniso manasikara — appropriate attention — and taught that no other inner quality was more helpful for untangling suffering and gaining release.
In giving his most detailed explanation of appropriate attention, he starts with examples of inappropriate attention, which center on questions of identity and existence: “Do I exist?” “Do I not?” “What am I?” “Did I exist in the past?” “Will I exist in the future?” These questions are inappropriate because they lead to “a wilderness of views, a thicket of views” such as “I have a self,” or “I have no self,” all of which lead to entanglement, and none to the end of suffering.
In contrast, the Buddha then depicts appropriate attention as the ability to identify that “This is suffering,” “This is the origination of suffering,” “This is the cessation of suffering,” and “This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of suffering.” These are the four categories that the Buddha, in his first discourse, called the four noble truths.
The ability to frame the issue of suffering in line with these categories is what enables you ultimately to put an end to the problem of suffering once and for all.
This is why they're appropriate.
The most obvious lesson to be drawn from this way of distinguishing inappropriate from appropriate attention is that inappropriate attention frames the issues of the mind in terms of abstract categories, whereas appropriate attention frames them in terms of things that can be directly pointed to in immediate experience as “This… This… This… This.” Ideas of identity and existence are basic to abstract thinking, and many philosophers have maintained that they lie at the basis of any spiritual quest.
The Buddha, however, noted that the thought, “I am the thinker” lies at the root of all the categories and labels of conceptual proliferation, the type of thinking that can turn and attack the person employing it.
These categories are notoriously hard to pin down, often dissolving into arbitrary semantics.
“Do I exist?” — It depends on what you mean by “exist.” “Do I have a self?” — It depends on what you mean by “self.” Thinking driven by definitions like these often falls prey to the hidden motives or agendas behind the definitions, which means that it's unreliable.
However, suffering is something directly knowable: preverbal, private, but universal.
In framing the issues of the mind around suffering, the Buddha bases his teachings on an intention totally trustworthy — the desire for his listeners to put an end to all their suffering — and focuses on something not dependent on definitions.
In fact, he never offers a formal definition of the term “suffering” at all.
Instead, he illustrates it with examples — such as the suffering of birth, aging, illness, and death — and then points out the functional element that all forms of mental suffering share: clinging to the five aggregates of form, feeling, perception, mental fabrication, and consciousness.
The clinging is not the totality of the suffering, but it's the aspect of suffering most useful to focus on for the purpose of bringing the suffering to an end.
Although there is a passage where the Buddha defines clinging as desire-passion, he never describes precisely what desire-passion is.
In what is apparently the oldest part of the Canon, the Atthaka Vagga, he fills a long discussion of clinging with puns and word play, a style that discourages attempts at systematic, set definitions and the conceptual proliferation they can foster.
What this means is that if you want to refine your understanding of clinging, desire-passion, and suffering, you can't cling to words or texts.
You have to look deeper into your present experience.
In pointing repeatedly to direct experience, however, the Buddha doesn't discourage all thought and concepts.
The ability to distinguish the four categories of appropriate attention requires thought and analysis — the type of thought that questions past understandings and misunderstandings, and ponders what's happening in the present; the type of analysis that can ferret out connections between actions and their results and can evaluate them as to whether they're helpful or not.
There are desires, for instance, that act as a cause of suffering, and other desires that can form part of the path leading to its end.
Although the Buddha gives a general outline to tell which kind of desire functions in which way, you have to learn how to watch your own desires carefully and honestly to tell which kind of desire they are.
As you keep analyzing the present under the framework of these four categories, you're tracing the Buddha's steps as he approached Awakening.
Having focused on clinging as the functional handle on suffering, he looked for the conditions that formed its basis and found them in three types of craving or thirst: sensual craving, craving for states of being, and craving to destroy states of being.
Then he identified the cessation of suffering as total dispassion for, cessation of, and release from those forms of craving.
And he identified the mental qualities and practices that would lead to that cessation — right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right concentration — all of which, in potential form, can be found in the present moment.
So instead of simply throwing the present moment at you as a monolithic whole, the Buddha points your attention to four significant things you might find there.
This is because there's a pattern to the changes we experience from moment to moment.
Change is never so random or radical that knowledge gained from the past is useless in the present.
Concepts still serve an important purpose even though they may lack the freshness of the immediate here and now.
When you stick your finger into fire, it's bound to burn.
If you spit into the wind, it's bound to come back at you.
Lessons like these are good to keep in mind.
Although the patterns underlying suffering may be more tangled than those underlying fire and wind, still they are patterns.
They can be learned and mastered, and the four categories of appropriate attention are crucial for getting a handle on those patterns and directing them to suffering's end.
In practical terms, distinguishing among categories is worthwhile only if you have to treat each of the different categories in a different way.
A doctor who formulates a theory of sixteen types of headaches only to treat them all with aspirin, for example, is wasting her time.
But one who, noting that different types of headaches respond to different types of medications, devises an accurate test to differentiate among the headaches, makes a genuine contribution to medical science.
The same principle applies to the categories of appropriate attention.
As the Buddha stated in his first account of his Awakening, once he had identified each of the four categories, he saw that each had to be treated in a different way.
Suffering had to be comprehended, its cause abandoned, its cessation realized, and the path to its cessation fully developed.
What this means is that, as a meditator, you can't treat everything in the present moment in the same way.
You can't simply stay non-reactive, or simply accept everything that comes.
If moments of stillness and ease arise in the mind, you can't just note them and let them pass.
You should learn to develop them into jhana — the full-body pleasure and rapture of right concentration that forms the heart of the path.
When mental suffering arises, you can't just let it go.
You should focus whatever powers of concentration and discernment you have to try to comprehend the clinging that lies at its heart.
The Buddha and his disciples expand on this point in discourses where they show how appropriate attention should be applied to various aspects of the present.
Applied to the five aggregates of form, feeling, and so forth, appropriate attention means viewing them in such a way as to induce a sense of dispassion that will help alleviate clinging.
Applied to perceptions of beauty or irritation, it means viewing them in such a way as to keep them from fostering obstacles to right concentration, such as sensual desire or ill will.
When applied to feelings of serenity or the potential for rapture, it means viewing them in such a way that helps develop them into factors for Awakening.
Even within a particular category, there's no one approach that works in all cases.
In one of his discourses the Buddha observes that some unskillful mental states wither away if you simply watch them with equanimity, while others require an active effort to take them apart.
In another discourse he expands on this observation by recommending five ways of dealing with distracting thoughts: replacing them with more skillful thoughts, focusing on their drawbacks, consciously ignoring them, relaxing the tension that goes into maintaining them, and forcefully suppressing them.
In neither discourse, though, does he give hard and fast rules for telling which type of thought will respond to which approach.
You have to find out for yourself by sharpening your discernment through trial and error as to what works and what doesn't in any given situation.
The same principle applies to skillful mental states.
The Buddha's final summary of his teachings, the wings to Awakening, lists seven ways of conceiving the path to the end of suffering — in terms of four establishings of mindfulness, four bases for success, four right exertions, five strengths, five faculties, seven factors for Awakening, and the noble eightfold path.
And again, it's up to you to learn through trial and error which way of conceiving the path is most useful at any particular time in your practice.
This means that applying appropriate attention to skillful and unskillful mental states is not a one-shot affair.
The tasks connected with each of the four categories of appropriate attention all have to be tested through trial and error, and mastered as skills.
To borrow an analogy from the Canon, full Awakening is not a matter of picking up a bow and arrow and hoping for a fluke bull's eye.
The insight of Awakening comes in the course of practicing on a straw man until you're able “to shoot long distances, to fire accurate shots in rapid succession, and to pierce great masses.” 
As the Buddha noted in his first discourse, he didn't claim to be awakened until he had fully mastered the tasks appropriate to all four categories.
In fully developing the factors of the path, he fully comprehended the five clinging aggregates to the point of abandoning all passion and craving for them.
That was when he fully realized the end of suffering.
With that, the categories of appropriate attention had done their work in solving the problem of suffering, but even then they still had their uses.
As Ven.
Sariputta stated, even a fully awakened arahant would still apply them to experience to provide a pleasant dwelling for the mind in the here and now.
In all of these cases, appropriate attention means seeing things in terms of their function — what they can do — while the act of appropriate attention is itself a type of doing, adopted for what it can do for the mind.
And the test for appropriate attention is that it actually works in helping to put an end to suffering.
When we contrast this with the Buddha's examples of inappropriate attention, we see that attention is inappropriate when it frames things in terms of being and identity, and appropriate when framing them in terms of actions and their results.
In fact, appropriate attention looks at being itself as an action, with each act of being or assuming an identity to be evaluated by the pleasure or pain it produces.
When we look at ourselves with appropriate attention, we focus not on what we are, but on what we're doing — and in particular on whether what we're doing is unskillful — leading to suffering — or skillful, leading to its end.
This point is important to bear in mind when we reflect on the two criticisms often leveled against the four categories of appropriate attention.
The first criticism is that they provide a limited view of the fullness and variety of life, that they don't encompass the virtually infinite number of skillful ways of approaching experience.
When formulating a theory of being, you could argue that the more variety it can contain, the better.
But when choosing a doctor, you wouldn't want one who insists on exploring an infinite variety of approaches to your disease.
You want one who focuses on the approaches most likely to work.
The same holds true with appropriate attention.
The four categories, with their attendant tasks, are meant not to encompass reality but to focus your attention at the right factors for curing the most basic problem in experience.
The Buddha limits his discussion to these four categories because he doesn't want you to get distracted from the problem at hand.
The second criticism is that the four categories are dualistic and thus inferior to a non-dualistic view of the world.
Again, when formulating a theory of being, you could argue that a non-dualistic theory would be superior to a dualistic one, on the grounds that a non-dual concept of being is more encompassing than a dualistic one, yielding a more unified theory.
But appropriate attention is not a theory of being.
It's a guide to what to do in the present moment.
Because the present moment is so tangled and complex, the multiple categories offered by appropriate attention are a strength rather than a weakness.
Instead of limiting you to one way of understanding and approaching events in the present, they provide you with a more discerning understanding and a wide variety of options for dealing with the tangles and complexities of suffering.
When offering options for solving a problem, no particular number of options is, on principle, superior to any other.
What matters is that the options are enough to be adequate for the problem, but not so many as to obscure its solution and become a tangle themselves.
In other words, the options are to be judged, not against abstract principles, but by what they enable you to do.
Although the Buddha describes his path to the end of suffering as the one form of doing that ultimately puts an end to doing, as long as you're still doing something in the present moment, appropriate attention ensures that what you're doing stays on the path: You know which strands in the knot of suffering to pull in which way, and which to leave alone.
And once you can untangle the problem of suffering, everything else gets untangled as well.
As we noted in the Introduction, all of the factors listed in the Wings to Awakening can be subsumed under the five faculties.
Whereas Part II focused on the interrelationships among these various factors, this part of the book is devoted to using the five faculties as a framework for discussing the individual factors in and of themselves.
Of the five faculties, the faculty of conviction covers the most ground, as it includes the total context for the practice of the Buddha's teachings.
The many issues related to the attitudes and ethics needed to lead a Buddhist life, whether as a lay person or a monastic, fall under this category.
Passage § defines the faculty of conviction as the four factors of stream-entry, so to understand the nature of conviction, it is necessary to know what these four factors are.
Passages § and § give different definitions for the four.
The first list gives prerequisites for stream-entry: association with good people, listening to the true Dhamma, appropriate attention, and practice in accordance with the Dhamma.
The second list gives qualities that characterize a person who has entered the stream: verified confidence in the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha; and virtues appealing to the noble ones.
Both lists are relevant here, for conviction is a quality that leads to stream-entry, whereas the attainment of stream-entry is the point where conviction becomes unshakable.
Only on the attainment of Arahantship does knowledge become so total that conviction is no longer needed.
The two lists of the factors of stream-entry are similar in that they both cover all three aspects of conviction: social, intellectual, and practical.
Because conviction is focused not on a descriptive proposition but on a course of action — the skillful mastery of the processes of kamma in a social context — these aspects are inextricably intertwined.
The social aspect comes from the need to associate with people who have already mastered these processes, learning from their words and emulating their actions.
The intellectual aspect — belief in the principle of kamma — is necessary because the development of skillfulness within the mind requires that one understand the nature of kamma, take responsibility for one's actions, and have conviction in one's ability to benefit from developing one's skills.
The practical aspect is necessary, for if one does not follow through in developing skill, it shows that one's conviction in the development of skillfulness is not genuine, and that one is not fully benefiting from one's beliefs.
The relationship of these factors to the development of skillfulness is shown in several passages.
For instance, § and § cite association with good people and appropriate attention — both of which are members of the first list above — as the primary external and internal prerequisites for the development of what is skillful.
At the same time, the intellectual and practical aspects of conviction help to counteract the grosser levels of the roots of unskillfulness: belief in the principle of kamma helps to undercut delusion, while the practice of virtue helps to weaken the force of greed and aversion in the mind.
To understand the detailed interaction of the social, intellectual, and practical aspects of conviction, we first have to examine them separately.
Because having admirable people as friends is the whole of the holy life, we will begin with the social aspect first.
The passages in this section focusing on the social aspect of conviction touch on two major issues: how to recognize good people, and why one should associate with them.
Passage § lists three basic teachings of good people.
These can be taken as criteria for judging whether a person qualifies as good.
If one meets people who criticize the practice of generosity, the practice of going forth into the renunciate life, or the practice of giving service to one's parents, one would do well to avoid associating with them, for their wisdom and motives cannot be trusted.
If one must associate with them, one should not regard them as people to learn from or to emulate.
Thus the social and intellectual aspects of conviction interact in that one way of knowing whether to associate with a person is by listening to what that person teaches; at the same time, the teachings of good people enable one to know what is good.
Passage § carries this point further, listing positive qualities to look for in a good person: conviction in the principle of kamma, generosity, virtue, and discernment.
People who teach these qualities and embody them in their lives qualify as good.
The important point here, of course, is that good people are ultimately recognized by what they habitually do, rather than simply by what they say.
These habits can be known only through long association over time.
This is why, in the Buddhist monkhood, a student does not take a lifetime vow of obedience to a teacher.
If he feels that the teacher does not have his best interests at heart — i.e., if he sees that the teacher does not really embody the above qualities — he is free to leave the teacher in search of another.
A person who has attained stream-entry finds it easier to recognize good people, for he/she is now a member of the noble Sangha and can recognize the qualities of that attainment in others as well.
“Good people” for a member of the Sangha means the Buddha and the rest of the noble Sangha.
Of course the Buddha has long been totally unbound, but he left his Dhamma and Vinaya as a teacher in his stead, and so on that level one may still associate with him.
The reason why a person embarking on the path to practice would need to associate with good people, rather than trying to be totally self-reliant, is that the roots of skillfulness within the mind lie mixed with the roots of unskillfulness, and the roots of unskillfulness make it difficult to tell which is which.
Thus one needs the advice and example of others more experienced on the path to help identify one's own skillful qualities and to give encouragement in the task of developing them.
Even if one is not yet committed to following the path, one would be wise to associate with good people who embody conviction, generosity, virtue, and discernment, for they are unlikely to treat one in an unfair or harmful manner.
If they truly embody conviction and virtue, one can trust that their sense of shame and compunction will prevent them from acting on unskillful intentions.
If they truly embody generosity and discernment, they have wisdom worth acquiring and will be willing to share it.
This sharing of wisdom forms the basis for further benefits — as listed in § & § — setting in motion a causal chain leading all the way to the experience of Awakening.
This causal chain requires that one listen to the teachings of good people so as to understand the implications of the principle of kamma.
It also requires that one take such people as examples to emulate in one's own life.
In this way, one can become a better person oneself and can enjoy the benefits coming with one's own improved mastery over the principle of kamma.
The wide availability of books on Buddhism tends to obscure the fact that the truths of the Buddha's teachings are not simply words or propositions, but are qualities of the heart and mind: the skillful mastery of thoughts, words, and deeds.
These qualities are best learned not from books but from people who are actually skilled.
This is like learning a sport.
One can pick up important principles from books written about the sport, but there is much more on a non-verbal level that can be learned only by associating with people who have actually mastered the sport.
This might include a sense of how much practice is enough, a sense of one's own strengths and weaknesses, a sense of timing, a sense of one's teammates and opponents, and so forth.
AN.
gives a similar list of the principles that characterize a good person, many of which cannot be verbalized in simple rules: knowledge of the Dhamma, knowledge of the meaning of statements, a sense of one's own strengths and weaknesses, a sense of moderation in the use of the requisites of life, a sense of the proper time and season for doing things, a sense of different levels of societies, and a sense of how to judge people.
Although the first two types of knowledge in this list are verbal and can be passed on in words, the others are more subliminal and can be picked up only by associating with good people and watching them in action.
With the issue of verbal knowledge we move from the social aspect of conviction to its intellectual aspect.
The content of the verbal knowledge that can be picked up from good people begins with what § defines as mundane right view:
There is what is given, what is offered, what is sacrificed.
There are fruits & results of good & bad actions.
There is this world & the next world.
There is mother & father.
There are spontaneously reborn beings; there are contemplatives & brahmans who, faring rightly & practicing rightly, proclaim this world & the next after having directly known & realized it for themselves.
As noted in II/H, this passage means that there is merit in generosity; that the moral qualities of good and bad are inherent in the universe, and not simply social conventions; that there is life after death; that one has a true moral debt to one's parents; and that there are people who have lived the renunciate's life properly in such a way that they have gained true and direct knowledge of these matters.
These beliefs form the minimum prerequisite for following the path to skillfulness.
If one doubts them, one will find it difficult to muster the energy or commitment needed to develop skillful qualities in the mind.
One would be more likely to revert to the selfish gratification of immediate desires, with little thought for right or wrong.
The willingness to accept these beliefs on faith thus counts as the first step from the stage of mere acquaintance with the Buddha's teachings to the stage of commitment.
These beliefs form the basis for the three points mentioned above as the teachings of good people: generosity, going forth, and service to one's parents.
Appreciating the value of these principles, and following them to the extent of one's abilities, enables one to develop the proper character needed for comprehending the higher levels of the Buddha's teachings, culminating in the four noble truths.
As the first list of factors of stream-entry points out, simply listening to the Dhamma is not enough.
One has to develop appropriate attention as well, which as we have already seen involves knowing how to focus on the right questions.
In this context, one begins by learning how to ask productive questions of one's teacher and then moves on to using the categories of the four noble truths to ask questions of one's experience in general.
In this sense, the act of listening and paying appropriate attention covers the first two levels in the development of discernment — understanding based on listening and on reasoning — and gets one started on the third: understanding based on the development of skillful qualities in the mind.
Although listening to the Dhamma is a prerequisite for appropriate attention, appropriate attention does not follow automatically from listening to the Dhamma.
It has to be consciously cultivated; otherwise, the causal process will not lead to clear knowledge and release.
This point is expressed in a famous stanza from the Dhammapada:
The purpose of meditation, in which one consciously develops mindfulness and discernment so as to master and understand the skillful use of the mind, is to turn one into the perceptive person who can fully understand the Dhamma.
With the attainment of stream-entry at one's first taste of the Deathless, the intellectual aspect of conviction is expressed in terms of verified conviction in the Awakening of the Buddha, which branches out into verified conviction in the Triple Gem: the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha.
One's own taste of Awakening verifies the reality of the Buddha's Awakening and that of the noble Sangha; one's understanding of how the Awakening came about through the practice of the Dhamma verifies that the noble eightfold path is the ideal synopsis of that practice, with nothing lacking or in excess.
From this comes the standard expression of conviction in the Triple Gem: The Buddha is rightly self-awakened; the Dhamma, well taught; and the noble Sangha, worthy of honor.
What this means in practical terms is that one is now convinced beyond a doubt that the human ability to develop skillfulness can lead all the way to the Deathless, and that the Deathless is the highest excellence.
Several passages emphasize that the experience of stream-entry reinforces one's conviction that the true Dhamma is fully expressed only in the Buddha's teachings.
This point will come as a surprise to many people who are aware of Buddhism's long history of tolerance toward other religions, and who assume that the enlightened attitude toward alternative teachings is to endorse the statement that many roads lead to the top of the mountain.
This assumption, though, is based on a confusion between “tolerance” and “endorsement.” As we have already noted, from the streamwinner's point of view the noble eightfold path is the ideal expression of the way to Awakening.
To endorse any other path to the same goal would be to concede that the noble eightfold path either lacks something essential or contains something superfluous.
The Buddha is quoted as saying that any other supposed path to Awakening would by definition be wrong: wrong view, wrong resolve, wrong speech, etc.
To try to get results from such a path, he says, would be like trying to squeeze sesame oil out of gravel or to churn butter out of water.
He did not deny that other teachings, advocating virtue and concentration, can lead to states of great peace or to rebirth in the higher heavens, but if one views those attainments as equivalent to Unbinding, one is suffering from wrong view.
To hold to that wrong view puts the total release to be found with Unbinding beyond reach.
This unwillingness to endorse other paths, however, does not necessarily lead to intolerance.
Buddhism's basic premise is the principle of kamma, that happiness and suffering are the results of one's own past and present actions.
The noble eightfold path grows out of this principle as the most skillful mode of action for escaping from the cycle of kammic retribution and attaining the Deathless.
Other paths are either incomplete expressions of the noble eightfold path or are based on other principles.
For example, they may state that there is a being who can sidestep the law of kamma and provide for one's happiness without one's having to master the skills of the noble eightfold path, or that certain ritual actions or words can provide a similar shortcut to happiness.
People who follow either of these two latter beliefs could well feel threatened by outsiders who do not share their beliefs, for the outsiders are in effect denying the existence of a shortcut on which the insiders are placing their hopes.
This explains why such people have often been intolerant of outside views.
But because the principle of kamma is a teaching of full personal responsibility, no one who believes in kamma will feel threatened by people who teach shortcuts around kamma.
Buddhists who have yet to attain stream-entry may waver in their conviction — as the path can seem long and arduous, and the results slow in coming — and this is one reason why they are encouraged not to associate with anyone who rejects the principle of kamma.
But those who have had their first taste of Awakening can in no way be persuaded to doubt the principle, for they have seen that the Deathless can be touched only through a process that requires the utmost skill in mindfulness and discernment applied to the processes of one's own mind.
Their attitude toward other teachings is that of a skilled artisan toward those with lesser skills, or of a woman who has learned how to extract sesame oil from sesame seeds toward those who are still trying to extract it from gravel: she will want to teach them the right way if they are willing to listen, but if they are unwilling, she will tolerate their ignorance and hope that someday they will be ready to learn.
To attain this level of unshakable conviction requires that one put the Dhamma into practice.
This shows the intimate relationship between the intellectual and practical aspects of conviction: one must have a certain level of intellectual understanding of the doctrinal Dhamma before one can practice it, and one must practice it to the point of touching the Dhamma of Deathlessness as an attainment before one's conviction in the teaching of the Dhamma can become unshakably firm.
The commentaries bring out this relationship by applying the term Dhamma to all three of these levels: doctrine, practice, and attainment, or in other words, Dhamma as an object of awareness, as a means of releasing awareness from bondage to its objects, and as the awareness released.
The practical aspect of conviction, prior to stream-entry, is covered by the factor of stream-entry called “practicing in accordance with the Dhamma.” What this factor means is that one must be willing to put the Dhamma ahead of one's preferences, so that one is not practicing simply in line with one's likes and dislikes.
This is the true test of one's conviction.
It is all too easy to pick and choose from the teachings on the basis of other standards — here in the West it is common to judge the Dhamma against Western psychology or other social sciences, and to pick and choose accordingly — but one must ask oneself the same question that Prince Siddhattha posed for himself: Which is a more worthwhile use of one's time, the pursuit of objects and ideals subject to change and death, or the pursuit of the Deathless?
Although there is a long-standing recognition in the Buddhist tradition that people benefit even if they follow only part of the teaching, the Dhamma can give its full results only if one commits oneself fully to developing the skill of release in one's thoughts, words, and deeds.
This training is similar to following a doctor's regimen.
One will benefit even from following the regimen only occasionally, but a full cure requires sticking to the regimen consistently and putting the goal of recovery ahead of one's other preferences.
The skill of release requires ordering one's priorities, taking the teachings and example of those who have attained that skill as one's primary guide, and regarding everything else as secondary.
With the attainment of stream-entry, one's conviction in the principle of kamma and its skillful mastery becomes so firm that one would not intentionally break any of the basic precepts that comprise right speech, right action, or right livelihood.
This is the import of the factor of stream-entry called “virtues appealing to the noble ones.” In addition to virtue, streamwinners have also begun to develop the other two aggregates in the noble path — concentration and discernment — but those two aggregates are not yet fully matured.
As § & § make clear, conviction cannot become firm until the remaining four faculties, including concentration and discernment, have been strengthened to at least some extent.
Once conviction does becomes firm, it can then function to strengthen those faculties even further.
The streamwinner realizes, from the experience of stream-entry, not only that he/she attained that experience through mastery of the processes of kamma, but also that his/her Awakening is not yet complete because there are gaps in that mastery.
This realization is what gives impetus for the further development of all five faculties until they issue in the full realization of the Deathless.
As he was seated to one side, Ven.
Ānanda said to the Blessed One, 'This is half of the holy life, lord: admirable friendship, admirable companionship, admirable camaraderie.'
'Don't say that, Ānanda.
Don't say that.
Admirable friendship, admirable companionship, admirable camaraderie is actually the whole of the holy life.
When a monk has admirable people as friends, companions, & comrades, he can be expected to develop & pursue the noble eightfold path.
'And how does a monk who has admirable people as friends, companions, & comrades, develop & pursue the noble eightfold path?
There is the case where a monk develops right view dependent on seclusion, dependent on dispassion, dependent on cessation, resulting in letting go.
He develops right resolve… right speech… right action… right livelihood… right effort… right mindfulness… right concentration dependent on seclusion… dispassion… cessation, resulting in letting go.
This is how a monk who has admirable people as friends, companions, & comrades, develops & pursues the noble eightfold path.
'And through this line of reasoning one may know how admirable friendship, admirable companionship, admirable camaraderie is actually the whole of the holy life: It's in dependence on me as an admirable friend that beings subject to birth have gained release from birth, that beings subject to aging have gained release from aging, that beings subject to death have gained release from death, that beings subject to sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair have gained release from sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.'
Mahānāma, to the Buddha: There may be the case where a Dhamma disagreement arises, with the Blessed One on one side and the Community of monks on the other.
I would be on the same side as the Blessed One.
May the Blessed One remember this as my confidence in him.
There may be the case where a Dhamma disagreement arises, with the Blessed One on one side and the Community of monks & the Community of nuns on the other.
I would be on the same side as the Blessed One.
May the Blessed One remember this as my confidence in him… 
There may be the case where a Dhamma disagreement arises, with the Blessed One on one side and the Community of monks & the Community of nuns & the male lay followers & the female lay followers & the world with its devas, māras, brahmās, its generations with their contemplatives & brahmans, their royalty & common folk on the other.
I would be on the same side as the Blessed One.
May the Blessed One remember this as my confidence in him.
The Buddha: Now Godha, what do you have to say about Mahānāma when he speaks in such a way?
Godha: I have nothing to say about Mahānāma when he speaks in such a way, except that he is admirable & skillful.
Advice to a lay person.
Now what, TigerPaw, is meant by admirable friendship?
There is the case where a lay person, in whatever town or village he may dwell, spends time with householders or householders' sons, young or old, who are advanced in virtue.
He talks with them, engages them in discussions.
He emulates consummate conviction in those who are consummate in conviction, consummate virtue in those who are consummate in virtue, consummate generosity in those who are consummate in generosity, & consummate discernment in those who are consummate in discernment.
This is called admirable friendship.
A friend endowed with these three qualities is worth associating with.
Which three?
He gives what is hard to give, does what is hard to do, endures what is hard to endure.
A friend endowed with these three qualities is worth associating with.
These three things have been promulgated by wise people, by people of integrity.
Which three?
Generosity… going-forth… & service to one's mother & father.
These three things have been promulgated by wise people, by people of integrity.
And what, monks, is the treasure of generosity?
There is the case of a disciple of the noble ones, his awareness cleansed of the stain of stinginess, living at home, freely generous, openhanded, delighting in being magnanimous, responsive to requests, delighting in the distribution of alms.
This is called the treasure of generosity.
If beings knew, as I know, the results of giving & sharing, they would not eat without having given, nor would the stain of miserliness overcome their minds.
Even if it were their last bite, their last mouthful, they would not eat without having shared, if there were someone to receive their gift.
But because beings do not know, as I know, the results of giving & sharing, they eat without having given.
The stain of miserliness overcomes their minds.
Monks, brahmans & householders are very helpful to you, as they provide you with the requisites of robes, alms food, lodgings, & medical requisites for the sick.
And you, monks, are very helpful to brahmans & householders, as you teach them the Dhamma admirable in the beginning, admirable in the middle, & admirable in the end, as you expound the holy life both in letter & meaning, entirely complete, surpassingly pure.
In this way the holy life is lived in mutual dependence, for the purpose of crossing over the flood, for making a right end to stress.
Now what is the level of a person of no integrity?
A person of no integrity is ungrateful & unthankful.
This ingratitude, this lack of thankfulness, is advocated by rude people.
It is entirely on the level of people of no integrity.
A person of integrity is grateful & thankful.
This gratitude, this thankfulness, is advocated by civil people.
It is entirely on the level of people of integrity.
I tell you, monks, there are two people who are not easy to repay.
Which two?
Your mother & father.
Even if you were to carry your mother on one shoulder & your father on the other shoulder for years, and were to look after them by anointing, massaging, bathing, & rubbing their limbs, and they were to defecate & urinate right there, you would not in that way pay or repay your parents.
If you were to establish your mother & father in absolute sovereignty over this great earth, abounding in the seven treasures, you would not in that way pay or repay your parents.
Why is that?
Mother & father do much for their children.
They care for them, they nourish them, they introduce them to this world.
But anyone who rouses his unbelieving mother & father, settles & establishes them in conviction; rouses his unvirtuous mother & father, settles & establishes them in virtue; rouses his stingy mother & father, settles & establishes them in generosity; rouses his foolish mother & father, settles & establishes them in discernment: To this extent one pays & repays one's mother & father.
Living with Brahmā are those families where, in the home, mother & father are revered by the children.
Living with the first devas are those families where, in the home, mother & father are revered by the children.
Living with the first teachers are those families where, in the home, mother & father are revered by the children.
Living with those worthy of gifts are those families where, in the home, mother & father are revered by the children.
'Brahmā' is a designation for mother & father.
'The first devas'… 'the first teachers'… 'those worthy of gifts' is a designation for mother & father.
Why is that?
Mother & father do much for their children.
They care for them, they nourish them, they introduce them to this world.
'A beginning point for ignorance —, “Before this, ignorance did not exist; then it came into play” — cannot be discerned.' This has been said.
Nevertheless, it can be discerned, 'Ignorance comes from this condition.' And I tell you, ignorance has its nutriment.
It is not without nutriment.
And what is the nutriment for ignorance?
The five hindrances… And what is the nutriment for the five hindrances?
The three forms of misconduct… And what is the nutriment for the three forms of misconduct?
Lack of restraint of the senses… And what is the nutriment for lack of restraint of the senses?
Lack of mindfulness & alertness… And what is the nutriment for lack of mindfulness & alertness?
Inappropriate attention… And what is the nutriment for inappropriate attention?
Lack of conviction… And what is the nutriment for lack of conviction?
Not hearing the true Dhamma… And what is the nutriment for not hearing the true Dhamma?
Associating with people of no integrity,… 
Just as when the devas pour rain in heavy drops & crash thunder on the upper mountains: the water, flowing down along the slopes, fills the mountain clefts & rifts & gullies.
When the mountain clefts & rifts & gullies are full, they fill the little ponds.
When the little ponds are full, they fill the big lakes… the little rivers… the big rivers.
When the big rivers are full, they fill the great ocean, and thus is the great ocean fed, thus is it filled.
In the same way, when not associating with people of integrity is brought to fulfillment, it fulfills not hearing the true Dhamma… lack of conviction… inappropriate attention… lack of mindfulness & alertness… l ack of restraint of the senses… the three forms of misconduct… the five hindrances.
When the five hindrances are brought to fulfillment, they fulfill ignorance.
Thus is ignorance fed, thus is it brought to fulfillment.
Now, I tell you, clear knowing & release have their nutriment.
They are not without nutriment.
And what is their nutriment?
The seven factors for Awakening… And what is the nutriment for the seven factors for Awakening?
The four frames of reference… And what is the nutriment for the four frames of reference?
The three forms of right conduct… And what is the nutriment for the three forms of right conduct?
Restraint of the senses… And what is the nutriment for restraint of the senses?
Mindfulness & alertness… And what is the nutriment for mindfulness & alertness?
Appropriate attention… And what is the nutriment for appropriate attention?
Conviction… And what is the nutriment for conviction?
Hearing the true Dhamma… And what is the nutriment for hearing the true Dhamma?
Associating with people of integrity…
Just as when the devas pour rain in heavy drops & crash thunder on the upper mountains: the water, flowing down along the slopes, fills the mountain clefts & rifts & gullies… the little ponds… the big lakes… the little rivers… the big rivers.
When the big rivers are full, they fill the great ocean, and thus is the great ocean fed, thus is it filled.
In the same way, when associating with people of integrity is brought to fulfillment, it fulfills hearing the true Dhamma… conviction… appropriate attention… mindfulness & alertness… restraint of the senses… the three forms of right conduct… the four frames of reference… the seven factors for Awakening.
When the seven factors for Awakening are brought to fulfillment, they fulfill clear knowing & release.
Thus is clear knowing & release fed, thus is it brought to fulfillment.
These are eight causes, eight conditions, for the attainment of discernment basic to the holy life when it has not yet been attained, and for its growth, its increase, & for the culmination of its development when it has.
Which eight?
There is the case where a monk dwells in dependence on the Teacher, or another fellow in the holy life worthy of being a teacher, under whom he becomes firmly established in a strong sense of shame & compunction, love & respect.
This is the first cause, the first condition…
And what is the treasure of shame?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones feels shame at bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, mental misconduct.
This is called the treasure of shame.
And what is the treasure of compunction?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones feels compunction at bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, mental misconduct.
This is called the treasure of compunction.
As he so lives, he periodically approaches his teacher to ask & inquire of him, 'How, venerable sir, does this happen?
What is the meaning of this?' To him the teacher reveals what is hidden, clarifies what is obscure, and dispels any doubt he may have about the various things that give him reason to doubt.
This is the second cause, the second condition…
When he has heard the Dhamma, he accomplishes twofold seclusion: seclusion of body & seclusion of mind.
This is the third cause, the third condition…
He is virtuous & lives restrained by the Pāṭimokkha, consummate in his behavior & range of activity.
Seeing danger in the slightest fault, he undertakes & trains himself in the training rules.
This is the fourth cause, the fourth condition…
He is erudite, a keeper & storehouse of learning.
He is erudite in the teachings — admirable in their beginning, admirable in their middle, admirable in their end — that affirm the holy life in letter & meaning, entirely complete, surpassingly pure; he has resolved on them, has made them familiar to his speech, has pondered them over in his mind, and has penetrated them in terms of his views.
This is the fifth cause, the fifth condition…
He keeps his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful mental qualities and taking on skillful mental qualities.
He is steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful mental qualities.
This is the sixth cause, the sixth condition…
When he joins the Community he is not talkative, nor does he discuss low topics.
He either speaks Dhamma himself or asks someone else to, and he does not despise noble silence.
This is the seventh cause, the seventh condition…
Finally, he remains focused on the arising & passing away of the five clinging-aggregates: 'Such is form, such its origination, such its disappearance.
Such is feeling… Such is perception… Such are fabrications… Such is consciousness, such its origination, such its disappearance.' This is the eighth cause, the eighth condition for the attainment of discernment basic to the holy life when it has not yet been attained, and for its growth, its increase, & for the culmination of its development when it has.
These are the five rewards of conviction in a lay person.
Which five?
When people of integrity in the world show compassion, they will first show compassion to people of conviction, and not to people without conviction.
When visiting, they first visit people of conviction, and not people without conviction.
When accepting gifts, they will first accept those from people with conviction, and not from people without conviction.
When teaching the Dhamma, they will first teach those with conviction, and not those without conviction.
A person of conviction, on the breakup of the body, after death, will arise in a good destination, the heavenly world.
These are the five rewards of conviction in a lay person.
Just as a large banyan tree, on level ground where four roads meet, is a haven for the birds all around, even so a lay person of conviction is a haven for many people: monks, nuns, male lay followers, & female lay followers.
A female disciple of the noble ones who grows in terms of these five types of growth grows in the noble growth, grasps hold of what is essential, what is excellent in the body.
Which five?
She grows in terms of conviction, in terms of virtue, in terms of learning, in terms of generosity, in terms of discernment.
Growing in terms of these five types of growth, the female disciple of the noble ones grows in the noble growth, grasps hold of what is essential, what is excellent in the body.
For a disciple who has conviction in the Teacher's message & lives to penetrate it, what accords with the Dhamma is this: 'The Blessed One is the Teacher, I am a disciple.
He is the one who knows, not I.' For a disciple who has conviction in the Teacher's message & lives to penetrate it, the Teacher's message is healing & nourishing.
For a disciple who has conviction in the Teacher's message & lives to penetrate it, what accords with the Dhamma is this: 'Gladly would I let the flesh & blood in my body dry up, leaving just the skin, tendons, & bones, but if I have not attained what can be reached through human firmness, human persistence, human striving, there will be no relaxing my persistence.' For a disciple who has conviction in the Teacher's message & lives to penetrate it, one of two fruits can be expected: either gnosis here & now, or — if there be any remnant of clinging/sustenance — non-return.
Several discourses in the Canon state that the first step in concentration practice is to abandon the five hindrances, which we have already discussed in conjunction with the seven factors for Awakening.
They are: sensual desire, ill will, sloth & drowsiness, restlessness & anxiety, and uncertainty.
These hindrances need to be abandoned because they function as intermediate levels of the three roots of unskillfulness.
Sensual desire is a form of greed; ill will, a form of aversion; and the remaining three hindrances, forms of delusion.
All five, in their various ways, block concentration and weaken discernment by making it difficult to realize what is beneficial for oneself, for others, or for both.
This last point makes them particularly tricky to deal with, for one needs to have a sense that they are unbeneficial states of mind before one can work at abandoning them, yet while one is overcome with them, they impair one's ability to see that they are in fact unbeneficial.
For instance, when one feels sensual desire for another person, it is hard to focus on the unattractive side of that person or on the drawbacks of the desire itself.
Similarly, when one feels anger, it is hard not to feel that the anger is justified; when sleepy, it is hard not to feel that one should get some sleep; when worried, it is hard not to believe that one needs to worry, and so forth.
Although the hindrances cannot be totally relinquished prior to the various stages of Awakening, they can be lessened on a preliminary level to the point where the mind can settle down in jhāna.
This preliminary level is the focus of the passages in this section.
Passage § lists five methods for dealing with unskillful thoughts in the course of meditation.
The passages included here focus almost exclusively on using the first two of those methods — replacing the unskillful thoughts with skillful ones, and contemplating the drawbacks of the unskillful thoughts until one feels repulsed by them — so as to escape from the power of any hindrances that have overcome the mind.
Examples of the first method include focusing on the unattractive side of any sensual object to which one may be attracted; focusing on the good qualities of a person who has aroused thoughts of ill will; focusing on the foolishness of expecting all people to act in line with one's wants; and changing one's object of concentration when finding that the current object is inducing sleepiness.
Examples of the second method include realizing that the hindrance is placing the mind in a state of bondage and limitation, and that one can find freedom only by releasing oneself from its power.
In practice, these are not the only ways of applying these two general approaches.
The examples in the texts can act as inspiration for any similar techniques that a meditator might devise to obtain the desired effect.
To escape the double bind mentioned above — the fact that the hindrances blind one to one's own true best interests, and yet one needs to see those true interests if one is to overcome the hindrances — one must depend on all five faculties as one has been able to develop them.
Conviction is needed so that one will listen to the advice of those who point out the drawbacks of the hindrances.
A certain momentum of persistence, as right exertion, is needed so that one will make the effort to abandon the hindrance as soon as one is aware that it has arisen and before it grows into anything stronger.
Mindfulness, based on the frames of reference, is needed so that one can be alert to the arising of the hindrances and can remember why they should be abandoned in the first place.
This mindfulness can be strengthened by remembering the teachings of others who have pointed out the drawbacks of the hindrances — the many similes for the hindrances given in passages §§- and § serve the purpose of keeping those memories vivid.
It can also be strengthened by remembering the drawbacks of the hindrances as encountered in one's own personal experience: the damage that has come when another person has given in to them, and the things that one regrets having done oneself when under their influence.
Because preliminary levels of concentration and discernment are present in right exertion and the practice of the frames of reference, these faculties play a role in abandoning the hindrances as well.
As they develop strength, they make one more and more skilled in cutting off the hindrances as effectively as possible.
The seven factors for Awakening, which are developed in concentration, act as direct antidotes to the hindrances, while discernment — combined with concentrated mindfulness — helps in mastering what is probably the most effective tool for not being fooled by the hindrances: the ability to separate the hindrance, as an act of the mind, from its object.
For instance, discernment makes one able to see the feeling of sensual desire as one thing, and the object of the desire as something separate.
This ability is crucial in a number of ways.
To begin with, it helps separate the positive qualities of the object from the act of desiring the object, so that one does not confuse the two.
The tendency to confuse the two is what makes it hard to see the drawbacks of the desire when it is present in the mind, and at the same time, serves to harden the mind in general against the Buddha's admonishments against sensuality.
There is a widespread feeling that Buddhism gives an unfair valuation of sensuality and is blind to the positive beauties of sensual objects, but this is simply not true.
The Buddha admitted that sensual objects have their beauty and can give a measure of satisfaction.
He pointed out, however, that the beauty of an object is not the whole story, for all beautiful objects must decay.
If one's happiness is based on them, that happiness is in for a fall.
More importantly, though, the Buddha defined sensuality not as the objects of the senses, but as the passion and delight that one feels for ones intentions toward such objects.
Although the objects of the senses are neither good nor evil per se, the act of passion and delight forms a bond on the mind, disturbing its immediate peace and ensuring its continued entrapment in the round of rebirth and redeath.
Only by separating the desire from its object can one directly perceive the truth of these teachings.
This point applies to the other hindrances as well.
For instance, when one can separate the object of one's anger from the anger itself as a mental event, one can see the obvious drawbacks of allowing anger to take over the mind.
In addition, the ability to separate the act from its object enables one to become sensitive to the act before it becomes overpowering, at the same time allowing one to regard it simply as a mental quality in and of itself.
One can then engage in the practice outlined in § — that of observing the coming and going of the hindrances as one tries to bring the mind to concentration.
In this way, one eventually becomes so familiar with the patterns underlying their occurrence that one can undercut them and eliminate them from the mind for good.
Passage § gives an example of one of the patterns that one will see when sensual desire arises: sexual attraction for another person begins with a sense of attraction for one's own sexuality.
Passage §, in a more abstract fashion, lists other patterns of mind that feed the hindrances.
By perceiving such patterns, one can take one's analysis of the roots of unskillfulness in the mind to ever more subtle levels.
In this way, the skill of being able to abandon the hindrances will go beyond simply the preliminary level of concentration practice, exercising all five of the faculties to the point where they issue in Awakening.
These are the five hindrances & obstructions that overcome awareness & weaken discernment.
Which five?
Sensual desire is a hindrance & obstruction that overcomes awareness & weakens discernment.
Ill will… Sloth & drowsiness… Restlessness & anxiety… Uncertainty is a hindrance & obstruction that overcomes awareness & weakens discernment…
Suppose there were a river, flowing down from the mountains, going far, its current swift, carrying everything with it: If a man were to open watercourses leading off from both sides, the current in the middle of the river would be interrupted, diverted, & dispersed.
The river would not go far, its current would not be swift, and it would not carry everything with it.
In the same way, if a monk has not rid himself of these five hindrances… there is no possibility that he can know what is for his own benefit, or the benefit of others, or both; or that he should come to realize a superior human attainment, a truly noble knowledge & vision…
But suppose there were a river, flowing down from the mountains, going far, its current swift, carrying everything with it: If a man were to close off the watercourses leading off from both sides, the current in the middle of the river would not be interrupted, diverted, or dispersed.
The river would go far, its current swift, carrying everything with it.
In the same way, if a monk has rid himself of these five hindrances… there is the possibility that he can know what is for his own benefit, or the benefit of others, or both, and that he should come to realize a superior human attainment, a truly noble knowledge & vision.
When gold is debased by these five impurities, it is not pliant, malleable, or luminous.
It is brittle and not ready to be worked.
Which five?
Iron, copper, tin, lead, & silver… But when gold is not debased by these five impurities, it is pliant, malleable, & luminous.
It is not brittle and is ready to be worked.
Then whatever sort of ornament one has in mind — whether a belt, an earring, a necklace, or a gold chain — it would serve one's purpose.
In the same way, when the mind is debased by these five impurities, it is not pliant, malleable, or luminous.
It is brittle and not rightly concentrated for the ending of the effluents.
Which five?
Sensual desire, ill will, sloth & drowsiness, restlessness & anxiety, and uncertainty… But when the mind is not debased by these five impurities, it is pliant, malleable, & luminous.
It is not brittle and is rightly concentrated for the ending of the effluents.
Then whichever of the six higher knowledges one turns one's mind to know & realize, one can witness them for oneself whenever there is an opening…
Similes for the Hindrances.
Imagine a bowl of water mixed with lac, yellow orpiment, indigo, or crimson, such that a man with good eyesight examining the reflection of his face in it would not be able to know or see his face as it has come to be.
In the same way, when one remains with awareness possessed by sensual passion, overcome with sensual passion, and neither knows nor sees the escape, as it has come to be, from sensual passion once it has arisen, then one neither knows nor sees what is for one's own benefit, or for the benefit of others, or for the benefit of both…
Now imagine a bowl of water heated on a fire, boiling & bubbling over, such that a man with good eyesight examining the reflection of his face in it would not be able to know or see his face as it has come to be.
In the same way, when one remains with awareness possessed by ill will, overcome with ill will, and neither knows nor sees the escape, as it has come to be, from ill will once it has arisen, then one neither knows nor sees what is for one's own benefit, or for the benefit of others, or for the benefit of both…
Now imagine a bowl of water covered with algae & slime, such that a man with good eyesight examining the reflection of his face in it would not be able to know or see his face as it has come to be.
In the same way, when one remains with awareness possessed by sloth & drowsiness, overcome with sloth & drowsiness, and neither knows nor sees the escape, as it has come to be, from sloth & drowsiness once it has arisen, then one neither knows nor sees what is for one's own benefit, or for the benefit of others, or for the benefit of both…
Now imagine a bowl of water ruffled by the wind, disturbed, & covered with waves, such that a man with good eyesight examining the reflection of his face in it would not be able to know or see his face as it has come to be.
In the same way, when one remains with awareness possessed by restlessness & anxiety, overcome with restlessness & anxiety, and neither knows nor sees the escape, as it has come to be, from restlessness & anxiety once it has arisen, then one neither knows nor sees what is for one's own benefit, or for the benefit of others, or for the benefit of both…
Now imagine a bowl of water stirred up, turbid, muddied, & left in the dark, such that a man with good eyesight examining the reflection of his face in it would not be able to know or see his face as it has come to be.
In the same way, when one remains with awareness possessed by uncertainty, overcome with uncertainty, and neither knows nor sees the escape, as it has come to be, from uncertainty once it has arisen, then one neither knows nor sees what is for one's own benefit, or for the benefit of others, or for the benefit of both…
Suppose that a man, taking a loan, invests it in his business affairs.
His business affairs succeed.
He repays his old debts and has extra left over for maintaining his wife.
The thought would occur to him, 'Before, taking a loan, I invested it in my business affairs.
Now my business affairs have succeeded.
I have repaid my old debts and have extra left over for maintaining my wife.' Because of that he would gain joy & experience happiness.
Now suppose that a man falls sick — in pain & seriously ill.
He does not enjoy his meals and has no measure of strength in his body.
At a later time he is released from that sickness.
He enjoys his meals and has a measure of strength in his body.
The thought would occur to him, 'Before, I was sick… Now I am released from that sickness.
I enjoy my meals and have a measure of strength in my body.' Because of that he would gain joy & experience happiness.
Now suppose that a man is bound in prison.
At a later time he is released from that bondage, safe & sound, with no loss of property.
The thought would occur to him, 'Before, I was bound in prison.
Now I am released from that bondage, safe & sound, with no loss of my property.' Because of that he would gain joy & experience happiness.
Now suppose that a man is a slave, subject to others, not subject to himself, unable to go where he likes.
At a later time he is released from that slavery, subject to himself, not subject to others, freed, able to go where he likes.
The thought would occur to him, 'Before, I was a slave… Now I am released from that slavery, subject to myself, not subject to others, freed, able to go where I like.' Because of that he would gain joy & experience happiness.
Now suppose that a man, carrying money & goods, is traveling by a road through desolate country.
At a later time he emerges from that desolate country, safe & sound, with no loss of property.
The thought would occur to him, 'Before, carrying money & goods, I was traveling by a road through desolate country.
Now I have emerged from that desolate country, safe & sound, with no loss of my property.' Because of that he would gain joy & experience happiness.
In the same way, when these five hindrances are not abandoned within him, the monk regards it as a debt, a sickness, a prison, slavery, a road through desolate country.
But when these five hindrances are abandoned within him, he regards it as unindebtedness, good health, release from prison, freedom, a place of security.
Sensual desire.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's Park.
Now on that occasion the Blessed One was sitting out in the open in the pitch black of the night, while oil lamps were burning.
Many flying insects were meeting their downfall & misfortune in those oil lamps.
Seeing this… the Blessed One exclaimed,
§.
I will teach you a Dhamma discourse on bondage & lack of bondage… A woman attends inwardly to her feminine faculties, her feminine gestures, her feminine manners, feminine poise, feminine desires, feminine voice, feminine charms.
She is excited by that, delighted by that.
Being excited & delighted by that, she attends outwardly to masculine faculties, masculine gestures, masculine manners, masculine poise, masculine desires, masculine voices, masculine charms.
She is excited by that, delighted by that… wants to be bonded to what is outside her, wants whatever pleasure & happiness that arise based on that bond.
Delighting, caught up in her femininity, a woman goes into bondage with reference to men.
This is how a woman does not transcend her femininity.
A man attends inwardly to his masculine faculties, masculine gestures, masculine manners, masculine poise, masculine desires, masculine voice, masculine charms.
He is excited by that, delighted by that.
Being excited & delighted by that, he attends outwardly to feminine faculties, feminine gestures, feminine manners, feminine poise, feminine desires, feminine voices, feminine charms.
He is excited by that, delighted by that… wants to be bonded to what is outside him, wants whatever pleasure & happiness that arise based on that bond.
Delighting, caught up in his masculinity, a man goes into bondage with reference to women.
This is how a man does not transcend his masculinity.
And how is there lack of bondage?
A woman does not attend inwardly to her feminine faculties… feminine charms.
She is not excited by that, not delighted by that… does not attend outwardly to masculine faculties… masculine charms.
She is not excited by that, not delighted by that… does not want to be bonded to what is outside her, does not want whatever pleasure & happiness that arise based on that bond.
Not delighting, not caught up in her femininity, a woman does not go into bondage with reference to men.
This is how a woman transcends her femininity.
A man does not attend inwardly to his masculine faculties… masculine charms.
He is not excited by that, not delighted by that… does not attend outwardly to feminine faculties… feminine charms.
He is not excited by that, not delighted by that… does not want to be bonded to what is outside him, does not want whatever pleasure & happiness that arise based on that bond.
Not delighting, not caught up in his masculinity, a man does not go into bondage with reference to women.
This is how a man transcends his masculinity.
This is how there is lack of bondage.
And this is the Dhamma discourse on bondage & lack of bondage.
'Suppose a dog, overcome with weakness & hunger, were to come across a slaughterhouse, and there a skilled butcher or butcher's apprentice were to fling him a chain of bones — thoroughly scraped, without any flesh, smeared with blood.
What do you think?
Would the dog, gnawing on that chain of bones — thoroughly scraped, without any flesh, smeared with blood — appease his weakness & hunger?'
'No, lord.
And why is that?
Because the chain of bones is thoroughly scraped, without any flesh, & smeared with blood.
The dog would get nothing but weariness & vexation.'
'In the same way, householder, a disciple of the noble ones considers this: “The Blessed One has compared sensuality to a chain of bones, of much stress, much despair.
The drawback there is greater.” Seeing this with right discernment as it has come to be, then avoiding the equanimity coming from multiplicity, dependent on multiplicity, he develops the equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness, where clingings for worldly baits totally cease without trace.
'Now suppose a vulture, a kite, or a hawk were to take off, having seized a lump of flesh, and other vultures, kites, or hawks — following right after it — were to tear at it & pull at it.
What do you think?
If that vulture, kite, or hawk were not quickly to drop that lump of flesh, would it meet with death from that cause, or with death-like pain?'
'Yes, lord.'
'In the same way, householder, a disciple of the noble ones considers this: “The Blessed One has compared sensuality to a lump of flesh, of much stress, much despair.
The drawback there is greater”… He develops the equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness, where clingings for worldly baits totally cease without trace.
'Now suppose a man were to come against the wind, carrying a burning grass torch.
What do you think?
If he were not quickly to drop that grass torch, would he burn his hand or his arm or some other part of his body, so that he would meet with death from that cause, or with death-like pain?'
'Yes, lord.'
'In the same way, householder, a disciple of the noble ones considers this: “The Blessed One has compared sensuality to a grass torch, of much stress, much despair.
The drawback there is greater”… He develops the equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness, where clingings for worldly baits totally cease without trace.
'Now suppose there were a pit of glowing embers, deeper than a man's height, full of embers that were neither flaming nor smoking, and a man were to come along — loving life, hating death, loving pleasure, abhorring pain — and two strong men, having grabbed him with their arms, were to drag him to the pit of embers.
What do you think?
Wouldn't the man twist his body this way & that?'
'Yes, lord.
And why is that?
Because he would realize, “If I fall into this pit of glowing embers, I will meet with death from that cause, or with death-like pain.”'
'In the same way, householder, a disciple of the noble ones considers this: “The Blessed One has compared sensuality to a pit of glowing embers, of much stress, much despair.
The drawback there is greater”… He develops the equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on sin-gleness, where clingings for worldly baits totally cease without trace.
'Now suppose a man, when dreaming, were to see delightful parks, delightful forests, delightful stretches of land, & delightful lakes, and on awakening were to see nothing.
In the same way, householder, a disciple of the noble ones considers this point: “The Blessed One has compared sensuality to a dream, of much stress, much despair.
The drawback there is greater”… He develops the equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness, where clingings for worldly baits totally cease without trace.
'Now suppose a man having borrowed some goods — a manly carriage, fine jewels, & ear ornaments — were to go into the market preceded & surrounded by his borrowed goods, and people seeing him would say, “How wealthy is this man, for this is how the wealthy enjoy their possessions,” but the actual owners, wherever they might see him, would strip him then & there of what is theirs.
What do you think?
Would the man justifiably be upset?'
'No, lord.
And why is that?
Because the owners are stripping him of what is theirs.'
'In the same way, householder, a disciple of the noble ones considers this point: “The Blessed One has compared sensuality to borrowed goods, of much stress, much despair.
The drawback there is greater”… He develops the equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness, where clingings for worldly baits totally cease without trace.
'Now suppose that, not far from a village or town, there were a dense forest grove, and there in the grove was a tree with delicious fruit, abundant fruit, but with no fruit fallen to the ground.
A man would come along, desiring fruit, looking for fruit, searching for fruit.
Plunging into the forest grove, he would see the tree… and the thought would occur to him, “This is a tree with delicious fruit, abundant fruit, and there is no fruit fallen to the ground, but I know how to climb a tree.
Why don't I climb the tree, eat what I like, and fill my clothes with the fruit?” So, having climbed the tree, he would eat what he liked and fill his clothes with the fruit.
Then a second man would come along, desiring fruit… searching for fruit and carrying a sharp ax.
Plunging into the forest grove, he would see the tree… and the thought would occur to him, “… I don't know how to climb a tree.
Why don't I chop down this tree at the root, eat what I like, and fill my clothes with the fruit?” So he would chop the tree at the root.
What do you think?
If the first man who climbed the tree didn't quickly come down, wouldn't the falling tree crush his hand or foot or some other part of his body, so that he would meet with death from that cause, or with death-like pain?'
'Yes, lord.'
'In the same way, householder, a disciple of the noble ones considers this point: “The Blessed One has compared sensuality to the fruits of a tree, of much stress, much despair.
The drawback there is greater.” Seeing this with right discernment as it has come to be, then avoiding the equanimity coming from multiplicity, dependent on multiplicity, he develops the equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on single-ness, where clingings for worldly baits totally cease without trace.
The Buddha: Māgandiya, suppose that there was a leper covered with sores & infections, devoured by worms, picking the scabs off the openings of his wounds with his nails, cauterizing his body over a pit of glowing embers.
Then suppose his friends, companions, & relatives brought a doctor to treat him.
The doctor would concoct medicine, and by means of that medicine he would be cured of his leprosy: well & happy, free, master of himself, going wherever he liked.
Then suppose two strong men, having grabbed him with their arms, were to drag him to a pit of glowing embers.
What do you think?
Wouldn't he twist his body this way and that?
Māgandiya: Yes, Master Gotama.
Why is that?
The fire is painful to the touch, very hot & scorching.
The Buddha: Now what do you think?
Is the fire painful to the touch, very hot & scorching, only now, or was it also that way before?
Māgandiya: Both now & before is it painful to the touch, very hot & scorching.
It's just that when the man was a leper… his faculties were impaired, which was why, even though the fire was actually painful to the touch, he had the skewed perception of 'pleasant.'
The Buddha: In the same way, sensuality in the past was painful to the touch, very hot & scorching; sensuality in the future will be painful to the touch, very hot & scorching; sensuality at present is painful to the touch, very hot & scorching; but when beings are not free from passion for sensuality — devoured by sensual craving, burning with sensual fever — their faculties are impaired, which is why, even though sensuality is actually painful to the touch, they have the skewed perception of 'pleasant.'
Now suppose that there was a leper covered with sores & infections, devoured by worms, picking the scabs off the openings of his wounds with his nails, cauterizing his body over a pit of glowing embers.
The more he cauterized his body over the pit of glowing embers, the more disgusting, foul-smelling, & putrid the openings of his wounds would become, and yet he would feel a modicum of enjoyment & satisfaction because of the itchiness of his wounds.
In the same way, beings not free from passion for sensuality — devoured by sensual craving, burning with sensual fever — indulge in sensuality.
The more they indulge in sensuality, the more their sensual craving increases and the more they burn with sensual fever, and yet they feel a modicum of enjoyment & satisfaction dependent on the five strings of sensuality.
Now what do you think?
Have you ever seen or heard of a king or king's minister — enjoying himself, provided & endowed with the five strings of sensuality, without abandoning sensual craving, without removing sensual fever — who has dwelt or will dwell or is dwelling free from thirst, his mind inwardly at peace?
Māgandiya: No, Master Gotama.
The Buddha: Very good, Māgandiya.
Neither have I… But whatever contemplatives or brahmans who have dwelt or will dwell or are dwelling free from thirst, their minds inwardly at peace, all have done so having realized — as it has come to be — the origination & disappearance, the allure, the danger, & the escape from sensuality, having abandoned sensual craving and removed sensual fever.
§.
§.
As Subhā the nun was going through Jīvaka's delightful mango grove, a libertine blocked her path, so she said to him:
Ill will.
These are five ways of subduing hatred by which, when hatred arises in a monk, he should wipe it out completely.
Which five?
When one gives birth to hatred for an individual, one should develop good will for that individual.
Thus the hatred for that individual should be subdued.
When one gives birth to hatred for an individual, one should develop compassion for that individual… equanimity toward that individual… one should pay him no mind & pay him no attention… When one gives birth to hatred for an individual, one should direct one's thoughts to the fact of his being the product of kamma: 'This venerable one is the doer of kamma, heir of kamma, born of kamma, related by kamma, and has kamma as his arbitrator.
Whatever kamma he does, for good or for evil, to that will he fall heir.' Thus the hatred for that individual should be subdued.
These are five ways of subduing hatred by which, when hatred arises in a monk, he should wipe it out completely.
Ven.
Sāriputta: There are some people who are impure in their bodily behavior but pure in their verbal behavior.
Hatred for a person of this sort should be subdued.
There are some people who are impure in their verbal behavior but pure in their bodily behavior.
Hatred for a person of this sort should also be subdued.
There are some people who are impure in their bodily behavior & verbal behavior, but who periodically experience mental clarity & calm.
Hatred for a person of this sort should also be subdued.
There are some people who are impure in their bodily behavior & verbal behavior, and who do not periodically experience mental clarity & calm.
Hatred for a person of this sort should also be subdued.
There are some people who are pure in their bodily behavior & their verbal behavior, and who periodically experience mental clarity & calm.
Hatred for a person of this sort should also be subdued.
Now as for a person who is impure in his bodily behavior but pure in his verbal behavior, how should one subdue hatred for him?
Just as when a monk who makes use of things that are thrown away sees a rag in the road: taking hold of it with his left foot and spreading it out with his right, he would tear off the sound part and go off with it.
In the same way, when the individual is impure in his bodily behavior but pure in his verbal behavior, one should at that time pay no attention to the impurity of his bodily behavior, and instead pay attention to the purity of his verbal behavior.
Thus the hatred for him should be subdued.
And as for a person who is impure in his verbal behavior, but pure in his bodily behavior, how should one subdue hatred for him?
Just as when there is a pool overgrown with slime & water plants, and a person comes along, burning with heat, covered with sweat, exhausted, trembling, & thirsty.
He would jump into the pool, part the slime & water plants with both hands, and then, cupping his hands, drink the water and go on his way.
In the same way, when the individual is impure in his verbal behavior but pure in his bodily behavior, one should at that time pay no attention to the impurity of his verbal behavior, and instead pay attention to the purity of his bodily behavior.
Thus the hatred for him should be subdued.
And as for a person who is impure in his bodily behavior & verbal behavior, but who periodically experiences mental clarity & calm, how should one subdue hatred for him?
Just as when there is a little puddle in a cow's footprint, and a person comes along, burning with heat, covered with sweat, exhausted, trembling, & thirsty.
The thought would occur to him, 'Here is this little puddle in a cow's footprint.
If I tried to drink the water using my hand or cup, I would disturb it, stir it up, & make it unfit to drink.
What if I were to get down on all fours and slurp it up like a cow, and then go on my way?' So he would get down on all fours, slurp up the water like a cow, and then go on his way.
In the same way, when an individual is impure in his bodily behavior & verbal behavior, but periodically experiences mental clarity & calm, one should at that time pay no attention to the impurity of his bodily behavior… the impurity of his verbal behavior, and instead pay attention to the fact that he periodically experiences mental clarity & calm.
Thus the hatred for him should be subdued.
And as for a person who is impure in his bodily behavior & verbal behavior, and who does not periodically experience mental clarity & calm, how should one subdue hatred for him?
Just as when there is a sick man — in pain, seriously ill — traveling along a road, far from the next village & far from the last, unable to get the food he needs, unable to get the medicine he needs, unable to get a suitable assistant, unable to get anyone to take him to human habitation.
Now suppose another person were to see him coming along the road.
He would do what he could out of compassion, pity, & sympathy for the man, thinking, 'O that this man should get the food he needs, the medicine he needs, a suitable assistant, someone to take him to human habitation.
Why is that?
So that he won't fall into ruin right here.' In the same way, when a person is impure in his bodily behavior & verbal behavior, and who does not periodically experience mental clarity & calm, one should do what one can out of compassion, pity, & sympathy for him, thinking, 'O that this man should abandon wrong bodily conduct and develop right bodily conduct, abandon wrong verbal conduct and develop right verbal conduct, abandon wrong mental conduct and develop right mental conduct.
Why is that?
So that, on the breakup of the body, after death, he won't fall into the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, hell.' Thus the hatred for him should be subdued.
And as for a person who is pure in his bodily behavior & verbal behavior, and who periodically experiences mental clarity & calm, how should one subdue hatred for him?
Just as when there is a pool of clear water — sweet, cool, & limpid, with gently sloping banks, & shaded on all sides by trees of many kinds — and a person comes along, burning with heat, covered with sweat, exhausted, trembling, & thirsty.
Having plunged into the pool, having bathed & drunk & come back out, he would sit down or lie down right there in the shade of the trees.
In the same way, when an individual is pure in his bodily behavior & verbal behavior, and periodically experiences mental clarity & calm, one should at that time pay attention to the purity of his bodily behavior… the purity of his verbal behavior, and to the fact that he periodically experiences mental clarity & calm.
Thus the hatred for him should be subdued.
An entirely inspiring individual can make the mind grow serene.
These are five ways of subduing hatred by which, when hatred arises in a monk, he should wipe it out completely.
There are these ten ways of subduing hatred.
Which ten?
Thinking, 'He has done me harm.
But what should I expect?' one subdues hatred.
Thinking, 'He is doing me harm.
But what should I expect?… He is going to do me harm.
But what should I expect?… He has done harm to people who are dear & pleasing to me.
But what should I expect?… He is doing harm to people who are dear & pleasing to me.
But what should I expect?… He is going to do harm to people who are dear & pleasing to me.
But what should I expect?… He has aided people who are not dear or pleasing to me.
But what should I expect?… He is aiding people who are not dear or pleasing to me.
But what should I expect?… He is going to aid people who are not dear or pleasing to me.
But what should I expect?' one subdues hatred.
One doesn't get worked up over impossibilities.
These are ten ways of subduing hatred.
§.
Sloth & drowsiness.
Once the Blessed One was living among the Bhaggas in the Deer Park at Bhesakalā Grove, near Crocodile Haunt.
At that time Ven.
Mahā Moggallāna sat nodding near the village of Kallavalaputta, in Magadha.
The Blessed One saw this with his purified divine eye, surpassing the human, and as soon as he saw this — just as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm — disappeared from the Deer Park… appeared right in front of Ven.
Mahā Moggallāna, and sat down on a prepared seat.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to Ven.
Mahā Moggallāna, 'Are you nodding, Moggallāna?
Are you nodding?'
'Yes, lord.'
'Well then, Moggallāna, whatever perception you have in mind when drowsiness descends on you, don't attend to that perception, don't pursue it.
It's possible that by doing this you will shake off your drowsiness.
'But if by doing this you don't shake off your drowsiness, then recall to your awareness the Dhamma as you have heard & memorized it, re-examine it & ponder it over in your mind.
It's possible that by doing this you will shake off your drowsiness.
'But if by doing this you don't shake off your drowsiness, then repeat aloud in detail the Dhamma as you have heard & memorized it.
It's possible that by doing this you will shake off your drowsiness.
'But if by doing this you don't shake off your drowsiness, then pull both your earlobes and rub your limbs with your hands.
It's possible that by doing this you will shake off your drowsiness.
'But if by doing this you don't shake off your drowsiness, then get up from your seat and, after washing your eyes out with water, look around in all directions and upward to the major stars & constellations.
It's possible that by doing this you will shake off your drowsiness.
'But if by doing this you don't shake off your drowsiness, then attend to the perception of light, resolve on the perception of daytime, by night as by day, and by day as by night.
By means of an awareness thus open & unhampered, develop a brightened mind.
It's possible that by doing this you will shake off your drowsiness.
'But if by doing this you don't shake off your drowsiness, then — percipient of what lies in front & behind — set a distance to meditate walking back & forth, your senses inwardly immersed, your mind not straying outward.
It's possible that by doing this you will shake off your drowsiness.
'But if by doing this you don't shake off your drowsiness, then — reclining on your right side — take up the lion's posture, one foot placed on top of the other, mindful, alert, with your mind set on getting up.
As soon as you wake up, get up quickly, with the thought, “I won't stay indulging in the pleasure of lying down, the pleasure of reclining, the pleasure of drowsiness.
'Thus, Moggallāna, should you train yourself…'
The passages in this section deal with right concentration in terms of three questions that deserve appropriate attention:
To answer the first question: Passage § defines concentration as singleness of mind, but not every instance of mental singleness counts as right concentration.
Passage § identifies right concentration with the four levels of jhāna — meditative absorption — and § makes the point that jhāna can be considered right concentration only if it is devoid of unskillful qualities such as the hindrances.
Absorption in sensual passion, for instance, even though it may be very single-minded, does not count as part of the path.
Thus the definition for the first level of jhāna specifies that it counts as a path factor only when the mind is secluded from sensuality and unskillful mental qualities.
The singleness of jhāna means not only that awareness is focused on a single object, but also that the object is reduced to a single quality that fills the entirety of one's awareness, at the same time that one's awareness broadens to suffuse the entire object.
This mutual pervasion of awareness and object in a state of expansion is what is meant by absorption.
The similes used to illustrate the various levels of jhāna repeatedly make mention of “expansion,” “suffusing,” “stretching,” and “filling”, culminating in the fourth jhāna where one's body is filled with a bright sense of awareness.
This sense of expansion and making-single is also indicated in passages that teach specific meditation techniques.
The directions for keeping the breath in mind, for instance, state that one should be sensitive to the entire body while breathing in and out.
This accounts for the term “mahaggata” — enlarged or expanded — used to describe the mind in the state of jhāna.
There are two basic types of jhāna, which the commentaries term “form jhāna” and “formless jhāna”.
Each type has several levels.
In the case of form jhāna, different passages in the Canon list the levels in different ways.
The differences revolve around two different senses of the word “form.” In one sense, “form” denotes the body, and form jhāna is a state of mental absorption in the form of one's own physical body, as sensed from within.
Jhana focused on this type of form comes in four levels, identical with the four levels mentioned in the definition of the faculty of concentration and of right concentration under the noble eightfold path.
In another sense, “form” can also denote the visible forms and light that some meditators can see in the mind's eye in the course of their meditation.
This type of form jhāna is analyzed into two patterns, one with two levels, the other with three.
Both patterns end with the perception of the “beautiful,” which in terms of its function is equivalent to the sense of radiance filling the body on the fourth level of “body form” jhāna.
For a person practicing form jhāna in either sense of the term, the equanimity experienced with the sense of beautiful radiance can then act as the basis for the formless levels of jhāna, which the Canon terms the four “formlessnesses beyond form.” These are invariably defined as progressive absorption in the perceptions of “infinite space,” “infinite consciousness,” and “there is nothing,” leading to a fourth state of neither perception nor non-perception.
As for the second question, on how to master right concentration: Passage § notes that the ability to attain the first level of jhāna — however one experiences the “form” acting as its focus — depends on the abandoning of the hindrances, because the feeling of freedom that comes with their abandoning provides the sense of joy and pleasure that lets the mind settle skillfully in the present moment.
How to master this process is best shown by following the Buddha's most detailed set of meditation instructions — the sixteen steps in the practice of keeping the breath in mind — and comparing them with the standard description of the four stages of jhāna.
Before we analyze these maps of the practice, however, we must make a few comments on how to use them skillfully.
To begin with, internal obstacles to the practice of jhāna do not end with the preliminary ground-clearing of the hindrances discussed in the preceding section.
More refined levels of unskillful mental states can get in the way.
Lapses in mindfulness and alertness can leave openings for the hindrances to return.
Thus, although the maps of the various stages of concentration proceed in a smooth, seemingly inevitable progression, the actual experience of the practice does not.
For this reason, the Buddha gives specific instructions on how to deal with these obstacles as they arise in the course of the practice.
Passage § lists five basic approaches, the first two of which we have already covered in the preceding section.
The remaining three are:
) One ignores the obstacles.
This works on the principle that paying attention to the distraction feeds the distraction, just as paying attention to a crazy person — even if one is simply trying to drive him away — encourages him to stay.
) One notices that the act of thinking a distracting thought actually takes more energy than not thinking the thought, and one consciously relaxes whatever tension or energy happens to accompany it.
This approach works best when one is sensitive enough to bodily sensations to see the pattern of physical tension that appears in conjunction with the thought, and can intentionally relax it.
) The approach of last resort is simply to exert force on the mind to drive out the distracting thought.
This is a temporary stopgap measure that works only as long as mindfulness is firm and determination strong.
It is useful in cases where discernment is not yet sharp enough to make the other approaches work, but once discernment is up to the task, the other approaches are more effective in the long run.
Another point to keep in mind in understanding the maps of the practice is that they list the steps of meditation, not in the order in which they will be experienced, but in the order in which they can be mastered.
There are cases, for instance, where one will feel rapture in the course of the practice before one is able to breath in and out sensitive to the entire body.
In such cases, it is important not to jump to any conclusions as to one's level of attainment, or to feel that one has bypassed the need to master an earlier step.
Instead — when several different experiences arise together in a jumble, as they often do — one should use the maps to tell which experience to focus on first for the sake of developing one's meditation as a skill.
One qualification here is that it is not necessary to master all the levels of concentration in order to gain Awakening.
The relationship of concentration to discernment is a controversial issue, which we will cover in the following section, but here we may simply note that many texts point out that the experience of the first jhāna can be a sufficient basis for the discernment leading to Awakening.
The same holds true for the first four steps in breath meditation, which constitute one of the alternative ways of developing the body in and of itself as a frame of reference.
In this case, one's practice of breath meditation would jump from a mastery of step straight to step, skipping the intervening steps.
In fact, beginning with step, it is possible to jump directly to from any of the steps, and from there to progress all the way to Awakening.
The fact that the higher stages are unnecessary in some cases, however, does not mean that they are superfluous.
Many people, as they develop the skill of their meditation, will find that their minds naturally go to deeper levels of stillness with no liberating insight arising.
For them, the maps are valuable aids for a number of reasons.
To begin with, the maps can help indicate what does and does not count as Awakening.
When one arrives at a new, more refined level of awareness in one's practice, it is easy to assume that one has attained the goal.
Comparing one's experience to the maps, however, can show that the experience is simply a higher level of concentration.
Furthermore, awareness of the distinct levels can help one review them after attaining them, so that in the course of trying to master them, moving from one level to another, one can begin to gain insight into the element of will and fabrication that goes into them.
This insight can then provide an understanding into the pattern of cause and effect in the mind and, as passage § shows, can lead to a sense of dispassion and ultimately to Awakening.
However, the maps should not be used to plan one's practice in advance.
This is the message of §, which makes the point that one should not try to use one's knowledge of the various levels of the practice to force one's way through them.
In other words, one should not try to concoct a particular state of jhāna based on ideas picked up from the maps.
On reaching a particular level, one should not be in a hurry to go to the next.
Instead, one should familiarize oneself with that level of mind, perfecting one's mastery; eventually that state of concentration will ripen naturally into the next level.
To continue the image of the passage, one will find that there is no need to jump to another pasture to taste different grass and water, for the new grass and water will develop right in one's own pasture.
Finally, although the maps to the various stages of concentration seem exhaustive and complete, bear in mind that they list only the stages of right concentration, and not the varieties of wrong.
In addition to the types of wrong concentration mentioned in §, there are states of mind that may be very quiet but lack the mindfulness that would make them right.
One of these stages is a blurred state — essentially a concentration of delusion — half-way between waking and sleep, in which one's object becomes hazy and ill-defined.
On leaving it, one is hard put to say where the mind was focused, or whether it was awake or asleep.
Another type of wrong concentration is one that a modern practice tradition, following DN, calls a state of non-perception.
In this state, which is essentially a concentration of subtle aversion — the result of a strongly focused determination not to stay with any one object — everything seems to cease: the mind blanks out, with no perception of sights or sounds, or of one's own body or thoughts.
There is just barely enough mindfulness to know that one hasn't fainted or fallen asleep.
One can stay there for long periods of time, and yet the experience will seem momentary.
One can even determine beforehand when one will leave the state; but on emerging from it, one may feel somewhat dazed or drugged, a reaction caused by the intense aversive force of the concentration that induced the state to begin with.
There are other forms of wrong concentration, but a general test is that right concentration is a mindful, fully alert state.
Any state of stillness without clear mindfulness and alertness is wrong.
With these points in mind we can now turn to the maps to see their answer to the question of how breath meditation leads to the mastery of jhāna.
As noted above, the practice of keeping the breath in mind is the meditation method that the Canon teaches in most detail.
There are two possible reasons for this, one historical and the other more theoretical.
From the historical point of view, the breath was the focal point that the Buddha himself used on the night of his own Awakening.
From the theoretical perspective, a state of concentration focused on the breath is the meeting place of all the elements of the factor of “fabrication” in the formula for dependent co-arising.
This factor, as experienced in the present, consists of bodily fabrication, verbal fabrication, and mental fabrication.
Because transcendent discernment must deal directly with these three types of fabrication if it is to eliminate the ignorance that underlies them, the practice of jhāna based on the breath is an ideal point to focus on all three at once.
The first two steps of breath meditation involve simple tasks of directed thought and evaluation: directing one's thoughts and attention to the breath in and of itself, in the present, at the same time evaluating it as one begins to discern variations in the length of the breath.
Some modern teachers maintain that the factor of evaluation here also includes taking one's observations of short and long breathing as a basis for adjusting the rhythm of the breath to make it as comfortable as possible.
Because the first level of jhāna must be based on a sense of pleasure, this advice is very practical.
The remaining steps are willed or determined: One “trains oneself,” first by manipulating one's sense of conscious awareness, making it sensitive to the body as a whole.
Then one can begin manipulating the bodily sensations of which one is aware, reducing them to a single sensation of calm by letting “bodily fabrication” — the breath — grow calm so as to create an easeful sense of rapture and pleasure.
A comparison between the stages of breath meditation and the graphic analogies for jhāna indicates that the fifth and sixth steps — being sensitive to rapture and pleasure — involve making these feelings “single” as well, by letting them suffuse the entire body, just as the bathman kneads the moisture throughout his ball of bath powder.
With bodily fabrications stilled, mental fabrications — feelings and perceptions — become clearly apparent as they occur, just as when a radio is precisely tuned to a certain frequency, static is eliminated and the message sent by the radio station broadcasting at that frequency becomes clear.
These mental fabrications, too, are calmed, a step symbolized in the analogies for jhāna by the still waters in the simile for the third level, in contrast to the spring waters welling up in the second.
What remains is simply a sense of the mind itself, corresponding to the level of fourth jhāna, in which the body is filled from head to toe with a single sense of bright, radiant awareness.
This completes the first level of frames-of-reference practice.
Once this stage is reached, steps - indicate that one can now turn one's attention to consolidating one's mastery of concentration.
One does this by reviewing the various levels of jhāna, focusing not so much on the breath as on the mind as it relates to the breath.
This allows a perception of the different ways in which the mind can be satisfied and steadied, and the different factors from which it can be released by taking it through the different levels of jhāna — for example, releasing it from rapture by taking it from the second level to the third, and so forth.
One comes to see that although the breath feels different on the different levels of jhāna, the cause is not so much the breath as it is the way the mind relates to the breath, shedding the various mental activities surrounding its single preoccupation.
As one ascends through the various levels, directed thought and evaluation are stilled, rapture fades, and pleasure is abandoned.
Another way of consolidating one's skills in the course of these steps is to examine the subtle defilements that interfere with full mastery of concentration.
The fact that one's focus is now on the mind makes it possible to see these defilements clearly, and then to steady the mind even further by releasing it from them.
Passage §, although aimed specifically at the problems faced by those who have visions in their meditation, gives a useful checklist of subtle mental defilements that can hamper the concentration of any meditator.
The image of grasping the quail neither too loosely nor too tight has become a standard one in Buddhist meditation manuals.
The mastery of concentration developed in steps - provides an excellent chance to develop discernment into the pattern of cause and effect in the process of concentrating the mind, in that one must master the causal factors before one can gain the desired results in terms of satisfaction, steadiness, and release.
Here we see at work the basic pattern of skillfulness mentioned in several earlier sections: that discernment is sharpened and strengthened by employing it in developing the skills of concentration.
This would correspond to the second level of frames-of-reference meditation — focusing on the phenomenon of origination and passing away — mentioned in II/B.
Another development that can happen during these steps — although this goes outside of the practice of breath meditation per se — is the discovery of how the equanimity developed in the fourth jhāna can be applied to other refined objects of the mind.
These are the four formless jhanas: the dimension of the infinitude of space, the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, the dimension of nothingness, and the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
These states may sound impossibly abstract, but in actual practice they grow directly from the way the mind relates to the still sense of the body in the fourth jhāna.
The first stage comes when the mind consciously ignores its perception of the form of the body, attending instead to the remaining sense of space that surrounds and pervades that form; the second stage comes when the mind sheds its perception of “space,” leaving a limitless sense of awareness; the third, when it lets go of the oneness of its perception of “awareness,” leaving a perception of inactivity; and the fourth, when it sheds the perception of that lack of activity.
That leaves a state where perception is so refined that it can hardly be called perception at all, even though it is still there.
As one masters these steps, one realizes that whereas the first four levels of jhāna differ in the type of activity the mind focuses on its one object, the four formless jhanas differ in their objects, as one level of mental labeling falls away to be replaced by a more subtle one.
Passages § and § list one more meditative attainment beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception — the cessation of feeling and perception — but this is qualitatively different from the others, in that a meditator cannot attain it without at the same time awakening to the level of at least non-returning.
The reason behind this is related, once more, to the factor of “fabrication” in dependent co-arising.
In the course of mastering the levels of jhāna, verbal fabrication grows still as one enters the second jhāna; bodily fabrication, as one enters the fourth; and mental fabrication, as one enters this last stage.
For all three types of fabrication to stop, however, ignorance — the condition for fabrication — must stop as well, and this can happen only with the insight that leads to Awakening.
We have come to the end of the list of the stages of mastery in meditative attainment, but four steps in breath meditation remain unexplained.
This is because, aside from the ninth level of attainment, the stages of mastery can all be attained without developing the discernment that constitutes Awakening, while the last four steps in breath meditation deal specifically with giving rise to that discernment.
This brings us to the third question that was broached at the beginning of this introduction: how right concentration can be put to use.
Passage § lists four possible uses for concentration:
The first use is the simple enjoyment of the experience of jhāna; the second relates to the first five supranormal powers.
The third relates to the development of the frames of reference; and the fourth, to the discernment that constitutes Awakening.
We have already discussed the second and third uses of concentration in the passages just cited in brackets.
This leaves us with the first and fourth.
The Canon notes that meditators can become “chained and fettered” to the attractions of the pleasure to be found in jhāna.
As a result, many meditators are afraid to let their minds settle into blissfully still states, for fear of becoming stuck.
The Canon, however, never once states that stream-entry can be attained without at least some experience in jhāna; and it states explicitly that the attainment of non-returning requires a mastery of concentration.
MN relates that the turning point in the Buddha's own practice — when he abandoned the path of self-affliction and turned to the middle way — hinged on his realization that there is nothing blameworthy in the pleasure to be found in jhāna.
Thus, there is nothing to fear.
This pleasure plays an important function in the practice.
To begin with, it enables the mind to stay comfortably in the present moment, helping it attain the stability it needs for gaining insight.
This can be compared to a scientific experiment in which the measuring equipment needs to be absolutely steady in order to give reliable readings.
Second, because a great deal of sensitivity is required to “tune” the mind to the refined pleasure of jhāna, the practice serves to increase one's sensitivity, making one more acutely aware of even the most refined levels of stress as well.
Third, because the pleasure and equanimity of jhāna are more exquisite than sensory pleasures, and because they exist independently of the five senses, they can enable the mind to become less involved in sensory pleasures and less inclined to search for emotional satisfaction from them.
In this sense, the skillful pleasures of jhāna can act as a fulcrum for prying loose one's attachments to the less skillful pleasures of sensuality.
The fact that fully mature mastery of jhāna brings about the attainment of non-returning, the preliminary level of Awakening where sensual passion is abandoned, shows the necessary role that jhāna plays in letting go of this particular defilement.
Finally, the pleasure of jhāna provides a place of rest and rehabilitation along the path when the mind's powers of discernment become dulled or it must be coaxed into the proper mood to accept some of the harsher lessons it needs to learn in order to abandon its cravings.
Just as a person who is well-fed and rested is more open to receiving criticism than when he is tired and hungry, the mind is often more willing to admit its own foolishness and lack of skill when it is nourished by the pleasure of jhāna than when it is not.
Thus, although the pleasure of jhāna can become an obstacle if treated as an end in itself, there are phases of the practice where the pursuit of this form of pleasure is a useful strategy toward the fourth use of concentration: the ending of the mental effluents.
This fourth use is the topic of the next section, but here we can simply note that it is related to the fifth factor of noble right concentration mentioned in §.
As the simile illustrating it suggests — with the standing person reflecting on the person sitting down — this factor is a pulling back or a lifting of the mind above the object of its absorption, without at the same time disturbing the absorption.
This factor corresponds to steps through in the guide to breath meditation, in that one is able to focus on the way the mind relates to its object at the same time that the mind is actually in a state of concentration.
Passage § shows that this factor can be applied to any level of jhāna except for the states of neither perception nor non-perception and the cessation of perception and feeling.
As for those two states, one can reflect on their component factors only after leaving them.
With the other states, one stays with the object, but one's prime focus is on the mind.
One sees the various mental events that go into maintaining that state of concentration, and as one contemplates these events, one becomes struck by how inconstant they are, how fabricated and willed.
This provides insight into how the present aspect of kamma — one's present intentions — shape one's present experience.
It also gives insight into the general pattern of cause and effect in the mind.
Focusing on the inconstancy and unreliability of the factors in this pattern gives rise to the realization that they are also stressful and not-self: neither “me” nor “mine,” but simply instances of the first noble truth.
When this realization goes straight to the heart, there comes a sense of dispassion for any craving directed at them and an experience of their fading and cessation.
Finally, one relinquishes attachment not only to these events, but also to the discernment that sees through to their true nature.
This completes steps through in the guide to breath meditation, at the same time bringing the seven factors for Awakening to completion in a state “dependent on seclusion… dispassion… cessation, resulting in letting go,” where “letting go” would appear to be equivalent to the “relinquishment” in step.
When one can simply experience the act of relinquishment without fashioning an identity around “doing” the relinquishing, one passes through the third stage of frames-of-reference meditation to the state of non-fashioning, which forms the threshold to release.
Even after attaining release, the Arahant continues to practice meditation, although now that the effluents are ended, the concentration is not needed to put them to an end.
MN mentions that Arahants practice concentration both for the sake of a pleasant abiding in the here and now, and for mindfulness and alertness.
A number of passages in the Canon mention the Buddha and his Arahant disciples exercising their supranormal powers, which shows that they were practicing concentration for the sake of attaining knowledge and vision as well, to use in instructing those around them.
The description of the Buddha's passing away tells that he entered total Unbinding after exercising his mastery in the full range of jhanic attainments.
Thus the practice of concentration is useful all the way to the point where one gains total release from the round of death and rebirth.
Visākha: Now what is concentration, what qualities are its themes, what qualities are its requisites, and what is its development?
Sister Dhammadinnā: Singleness of mind is concentration; the four frames of reference are its themes; the four right exertions are its requisites; and any cultivation, development, & pursuit of these qualities is its development.
These are the four developments of concentration.
Which four?
There is the development of concentration that, when developed & pursued, leads to a pleasant abiding in the here & now.
There is the development of concentration that… leads to the attainment of knowledge & vision.
There is the development of concentration that… leads to mindfulness & alertness.
There is the development of concentration that, when developed & pursued, leads to the ending of the effluents.
And what is the development of concentration that, when developed & pursued, leads to a pleasant abiding in the here & now?
There is the case where a monk — quite secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful qualities — enters & remains in the first jhāna: rapture & pleasure born from seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
With the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
With the fading of rapture he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhāna, of which the noble ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' With the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of joys & distresses — he enters & remains in the fourth jhāna: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor pain.
This is the development of concentration that… leads to a pleasant abiding in the here & now.
And what is the development of concentration that… leads to the attainment of knowledge & vision?
There is the case where a monk attends to the perception of light and is resolved on the perception of daytime.
Day is the same as night, night is the same as day.
By means of an awareness open & unhampered, he develops a brightened mind.
This is the development of concentration that… leads to the attainment of knowledge & vision.

And what is the development of concentration that… leads to mindfulness & alertness?
There is the case where feelings are known to the monk as they arise, known as they persist, known as they subside.
Perceptions are known to him as they arise, known as they persist, known as they subside.
Thoughts are known to him as they arise, known as they persist, known as they subside.
This is the development of concentration that… leads to mindfulness & alertness.

And what is the development of concentration that… leads to the ending of the effluents?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on arising & falling away with reference to the five clinging-aggregates: 'Such is form, such its origination, such its disappearance.
Such is feeling… Such is perception… Such are fabrications… Such is consciousness, such its origination, such its disappearance.' This is the development of concentration that… leads to the ending of the effluents.

These are the four developments of concentration.
Noble Right Concentration.
Now what, monks, is five-factored noble right concentration?
There is the case where a monk — quite secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful qualities — enters & remains in the first jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
He permeates & pervades, suffuses & fills this very body with the rapture & pleasure born of seclusion.
There is nothing of his entire body unpervaded by rapture & pleasure born of seclusion.
Just as if a skilled bathman or bathman's apprentice would pour bath powder into a brass basin and knead it together, sprinkling it again & again with water, so that his ball of bath powder — saturated, moisture-laden, permeated within & without — would nevertheless not drip; even so, the monk permeates… this very body with the rapture & pleasure born of seclusion.
There is nothing of his entire body unpervaded by rapture & pleasure born of seclusion.
This is the first development of the five-factored noble right concentration.
Furthermore, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
He permeates & pervades, suffuses & fills this very body with the rapture & pleasure born of concentration.
There is nothing of his entire body unpervaded by rapture & pleasure born of concentration.
Just like a lake with spring-water welling up from within, having no inflow from east, west, north, or south, and with the skies periodically supplying abundant showers, so that the cool fount of water welling up from within the lake would permeate & pervade, suffuse & fill it with cool waters, there being no part of the lake unpervaded by the cool waters; even so, the monk permeates… this very body with the rapture & pleasure born of concentration.
There is nothing of his entire body unpervaded by rapture & pleasure born of concentration.
This is the second development of the five-factored noble right concentration.
And furthermore, with the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhāna, of which the noble ones declare, 'Equani-mous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' He permeates & pervades, suffuses & fills this very body with the pleasure divested of rapture, so that there is nothing of his entire body unpervaded with pleasure divested of rapture.
Just as in a blue-, white-, or red-lotus pond, there may be some of the blue, white, or red lotuses which, born & growing in the water, stay immersed in the water and flourish without standing up out of the water, so that they are permeated & pervaded, suffused & filled with cool water from their roots to their tips, and nothing of those blue, white, or red lotuses would be unpervaded with cool water; even so, the monk permeates… this very body with the pleasure divested of rapture.
There is nothing of his entire body unpervaded with pleasure divested of rapture.
This is the third development of the five-factored noble right concentration.
And furthermore, with the abandoning of pleasure & stress — as with the earlier disappearance of joys & distresses — he enters & remains in the fourth jhāna: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
He sits, permeating the body with a pure, bright awareness, so that there is nothing of his entire body unpervaded by pure, bright awareness.
Just as if a man were sitting wrapped from head to foot with a white cloth so that there would be no part of his body to which the white cloth did not extend; even so, the monk sits, permeating his body with a pure, bright awareness.
There is nothing of his entire body unpervaded by pure, bright awareness.
This is the fourth development of the five-factored noble right concentration.
And furthermore, the monk has his theme of reflection well in hand, well attended to, well pondered, well tuned by means of discernment.
Just as if one person were to reflect on another, or a standing person were to reflect on a sitting person, or a sitting person were to reflect on a person lying down; even so, monks, the monk has his theme of reflection well in hand, well attended to, well pondered, well tuned by means of discernment.
This is the fifth development of the five-factored noble right concentration.
When a monk has developed & pursued the five-factored noble right concentration in this way, then whichever of the six higher knowledges he turns his mind to know & realize, he can witness them for himself whenever there is an opening.

Suppose that there were a water jar, set on a stand, brimful of water so that a crow could drink from it.
If a strong man were to tip it in any way at all, would water spill out?
In the same way, when a monk has developed & pursued the five-factored noble right concentration in this way, then whichever of the six higher knowledges he turns his mind to know & realize, he can witness them for himself whenever there is an opening.
Suppose there were a rectangular water tank — set on level ground, bounded by dikes — brimful of water so that a crow could drink from it.
If a strong man were to loosen the dikes anywhere at all, would water spill out?
Yes, lord…
Suppose there were a chariot on level ground at four crossroads, harnessed to thoroughbreds, waiting with whips lying ready, so that a skilled driver, a trainer of tamable horses, might mount and — taking the reins with his left hand and the whip with his right — drive out & back, to whatever place and by whichever road he liked; in the same way, when a monk has developed & pursued the five-factored noble right concentration in this way, then whichever of the six higher knowledges he turns his mind to know & realize, he can witness them for himself whenever there is an opening.
Breath Meditation.
Now how is mindfulness of in-&-out breathing developed & pursued so that it bears great fruit & great benefits?
There is the case where a monk, having gone to the wilderness, to the shade of a tree, or to an empty building, sits down folding his legs crosswise, holding his body erect, and setting mindfulness to the fore.
Always mindful, he breathes in; mindful he breathes out.
Breathing in long, he discerns, 'I am breathing in long'; or breathing out long, he discerns, 'I am breathing out long.' Or breathing in short, he discerns, 'I am breathing in short'; or breathing out short, he discerns, 'I am breathing out short.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to the entire body'; he trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to the entire body.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in calming bodily fabrication, and to breathe out calming bodily fabrication.
He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to rapture'; he trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to rapture.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to pleasure'; he trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to pleasure.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to mental fabrication'; he trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to mental fabrication.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in calming mental fabrication'; he trains himself, 'I will breathe out calming mental fabrication.'
He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to the mind'; he trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to the mind.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in gladdening the mind'; he trains himself, 'I will breathe out gladdening the mind.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in steadying the mind'; he trains himself, 'I will breathe out steadying the mind.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in releasing the mind'; he trains himself, 'I will breathe out releasing the mind.'
He trains himself, 'I will breathe in focusing on inconstancy'; he trains himself, 'I will breathe out focusing on inconstancy.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in focusing on dispassion '; he trains himself, 'I will breathe out focusing on dispassion.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in focusing on cessation'; he trains himself, 'I will breathe out focusing on cessation.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in focusing on relinquishment'; he trains himself, 'I will breathe out focusing on relinquishment.'
This is how mindfulness of in-&-out breathing is developed & pursued so that it bears great fruit & great benefits.
Vassakāra: Once, Master Ānanda, Master Gotama was living at Vesālī in the Hall with the peaked roof in the Great Forest.
I went to where he was staying in the Great Forest… and there he spoke in a variety of ways on jhāna.
Master Gotama was both endowed with jhāna and made jhāna his habit.
In fact, he praised all sorts of jhāna.
Ven.
Ānanda: It was not the case that the Blessed One praised all sorts of jhāna, nor did he criticize all sorts of jhāna.
And what sort of jhāna did he not praise?
There is the case where a certain person dwells with his awareness overcome by sensual passion, obsessed with sensual passion.
He does not discern the escape, as it has come to be, from sensual passion once it has arisen.
Making that sensual passion the focal point, he absorbs himself with it, besorbs, resorbs, & supersorbs himself with it.
He dwells with his awareness overcome by ill will… sloth & drowsiness… restlessness & anxiety… uncertainty, obsessed with uncertainty.
He does not discern the escape, as it has come to be, from uncertainty once it has arisen.
Making that uncertainty the focal point, he absorbs himself with it, besorbs, resorbs, & supersorbs himself with it.
This is the sort of jhāna that the Blessed One did not praise.
And what sort of jhāna did he praise?
There is the case where a monk — quite secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful qualities — enters & remains in the first jhāna… the second jhāna… the third jhāna… the fourth jhāna: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor pain.
This is the sort of jhāna that the Blessed One praised.
Vassakāra: It would seem, Master Ānanda, that Master Gotama criticized the jhāna that deserves criticism, and praised that which deserves praise.
A monk endowed with these five qualities is incapable of entering & remaining in right concentration.
Which five?
He cannot withstand sights, he cannot withstand sounds… aromas… tastes… tactile sensations.
A monk endowed with these five qualities is not capable of entering & remaining in right concentration.
A monk endowed with these five qualities is capable of entering & remaining in right concentration.
Which five?
He can withstand sights… sounds… aromas… tastes… tactile sensations.
A monk endowed with these five qualities is capable of entering & remaining in right concentration.
A monk who has not abandoned these six qualities is incapable of entering & remaining in the first jhāna.
Which six?
Sensual desire, ill will, sloth & drowsiness, restlessness & anxiety, uncertainty, and not seeing well with right discernment, as they have come to be, the drawbacks of sensual pleasures…
A monk who has not abandoned these six qualities is incapable of entering & remaining in the first jhāna.
Which six?
Thoughts of sensuality, thoughts of ill will, thoughts of violence, perceptions of sensuality, perceptions of ill will, perceptions of violence.
A monk endowed with these six qualities is capable of mastering strength in concentration.
Which six?
There is the case where a monk is skilled in the attaining of concentration, in the maintenance of concentration, and in the exit from concentration.
He is deliberate in doing it, persevering in doing it, and amenable to doing it.
A monk endowed with these six qualities is capable of mastering strength in concentration.
A monk endowed with these six qualities could break through the Himalayas, king of mountains, to say nothing of miserable ignorance.
Which six?
There is the case where a monk is skilled in the attaining of concentration, in the maintenance of concentration, in the exit from concentration, in the preparedness for concentration, in the range of concentration, & in the application of concentration.
A monk endowed with these six qualities could break through the Himalayas, king of mountains, to say nothing of miserable ignorance.
Imagine a great pool of water to which there comes a great bull elephant, seven or seven and a half cubits tall.
The thought occurs to him, 'What if I were to plunge into this pool of water, to amuse myself by squirting water into my ears and along my back, and then to bathe & drink & come back out & go off as I please?' So he plunges into the pool of water, amuses himself by squirting water into his ears and along his back, and then bathes & drinks & comes back out & goes off as he pleases.
Why is that?
Because his large body finds a footing in the depth.
Now suppose a rabbit or a cat were to come along & think, 'What's the difference between me & a bull elephant?
What if I were to plunge into this pool of water, to amuse myself by squirting water into my ears and along my back, and then to bathe & drink & come back out & go off as I please?' So he plunges rashly into the pool of water without reflecting, and of him it can be expected that he will either sink to the bottom or float away on the surface.
Why is that?
Because his small body doesn't find a footing in the depth.
In the same way, whoever says, 'Without having attained concentration, I will go live in solitude, in isolated wilderness places,' of him it can be expected that he will either sink to the bottom or float away on the surface.
These are the five rewards for one who practices walking meditation.
Which five?
He can endure traveling by foot; he can endure exertion; he becomes free from disease; whatever he has eaten & drunk, chewed & savored, becomes well-digested; the concentration he wins while doing walking meditation lasts for a long time.
Distracting Thoughts.
When a monk is intent on the heightened mind, there are five themes he should attend to at the appropriate times.
Which five?
There is the case where evil, unskillful thoughts — imbued with desire, aversion, or delusion — arise in a monk while he is referring to & attending to a particular theme.
He should attend to another theme, apart from that one, connected with what is skillful.
When he is attending to this other theme… those evil, unskillful thoughts… are abandoned & subside.
With their abandoning, he steadies his mind right within, settles it, unifies it, & concentrates it.
Just as a skilled carpenter or his apprentice would use a small peg to knock out, drive out, & pull out a large one; in the same way… he steadies his mind right within, settles it, unifies it, & concentrates it.
If evil, unskillful thoughts — imbued with desire, aversion, or delusion — still arise in the monk while he is attending to this other theme, connected with what is skillful, he should scrutinize the drawbacks of those thoughts: 'Truly, these thoughts of mine are unskillful… blameworthy… these thoughts of mine result in stress.' As he is scrutinizing their drawbacks… those evil, unskillful thoughts… are abandoned & subside.
With their abandoning, he steadies his mind right within, settles it, unifies it, & concentrates it.
Just as a young woman — or man — fond of adornment, would be horrified, humiliated, & disgusted if the carcass of a snake or a dog or a human being were hung from her neck; in the same way… the monk steadies his mind right within, settles it, unifies it, & concentrates it.
If evil, unskillful thoughts — imbued with desire, aversion or delusion — still arise in the monk while he is scrutinizing the drawbacks of those thoughts, he should pay no mind & pay no attention to those thoughts.
As he is paying no mind & paying no attention to them… those evil, unskillful thoughts are abandoned & subside.
With their abandoning, he steadies his mind right within, settles it, unifies it, & concentrates it.
Just as a man with good eyes, not wanting to see forms that had come into range, would close his eyes or look away; in the same way… the monk steadies his mind right within, settles it, unifies it, & concentrates it.
If evil, unskillful thoughts — imbued with desire, aversion or delusion — still arise in the monk while he is paying no mind & paying no attention to those thoughts, he should attend to the relaxing of thought-fabrication with regard to those thoughts.
As he is attending to the relaxing of thought-fabrication with regard to those thoughts… those evil, unskillful thoughts are abandoned & subside.
With their abandoning, he steadies his mind right within, settles it, unifies it, & concentrates it.
Just as the thought would occur to a man walking quickly, 'Why am I walking quickly?
Why don't I walk slowly?' So he walks slowly.
The thought occurs to him, 'Why am I walking slowly?
Why don't I stand?' So he stands.
The thought occurs to him, 'Why am I standing?
Why don't I sit down?' So he sits down.
The thought occurs to him, 'Why am I sitting?
Why don't I lie down?' So he lies down.
In this way, giving up the grosser posture, he takes up the more refined one.
In the same way… the monk steadies his mind right within, settles it, unifies it, & concentrates it.
If evil, unskillful thoughts — imbued with desire, aversion or delusion — still arise in the monk while he is attending to the relaxing of thought-fabrication with regard to those thoughts, then — with his teeth clenched & his tongue pressed against the roof of his mouth — he should beat down, constrain, & crush his mind with his awareness.
As — with his teeth clenched & his tongue pressed against the roof of his mouth — he is beating down, constraining, & crushing his mind with his awareness… those evil, unskillful thoughts are abandoned & subside.
With their abandoning, he steadies his mind right within, settles it, unifies it, & concentrates it.
Just as a strong man, seizing a weaker man by the head or the throat or the shoulders, would beat him down, constrain, & crush him; in the same way… the monk steadies his mind right within, settles it, unifies it, & concentrates it.
Now when a monk… attending to another theme… scrutinizing the drawbacks of those thoughts… paying no mind & paying no attention to those thoughts… attending to the relaxing of thought-fabrication with regard to those thoughts… beating down, constraining, & crushing his mind with his awareness… steadies his mind right within, settles it, unifies it, & concentrates it, he is then called a monk with mastery over the ways of thought sequences.
He thinks whatever thought he wants to, and doesn't think whatever thought he doesn't.
He has severed craving, thrown off the fetters, and — through the right penetration of conceit — has made an end of suffering & stress.
There are these gross impurities in gold: dirty sand, gravel, & grit.
The dirt-washer or his apprentice, having placed in a vat, washes it again & again until he has washed them away.
When he is rid of them, there remain the moderate impurities in the gold: coarse sand & fine grit.
He washes the gold again & again until he has washed them away.
When he is rid of them, there remain the fine impurities in the gold: fine sand & black dust.
The dirt-washer or his apprentice washes the gold again & again until he has washed them away.
When he is rid of them, there remains just the gold dust.
The goldsmith or his apprentice, having placed it in a crucible, blows on it again & again to blow away the dross.
The gold, as long as it has not been blown on again & again to the point where the impurities are blown away, as long as it is not refined & free from dross, is not pliant, malleable, or luminous.
It is brittle and not ready to be worked.
But there comes a time when the goldsmith or his apprentice has blown on the gold again & again until the dross is blown away.
The gold… is then refined, free from dross, plaint, malleable, & luminous.
It is not brittle, and is ready to be worked.
Then whatever sort of ornament he has in mind — whether a belt, an earring, a necklace, or a gold chain — the gold would serve his purpose.
In the same way, there are these gross impurities in a monk intent on heightened mind: misconduct in body, speech, & mind.
These the monk — aware & able by nature — abandons, destroys, dispels, wipes out of existence.
When he is rid of them, there remain in him the moderate impurities: thoughts of sensuality, ill will, & violence.
These he… wipes out of existence.
When he is rid of them there remain in him the fine impurities: thoughts of his caste, thoughts of his home district, thoughts related to not wanting to be despised.
These he… wipes out of existence.
When he is rid of them, there remain only thoughts of the Dhamma.
His concentration is neither calm nor refined, it has not yet attained serenity or unity, and is kept in place by the fabrication of forceful restraint.
But there comes a time when his mind grows steady inwardly, settles down, grows unified & concentrated.
His concentration is calm & refined, has attained serenity & unity, and is no longer kept in place by the fabrication of forceful restraint.
Then whichever of the six higher knowledges he turns his mind to know & realize, he can witness them for himself whenever there is an opening… 
Ven.
Anuruddha: It has happened that, as we were remaining heedful, ardent, & resolute, we perceived light & the vision of forms.
But soon after that the light disappeared, together with the vision of forms, and we can't become attuned to that theme.
The Buddha: You should become attuned to that theme.
Before my self-awakening, while I was still just an unawakened Bodhisatta, I too perceived light & the vision of forms, and soon after that the light disappeared, together with the vision of forms.
The thought occurred to me, 'What is the cause, what is the reason, why the light disappeared, together with the vision of forms?' Then it occurred to me, 'Uncertainty arose in me, and because of the uncertainty my concentration fell away; when my concentration fell away, the light disappeared together with the vision of forms.
I will act in such a way that uncertainty will not arise in me again.'
As I was remaining heedful, ardent, & resolute, I perceived light & the vision of forms.
But soon after that the light disappeared, together with the vision of forms.
The thought occurred to me, 'What is the cause, what is the reason, why the light disappeared, together with the vision of forms?' Then it occurred to me, 'Inattention… sloth & drowsiness… fear… elation… inertia arose in me, and because of the inattention… inertia my concentration fell away; when my concentration fell away, the light disappeared together with the vision of forms.
I will act in such a way that uncertainty, inattention, sloth & drowsiness, fear, elation, & inertia will not arise in me again.'
As I was remaining heedful, ardent, & resolute… it occurred to me, 'Excessive persistence arose in me, and because of the excessive persistence my concentration fell away; when my concentration fell away, the light disappeared together with the vision of forms.
Just as if a man might hold a quail tightly with both hands, it would die then & there; in the same way, excessive persistence arose in me… I will act in such a way that uncertainty… & excessive persistence will not arise in me again.'
As I was remaining heedful, ardent, & resolute… it occurred to me, 'Sluggish persistence arose in me, and because of the sluggish persistence my concentration fell away; when my concentration fell away, the light disappeared together with the vision of forms.
Just as if a man might hold a quail loosely, it would fly out of his hand; in the same way, sluggish persistence arose in me… I will act in such a way that uncertainty… excessive & sluggish persistence will not arise in me again.'
As I was remaining heedful, ardent, & resolute… it occurred to me, 'Longing… the perception of multiplicity… excessive absorption in forms arose in me, and because of the excessive absorption in forms my concentration fell away; when my concentration fell away, the light disappeared together with the vision of forms… I will act in such a way that uncertainty… longing, the perception of multiplicity, excessive absorption in forms will not arise in me again.'
When I knew, 'Uncertainty is a defilement of the mind,' I abandoned the uncertainty that was a defilement of the mind.

As I was remaining heedful, ardent, & resolute, I perceived light without seeing forms, or saw forms without perceiving light for a whole day, a whole night, a whole day & night.
The thought occurred to me, 'What is the cause, what is the reason…?' Then it occurred to me, 'When I attend to the theme of light without attending to the theme of forms, I perceive light without seeing forms.
When I attend to the theme of forms without attending to the theme of light, I see forms without seeing light for a whole day, a whole night, a whole day & night.'
As I was remaining heedful, ardent, & resolute, I perceived limited light & saw limited forms; I perceived unlimited light & saw unlimited forms for a whole day, a whole night, a whole day & night.
The thought occurred to me, 'What is the cause, what is the reason…?' Then it occurred to me, 'When my concentration is limited, my sense of vision is limited.
When my concentration is unlimited, my sense of vision is unlimited.
With an unlimited sense of vision I perceive unlimited light & see unlimited forms for a whole day, a whole night, a whole day & night'…
'I have abandoned those defilements of the mind.
Let me develop concentration in three ways.' So I developed concentration with directed thought & evaluation.
I developed concentration without directed thought but with a modicum of evaluation.
I developed concentration without directed thought or evaluation.
I developed concentration with rapture… without rapture… I developed concentration accompanied by enjoyment… accompanied by equanimity.
When my concentration with directed thought & evaluation was developed, when my concentration without directed thought but with a modicum of evaluation… without directed thought or evaluation… with rapture… without rapture… accompanied by enjoyment… accompanied by equanimity was developed, then the knowledge & vision arose in me: 'Unprovoked is my release.
This is my last birth.
There is no further becoming.'
That was what the Blessed One said.
Glad at heart, Ven.
Anuruddha delighted in the Blessed One's words.
Skill in concentration.
Suppose there was a mountain cow — foolish, inexperienced, unfamiliar with her pasture, unskilled in roaming on rugged mountains — and she were to think, 'What if I were to go in a direction I have never gone before, to eat grass I have never eaten before, to drink water I have never drunk before!' She would lift her hind hoof without having placed her front hoof firmly and would not get to go in a direction she had never gone before, to eat grass she had never eaten before, or to drink water she had never drunk before.
And as for the place where she was standing when the thought occurred to her, 'What if I were to go where I have never been before… to drink water I have never drunk before,' she would not return there safely.
Why is that?
Because she is a foolish, inexperienced mountain cow, unfamiliar with her pasture, unskilled in roaming on rugged mountains.
In the same way, there are cases where a monk — foolish, inexperienced, unfamiliar with his pasture, unskilled in… entering & remaining in the first jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation — doesn't stick with that theme, doesn't develop it, pursue it, or establish himself firmly in it.
The thought occurs to him, 'What if I, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, were to enter & remain in the second jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.' He is not able… to enter & remain in the second jhāna… The thought occurs to him, 'What if I… were to enter & remain in the first jhāna… He is not able… to enter & remain in the first jhāna.
This is called a monk who has slipped & fallen from both sides, like the mountain cow, foolish, inexperienced, unfamiliar with her pasture, unskilled in roaming on rugged mountains.
But suppose there was a mountain cow — wise, experienced, familiar with her pasture, skilled in roaming on rugged mountains — and she were to think, 'What if I were to go in a direction I have never gone before, to eat grass I have never eaten before, to drink water I have never drunk before!' She would lift her hind hoof only after having placed her front hoof firmly and would get to go in a direction she had never gone before… to drink water she had never drunk before.
And as for the place where she was standing when the thought occurred to her, 'What if I were to go in a direction I have never gone before… to drink water I have never drunk before,' she would return there safely.
Why is that?
Because she is a wise, experienced mountain cow, familiar with her pasture, skilled in roaming on rugged mountains.
In the same way, there are some cases where a monk — wise, experienced, familiar with his pasture, skilled in… entering & remaining in the first jhāna… sticks with that theme, develops it, pursues it, & establishes himself firmly in it.
The thought occurs to him, 'What if I… were to enter & remain in the second jhāna…' Without jumping at the second jhāna, he — with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations — enters & remains in the second jhāna.
He sticks with that theme, develops it, pursues it, & establishes himself firmly in it.
The thought occurs to him, 'What if I… were to enter & remain in the third jhāna'… Without jumping at the third jhāna, he… enters & remains in the third jhāna.
He sticks with that theme, develops it, pursues it, & establishes himself firmly in it.
The thought occurs to him, 'What if I… were to enter & remain in the fourth jhāna'… Without jumping at the fourth jhāna, he… enters & remains in the fourth jhāna.
He sticks with that theme, develops it, pursues it, & establishes himself firmly in it.
The thought occurs to him, 'What if I, with the complete transcending of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of resistance, and not heeding perceptions of diversity, “Infinite space,” were to enter & remain in the dimension of the infinitude of space.' Without jumping at the dimension of the infinitude of space, he… enters & remains in dimension of the infinitude of space.
He sticks with that theme, develops it, pursues it, & establishes himself firmly in it.
The thought occurs to him, 'What if I, with the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of space, “Infinite consciousness,” were to enter & remain in the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.' Without jumping at the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, he… enters & remains in dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
He sticks with that theme, develops it, pursues it, & establishes himself firmly in it.
The thought occurs to him, 'What if I, with the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, “There is nothing,” were to enter & remain in the dimension of nothingness.' Without jumping at the dimension of nothingness, he… enters & remains in dimension of nothingness.
He sticks with that theme, develops it, pursues, it & establishes himself firmly in it.
The thought occurs to him, 'What if I, with the complete transcending of the dimension of nothingness, were to enter & remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.' Without jumping at the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, he… enters & remains in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
He sticks with that theme, develops it, pursues it, & establishes himself firmly in it.
The thought occurs to him, 'What if I, with the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, were to enter & remain in the cessation of perception & feeling.' Without jumping at the cessation of perception & feeling, he… enters & remains in the cessation of perception & feeling.
When a monk enters & emerges from that very attainment, his mind is pliant & malleable.
With his pliant, malleable mind, limitless concentration is well developed.
With his concentration well developed & limitless, then whichever of the six higher knowledges he turns his mind to know & realize, he can witness them for himself whenever there is an opening.
Guided by the elephant trainer, the elephant to be tamed goes only in one direction: east, west, north, or south… Guided by the Tathāgata… the person to be tamed goes in eight directions.
Possessed of form, he sees forms.
This is the first direction.
Not percipient of form internally, he sees forms externally.
This is the second direction.
He is intent only on the beautiful.
This is the third direction.
With the complete transcending of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of resistance, and not heeding perceptions of diversity, 'Infinite space,' he enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of space.
This is the fourth direction.
With the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of space, 'Infinite consciousness,' he enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
This is the fifth direction.
He… enters & remains in the dimension of nothingness.
This is the sixth direction.
He… enters & remains in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
This is the seventh direction.
With the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, he enters & remains in the cessation of perception & feeling.
This is the eighth direction.
'There are these seven properties.
Which seven?
The property of light, the property of beauty, the property of the dimension of the infinitude of space, the property of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, the property of the dimension of nothingness, the property of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, the property of the cessation of feeling & perception.
These are the seven properties.'
When this was said, a certain monk addressed the Blessed One: '…In dependence on what are these properties discerned?'
'The property of light is discerned in dependence on darkness.
The property of beauty is discerned in dependence on the unattractive.
The property of the dimension of the infinitude of space is discerned in dependence on form.
The property of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness is discerned in dependence on the dimension of the infinitude of space.
The property of the dimension of nothingness is discerned in dependence on the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
The property of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception is discerned in dependence on the dimension of nothingness.
The property of the cessation of feeling & perception is discerned in dependence on cessation.'
'…And how, lord, is the attainment of these properties to be reached?'
'The property of light… beauty… the dimension of the infinitude of space… the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the dimension of nothingness: These properties are to be reached as perception attainments.
The property of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception is to be reached as a remnant-of-fabrications attainment.
The property of the cessation of feeling & perception is to be reached as a cessation attainment.'
We noted in II/A that some of the sets in the Wings to Awakening list jhāna as a condition for discernment, whereas others list discernment as a condition for jhāna.
Place both of these patterns into the context of this/that conditionality, and they convey the point that jhāna and discernment in practice are mutually supporting.
Passage § states this point explicitly, while § and § show that the difference between the two causal patterns relates to differences in meditators: some develop strong powers of concentration before developing strong discernment, whereas others gain a sound theoretical understanding of the Dhamma before developing strong concentration.
In either case, both strong concentration and sound discernment are needed to bring about Awakening.
Passage § makes the point that when the practice reaches the culmination of its development, concentration and discernment act in tandem.
The passages in this section deal with this topic in more detail.
The role of jhāna as a condition for transcendent discernment is one of the most controversial issues in the Theravada tradition.
Three basic positions have been advanced in modern writings.
One, following the commentarial tradition, asserts that jhāna is not necessary for any of the four levels of Awakening and that there is a class of individuals — called “dry insight” meditators — who are “discernment-released” based on a level of concentration lower than that of jhāna.
A second position, citing a passage in the Canon stating that concentration is mastered only on the level of non-returning, holds that jhāna is necessary for the attainment of non-returning and Arahantship, but not for the lower levels of Awakening.
The third position states that the attainment of at least the first level of jhāna is essential for all four levels of Awakening.
Evidence from the Canon supports the third position, but not the other two.
As § points out, the attainment of stream-entry has eight factors, one of which is right concentration, defined as jhāna.
In fact, according to this particular discourse, jhāna is the heart of the streamwinner's path.
Secondly, there is no passage in the Canon describing the development of transcendent discernment without at least some skill in jhāna.
The statement that concentration is mastered only on the level of non-returning must be interpreted in the light of the distinction between mastery and attainment.
A streamwinner may have attained jhāna without mastering it; the discernment developed in the process of gaining full mastery over the practice of jhāna will then lead him/her to the level of non-returning.
As for the term “discernment-released,” passage § shows that it denotes people who have become Arahants without experiencing the four formless jhanas.
It does not indicate a person who has not experienced jhāna.
Part of the controversy over this question may be explained by the fact that the commentaries define jhāna in terms that bear little resemblance to the canonical description.
The Path of Purification — the cornerstone of the commentarial system — takes as its paradigm for meditation practice a method called kasina, in which one stares at an external object until the image of the object is imprinted in one's mind.
This image then gives rise to a countersign that is said to indicate the attainment of threshold concentration, a necessary prelude to jhāna.
The text then tries to fit all other meditation methods into this mold, so that they too give rise to countersigns, but even by its own admission, breath meditation does not fit the mold very well.
With the other methods, the stronger one's focus, the more vivid the object and the closer it is to producing a countersign; but with the breath, the stronger one's focus, the more subtle the breath and the harder it is to detect.
As a result, the text states that only Buddhas and Buddhas' sons find the breath a congenial focal point for attaining jhāna.
None of these assertions have any support in the Canon.
Although a practice called kasina is mentioned tangentially in some of the discourses, the only point where it is described in any detail makes no mention of staring at an object or gaining a countersign.
If breath meditation were congenial only to Buddhas and their sons, there seems little reason for the Buddha to have taught it so frequently and to such a wide variety of people.
If the arising of a countersign were essential to the attainment of jhāna, one would expect it to be included in the steps of breath meditation and in the graphic analogies used to describe jhāna, but it isn't.
Some Theravadins insist that questioning the commentaries is a sign of disrespect for the tradition, but it seems to be a sign of greater disrespect for the Buddha — or the compilers of the Canon — to assume that he or they would have left out something absolutely essential to the practice.
So it would seem that what jhāna means in the commentaries is something quite different from what it means in the Canon.
Because of this difference we can say that the commentaries are right in viewing their type of jhāna as unnecessary for Awakening, but Awakening cannot occur without the attainment of jhāna in the canonical sense.
We have already given a sketch in the preceding section of how jhāna in its canonical sense can act as the basis for transcendent discernment.
To recapitulate: On attaining any of the first seven levels of jhāna, one may step back slightly from the object of jhāna — entering the fifth factor of noble right concentration — to perceive how the mind relates to the object.
In doing this, one sees the process of causation as it plays a role in bringing the mind to jhāna, together with the various mental acts of fabrication that go into keeping it there.
Passage § lists these acts in considerable detail.
The fact that the passage emphasizes the amazing abilities of Sariputta, the Buddha's foremost disciple in terms of discernment, implies that there is no need for every meditator to perceive all these acts in such a detailed fashion.
What is essential is that one develop a sense of dispassion for the state of jhāna, seeing that even the relatively steady sense of refined pleasure and equanimity it provides is artificial and willed, inconstant and stressful, a state fabricated from many different events, and thus not worth identifying with.
Jhana thus becomes an ideal test case for understanding the workings of kamma and dependent co-arising in the mind.
Its stability gives discernment a firm basis for seeing clearly; its refined sense of pleasure and equanimity allow the mind to realize that even the most refined mundane states involve the inconstancy and stress common to all willed phenomena.
Passage § lists a number of verbal mental acts surrounding the exercise of supranormal powers that can be regarded in a similar light, as topics to be analyzed so as to give rise to a sense of dispassion.
The dispassion that results in either case enables one to experience the fading away and cessation of the last remaining activities in the mind, even the activity of discernment itself.
When this process fully matures, it leads on to total relinquishment, resulting in the clear knowing and release of Arahantship.
In contrast to the issue of the role of jhāna as a condition for discernment, the role of discernment as a condition for jhāna is uncontroversial.
Discernment aids jhāna on two levels: mundane and transcendent.
On the mundane level, it enables one to perceive the various factors that go into one's state of jhāna so that one can master them and shed the factors that prevent one from attaining a higher level of jhāna.
This again involves the reflection that constitutes the fifth factor of noble right concentration, but in this case the results stay on the mundane level.
For instance, as one masters the first level of jhāna and can reflect on the elements of stress it contains, one may perceive that directed thought and evaluation should be abandoned because they have become unnecessary in maintaining one's concentration, just as the forms used in pouring a cement wall become unnecessary when the cement has hardened.
In dropping these factors, one then goes on to the second level of jhāna.
Passage § gives a list of the factors that, in succession, are dropped in this way as one attains higher and higher levels of concentration.
On the transcendent level, the discernment that precipitates Awakening results in a supramundane level of jhāna called the fruit of gnosis, which is described in §§- — a type of jhāna independent of all perceptions and intentional processes, beyond all limitations of cosmos, time, and the present: the Arahant's foretaste, in this lifetime, of the absolutely total Unbinding experienced by the awakened mind at death.
§.
These four types of individuals are to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
There is the case of the individual who has attained internal tranquility of awareness, but not insight into phenomena through heightened discernment.
There is… the individual who has attained insight into phenomena through heightened discernment, but not internal tranquility of awareness.
There is… the individual who has attained neither internal tranquility of awareness nor insight into phenomena through heightened discernment.
And there is… the individual who has attained both internal tranquility of awareness & insight into phenomena through heightened discernment.
The individual who has attained internal tranquility of awareness, but not insight into phenomena through heightened discernment, should approach an individual who has attained insight into phenomena through heightened discernment… and ask him: 'How should fabrications be regarded?
How should they be investigated?
How should they be seen with insight?' The other will answer in line with what he has seen & experienced: 'Fabrications should be regarded in this way… investigated in this way… seen in this way with insight.' Then eventually he will become one who has attained both internal tranquility of awareness & insight into phenomena through heightened discernment.
As for the individual who has attained insight into phenomena through heightened discernment, but not internal tranquility of awareness, he should approach an individual who has attained internal tranquility of awareness… and ask him, 'How should the mind be steadied?
How should it be made to settle down?
How should it be unified?
How should it be concentrated?' The other will answer in line with what he has seen & experienced: 'The mind should be steadied in this way… made to settle down in this way… unified in this way… concentrated in this way.' Then eventually he will become one who has attained both internal tranquility of awareness & insight into phenomena through heightened discernment.
As for the individual who has attained neither internal tranquility of awareness nor insight into phenomena through heightened discernment, he should approach an individual who has attained both internal tranquility of awareness & insight into phenomena through heightened discernment… and ask him, 'How should the mind be steadied?
How should it be made to settle down?
How should it be unified?
How should it be concentrated?
How should fabrications be regarded?
How should they be investigated?
How should they be seen with insight?' The other will answer in line with what he has seen & experienced: 'The mind should be steadied in this way… made to settle down in this way… unified in this way… concentrated in this way.
Fabrications should be regarded in this way… investigated in this way… seen in this way with insight.' Then eventually he will become one who has attained both internal tranquility of awareness & insight into phenomena through heightened discernment.
As for the individual who has attained both internal tranquility of awareness & insight into phenomena through heightened discernment, his duty is to make an effort in establishing those very same skillful qualities to a higher degree for the ending of the effluents.
Ven.
Ananda: Whenever a monk or nun declares the attainment of arahantship in my presence, they all do it by means of one or another of four paths.
Which four?
There is the case where a monk has developed insight preceded by tranquility.
As he develops insight preceded by tranquility, the path is born.
He follows that path, develops it, pursues it.
As he follows the path, developing it & pursuing it — his fetters are abandoned, his obsessions abolished.
Furthermore, there is the case where a monk has developed tranquility preceded by insight.
As he develops tranquility preceded by insight, the path is born.
He follows that path… His fetters are abandoned, his obsessions abolished.
Furthermore, there is the case where a monk has developed tranquility & insight in concert.
As he develops tranquility & insight in tandem, the path is born.
He follows that path… His fetters are abandoned, his obsessions abolished.
Furthermore, there is the case where a monk's mind has its restlessness concerning the Dhamma well under control.
There comes a time when his mind grows steady inwardly, settles down, and becomes unified & concentrated.
In him the path is born.
He follows that path… His fetters are abandoned, his obsessions abolished.
Whenever a monk or nun declares the attainment of Arahantship in my presence, they all do it by means of one or another of these four paths.
Then Ven.
Anuruddha went to Ven.
Sāriputta and, on arrival, greeted him courteously.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat down to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Sāriputta, 'By means of the divine eye, purified & surpassing the human, I see the thousand-fold cosmos.
My persistence is aroused & unsluggish.
My mindfulness is established & unshaken.
My body is calm & unaroused.
My mind is concentrated into singleness.
And yet my mind is not released from the effluents through lack of clinging/sustenance.
Ven.
Sāriputta: 'My friend, when the thought occurs to you, “By means of the divine eye, purified & surpassing the human, I see the thousand-fold cosmos,” that is related to your conceit.
When the thought occurs to you, “My persistence is aroused & unsluggish.
My mindfulness is established & unshaken.
My body is calm & unperturbed.
My mind is concentrated into singleness,” that is related to your restlessness.
When the thought occurs to you, “And yet my mind is not released from the effluents through lack of clinging/sustenance,” that is related to your anxiety.
It would be well if — abandoning these three qualities, not attending to these three qualities — you directed your mind to the Deathless property.'
So after that, Ven.
Anuruddha — abandoning those three qualities, not attending to those three qualities — directed his mind to the Deathless property.
Dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute, he in no long time entered & remained in the unexcelled goal of the holy life for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew, 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.' And thus Ven.
Anuruddha became another one of the Arahants.
And what is an individual released in both ways?
There is the case of the individual who remains touching with his body the peaceful liberations, the formlessnesses beyond forms; when he has seen with discernment, his effluents are totally ended.
I do not say that such a monk has any duty to do with heedfulness.
Why is that?
Because he has done his duty with heedfulness; he is no longer capable of being heedless.
And what is an individual released through discernment?
There is the case of the individual who does not remain touching with his body the peaceful liberations, the formlessnesses beyond forms; but when he has seen with discernment, his effluents are totally ended.
I do not say that such a monk has any duty to do with heedfulness.
Why is that?
Because he has done his duty with heedfulness; he is no longer capable of being heedless.
Develop concentration, monks.
A concentrated monk discerns things as they have come to be.
And what does he discern as it has come to be?
'This is stress,' he discerns as it has come to be.
'This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress,' he discerns as it has come to be…
Therefore your duty is the contemplation, 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.'
Develop concentration, monks.
A concentrated monk discerns things as they have come to be.
And what does he discern as it has come to be?
The origination & disappearance of form… of feeling… of perception… of fabrications… of consciousness.
And what is the origination of form… of feeling… of perception… of fabrications… of consciousness?
There is the case where one relishes, welcomes, & remains fastened.
To what?
One relishes form, welcomes it, & remains fastened to it.
While one is relishing form, welcoming it, & remaining fastened to it, delight arises.
Any delight in form is clinging.
With that clinging as a condition there is becoming.
With becoming as a condition there is birth.
With birth as a condition then aging-&-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all come into play.
Thus is the origination of this entire mass of suffering & stress.

And what is the disappearance of form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness?
There is the case where one does not relish, welcome or remain fastened.
To what?
One does not relish form, welcome it, or remain fastened to it.
While one is not relishing form, welcoming it, or remaining fastened to it, one's delight in form ceases.
From the cessation of that delight, clinging ceases.
From the cessation of clinging, becoming ceases.
From the cessation of becoming, birth ceases.
From the cessation of birth, then aging-&-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Thus is the cessation of this entire mass of suffering & stress.

§.
Monks, Sāriputta is wise, of great discernment, deep discernment, wide… joyous… rapid… quick… penetrating discernment… There is the case where Sāriputta… entered & remained in the first jhāna.
Whatever qualities there are in the first jhāna — applied thought, evaluation, rapture, pleasure, singleness of mind, contact, feeling, perception, intention, consciousness, desire, decision, persistence, mindfulness, equanimity, & attention — he ferreted them out one by one.
Known to him they arose, known to him they remained, known to him they subsided.
He discerned, 'So this is how these qualities, not having been, come into play.
Having been, they vanish.' He remained unattracted & unrepelled with regard to those qualities — independent, detached, released, dissociated, with an awareness rid of barriers.
He discerned that 'There is a further escape,' and pursuing it, there really was for him.

Furthermore, completely transcending the dimension of nothingness, he entered & remained in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
He emerged mindful from that attainment.
On emerging… he regarded the past qualities that had ceased & changed: 'So this is how these qualities, not having been, come into play.
Having been, they vanish.' He remained unattracted & unrepelled with regard to those qualities — independent, detached, released, dissociated, with an awareness rid of barriers.
He discerned that 'There is a further escape,' and pursuing it there really was for him.
Furthermore, completely transcending the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, he entered & remained in the cessation of feeling & perception.
And when he saw with discernment, his effluents were totally ended.
He emerged mindful from that attainment.
On emerging… he regarded the past qualities that had ceased & changed: 'So this is how these qualities, not having been, come into play.
Having been, they vanish.' He remained unattracted & unrepelled with regard to those qualities — independent, detached, released, dissociated, with an awareness rid of barriers.
He discerned that 'There is no further escape,' and pursuing it there really wasn't for him.
If someone, rightly describing a person, were to say, 'He has attained mastery & perfection in noble virtue… noble concentration… noble discernment… noble release,' he would be rightly describing Sāriputta… Sāriputta takes the unexcelled wheel of Dhamma set rolling by the Tathāgata and keeps it rolling rightly.
I tell you, the ending of the effluents depends on the first jhāna… the second jhāna… the third… the fourth… the dimension of the infinitude of space… the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the dimension of nothingness… the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
'I tell you, the ending of the effluents depends on the first jhāna.' Thus it has been said.
In reference to what was it said?… Suppose that an archer or archer's apprentice were to practice on a straw man or mound of clay, so that after a while he would become able to shoot long distances, to fire accurate shots in rapid succession, and to pierce great masses.
In the same way, there is the case where a monk… enters & remains in the first jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
He regards whatever phenomena there that are connected with form, feeling, perceptions, fabrications, & consciousness, as inconstant, stressful, a disease, a cancer, an arrow, painful, an affliction, alien, a disintegration, an emptiness, not-self.
He turns his mind away from those phenomena, and having done so, inclines his mind to the property of deathlessness: 'This is peace, this is exquisite — the resolution of all fabrications; the relinquishment of all acquisitions; the ending of craving; dispassion; cessation; Unbinding.'
Staying right there, he reaches the ending of the mental effluents.
Or, if not, then — through this very Dhamma-passion, this Dhamma-delight and through the total wasting away of the five lower fetters — he is due to be reborn, there to be totally unbound, never again to return from that world.
'I tell you, the ending of the effluents depends on the first jhāna.' Thus it was said, and in reference to this was it said.
Thus, as far as the perception-attainments go, that is as far as gnosis-penetration goes.
As for these two dimensions — the attainment of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception & the attainment of the cessation of feeling & perception — I tell you that they are to be rightly explained by those monks who are meditators, skilled in attaining, skilled in attaining & emerging, who have attained & emerged in dependence on them.
Then Dasama the householder from the city of Aṭṭhaka went to Ven.
Ānanda and, on arrival, having bowed down, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Ānanda, 'Is there, venerable sir, any one condition explained by the Blessed One… whereby a monk — dwelling heedful, ardent, & resolute — releases his mind that is as yet unreleased, or whereby the effluents not yet brought to an end come to an end, or whereby he attains the unexcelled security from bondage that he has not yet attained?
Ven.
Ānanda: Yes, householder, there is… There is the case where a monk… enters & remains in the first jhāna… He notices that 'This first jhāna is fabricated & willed.' He discerns, 'Whatever is fabricated & willed is inconstant & subject to cessation.' Staying right there, he reaches the ending of the effluents.
Or, if not, then — through this very Dhamma-passion, this Dhamma-delight and through the total wasting away of the five lower fetters — he is due to be reborn, there to be totally unbound, never again to return from that world.

Ven.
Sāriputta: This Unbinding is pleasant, friends.
This Unbinding is pleasant.
Udāyin: But what is the pleasure here, my friend, where there is nothing felt?
Ven.
Sāriputta: Just that is the pleasure here, my friend: where there is nothing felt.
There are these five strings of sensuality.
Which five?
Forms cognizable via the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing; sounds… smells… tastes… tactile sensations cognizable via the body — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
Whatever pleasure or joy arises in dependence on these five strings of sensuality, that is sensual pleasure.
Now there is the case where a monk — quite secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful qualities — enters & remains in the first jhāna… If, as he remains there, he is beset with attention to perceptions dealing with sensuality, that is an affliction for him.
Just as pain arises as an affliction for a healthy person, even so the attention to perceptions dealing with sensuality that beset the monk is an affliction for him.
Now the Blessed One has said that whatever is an affliction is stress.
So by this line of reasoning it may be known how Unbinding is pleasant.
Furthermore, there is the case where a monk… enters & remains in the second jhāna… If, as he remains there, he is beset with attention to perceptions dealing with directed thought, that is an affliction for him…
Furthermore, there is the case where a monk… enters & remains in the third jhāna… If, as he remains there, he is beset with attention to perceptions dealing with rapture, that is an affliction for him…
Furthermore, there is the case where a monk… enters & remains in the fourth jhāna… If, as he remains there, he is beset with attention to perceptions dealing with equanimity, that is an affliction for him…
Furthermore, there is the case where a monk… enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of space.
If, as he remains there, he is beset with attention to perceptions dealing with form, that is an affliction for him…
Furthermore, there is the case where a monk… enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
If, as he remains there, he is beset with attention to perceptions dealing with the dimension of the infinitude of space, that is an affliction for him…
Furthermore, there is the case where a monk… enters & remains in the dimension of nothingness.
If, as he remains there, he is beset with attention to perceptions dealing with the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, that is an affliction for him…
Furthermore, there is the case where a monk… enters & remains in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
If, as he remains there, he is beset with attention to perceptions dealing with the dimension of nothingness, that is an affliction for him… whatever is an affliction is stress.
So by this line of reasoning it may be known how Unbinding is pleasant.
Furthermore, there is the case where a monk… enters & remains in the cessation of perception & feeling.
And when he has seen with discernment, his effluents are completely ended.
So by this line of reasoning it may be known how Unbinding is pleasant.
Ven.
Ānanda: It's amazing, my friend, it's astounding, how the Blessed One has attained & recognized the opportunity for the purification of beings… and the direct realization of Unbinding, where the eye will be, and forms, and yet one will not be sensitive to that dimension; where the ear will be, and sounds… where the nose will be, and smells… where the tongue will be, and tastes… where the body will be, and tactile sensations, and yet one will not be sensitive to that dimension.
Ven.
Udāyin: Is one percipient when not sensitive to that dimension or unpercipient?
Ven.
Ānanda:…percipient…
Ven.
Udāyin:…percipient of what?
Ven.
Ānanda: There is the case where with the complete transcending of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of resistance, and not heeding perceptions of diversity, 'Infinite space,' one… remains in the dimension of the infinitude of space: this is one way of being percipient when not sensitive to that dimension.
Further, with the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of space, 'Infinite consciousness,' one… remains in the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness: this is another way of being percipient when not sensitive to that dimension.
Further, with the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, 'There is nothing,' one… remains in the dimension of nothingness: this is another way of being percipient when not sensitive to that dimension.
Once, friend, when I was staying in Sāketa at the Game Refuge in the Black Forest, the nun Jaṭilā Bhāgikā went to me, and on arrival — having bowed down — stood to one side.
As she was standing to one side, she said to me, 'The concentration whereby — neither pressed down nor forced back, nor with mental fabrications kept blocked or suppressed — still as a result of release, contented as a result of stillness, and as a result of contentment one is not agitated: this concentration is said by the Blessed One to be the fruit of what?'
I said to her, '…This concentration is said by the Blessed One to be the fruit of gnosis.' This is another way of being percipient when not sensitive to that dimension.
The Buddha: Sandha, practice the absorption of a thoroughbred horse, not the absorption of an unbroken colt.
And how is an unbroken colt absorbed?
An unbroken colt, tied to the feeding trough, is absorbed with the thought, 'Barley grain!
Barley grain!' Why is that?
Because as he is tied to the feeding trough, the thought does not occur to him, 'I wonder what task the trainer will have me do today?
What should I do in response?' Tied to the feeding trough, he is simply absorbed with the thought, 'Barley grain!
Barley grain!'
In the same way, there are cases where an unbroken colt of a man, having gone to the wilderness, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty dwelling, dwells with his awareness overcome by sensual passion, obsessed with sensual passion.
He does not discern the escape, as it has come to be, from sensual passion once it has arisen.
Making that sensual passion the focal point, he absorbs himself with it, besorbs, resorbs, & supersorbs himself with it.
He dwells with his awareness overcome by ill will… sloth & drowsiness… restlessness & anxiety… uncertainty, obsessed with uncertainty.
He does not discern the escape, as it has come to be, from uncertainty once it has arisen.
Making that uncertainty the focal point, he absorbs himself with it, besorbs, resorbs, & supersorbs himself with it.
He is absorbed dependent on earth… liquid… fire… wind… the dimension of the infinitude of space… the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the dimension of nothingness… the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception… this world… the next world… whatever is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, attained, sought after, pondered by the intellect.
That is how an unbroken colt of a man is absorbed.
And how is a thoroughbred absorbed?
An excellent thoroughbred horse tied to the feeding trough, is not absorbed with the thought, 'Barley grain!
Barley grain!' Why is that?
Because as he is tied to the feeding trough, the thought occurs to him, 'I wonder what task the trainer will have me do today?
What should I do in response?' Tied to the feeding trough, he is not absorbed with the thought, 'Barley grain!
Barley grain!' The excellent thoroughbred horse regards the feel of the spur as a debt, an imprisonment, a loss, a piece of bad luck.
In the same way, an excellent thoroughbred of a man, having gone to the wilderness, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty dwelling, dwells with his awareness not overcome by sensual passion, not obsessed with sensual passion.
He discerns the escape, as it has come to be, from sensual passion once it has arisen.
He dwells with his awareness not overcome by ill will… sloth & drowsiness… restlessness & anxiety… uncertainty, obsessed with uncertainty.
He discerns the escape, as it has come to be, from uncertainty once it has arisen.
He is absorbed dependent neither on earth, liquid, fire, wind, the dimension of the infinitude of space, the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, the dimension of nothingness, the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, this world, the next world, nor on whatever is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, attained, sought after, or pondered by the intellect — and yet he is absorbed.
And to this excellent thoroughbred of a man, absorbed in this way, the devas, with their Indras, Brahmās, & viceroys, pay homage even from afar:
Ven.
Sandha: But in what way is the excellent thoroughbred of a man absorbed when he is absorbed…?
The Buddha: There is the case, Sandha, where for an excellent thorough-bred of a man the perception of earth with regard to earth has ceased to exist; the perception of liquid with regard to liquid… the perception of fire with regard to fire… the perception of wind with regard to wind… the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of space with regard to the dimension of the infinitude of space… the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness with regard to the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the perception of the dimension of nothingness with regard to the dimension of nothingness… the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception with regard to the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception… the perception of this world with regard to this world… the next world with regard to the next world… and whatever is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, attained, sought after, or pondered by the intellect: the perception of that has ceased to exist.
Absorbed in this way, the excellent thoroughbred of a man is absorbed dependent neither on earth, liquid, fire, wind, the dimension of the infinitude of space, the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, the dimension of nothingness, the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, this world, the next world, nor on whatever is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, attained, sought after, or pondered by the intellect — and yet he is absorbed.
And to this excellent thoroughbred of a man, absorbed in this way, the devas, with their Indras, Brahmās, & viceroys, pay homage even from afar:
Knowledge of the ending of the effluents, as it has come to be, occurs to one who is concentrated, I tell you, and not to one who is not concentrated.
So concentration is the path, monks.
Non-concentration is no path at all.
We have pinpointed the fifth, reflective level of noble right concentration as the mental state in which transcendent discernment can arise.
A look at how equanimity functions in this process will help to flesh out our account of this state.
The word “equanimity” is used in the Canon in two basic senses: ) a neutral feeling in the absence of pleasure and pain, and ) an attitude of even-mindedness in the face of every sort of experience, regardless of whether pleasure and pain are present or not.
The attitude of even-mindedness is what is meant here.
Passage § gives an outline of the place of equanimity in the emotional life of a person on the path of practice.
This outline is interesting for several reasons.
To begin with, contrary to many teachings currently popular in the West, it shows that there is a skillful use for the sense of distress that can come to a person who longs for the goal of the practice but has yet to attain it.
This sense of distress can help one to get over the distress that comes when one feels deprived of pleasant sensory objects, for one realizes that the goal unattained is a much more serious lack than an unattained sensual pleasure.
With one's priorities thus straightened out, one will turn one's energy to the pursuit of the path, rather than to the pursuit of sensual pleasure.
As the path thus matures, it results in the sense of joy that comes on gaining an insight into the true nature of sensory objects — a joy that in turn matures into a sense of equanimity resulting from that very same insight.
This is the highest stage of what is called equanimity “dependent on multiplicity” — i.e., equanimity in the face of multiple objects.
Passages § and § go into more detail on how to foster this sort of equanimity.
Passage § describes three stages in the process: ) development, or a conscious turning of the mind to equanimity in the face of agreeable or disagreeable objects; ) a state of being in training, in which one feels a spontaneous disillusionment with agreeable or disagreeable objects; and ) fully developed faculties, in which one's even-mindedness is so completely mastered that one is in full control of one's thought processes in the face of agreeable or disagreeable objects.
Because the first of these three stages is a conscious process, both § and § illustrate it with a series of graphic metaphors to help “tune” the mind to the right attitude and to help keep that attitude firmly in mind.
However, the cultivation of equanimity does not stop with equanimity dependent on multiplicity.
Formless jhāna, if one is able to attain it, functions as a basis for equanimity dependent on singleness, i.e., the singleness of jhāna.
The next stage is to use this equanimity to bring on the state of equipoise called non-fashioning, although § shows that non-fashioning can be attained directly from any of the stages of jhāna, and not just the formless ones.
Exactly what non-fashioning involves is shown in §: one perceives the fabricated and willed nature of even one's refined state of jhāna, and becomes so dispassionate toward the whole process that one “neither fabricates nor wills for the sake of becoming or un-becoming.” In this state of non-fashioning, the mind is so balanced that it contributes absolutely no present input into the conditioning of experience at all.
Because the process of conditioned or fabricated experience, on the unawakened level, requires present input together with input from the past in order to continue functioning, the entire process then breaks down, and all that remains is the Unfabricated.
After this experience, the processes of worldly experience resume due to the kammic input from the past, but one's attitude toward these processes is changed, in line with the mental fetters that have been cut by the Awakening.
If the Awakening was total, one continues to deal on an awakened level with the world until the time of one's total Unbinding with an attitude of perfect even-mindedness, illustrated by the three “frames of reference” described at the end of §.
One feels sympathy for others and seeks their well-being, experiencing a sense of satisfaction when they respond to one's teachings, but otherwise one stays equanimous, untroubled, mindful, and alert.
This passage shows that the even-mindedness of a fully awakened person is an attitude not of cold indifference, but rather of mental imperturbability.
Such a person has found true happiness and would like others to share that happiness as well, but that happiness is not dependent on how others respond.
This is the ideal state of mind for a person who truly works for the benefit of the world.
'The thirty-six emotions should be known by experience.' Thus it was said.
And in reference to what was it said?
Six kinds of household joy & six kinds of renunciation joy; six kinds of household distress & six kinds of renunciation distress; six kinds of household equanimity & six kinds of renunciation equanimity.
And what are the six kinds of household joy?
The joy that arises when one regards as an acquisition the acquisition of forms cognizable by the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, connected with worldly baits — or when one recalls the previous acquisition of such forms after they have passed, ceased, & changed: that is called household joy.

And what are the six kinds of renunciation joy?
The joy that arises when — experiencing the inconstancy of those very forms, their change, fading, & cessation — one sees with right discernment as it has come to be that all forms, past or present, are inconstant, stressful, subject to change: that is called renunciation joy.

And what are the six kinds of household distress?
The distress that arises when one regards as a non-acquisition the non-acquisition of forms cognizable by the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, connected with worldly baits — or when one recalls the previous non-acquisition of such forms after they have passed, ceased, & changed: that is called household distress.

And what are the six kinds of renunciation distress?
The distress coming from the longing that arises in one who is filled with longing for the unexcelled liberations when — experiencing the inconstancy of those very forms, their change, fading, & cessation — he sees with right discernment as it has come to be that all forms, past or present, are inconstant, stressful, subject to change and he is filled with this longing: 'O when will I enter & remain in the dimension that the noble ones now enter & remain in?' This is called renunciation distress.

And what are the six kinds of household equanimity?
The equanimity that arises when a foolish, deluded person — a run-of-the-mill, untaught person who has not conquered his limitation or the results of action & who is blind to danger — sees a form with the eye.
Such equanimity does not go beyond the form, which is why it is called household equanimity.

And what are the six kinds of renunciation equanimity?
The equanimity that arises when — experiencing the inconstancy of those very forms, their change, fading, & cessation — one sees with right discernment as it has come to be that all forms, past or present, are inconstant, stressful, subject to change: this equanimity goes beyond form, which is why it is called renunciation equanimity.

'Thirty-six emotions should be known by experience.' Thus it was said.
And in reference to this was it said.
'With regard to them, depending on this, abandon that.' Thus it was said.
And in reference to what was it said?
Here, by depending & relying on the six kinds of renunciation joy, abandon & transcend the six kinds of household joy.
Such is their abandoning, such is their transcending.
By depending & relying on the six kinds of renunciation distress, abandon & transcend the six kinds of household distress.
Such is their abandoning, such is their transcending.
By depending & relying on the six kinds of renunciation equanimity, abandon & transcend the six kinds of household equanimity.
Such is their abandoning, such their transcending.
By depending & relying on the six kinds of renunciation joy, abandon & transcend the six kinds of renunciation distress.
Such is their abandoning, such is their transcending.
By depending & relying on the six kinds of renunciation equanimity, abandon & transcend the six kinds of renunciation joy.
Such is their abandoning, such their transcending.
There is equanimity coming from multiplicity, dependent on multiplicity; and there is equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness.
And what is equanimity coming from multiplicity, dependent on multiplicity?
There is equanimity with regard to forms, equanimity with regard to sounds…smells…tastes…tactile sensations.
This is equanimity coming from multiplicity, dependent on multiplicity.
And what is equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness?
There is equanimity dependent on the dimension of the infinitude of space, equanimity dependent on the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness…the dimension of nothingness…the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
This is equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness.
By depending & relying on equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness, abandon & transcend equanimity coming from multiplicity, dependent on multiplicity.
Such is its abandoning, such its transcending.
By depending & relying on non-fashioning, abandon & transcend the equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness.
Such is its abandoning, such its transcending.
'Depending on this, abandon that.' Thus it was said.
And in reference to this was it said.
'There are three frames of reference that a noble one cultivates, cultivating which he is a teacher fit to instruct a group.' Thus it was said.
And in reference to what was it said?
There is the case where the Teacher — out of sympathy, seeking their well-being — teaches the Dhamma to his disciples: 'This is for your well-being, this is for your happiness.' His disciples do not listen or lend ear or apply their minds to gnosis.
Turning aside, they stray from the Teacher's message.
In this case the Tathāgata is not satisfied nor is he sensitive to satisfaction, yet he remains untroubled, mindful, & alert.
This is the first frame of reference…
Furthermore, there is the case where the Teacher — out of sympathy, seeking their well-being — teaches the Dhamma to his disciples: 'This is for your well-being, this is for your happiness.' Some of his disciples do not listen or lend ear or apply their minds to gnosis.
Turning aside, they stray from the Teacher's message.
But some of his disciples listen, lend ear, & apply their minds to gnosis.
They do not turn aside or stray from the Teacher's message.
In this case the Tathāgata is not satisfied nor is he sensitive to satisfaction; at the same time he is not dissatisfied nor is he sensitive to dissatisfaction.
Free from both satisfaction & dissatisfaction, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert.
This is the second frame of reference…
Furthermore, there is the case where the Teacher — out of sympathy, seeking their well-being — teaches the Dhamma to his disciples: 'This is for your well-being, this is for your happiness.' His disciples listen, lend ear, & apply their minds to gnosis.
They do not turn aside or stray from the Teacher's message.
In this case the Tathāgata is satisfied and is sensitive to satisfaction, yet he remains untroubled, mindful, & alert.
This is the third frame of reference…
'There are three frames of reference that a noble one cultivates, cultivating which he is a teacher fit to instruct a group.' Thus it was said.
And in reference to this was it said.
Rāhula, develop meditation in tune with earth — for when you are developing meditation in tune with earth, agreeable & disagreeable sensory impressions that have arisen will not stay in charge of your mind.
Just as when people throw what is clean or unclean on the earth — feces, urine, saliva, pus, or blood — the earth is not horrified, humiliated, or disgusted by it; in the same way, when you are developing meditation in tune with earth, agreeable & disagreeable sensory impressions that have arisen will not stay in charge of your mind.
Develop meditation in tune with water — for when you are developing meditation in tune with water, agreeable & disagreeable sensory impressions that have arisen will not stay in charge of your mind.
Just as when people wash what is clean or unclean in water — feces, urine, saliva, pus, or blood — the water is not horrified, humiliated, or disgusted by it; in the same way, when you are developing meditation in tune with water, agreeable & disagreeable sensory impressions that have arisen will not stay in charge of your mind.
Develop meditation in tune with fire — for when you are developing meditation in tune with fire, agreeable & disagreeable sensory impressions that have arisen will not stay in charge of your mind.
Just as when fire burns what is clean or unclean — feces, urine, saliva, pus, or blood — it is not horrified, humiliated, or disgusted by it; in the same way, when you are developing meditation in tune with fire, agreeable & disagreeable sensory impressions that have arisen will not stay in charge of your mind.
Develop meditation in tune with wind — for when you are developing meditation in tune with wind, agreeable & disagreeable sensory impressions that have arisen will not stay in charge of your mind.
Just as when wind blows what is clean or unclean — feces, urine, saliva, pus, or blood — it is not horrified, humiliated, or disgusted by it; in the same way, when you are developing meditation in tune with wind, agreeable & disagreeable sensory impressions that have arisen will not stay in charge of your mind.
Develop meditation in tune with space — for when you are developing meditation in tune with space, agreeable & disagreeable sensory impressions that have arisen will not stay in charge of your mind.
Just as space is not established anywhere, in the same way, when you are developing meditation in tune with space, agreeable & disagreeable sensory impressions that have arisen will not stay in charge of your mind.
And how, Ānanda, in the discipline of a noble one is there the unexcelled development of the faculties?
There is the case where, when seeing a form with the eye, there arises in a monk what is agreeable, what is disagreeable, what is agreeable & disagreeable.
He discerns that 'This agreeable thing has arisen in me, this disagreeable thing…this agreeable & disagreeable thing has arisen in me.
And that is fabricated, gross, dependently co-arisen.
But this is peaceful, this is exquisite, i.e., equanimity.' With that, the arisen agreeable thing…disagreeable thing…agreeable & disagreeable thing ceases, and equanimity takes its stance.
Just as a man with good eyes, having closed them, might open them; or having opened them, might close them, that is how quickly, how rapidly, how easily, no matter what it refers to, the arisen agreeable thing… disagreeable thing… agreeable & disagreeable thing ceases, and equanimity takes its stance.
In the discipline of a noble one, this is called the unexcelled development of the faculties with regard to forms cognizable by the eye.
Furthermore, when hearing a sound with the ear, there arises in a monk what is agreeable, what is disagreeable, what is agreeable & disagreeable.
He discerns that… and equanimity takes its stance.
Just as a strong man might easily snap his fingers, that is how quickly… equanimity takes its stance.
In the discipline of a noble one, this is called the unexcelled development of the faculties with regard to sounds cognizable by the ear.
Furthermore, when smelling an aroma with the nose, there arises in a monk what is agreeable, what is disagreeable, what is agreeable & disagreeable.
He discerns that…and equanimity takes its stance.
Just as drops of water roll off a gently sloping lotus leaf & do not remain there, that is how quickly… equanimity takes its stance.
In the discipline of a noble one, this is called the unexcelled development of the faculties with regard to aromas cognizable by the nose.
Furthermore, when tasting a flavor with the tongue, there arises in a monk what is agreeable, what is disagreeable, what is agreeable & disagreeable.
He discerns that… and equanimity takes its stance.
Just as a strong man might easily spit out a ball of saliva gathered on the tip of his tongue, that is how quickly… equanimity takes its stance.
In the discipline of a noble one, this is called the unexcelled development of the faculties with regard to flavors cognizable by the tongue.
Furthermore, when touching a tactile sensation with the body, there arises in a monk what is agreeable, what is disagreeable, what is agreeable & disagreeable.
He discerns that… and equanimity takes its stance.
Just as a strong man might easily extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm, that is how quickly… equanimity takes its stance.
In the discipline of a noble one, this is called the unexcelled development of the faculties with regard to tactile sensations cognizable by the body.
Furthermore, when cognizing an idea with the intellect, there arises in a monk what is agreeable, what is disagreeable, what is agreeable & disagreeable.
He discerns that 'This agreeable thing has arisen in me, this disagreeable thing…this agreeable & disagreeable thing has arisen in me.
And that is fabricated, gross, dependently co-arisen.
But this is peaceful, this is exquisite, i.e., equanimity.
With that, the arisen agreeable thing… disagreeable thing… agreeable & disagreeable thing ceases, and equanimity takes its stance.
Just as a strong man might let two or three drops of water fall onto an iron pan heated all day: slow would be the falling of the drops of water, but they quickly would vanish & disappear.
That is how quickly, how rapidly, how easily, no matter what it refers to, the arisen agreeable thing… disagreeable thing… agreeable & disagreeable thing ceases, and equanimity takes its stance.
In the discipline of a noble one, this is called the unexcelled development of the faculties with regard to ideas cognizable by the intellect.
And how is one a person in training, someone following the way?
There is the case where, when seeing a form with the eye, there arises in a monk what is agreeable, what is disagreeable, what is agreeable & disagreeable.
He feels horrified, humiliated, & disgusted with the arisen agreeable thing… disagreeable thing… agreeable & disagreeable thing….
And how is one a noble one with developed faculties?
There is the case where, when seeing a form with the eye, there arises in a monk what is agreeable, what is disagreeable, what is agreeable & disagreeable.
If he wants, he remains percipient of loathsomeness in the presence of what is not loathsome.
If he wants, he remains percipient of unloathsomeness in the presence of what is loathsome.
If he wants, he remains percipient of loathsomeness in the presence of what is not loathsome & what is.
If he wants, he remains percipient of unloathsomeness in the presence of what is loathsome & what is not.
If he wants — in the presence of what is loathsome & what is not — cutting himself off from both, he remains equanimous, alert, & mindful.

This is how one is a noble one with developed faculties.
there remains only equanimity: pure & bright, pliant, malleable & luminous.
Just as if a skilled goldsmith or goldsmith's apprentice were to prepare a furnace, heat up a crucible, and, taking gold with a pair of tongs, place it in the crucible.
He would blow on it periodically, sprinkle water on it periodically, examine it periodically, so that the gold would become refined, well-refined, thoroughly refined, flawless, free from dross, pliant, malleable & luminous.
Then whatever sort of ornament he had in mind — whether a belt, an earring, a necklace, or a gold chain — it would serve his purpose.
In the same way, there remains only equanimity: pure & bright, pliant, malleable, & luminous.
He discerns that 'If I were to direct equanimity as pure & bright as this toward the dimension of the infinitude of space, I would develop the mind along those lines, and thus this equanimity of mine — thus supported, thus sustained — would last for a long time.
'
He discerns that 'If I were to direct equanimity as pure & bright as this toward the dimension of the infinitude of space and to develop the mind along those lines, that would be fabricated.
' He neither fabricates nor wills for the sake of becoming or un-becoming.
This being the case, he is not sustained by anything in the world.
Unsustained, he is not agitated.
Unagitated, he is totally unbound right within.
He discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'
A person of no integrity…enters & remains in the first jhāna.
He notices, 'I have gained the attainment of the first jhāna, but these other monks have not gained the attainment of the first jhāna.' He exalts himself for the attainment of the first jhāna and disparages others.
This is the quality of a person of no integrity.
A person of integrity notices, 'The Blessed One has spoken of non-fashioning even with regard to the attainment of the first jhāna, for by whatever means they construe it, it becomes otherwise from that.' So, making non-fashioning his focal point, he neither exalts himself for the attainment of the first jhāna nor disparages others.
This is the quality of a person of integrity.
A person of no integrity…enters & remains in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
He notices, 'I have gained the attainment of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, but these other monks have not gained the attainment of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.' He exalts himself for the attainment of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception and disparages others.
This is the quality of a person of no integrity.
A person of integrity notices, 'The Blessed One has spoken of non-fashioning even with regard to the attainment of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, for by whatever means they construe it, it becomes otherwise from that.' So, making non-fashioning his focal point, he neither exalts himself for the attainment of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception nor disparages others.
This is the quality of a person of integrity.
A person of integrity, completely transcending the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters & remains in the cessation of feeling & perception.
When he sees with discernment, his effluents are ended.
This is a monk who does not construe anything, does not construe anywhere, does not construe in any way.
The texts define right view as knowledge with regard to the four noble truths.
The phrase “with regard to,” here, can also mean “in terms of,” and this alternative meaning is especially relevant in this case.
It reflects the point that the knowledge constituting right view is not a theoretical knowledge about the truths but is a way of using the truths to categorize all of conditioned experience.
Because these truths view experience in terms of function — how unskillful and skillful mental qualities play a role in the causal chain of creating suffering or bringing it to an end — the right way to view right view itself is not to stop with its definition but to regard it in terms of its function and then put it to its intended use.
The function of right view is to look at events in the mind in a way that gives rise to a sense of dispassion, leading the mind to a state of non-fashioning and then on to Awakening.
It does this by focusing on the way in which passion and desire lead to suffering and stress.
In this, it develops the mind's basic reaction to stress — the search for a way to escape from the stress — in a skillful way so that this reaction actually leads to utter release.
When the mind sees, without its normal bewilderment, the actual process by which stress is caused, it will naturally let go of the causes.
When it sees passion clearly enough to catch that passion in the act of leading to stress, it will naturally develop a sense of dispassion for and detachment from the passion, so that it can view it simply as a mental event, with no meaning in terms of anything else.
This opens the way to the state of non-fashioning where the cause of stress is allowed to cease.
The causal connection between passion and desire on the one hand, and stress on the other, is explained in the standard formula for dependent co-arising under the factor of clinging/sustenance.
A passage in the Canon analyzes this factor into four forms of passion and desire for the five aggregates: clinging to sensuality, clinging to habits and practices, clinging to views, and clinging to theories about the self.
The third form of clinging listed here points to one of the paradoxes about right view: it is a form of view that has to loosen attachment to all views, ultimately including itself.
Passage § shows how this happens.
When faced with a variety of views about the world and the self, right view looks at the views, not in terms of their content, but simply as events in the mind, in and of themselves.
It sees them as part of a causal chain: fabricated, inconstant, stressful, and thus not-self, not worthy of attachment.
In this way it makes the mind dispassionate to all other views: dispassionate toward the terms they use, dispassionate toward their claims to truth.
Right view then turns on itself to see itself as part of a similar causal chain.
This loosens any sense of attachment even for right view so that the mind can see the view simply as an event: “there is this.” This entry into the perceptual mode of emptiness leads straight to the “higher escape” — the state of non-fashioning — that then becomes present to awareness.
Because right view is the only form of view that contains the seeds of its own transcendence in this way, it is the only form of knowing that is skillful enough to lead to Awakening.
The Canon gives no room for any alternative “skillful means” that would contradict right view.
After the experience of Awakening, the texts tell us, one continues to make use of right view, with no sense of clinging, as a pleasant abiding for the mind and for mindfulness and alertness, much as one would use jhāna for the same purpose.
This process of transcending right view even as one makes use of it shows that non-attachment to views does not mean agnosticism or an openness to all views.
Instead, non-attachment is a skillful way of making use of one's discerning faculties, seeing through to the causal function of all views, so that one may attain Awakening and then maintain a pleasant and mindfully alert abiding after one has become awakened.
The steps in the functioning of right view correspond to the three stages of frames-of-reference meditation.
The first step, in which one focuses on events in and of themselves — and not in reference to anything they might mean outside of the range of immediate experience — corresponds to the first stage of frames-of-reference meditation, in which one stays focused on the body, etc., in and of itself, putting aside all greed and distress with reference to the world.
The second step of right view, in which one focuses on events in terms of their role in the causal chain — fabricated, inconstant, stressful, and not-self — corresponds to the second stage of frames-of-reference meditation, in which one remains focused on the phenomenon of origination and passing away.
The third step of right view, in which one sees even right view simply as an event, corresponds to the third stage of frames-of-reference meditation in which one moves to the perceptual mode of “entry into emptiness,” noting simply, “There is this” — without being caught up in the “this” — and from there on to non-fashioning and Awakening.
Because the practice of jhāna is also implicated in these three steps — steadying the mind in the first step, sensitizing it to causality in the second, and providing the basis for the fifth factor of noble concentration in the third — mindfulness, concentration, and discernment are thus inextricably intertwined as they develop along the path to Awakening.
It is important to note that right view functions in two time frames: small and large.
Its primary frame is in the small frame, dealing exclusively with the immediate present.
As it focuses on the phenomenon of origination and passing away, it reduces its terms of analysis to more and more basic levels until reaching the point where it sees even such simple categories as “being” and “non-being” as extraneous, inappropriate, and irrelevant to the simple flow of events arising and passing away in the present.
As a result, it strips everything down to the most basic categories of experience — the presence and absence of stress — without adding anything further.
This phenomenological mode of perception, or “entry into emptiness,” sees things simply in terms of what is present and what is not.
Here, realizations are expressed merely as pointers to present phenomena without any content that would point to anything outside of direct experience: “There is this,” “Such is form, such is feeling,” etc.
The Pali name for this/that conditionality, idappaccayata, points to the fact that not only the phenomena but also their relationships are a matter of immediate, “right here-and-now” insight.
Once these insights are gained on the level of radically immediate experience, one realizes that they have implications for the larger time frame of the whole process of transmigration and one's entire experience of the cosmos as well.
The process of stress arising and passing away in the present is precisely the same process as that of living beings arising and passing away on the cosmic scale.
One sees that one has participated in this process from an inconceivable beginning in time; one knows — now that the process has been disbanded — that one has found the end of the cycle of rebirth.
This is because, in entering radically into the present moment by stripping away all clinging, one ultimately steps out of the dimensions of time and the present; having done so, one can see the totality of what it means to be in those dimensions.
This point is illustrated in two passages that express the content of right view immediately before and after the experience of the Deathless:
'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the way leading to the cessation of stress… These are effluents… This is the origination of effluents… This is the cessation of effluents… This is the way leading to the cessation of effluents.' His heart, thus knowing, thus seeing, is released from the effluent of sensuality, released from the effluent of becoming, released from the effluent of ignorance.
With release, there is the knowledge, 'Released.' He discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'
The first passage depicts the act of discernment that verifies the principles of conviction.
The second passage depicts the act of discernment that confirms the fact that the five faculties, when fully developed, do lead to the Deathless.
Notice that both passages follow a similar pattern, even though they deal with vastly different time scales.
Transmigration and darkness, in the first passage, correspond to stress in the second.
Ignorance and craving are the origination of stress, and the sentence, “The total fading & cessation of ignorance… Unbinding,” describes the cessation of stress.
The act of discernment that sees all these things is the way leading to the cessation of stress.
This repetition of the same pattern on two different frames of space and time in non-linear systems is called scale invariance: the same process on two different scales.
It is one of the most distinctive features of the Buddha's teachings, for it shows how an insight into a present moment in the mind can have repercussions on one's entire involvement in the cosmos.
The principle behind the scale invariance of right view is this/that conditionality: the fact that one's continued participation in the cosmos is kept going by one's present contribution to the causal stream initiated over the long course of the past.
By reaching the state of non-fashioning, one stops contributing to the present, and thus can bring the totality of one's participation to an end, leaving the utter freedom of Unbinding.
In this sense, the principle of this/that conditionality explains the possibility of attaining the Deathless, while the actuality of the Deathless — once it is attained through skillful mastery of kamma — is what proves the principle of this/that conditionality as an adequate description of the causal process that fabricates conditioned experience and provides an opening to the Unfabricated.
I do not envision any one other quality by which unarisen unskillful qualities arise, and arisen unskillful qualities go to growth & proliferation, like wrong view.
When a person has wrong view, unarisen unskillful qualities arise, and arisen unskillful qualities go to growth & proliferation.
I do not envision any one other quality by which unarisen skillful qualities arise, and arisen skillful qualities go to growth & proliferation, like right view.
When a person has right view, unarisen skillful qualities arise, and arisen skillful qualities go to growth & proliferation.
Just as when a nimb-tree seed, a bitter creeper seed, or a bitter melon seed is placed in moist soil, whatever nutriment it takes from the soil & the water, all conduces to its bitterness, acridity, & distastefulness.
Why is that?
Because of the evil nature of the seed.
In the same way, when a person has wrong view, whatever bodily deeds he undertakes in line with that view, whatever verbal deeds…whatever mental deeds he undertakes in line with that view, whatever intentions, whatever determinations, whatever vows, whatever fabrications, all lead to what is disagreeable, unpleasing, unappealing, unprofitable, & stressful.
Why is that?
Because of the evil nature of the view…
Just as when a sugar cane seed, a rice grain, or a grape seed is placed in moist soil, whatever nutriment it takes from the soil & the water, all conduces to its sweetness, tastiness, & unalloyed delectability.
Why is that?
Because of the auspicious nature of the seed.
In the same way, when a person has right view, whatever bodily deeds he undertakes in line with that view, whatever verbal deeds… whatever mental deeds he undertakes in line with that view, whatever intentions, whatever vows, whatever determinations, whatever fabrications, all lead to what is agreeable, pleasing, charming, profitable, & easeful.
Why is that?
Because of the auspicious nature of the view.
Right view, when assisted by these five factors, has awareness-release as its fruit & reward, has discernment-release as its fruit & reward.
Which five?
There is the case where right view is assisted by virtue, assisted by learning, assisted by discussion, assisted by tranquility, & assisted by insight.
When assisted by these five factors, right view has awareness-release & discernment release as its fruit & reward.
Kaccāyana: 'Lord, “Right view, right view,” it is said.
To what extent is there right view?'
The Buddha: 'By & large, Kaccāyana, this world is supported by a polarity, that of existence & non-existence.
But when one sees the origination of the world with right discernment as it has come to be, “non-existence” with reference to the world does not occur to one.
When one sees the cessation of the world with right discernment as it has come to be, “existence” with reference to the world does not occur to one.
'By & large, Kaccāyana, this world is in bondage to attachments, clingings, & biases.
But one such as this does not get involved with or cling to these attachments, clingings, fixations of awareness, biases, or obsessions; nor is he resolved on “my self.” He has no uncertainty or doubt that mere stress, when arising, is arising; stress, when passing away, is passing away.
In this, his knowledge is independent of others.
It's to this extent, Kaccāyana, that there is right view.'
Then Anāthapiṇḍika the householder went to the wanderers of other persuasions.
On arrival he greeted them courteously.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat down to one side.
As he was sitting there, the wanderers said to him, 'Tell us, householder, what views the contemplative Gotama has.'
'Venerable sirs, I don't know entirely what views the Blessed One has.' 
'Well, well.
So you don't know entirely what views the contemplative Gotama has.
Then tell us what views the monks have.'
'I don't even know entirely what views the monks have.'
'So you don't know entirely what views the contemplative Gotama has or even the monks have.
Then tell us what views you have.'
'It wouldn't be difficult for me to expound to you what views I have.
But please let the venerable ones expound each in line with his position, and then it won't be difficult for me to expound to you what views I have.'
When this had been said, one of the wanderers said to Anāthapiṇḍika the householder, 'The cosmos is eternal.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.
This is the sort of view I have.'
Another wanderer said to Anāthapiṇḍika, 'The cosmos is not eternal.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.
This is the sort of view I have.'
Another wanderer said, 'The cosmos is finite…'…'The cosmos is infinite…'…'The soul & the body are the same…'…'The soul is one thing and the body another…'…'After death a Tathāgata exists…'…'After death a Tathāgata does not exist…'…'After death a Tathāgata both does & does not exist…'…'After death a Tathāgata neither does nor does not exist.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.
This is the sort of view I have.'
When this had been said, Anāthapiṇḍika the householder said to the wanderers, 'As for the venerable one who says, “The cosmos is eternal.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.
This is the sort of view I have,” his view arises from his own inappropriate attention or in dependence on the words of another.
Now this view has been brought into being, is fabricated, willed, dependently co-arisen.
Whatever has been brought into being, is fabricated, willed, dependently co-arisen, that is inconstant.
Whatever is inconstant is stress.
This venerable one thus adheres to that very stress, submits himself to that very stress.' 
When this had been said, the wanderers said to Anāthapiṇḍika the householder, 'We have each & every one expounded to you in line with our own positions.
Now tell us what views you have.'
'Whatever has been brought into being, is fabricated, willed, dependently co-arisen, that is inconstant.
Whatever is inconstant is stress.
Whatever is stress is not mine, is not what I am, is not my self.
This is the sort of view I have.'
'So, householder, whatever has been brought into being, is fabricated, willed, dependently co-arisen, that is inconstant.
Whatever is inconstant is stress.
You thus adhere to that very stress, submit yourself to that very stress.'
'Venerable sirs, whatever has been brought into being, is fabricated, willed, dependently co-arisen, that is inconstant.
Whatever is inconstant is stress.
Whatever is stress is not mine, is not what I am, is not my self.
Having seen this well with right discernment as it has come to be, I also discern the higher escape from it as it has come to be.'
When this had been said, the wanderers fell silent, abashed, sitting with their shoulders drooping, their heads down, brooding, at a loss for words.
Anāthapiṇḍika the householder, perceiving that the wanderers were silent, abashed…at a loss for words, got up & left.
In §, the Buddha refers to himself as a doctor, treating the spiritual illnesses of his students.
This metaphor is useful to keep in mind as we discuss the basic categories of right view: the four noble truths.
Many people have charged Buddhism with being pessimistic because the four truths start out with stress and suffering, but this charge misses the fact that the first truth is part of a strategy of diagnosis and therapy focusing on the basic problem in life so as to offer a solution to it.
This is the sense in which the Buddha was like a doctor, focusing on the disease he wanted to cure.
The total cure he promised as a result of his course of therapy shows that, in actuality, he was much less pessimistic than the vast majority of world, for whom wisdom means accepting the bad things in life with the good, assuming that there is no chance in this life for unalloyed happiness.
The Buddha was an extremely demanding person, unwilling to bend to this supposed wisdom or to rest with anything less than absolute happiness.
We are fortunate that he was so demanding and succeeded in his aim, for otherwise we would have to undertake the uncertain task of trying to discover the way to that happiness ourselves.
Although the four noble truths constitute the most basic categories of the Buddha's teaching, he did not discuss them unless he felt that his listeners were ready for them.
To understand and accept them requires a basic shift in the framework of one's awareness, and only a mind that has been thoroughly prepared is in a position to make such a shift.
Often the Buddha would prepare his listeners with what he called a gradual discourse: discussing step by step the joy of generosity; the joy of living a virtuous life; the long-term sensory rewards of generosity and virtue in heaven; the drawbacks and impermanence of sensory pleasures and conditioned phenomena in general; and finally the rewards of renunciation.
Then, if he sensed that his listeners were ready to look favorably on renunciation as a means to true happiness, he would discuss the four truths, beginning with suffering and stress.
In this, he followed the sequence of his own Awakening: beginning with insight into the punishments of bad kamma, the rewards of good kamma, and the limitations of all kamma, and then proceeding to insight into the origination of stress and its cessation through the cessation of kamma.
Once the problem of stress and suffering is solved, he said, there are no more problems.
This is why he limited his teaching to this issue, even though his own Awakening encompassed much more.
The vicious cycle that operates between suffering and ignorance — with ignorance underlying the craving that causes suffering, and suffering causing the bewilderment that leads people to act in ignorant and unskillful ways — can be broken only when one focuses on understanding suffering and stress and the causal network that surrounds them.
Most people are so bewildered by the complexities of suffering and stress that they do not even know what the true problem is.
Thus they may deny that they are suffering, or may imagine that something stressful can actually be a solution to their problems.
The genius of the Buddha is that he recognized the most elegant and comprehensive way to deal with every variety of dissatisfaction in life.
When suffering and stress are seen with clear knowledge, they no longer can cause bewilderment, and the cycle that underlies all the problems of experience can be disbanded for good.
As § states, this clear knowledge is based on knowledge of the four noble truths.
These truths are best understood not as the content of a belief, but as categories for viewing and classifying the processes of immediate experience.
In §, the Buddha refers to them as categories of “appropriate attention,” a skillful alternative to the common way that people categorize their experience in terms of two dichotomies: being/non-being, and self/other.
For several reasons, these common dichotomies are actually problem-causing, rather than problem-solving.
The being/non-being dichotomy, for instance, comes down to the question of whether or not there exist actual “things” behind the changing phenomena of experience.
This type of questioning deals, by definition, with possibilities that cannot be directly experienced.
If the things in question could be experienced, then they wouldn't be lying behind experience.
Thus the being/non-being dichotomy pulls one's attention into the land of conjecture — “a thicket of views, a wilderness of views, a contortion of views, a writhing of views, a fetter of views” — and away from the area of direct awareness where the real problem and its solution lie.
As for the self/other dichotomy, there is the initial difficulty of determining what the self is.
Any true self would have to lie totally under one's own control, and yet nothing that one might try to identify as one's self actually meets this criterion.
Although the sense of self may seem intuitive enough, when carefully examined it shows itself to be based on confused perceptions and ideas.
If one's basic categories for understanding experience are a cause for confusion in this way, they can lead only to confused, unskillful action, and thus to more suffering and stress.
For example, when people view the source of their problems as poor relationships between themselves and others, or inadequate integration of the self, they are trying to analyze their problems in terms of categories that are ultimately uncertain.
Thus there is a built-in uncertainty in the efforts they make to solve their problems in terms of those categories.
A second problem, no matter how one might define a self, is the question of how to prove whether or not it actually exists.
This question entangles the mind in the unresolvable problems of the being/non-being dichotomy mentioned above: because the problem is phrased in terms that cannot be directly experienced, it forces the solution into a realm that cannot be experienced, either.
This fact probably explains the Buddha's statement in § to the effect that if one even asks the question of whether there is someone standing outside the processes of dependent co-arising to whom those processes pertain, it is impossible to lead the life that will bring about an end to suffering.
Regardless of whether one would answer the question with a yes or a no, the terms of the question focus on an area outside of direct experience and thus away from the true problem — the direct experience of suffering — and actually make it worse.
If one assumes the existence of a self, one must take on the implicit imperative to maximize the self's well-being through recourse to the “other.” This recourse may involve either exploiting the “other” or swallowing the “other” into the self by equating one's self with the cosmos as a whole.
Either approach involves clinging and craving, which lead to further suffering and stress.
On the other hand, if one denies any kind of self, saying that the cosmos is totally “other,” then one is assuming that there is nothing with any long-term existence whose happiness deserves anything more than quick, short-term attempts at finding pleasure.
The imperative in this case would be to pursue immediate pleasure with as little effort as possible, thus aborting any sustained effort to bring about an end to suffering.
These problems explain why the Buddha regarded questions of existence and non-existence, self and no-self, as unskillful, inappropriate ways of attending to experience.
Stress and its cessation, on the other hand, are categories that avoid these problems.
To begin with, they are immediately present and apparent.
Even babies recognize stress and pain, well before they have any concept of “self” or “being.” If one pays close attention to one's actual experience, there is no question about whether or not stress and its cessation are present.
Finally, because these categories don't require fashioning notions of “self” or “other” — or “no-self” or “no-other” — on top of one's immediate awareness, they allow one to reach the mode of “entry into emptiness” on the verge of non-fashioning, in which, as we mentioned in III/H, the mind simply notes, “There is this…” Thus they are ideal categories for analyzing experience in a way that reduces the confusion that causes people to act in unskillful ways and brings the mind to a point where it can disengage and transcend all suffering and stress by ending the mental fabrication that provides input into the causal web.
As for the imperatives implicit in the four categories of the noble truths, they are very different from the imperatives implicit in the notion that there is a self or that there isn't.
Stress, the first category, should be comprehended.
In practice, this means admitting its presence, recognizing it as a problem, and then observing it with patient mindfulness to understand its true nature.
One comes to realize that the problem is not with the stress and discomfort of external conditions, but with the stress and discomfort in the mind.
One also sees how stress is part of a causal process, and that it is always accompanied by craving, its point of origination.
The second category — craving, the origination of stress — should be abandoned.
Here we must note that the word “craving” covers not all desire, but only the desire leading to further becoming.
The desire to escape from that becoming, as we have noted, is part of the path.
Without such a desire, no one would have the motivation to follow the path or reach Unbinding.
When Unbinding is reached, though, even this desire is abandoned, just as a desire to walk to a park is abandoned on arriving there.
The third category, the cessation of stress, should be realized.
The definition of this truth as the abandoning of craving means that it denotes the successful performance of the duty appropriate to the second noble truth.
This introduces a double tier into the practice, in that one must not only abandon craving but also realize what is happening and what is uncovered in the process of that abandoning.
This, in turn, accounts for two of the major themes covered so far in this book: the switch from “object” to “approach” as the focal point in one's meditation as one moves from the first to the second stage in frames-of-reference meditation; and the need for sensitivity to one's present input into the causal network in order to nurture the mind's skillful mastery of this/that conditionality.
The feedback loop created by this combination of abandoning and knowing is what eventually short-circuits the process of this/that conditionality, cutting dependent co-arising at the links of craving and ignorance, and leading on to the state of non-fashioning that forms the threshold to the Deathless.
The fourth category, the way to the cessation of stress, is defined as the noble eightfold path, which we have already discussed in detail.
This truth must be developed, which involves two processes: nurturing the conditions for clear knowing; and abstaining from acts of body, speech, and mind that involve craving and would obstruct knowledge.
These two processes correspond to the two layers we have just noted in the duties associated with the cessation of stress: realizing and abandoning.
This correspondence shows the intimate relation between the third and fourth noble truths, and explains the Buddha's insistence that the noble eightfold path is the only way to the goal.
Taken together, the four categories of the noble truths, along with their imperatives, follow a basic problem-solving approach: one solves the problem of stress by following a path of practice that directly attacks the cause of the problem.
The noble eightfold path develops the qualities of mind needed to see that all the possible objects of craving — the five aggregates — are stressful, inconstant, and not-self.
As a result, one grows dispassionate toward them.
With nothing left to focus on, craving disbands.
When one experiences the “remainderless fading & cessation, renunciation, relinquishment, release, & letting go of that very craving”, the problem is solved.
Although the texts list four separate duties appropriate to each of the truths, in actual practice these duties are four aspects of a single process.
When stress is comprehended, the second noble truth — craving — has no object to latch onto and so can be abandoned.
The full realization of what is happening in the process of that abandoning constitutes the realization of the third noble truth, the cessation of stress.
Both the abandoning and the realization are accomplished by developing the path, which destroys any trace of ignorance concerning the four noble truths at the same time that it abandons craving.
This is how the practice cuts the chain of dependent co-arising simultaneously at its two most crucial factors, thus unraveling the causal chain and opening the way for an experience of the Unfabricated.
Passage § lists three steps in this process, which take the form of three levels of knowledge concerning each of the four truths: recognizing the truth for what it is, recognizing the duty appropriate to the truth, and realizing that the duty has been completed.
These levels of knowledge correspond to the three stages in right view that we mentioned in the preceding section.
The first level corresponds to the stage of seeing events in and of themselves for what they actually are.
The relationship between the second level of knowledge — realizing the duty appropriate to the truth — and the second stage of right view — viewing things as part of a causal chain — is somewhat less obvious, but more revealing once it is understood.
The word “duty” makes the point that, in order to understand the process of origination and passing away, one must become involved in the process in an active way.
This understanding does not come from a passive state of simply watching things arise and disappear.
Instead, one must participate in the process, becoming sensitive to pre-existing causal conditions and the impact of one's present activity on those conditions, if one wants truly to understand them.
The only way to know a causal relationship is to tamper with it and see what happens as a result.
The more precise and skillful one's tampering, and the more properly attuned one's powers of observation, the more precise the knowledge that can be gained.
This active participation corresponds to the second stage of frames of reference meditation and the process of gaining mastery in the practice of concentration.
Ultimately, it comes down to the issues of acquiring skillfulness and understanding the connection between skillfulness and this/that conditionality.
The meditator can gain escape from the confines of the causal process, not by simply watching it, but by developing the sensitivity to causal factors that comes from learning how to explore and manipulate them with skill.
The third level of knowledge — that the duty appropriate to the truth has been completed — corresponds to the mode of “entry into emptiness” on the verge of non-fashioning, when one realizes that nothing more needs to be contributed to the present moment.
In fact, nothing more can be contributed to the present moment.
As noted in the preceding section, this is the point where right view transcends itself.
In terms of the four noble truths, this is where simple distinctions among the four truths begin to break down.
As a modern teacher has put it, the meditator sees that all four truths are ultimately identical.
After having used jhāna and discernment, which form the heart of the path, to gain understanding of pain and to abandon clinging and craving, one comes to see that even jhāna and discernment are composed of the same aggregates as stress and pain, and that one's attitude toward them involves subtle levels of clinging and craving as well.
Thus the path is simply a refined version of the first three noble truths, in which one has taken suffering, craving, and ignorance, and turned them into tools for pleasure, detachment, and insight.
Without these tools, one could not have begun the process of release.
Were it not for one's attachment to jhāna and discernment, one could not have liberated oneself from the more obvious levels of stress; one could not have developed the sensitivity enabling one to appreciate the value of cessation and release when they finally come.
Now, however, that these tools have performed their functions, they become the last remaining obstacle to full release.
The approach to the problem of stress has now become, in and of itself, the only problem left.
As the four truths become one in this way, their respective duties reach the point where any further activity would mean that they would cancel one another out.
This is where the mind attains the state of non-fashioning, as there is nothing more it can do or know in terms of any of these duties.
This lack of input into the present moment forms a breach in this/that conditionality, opening the way beyond the four truths and on to the Unfabricated.
This coalescing of the truths coincides with a movement noted earlier, in which jhāna and discernment become one and the same thing.
This union of jhāna and discernment solves the riddle of how one can come to know the end of the intention that keeps the round of rebirth in motion.
As the path nears its end, the intentional activity underlying jhāna becomes the sole remaining element of intention in the mind; while the activity of discernment, as appropriate attention aimed at understanding jhāna, becomes the sole function of knowledge.
As they reach culmination and coalesce, the attention focused on the intention and the intention behind the act of attention short-circuit one another.
All that can follow on this point is the state of non-fashioning, in which all present input into the cycle of rebirth ends, and all experience of the cycle falls away.
As we explained in the Introduction, the experience of this falling away at Awakening confirms not only the Buddha's teachings on the present function of kammic input in this/that conditionality, but also on the functioning of kamma in the round of rebirth in the larger dimensions of time.
The wheel, the traditional symbol of the Dhamma, expresses these points in a visual form.
The Buddha states that when he gained full knowledge of all four truths on all three levels — recognizing the truth, recognizing the duty appropriate to it, and realizing that he had fully completed that duty — he knew that he had attained full Awakening.
He elaborates on his assertion by setting out a table of two sets of variables — the four noble truths and the three levels of knowledge appropriate to each — listing all twelve permutations of the two sets.
This sort of table, in Indian legal and philosophical traditions, is called a wheel.
This is why the discourse in which he makes this statement is called “Setting the Wheel of Dhamma in Motion,” and why the wheel used as a symbol of the Dhamma has twelve spokes, uniting at the hub, symbolizing the twelve permutations that merge into a singularity — knowledge and vision of things as they have come to be — at the still point of non-fashioning in the midst of the cycle of kamma.
Once the Blessed One was staying at Kosambī in the siṃsapā forest.
Then, picking up a few siṃsapā leaves with his hand, he asked the monks, 'What do you think, monks?
Which are more numerous, the few siṃsapā leaves in my hand or those overhead in the siṃsapā forest?'
'The leaves in the hand of the Blessed One are few in number, lord.
Those overhead in the siṃsapā forest are more numerous.'
'In the same way, monks, those things that I have known with direct knowledge but have not taught are more numerous.
And why haven't I taught them?
Because they are not connected with the goal, do not relate to the rudiments of the holy life, and do not lead to disenchantment, to dispassion, to cessation, to calm, to direct knowledge, to self-awakening, to Unbinding.
That is why I have not taught them.
'And what have I taught?
“This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.” This is what I have taught.
And why have I taught these things?
Because they are connected with the goal, relate to the rudiments of the holy life, and lead to disenchantment, to dispassion, to cessation, to calm, to direct knowledge, to self-awakening, to Unbinding.
This is why I have taught them.
'Therefore your duty is the contemplation, “This is stress…This is the origination of stress…This is the cessation of stress…This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.”'
'Stress should be known.
The cause by which stress comes into play should be known.
The diversity in stress should be known.
The result of stress should be known.
The cessation of stress should be known.
The path of practice for the cessation of stress should be known.' Thus it was said.
And in reference to what was it said?
Birth is stress, aging is stress, death is stress; sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair are stress; association with the unbeloved is stress; separation from the loved is stress; not getting what is wanted is stress.
In short, the five clinging-aggregates are stress.
And what is the cause by which stress comes into play?
Craving is the cause by which stress comes into play.
And what is the diversity in stress?
There is major stress & minor, slowly fading & quickly fading.
This is called the diversity in stress.
And what is the result of stress?
There are some cases in which a person overcome with pain, his mind exhausted, grieves, mourns, laments, beats his breast, & becomes bewildered.
Or one overcome with pain, his mind exhausted, comes to search outside, 'Who knows a way or two to stop this pain?' I tell you, monks, that stress results either in bewilderment or in search.
And what is the cessation of stress?
From the cessation of craving is the cessation of stress; and just this noble eightfold path is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress: right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
Now when a disciple of the noble ones discerns stress in this way, the cause by which stress comes into play in this way, the diversity of stress in this way, the result of stress in this way, the cessation of stress in this way, & the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress in this way, then he discerns this penetrative holy life as the cessation of stress.
'Stress should be known.
The cause by which stress comes into play…The diversity in stress…The result of stress…The cessation of stress…The path of practice for the cessation of stress should be known.' Thus it was said, and in reference to this was it said.
These four things are real, not unreal, not other than what they seem.
Which four?
'This is stress,' is real, not unreal, not other than what it seems.
'This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress,' is real, not unreal, not other than what it seems.
These are the four things that are real, not unreal, not other than what they seem.
Therefore your duty is the contemplation, 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.'
Suppose that a man were to cut down all the grass, sticks, branches, & leaves in India and to gather them into a heap.
Having gathered them into a heap, he would make stakes from them, and having made stakes he would impale all the large animals in the sea on large stakes, all the medium-sized animals in the sea on medium-sized stakes, & all the minute animals in the sea on minute stakes.
Before he had come to the end of all the sizable animals in the sea, he would have used up all the grass, sticks, branches, & leaves here in India.
It would not be feasible for him to impale on stakes the minute animals in the sea, which are even more numerous.
Why is that?
Because of the minuteness of their bodies.
So great is the plane of deprivation.
Freed from this great realm of deprivation is the individual who is consummate in his views.
He discerns, as it has come to be, that 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.'
'Monks, there is a between-the-worlds space of impenetrable darkness, and in the murk of that darkness not even the sun & moon, so mighty, so powerful, can spread their light.'
When this was said, a certain monk addressed the Blessed One: 'What a great darkness, lord!
What a very great darkness!
Is there another darkness greater & more fearsome than that?'
'Yes, there is…'
'What darkness…?'
'Any contemplatives or brahmans who do not discern, as it has come to be, that “This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress,” cherish the fabrications leading to birth, cherish the fabrications leading to aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
Cherishing the fabrications leading to birth… aging… death…sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, they fashion fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, and so they fall into the darkness of birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress & despair.
They are not released from birth… aging… death… sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
They are not released, I tell you, from stress.
However, those contemplatives or brahmans who discern, as it has come to be, that “This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress,” do not cherish the fabrications leading to birth… aging… death.
They do not cherish the fabrications leading to sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
They do not fashion fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, and so do not fall into the darkness of birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
They are released from birth… aging… death… sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
They are released, I tell you, from stress.
Therefore your duty is the contemplation, 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.'
Suppose that people would say to a man whose life span was years: 'Look here, fellow.
They will stab you at dawn with spears, at noon with spears, & again at evening with spears.
You, thus stabbed every day with spears, will live to be, and at the end of years you will realize the four noble truths that you have never realized before.'
If the man desired his own true benefit, he would do well to take them up on their offer.
Why is that?
From an inconceivable beginning comes transmigration.
A beginning point is not evident for the blows from spears, swords, & axes.
Even if this were to occur, I would not say that the realization of the four noble truths would be accompanied by pain & distress.
Instead, I would say that the realization of the four noble truths would be accompanied by pleasure & joy.
Ven.
Gavampati: Face to face with the Blessed One did I hear this, face to face did I learn it: whoever sees stress also sees the origination of stress, the cessation of stress, & the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.
Whoever sees the origination of stress also sees stress, the cessation of stress, & the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.
Whoever sees the cessation of stress also sees stress, the origination of stress, & the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.
Whoever sees the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress also sees stress, the origination of stress, & the cessation of stress.
Awakening.
Vision arose, clear knowing arose, discernment arose, knowledge arose, illumination arose within me with regard to things never heard before: 'This is the noble truth of stress… This noble truth of stress is to be comprehended… This noble truth of stress has been comprehended… This is the noble truth of the origination of stress… This noble truth of the origination of stress is to be abandoned… This noble truth of the origination of stress has been abandoned… This is the noble truth of the cessation of stress… This noble truth of the cessation of stress is to be realized… This noble truth of the cessation of stress has been realized… This is the noble truth of the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress… This noble truth of the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress is to be developed… This noble truth of the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress has been developed.'
And, monks, as long as this knowledge & vision of mine — with its three rounds & twelve permutations concerning these four noble truths as they have come to be — was not pure, I did not claim to have directly awakened to the unexcelled right self-awakening… But as soon as this knowledge & vision of mine — with its three rounds & twelve permutations concerning these four noble truths as they have come to be — was truly pure, only then did I claim to have directly awakened to the unexcelled right self-awakening… The knowledge & vision arose in me: 'Unprovoked is my release.
This is the last birth.
There is now no further becoming.'
The first noble truth is that of dukkha, translated here as stress and suffering.
The term has a wide range of other meanings as well, including distress, dis-ease, and — what is probably its most elemental meaning — pain.
People learn their most basic strategies for dealing with pain in very early childhood, when their powers of observation are undeveloped and they cannot learn from the verbal lessons of others.
Being in such a stage, they are in a poor position to understand pain, and it often leaves them bewildered.
This means that they develop unskillful ways of handling it.
Even when their minds later develop verbal and higher logical skills, many of the unskillful strategies and attitudes toward pain that they developed in early childhood persist on a subconscious level.
One of the most important insights leading up to the Buddha's Awakening was his realization that the act of comprehending pain lay at the essence of the spiritual quest.
In trying to comprehend pain — instead of simply trying to get rid of it in line with one's habitual tendencies — one learns many valuable lessons.
To begin with, one can end any sense of bewilderment in the face of pain.
In seeing pain for what it truly is, one can treat it more effectively and skillfully, thus weakening the process by which pain and ignorance feed on each other.
At the same time, as one learns to resist one's habitual reactions to pain, one begins to delve into the non-verbal, subconscious levels of the mind, bringing to light many ill-formed and hidden processes of which one was previously unaware.
In this sense, pain is like a watering hole where all the animals in the forest — all the mind's subconscious tendencies — will eventually come to drink.
Just as a naturalist who wants to make a survey of the wildlife in a particular area can simply station himself near a watering hole to wait for the animals that will eventually have to come there for water; in the same way, a meditator who wants to understand the mind can simply keep watch right at pain in order to see what subconscious reactions will appear.
Thus the act of trying to comprehend pain leads not only to an improved understanding of pain itself, but also to an increased awareness of the most basic processes at work in the mind.
As one sees how any lack of skill in these processes, and in particular in one's reactions to pain, leads only to more pain, one's mind opens to the possibility that more skillful reactions will not only alleviate specific pains but also lead away from pain altogether.
Passage § shows how conviction in this possibility — which is nothing other than the principle of kamma — leads from the experience of stress and pain into a causal chain that cuts the bewilderment leading to further pain and ends in total release.
Although pain is the best vantage point for observing the processes of the mind, it is also the most difficult, simply because it is so unpleasant and hard to bear.
This is why discernment needs the faculties of conviction, persistence, mindfulness, and concentration to give it the detached assurance and steady focus needed to stick with pain in and of itself, in the phenomenological mode, and not veer off into the usual narratives, abstract theories, and other unskillful defenses the mind devises against the pain.
Only through the development of the five faculties into right concentration does discernment have the basis of pleasure and equanimity needed to probe into pain without feeling threatened by it, thus enabling it to arrive at an unbiased understanding of its true nature.
Passage § shows the direction this understanding should take, ultimately analyzing the wide variety of stress and pain down to five categories: the five clinging-aggregates.
Many of the remaining passages in this section give more detailed analysis of these categories.
Taken together, these passages provide a useful conceptual framework for taking on the duty of trying to comprehend the issues surrounding stress, suffering, and pain.
Here we will first discuss the aggregates, and then their connection with clinging and sustenance.
The five aggregates are form, feeling, perception, fabrications, and consciousness.
These five categories cover the entire range of experience that can be adequately described.
“Form” covers all physical phenomena, both within one's own body and without.
The remaining four categories cover all mental events.
“Feeling” covers feelings of pleasure, pain, and neither-pleasure-nor-pain, regardless of whether they are based on physical or mental sensations.
“Perception” denotes the mental act of applying labels or names to physical or mental events.
“Fabrications” here covers the verbal and mental processes of concocting thoughts, questions, urges, or intentions in the mind.
“Consciousness” covers the act of consciousness at any of the six senses: eyes, ears, nose, tongue, body, and intellect.
A few texts discuss a separate type of consciousness that does not partake of any of the six senses or their objects.
This type of consciousness is said to lie beyond the range of describable experience and so is not included under the five aggregates.
In fact, it is equivalent to the Unfabricated and forms the goal at the end of the path.
The five aggregates, on their own, do not constitute suffering or stress.
They are stressful only when functioning as objects of clinging/sustenance.
This hybrid word — clinging/sustenance — is a translation of the Pali term upadana.
Upadana has a hybrid meaning because it is used to cover two sides of a physical process metaphorically applied to the mind: the act of clinging whereby a fire takes sustenance from a piece of fuel, together with the sustenance offered by the fuel.
On the level of the mind, upadana denotes both the act of clinging and the object clung to, which together give sustenance to the process whereby mental pain arises.
In terms of this metaphor, pain is hot and unstable like fire, whereas the mental act of clinging to any of the five aggregates is what keeps the fire burning.
These images are part fiof a larger complex of imagery contained in the Pali discourses, likening the processes of pain and its cessation to the physical processes of fire and its extinguishing.
An understanding of this imagery helps to give a graphic, intuitive sense for the ways in which the Pali texts analyze the problem of stress and pain.
Many of the texts explicitly liken pain to a fever or to a burning, unstable fire.
Others deal more in indirect imagery, in which the terminology for explaining fire is applied to the mind.
The word upadana is one instance of this type of indirect imagery.
Others include khandha, or aggregate, which also means the trunk of a tree; and nibbana, the most common name for the Buddhist goal, which also means the extinguishing of a fire.
According to the physics of the Buddha's time, fire was “seized” when it was ignited.
Burning, it was in a state of unstable agitation, entrapped by the fuel to which it clung for sustenance.
On going out, it was “freed.” Letting go of its sustenance, it grew cool, calm, and unbound.
According to the commentaries, “unbound” is what nibbana literally means.
Thus the study of pain is like the study of a raging fire: one tries to comprehend it in order to find the source of the burning, bondage, and entrapment so as to put the fire out and gain freedom from it for good.
There are four types of clinging to the aggregates that give sustenance to the processes of suffering and stress: desire and passion for
MN makes the point that the act of clinging is neither the same as the aggregates nor entirely separate from them.
If clinging were identical with the aggregates, there would be no way to experience the aggregates without clinging, and thus there would be no way for an awakened person to return to the conditioned level of experience after Awakening.
If clinging and the aggregates were totally separate, clinging could exist independently of the aggregates and would count as a separate part of describable experience.
If this were so, the transcending of the aggregates at the moment of Awakening would not constitute the transcending of the fabricated realm, and thus the task of comprehending suffering would not yet be finished.
Thus the nature of the actual interdependence between clinging and the aggregates means that a full comprehension of the aggregates is enough to bring about Awakening, at the same time that it leaves an opening for the continued experience of the fabricated realm after Awakening has occurred.
What this interdependence means in practical terms is that one must examine the aggregates in such a way as to realize fully that they are not worth clinging to.
One does this by focusing on two of their common characteristics: their instability and their complexity.
In seeing their inherent instability, one realizes that they are inconstant.
Because they are inconstant, any attempt to base happiness on them is inherently stressful, just as there is inherent stress in trying to sit comfortably on a wobbling chair.
Because the aggregates offer no basis for true happiness, they lie beyond one's control and thus do not deserve to be viewed as “me” or “mine.
Focusing further on the aggregates, one perceives the complexity of their interrelationships.
Passage § indicates some of this complexity in its discussion of the relationship among feeling, perception, and sensory consciousness.
Although these aggregates function in different ways, in actual experience they can occur only as parts of an interrelated cluster of mental events surrounding a common object.
In fact, they are so closely related to one another that ordinary awareness assumes them to be a single whole.
One of the tasks of discernment in comprehending pain is to see these aggregates as interrelated events.
Because their interrelationships follow complex, invariable laws, one's comprehension of their true behavior brings with it the oppressive realization — oppressive as long as one is still regarding the causal network in part or in whole in terms of “self” or “other” — that they ultimately do not lie under one's control.
At best, one can explore and manipulate them to the extent of understanding them to gain freedom from them, but in and of themselves they do not offer any stable kind of happiness.
Observing and understanding the complex interrelationships among feeling, perception, and consciousness leads one into the area of dependent co-arising, which forms the essence of the second truth.
As one's understanding grows more sensitive, it drives home the point that all clinging to these interrelated phenomena should be abandoned.
This understanding — that phenomena taking part in such relationships are unworthy of clinging — forms the essence of the path.
The full pursuit of this path, in which one abandons all passion and desire for the five aggregates, brings about knowledge of the cessation of stress.
All of this bears out Ven.
Gavampati's comment that knowledge of the first noble truth inherently involves knowledge of the remaining three.
And what is the noble truth of stress?
The six internal sense media, should be the reply.
Which six?
The medium of the eye… the ear… the nose… the tongue… the body… the intellect.
This is called the noble truth of stress.
The All is aflame.
Which All is aflame?
The eye is aflame.
Forms are aflame.
Eye-consciousness is aflame.
Eye-contact is aflame.
And anything that arises in dependence on eye-contact, experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure-nor-pain, that too is aflame.
Aflame with what?
Aflame with the fire of passion, the fire of aversion, the fire of delusion.
Aflame, I tell you, with birth, aging, & death, with sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
The ear is aflame.
Sounds are aflame…
The nose is aflame.
Aromas are aflame…
The tongue is aflame.
Flavors are aflame…
The body is aflame.
Tactile sensations are aflame…
The intellect is aflame.
Ideas are aflame.
Intellect-consciousness is aflame.
Intellect-contact is aflame.
And anything that arises in dependence on intellect-contact, experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure-nor-pain, that too is aflame.
Aflame with what?
Aflame with the fire of passion, the fire of aversion, the fire of delusion.
Aflame, I tell you, with birth, aging, & death, with sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
Now what, monks, is the noble truth of stress?
Birth is stress, aging is stress, death is stress; sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair are stress; association with the unbeloved is stress; separation from the loved is stress; not getting what is wanted is stress.
In short, the five clinging-aggregates are stress.
Now what is birth?
Whatever birth, taking birth, descent, coming- to-be, coming-forth, appearance of aggregates, & acquisition of media of the various beings in this or that group of beings, that is called birth.
And what is aging?
Whatever aging, decrepitude, brokenness, graying, wrinkling, decline of life-force, weakening of the faculties of the various beings in this or that group of beings, that is called aging.
And what is death?
Whatever deceasing, passing away, breaking up, disappearance, dying, death, completion of time, break up of the aggregates, casting off of the body, interruption in the life faculty of the various beings in this or that group of beings, that is called death.
And what is sorrow?
Whatever sorrow, sorrowing, sadness, inward sorrow, inward sadness of anyone suffering from misfortune, touched by a painful thing, that is called sorrow.
And what is lamentation?
Whatever crying, grieving, lamenting, weeping, wailing, lamentation of anyone suffering from misfortune, touched by a painful thing, that is called lamentation.
And what is pain?
Whatever is experienced as bodily pain, bodily discomfort, pain or discomfort born of bodily contact, that is called pain.
And what is distress?
Whatever is experienced as mental pain, mental discomfort, pain or discomfort born of mental contact, that is called distress.
And what is despair?
Whatever despair, despondency, desperation of anyone suffering from misfortune, touched by a painful thing, that is called despair.
And what is the stress of association with the unbeloved?
There is the case where undesirable, unpleasing, unattractive sights, sounds, aromas, flavors, or tactile sensations occur to one; or one has connection, contact, relationship, interaction with those who wish one ill, who wish for one's harm, who wish for one's discomfort, who wish one no security from bondage.
This is called the stress of association with the unbeloved.
And what is the stress of separation from the loved?
There is the case where desirable, pleasing, attractive sights, sounds, aromas, flavors, or tactile sensations do not occur to one; or one has no connection, no contact, no relationship, no interaction with those who wish one well, who wish for one's benefit, who wish for one's comfort, who wish one security from bondage, nor with one's mother, father, brother, sister, friends, companions, or relatives.
This is called the stress of separation from the loved.
And what is the stress of not getting what is wanted?
In beings subject to birth, the wish arises, 'O, may we not be subject to birth, and may birth not come to us.' But this is not to be achieved by wishing.
This is the stress of not getting what is wanted.
In beings subject to aging… illness… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, the wish arises, 'O, may we not be subject to aging… illness… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, and may aging… illness… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair not come to us.' But this is not to be achieved by wishing.
This is the stress of not getting what is wanted.
And what are the five clinging-aggregates that, in short, are stress?
The form clinging-aggregate, the feeling clinging-aggregate, the perception clinging-aggregate, the fabrication clinging-aggregate, the consciousness clinging-aggregate: These are called the five clinging-aggregates that, in short, are stress.
This is called the noble truth of stress.
The Buddha: These are the five clinging-aggregates: the form clinging-aggregate, the feeling clinging-aggregate, the perception clinging-aggregate, the fabrication clinging-aggregate, the consciousness clinging-aggregate… These five clinging-aggregates are rooted in desire…
A certain monk: Is it the case that clinging and the five clinging-aggregates are the same thing, or are they separate?
The Buddha: Clinging is neither the same thing as the five clinging-aggregates, nor are they separate.
Whatever desire & passion there is with regard to the five clinging-aggregates, that is the clinging there…
The monk: To what extent does the term 'aggregates' apply to the aggregates?
The Buddha: Any form whatsoever — past, present, or future; internal or external; gross or subtle; inferior or superior; near or far — that is the form aggregate.
Any feeling whatsoever — past, present, or future… near or far — that is the feeling aggregate.
Any perception whatsoever — past, present, or future… near or far — that is the perception aggregate.
Any fabrications whatsoever — past, present, or future… near or far — those are the fabrication aggregate.
Any consciousness whatsoever — past, present, or future; internal or external; gross or subtle; inferior or superior; near or far — that is the consciousness aggregate.
The monk: What is the cause, what is the condition, for the discernibility of the form aggregate… feeling aggregate… perception aggregate… fabrication aggregate… consciousness aggregate?
The Buddha: The four great existents are the cause & condition for the discernibility of the form aggregate.
Contact is the cause & condition for the discernibility of the feeling… perception… fabrication aggregate.
Name-&-form is the cause & condition for the discernibility of the consciousness aggregate.
And why do you call it 'form'?
Because it is afflicted, thus it is called 'form.' Afflicted with what?
With cold & heat & hunger & thirst, with the touch of flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, & reptiles.
Because it is afflicted, it is called 'form.'
And why do you call it 'feeling'?
Because it feels, thus it is called 'feeling.' What does it feel?
It feels pleasure, it feels pain, it feels neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
Because it feels, it is called 'feeling.'
And why do you call it perception?
Because it perceives, thus it is called 'perception.' What does it perceive?
It perceives blue, it perceives yellow, it perceives red, it perceives white.
Because it perceives, it is called 'perception.'
And why do you call them 'fabrications'?
Because they fabricate fabricated things, thus they are called 'fabrications.' What do they fabricate as a fabricated thing?
For the sake of form-ness, they fabricate form as a fabricated thing.
For the sake of feeling-ness, they fabricate feeling as a fabricated thing.
For the sake of perception-hood… For the sake of fabrication-hood… For the sake of consciousness-hood, they fabricate consciousness as a fabricated thing.
Because they fabricate fabricated things, they are called 'fabrications.'
And why do you call it 'consciousness'?
Because it cognizes, thus it is called 'consciousness.' What does it cognize?
It cognizes what is sour, bitter, pungent, sweet, alkaline, non-alkaline, salty, & unsalty.
Because it cognizes, it is called 'consciousness.'
Ven.
Mahā Koṭṭhita: Feeling, perception, & consciousness: Are these qualities conjoined or disjoined?
And is it possible, having divided them, to describe their separateness?
Ven.
Sāriputta: Feeling, perception, & consciousness are conjoined, not disjoined, and it is impossible, having divided them, to describe their separateness.
What one feels, one perceives; and what one perceives, one cognizes.
Form.
Ven.
Sāriputta: And what, friends, is the form clinging-aggregate?
The four great existents and the form derived from them.
And what are the four great existents?
They are the earth property, the liquid property, the fire property, & the wind property.
And what is the earth property?
The earth property can be either internal or external.
What is the internal earth property?
Whatever internal, within oneself, is hard, solid, & sustained: head hairs, body hairs, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, tendons, bones, bone marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, pleura, spleen, lungs, large intestines, small intestines, contents of the stomach, feces, or whatever else internal, within oneself, is hard, solid, & sustained: this is called the internal earth property.
Now both the internal earth property and the external earth property are simply earth property.
And that should be seen with right discernment as it has come to be: 'This is not mine, this is not me, this is not my self.' When one sees it thus with right discernment as it has come to be, one becomes disenchanted with the earth property and makes the earth property fade from the mind…
And what is the liquid property?
The liquid property may be either internal or external.
What is the internal liquid property?
Whatever internal, belonging to oneself, is liquid, watery, & sustained: bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat, tears, skin-oil, saliva, mucus, fluid in the joints, urine, or whatever else internal, within oneself, is liquid, watery, & sustained: this is called the internal liquid property.
Now both the internal liquid property and the external liquid property are simply liquid property.
And that should be seen with right discernment as it has come to be: 'This is not mine, this is not me, this is not my self.' When one sees it thus with right discernment as it has come to be, one becomes disenchanted with the liquid property and makes the liquid property fade from the mind…
And what is the fire property?
The fire property may be either internal or external.
What is the internal fire property?
Whatever internal, belonging to oneself, is fire, fiery, & sustained: that by which is warmed, aged, & consumed with fever; and that by which what is eaten, drunk, chewed, & savored gets properly digested, or whatever else internal, within oneself, is fire, fiery, & sustained: this is called the internal fire property.
Now both the internal fire property and the external fire property are simply fire property.
And that should be seen with right discernment as it has come to be: 'This is not mine, this is not me, this is not my self.' When one sees it thus with right discernment as it has come to be, one becomes disenchanted with the fire property and makes the fire property fade from the mind…
And what is the wind property?
The wind property may be either internal or external.
What is the internal wind property?
Whatever internal, belonging to oneself, is wind, windy, & sustained: up-going winds, down-going winds, winds in the stomach, winds in the intestines, winds that course through the body, in-&-out breathing, or whatever else internal, within oneself, is wind, windy, & sustained: this is called the internal wind property.
Now both the internal wind property and the external wind property are simply wind property.
And that should be seen with right discernment as it has come to be: 'This is not mine, this is not me, this is not my self.' When one sees it thus with right discernment as it has come to be, one becomes disenchanted with the wind property and makes the wind property fade from the mind…
Ven.
Sāriputta: There comes a time, my friends, when the external liquid property is provoked, and at that moment the external earth property vanishes.
So when even in the external earth property — so vast — inconstancy will be discerned, destructibility will be discerned, a tendency to decay will be discerned, changeability will be discerned, then what of this short-lasting body, sustained by clinging, is 'I' or 'mine' or 'what I am'?
It has here only a 'no.'
There comes a time when the external liquid property is provoked and it carries away village, town & city, countryside & rural area.
There comes a time when the waters of the ocean recede one hundred leagues, two hundred… seven hundred leagues.
There comes a time when the water in the ocean stands only seven palm trees deep, six… one palm tree deep.
There comes a time when the water in the ocean stands only seven fathoms deep, six fathoms… one fathom deep.
There comes a time when the water in the ocean stands only half a fathom deep, hip deep, knee deep, ankle deep.
There comes a time when the water in the ocean is not enough to wet even the joint of a finger.
So when even in the external liquid property — so vast — inconstancy will be discerned… then what of this short-lasting body, sustained by clinging, is 'I' or 'mine' or 'what I am'?
It has here only a 'no'…
There comes a time when the external fire property is provoked and consumes village, town & city, countryside & rural area, and then, coming to the edge of a green district, the edge of a road, the edge of a rocky district, to the water's edge, or to a lush, well-watered area, it goes out from lack of sustenance.
There comes a time when people try to make fire even with a wing bone & tendon parings.
So when even in the external fire property — so vast — inconstancy will be discerned… then what of this short-lasting body, sustained by clinging, is 'I' or 'mine' or 'what I am'?
It has here only a 'no'…
There comes a time when the external wind property is provoked, and carries off village, town & city, countryside & rural area.
There comes a time when, in the last month of the hot season, they make wind with a fan or a bellows, and even the grasses hanging in the drip-fringe of the thatch do not stir.
So when even in the external wind property — so vast — inconstancy will be discerned, destructibility will be discerned, a tendency to decay will be discerned, changeability will be discerned, then what of this short-lasting body, sustained by clinging, is 'I' or 'mine' or 'what I am'?
It has here only a 'no'…
Feeling.
Sister Dhammadinnā: There are three kinds of feeling: pleasant feeling, painful feeling, & neither-pleasant-nor-painful feeling… Whatever is experienced physically or mentally as pleasant & gratifying is pleasant feeling.
Whatever is experienced physically or mentally as painful & hurting is painful feeling.
Whatever is experienced physically or mentally as neither gratifying nor hurting is neither-pleasant-nor-painful feeling… Pleasant feeling is pleasant in remaining and painful in changing.
Painful feeling is painful in remaining and pleasant in changing.
Neither-pleasant-nor-painful feeling is pleasant when conjoined with knowledge and painful when devoid of knowledge.
Fabrications.
And what are fabrications?
There are these six classes of intention: intention aimed at sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile sensations, & ideas.
These are called fabrications.
Three kinds of fabrications: meritorious fabrications, demeritorious fabrications, & imperturbable fabrications.
Consciousness.
Consciousness is classified simply by the condition in dependence on which it arises.
When consciousness arises in dependence on eye & forms, it is classified simply as eye-consciousness.
When consciousness arises in dependence on ear & sounds, it is classified simply as ear-consciousness.
When consciousness arises in dependence on nose & smells, it is classified simply as nose-consciousness.
When consciousness arises in dependence on tongue & tastes, it is classified simply as tongue-consciousness.
When consciousness arises in dependence on body & tactile sensations, it is classified simply as body-consciousness.
When consciousness arises in dependence on intellect & ideas, it is classified simply as intellect-consciousness.
Just as fire is classified simply by the condition in dependence on which it burns — a fire burning in dependence on logs is classified simply as a log fire… a fire burning in dependence on rubbish is classified simply as a rubbish fire; in the same way, consciousness is classified simply by the condition in dependence on which it arises.
As noted under III/H/i, the third noble truth is identical with the successful performance of the duty appropriate to the second.
Thus these two truths are best discussed together.
Passage § gives the short definition of the second noble truth:
Now what is the noble truth of the origination of stress?
The craving that makes for further becoming — accompanied by passion & delight, relishing now here & now there — i.e., craving for sensuality, craving for becoming, craving for non-becoming.
Craving for sensuality, here, means the desire for sensual objects.
Craving for becoming means the desire for the formation of states or realms of being that are not currently happening, while craving for non-becoming means the desire for the destruction or halting of any that are.
“Passion and delight,” here, is apparently a synonym for the “desire and passion” for the five aggregates that constitutes clinging/sustenance.
Passage § also gives the short definition of the third noble truth:
And what is the noble truth of the cessation of stress?
The remainderless fading & cessation, renunciation, relinquishment, release, & letting go of that very craving.
The extended passages that make up the remainder of § make the point that craving must be brought to cessation right at the objects where it arises, i.e., by realizing that those objects are unworthy of craving.
The longer definitions of the second and third noble truths center on dependent co-arising, a detailed map of how craving arises and how it can be brought to cessation by undercutting its preconditions.
This map is the most complex teaching in the Canon.
In a famous passage, Ven.
Ananda comments on how clear the doctrine of dependent co-arising seems to him, and the Buddha replies:
Don't say that, Ananda.
Don't say that.
Deep is this dependent co-arising, and deep its appearance.
It's because of not understanding & not penetrating this Dhamma that this generation is like a tangled skein, a knotted ball of string, like matted rushes & reeds, and does not go beyond the cycle of the planes of deprivation, woe, & bad destinations.
Nevertheless, although no explanations can be expected to give a full and final understanding of the process of dependent co-arising, they can provide tools that the meditator can use to probe the process in the course of training the mind and come to an understanding for him or herself.
The passages in this section help to provide that set of tools.
A few general points about dependent co-arising are important to understand before going into the details.
To begin with, dependent co-arising is often presented in the texts as an expansion of the general principle of this/that conditionality, which we have already discussed in the Introduction.
Here we will recapitulate some of the essential points.
This/that conditionality is expressed in a simple formula:
This formula is non-linear, an interplay of linear and synchronic principles.
The linear principle — taking and as a pair — connects events over time; the synchronic principle — and — connects objects and events in the present moment.
The two principles intersect, so that any given event is influenced by two sets of conditions, those acting from the past and those acting from the present.
Because this is the pattern underlying dependent co-arising, it is a mistake to view dependent co-arising simply as a chain of causes strung out over time.
Events in any one category of the list are affected not only by past events in the categories that act as their conditions, but also by the on-going, interacting presence of whole streams of events in those categories.
All categories can be present at once, and even though two particular conditions may be separated by several steps in the list, they can be immediately present to each other.
Thus they can create the possibility for unexpected feedback loops in the causal process.
Feeling, for instance, keeps reappearing at several stages in the process, and ignorance can contribute to any causal link at any time.
The importance of these points will become clear when we examine how to disengage the causal network so as to realize the third noble truth.
Because new input into the causal stream is possible at every moment, the actual working out of this/that conditionality and dependent co-arising can be remarkably fluid and complex.
This point is borne out by the imagery used in the Canon to illustrate these teachings.
Although some non-canonical texts depict dependent co-arising as a circle or a wheel of causes — implying something of a mechanical, deterministic process — the Canon never uses that image at all.
Instead it likens dependent co-arising to water flowing over land: lakes overflow, filling rivers, which in turn fill the sea; while the tides of the sea rise, swelling the rivers, which in turn swell the lakes.
This imagery captures something of the flow of give and take among the factors of the process.
A more modern pattern that might be used to illustrate dependent co-arising is the “strange attractor”: an intricate, interwoven pattern that chaos theory uses to describe complex, fluid systems containing at least three feedback loops.
As we will see below, the number of feedback loops in dependent co-arising is far more than three.
The fluid complexity of dependent co-arising means that it is inherently unstable, and thus stressful and not-self.
Although some non-Theravadin Buddhist texts insist that happiness can be found by abandoning one's smaller, separate identity and embracing the interconnected identity of all interdependent things, this teaching cannot be found in the Pali Canon.
The instability of conditioned processes means that they can never provide a dependable basis for happiness.
The only true basis for happiness is the Unfabricated.
The Pali discourses are quite clear on the point that the fabricated and Unfabricated realms are radically separate.
In MN the Buddha strongly criticizes a group of monks who tried to develop a theory whereby the fabricated was derived out of the Unfabricated or somehow lay within it.
Stress, he says, is inherent in the interdependent nature of conditioned phenomena, while the Unfabricated is totally free from stress.
Stress could not possibly be produced by absolute freedom from stress.
Because the nature of conditioning is such that causes are in turn influenced by their effects, the Unfabricated could not itself function as a cause for anything.
The only way the Unfabricated can be experienced is by skillfully using fabricated, conditioned processes to unravel the network of fabricated, conditioned processes from within.
To do so, one needs to know the individual factors of dependent co-arising and the patterns in which they depend on one another.
These factors come down to the five aggregates.
In fact, the entire pattern of dependent co-arising is a map showing how the different aggregates group, disband, and regroup in one another's presence in a variety of configurations, giving rise to stress and to the cosmos at large.
As we have mentioned earlier, one of the most basic features of the Buddha's teachings is his confirmation that the knowable cosmos, composed of old kamma, is made up of the same factors that make up the personality; and that the interaction of the aggregates, as immediately present to awareness in the here and now, is the same process that underlies the functioning of the knowable cosmos as a whole.
As a result, the descriptions of dependent co-arising slip easily back and forth between two time scales — events in the present moment and events over the vast cycle of time.
It is important to remember, though, that the Buddha discovered this principle by observing events in the immediate present, which is where the individual meditator will have to discover them as well.
Thus the practice takes the same approach as phenomenology: exploring the processes of conditioning from the inside as they are immediately experienced in the present moment.
This is why the pattern of dependent co-arising lists factors of consciousness — such as ignorance, attention, and intention — as prior conditions for the experience of the physical world, for if we take as our frame of reference the world as it is directly experienced — rather than a world conceived somehow as separate from our experience of it — we have to see the processes of the mind as prior to the objects they process.
References in the texts to the larger frame of space and time provide examples to illustrate particularly subtle points in the immediate present and serve as reminders that the pattern of events observed in the present moment has implications that cover the entire cosmos.
Given the fluid, complex nature of the basic causal principle, it should come as no surprise that the Canon contains several variations on the list of basic factors and configurations in dependent co-arising.
Like the seven sets in the Wings to Awakening, these different lists offer the meditator a variety of ways to approach the complexities of the causal stream and to gain a handle on mastering them.
The most basic list is found in § and §, which give the factors — starting with the stress of aging and death, and then working backwards — as follows:
Aging and death require birth.
If there were no birth, there would be nothing to set in motion the processes of aging and death.
Here and in the following causal links, “birth,” “aging,” and “death” denote not only the arising, decay, and passing away of the body, but also the repeated arising, decay, and passing away of mental states, moment-by-moment in the present.
In fact, during the third watch on the night of his Awakening, the Buddha probably focused on present mental states as his primary examples of birth, aging, and death.
From them he gained insight into how these processes functioned in the cosmos as a whole.
Birth depends on becoming.
If there were no coming-into-being of a sensual realm, a realm of form, or a formless realm, there would be no locus for rebirth.
Again, these realms refer not only to levels of being on the cosmic scale, but also to levels of mental states.
Some mental states are concerned with sensual images, others with forms, and still others with formless dimensions, such as the formless jhanas.
The relationship between birth and becoming can be compared to the process of falling asleep and dreaming.
As drowsiness makes the mind lose contact with waking reality, a dream image of another place and time will appear in it.
The appearance of this image is called becoming.
The act of entering into this image and taking on a role or identity within it — and thus entering the world of the dream and falling asleep — is birth.
The commentaries maintain that precisely the same process is what enables rebirth to follow the death of the body.
At the same time, the analogy between falling asleep and taking birth explains why release from the cycle of becoming is called Awakening.
Becoming requires clinging/sustenance.
The image here is of a fire staying in existence by appropriating sustenance in the act of clinging to its fuel.
The process of becoming takes its sustenance from the five aggregates, while the act of taking sustenance is to cling to these aggregates in any of four forms of passion and delight mentioned in III/H/ii: sensual intentions, views, habits and practices, or theories about the self.
Without these types of clinging, the realms of sensuality, form, and formlessness would not come into being.
Clinging/sustenance requires craving.
If one did not thirst for sensuality, for becoming, or for non-becoming, then the process would not appropriate fuel.
Craving requires feeling.
If there were no experience of pleasant, painful, or neither-pleasant-nor-painful feelings, one would not thirst for continuing experience of the pleasant or for cessation of the unpleasant.
Feeling requires contact.
Without contact there would be no feelings of pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
Contact requires name-and-form.
“Form” covers all physical phenomena.
“Name” here is defined as feeling, perception, contact, attention, and intention.
Without these phenomena, there would be nothing to make contact.
Name-and-form requires consciousness of the six sense fields.
Without this kind of consciousness, the physical birth of the individual composed of the aggregates would abort, while on the level of momentary mental birth there would be nothing to activate an experience of the aggregates.
Consciousness of the six sense fields requires name-and-form.
Without name-and-form, there would be no object for this type of consciousness.
In §, Ven.
Sariputta points out that the entire process of dependent co-arising relies on the mutual dependency of name-and-form on the one hand, and sensory consciousness on the other.
This mutual dependency is actually composed of many feedback loops, which can get quite complex.
If either of the two factors is pulled away from the other, the whole edifice falls down.
For this reason, as we shall see when we discuss the cessation of stress, this mutual dependency is one of the primary points for focusing attention in disbanding the causal process.
Other lists of the factors in dependent co-arising expand on this basic list.
The most common list adds the factors of the six sense fields between contact and name-and-form, and then states that sensory consciousness requires the three types of fabrication — bodily, verbal, and mental — while these fabrications in turn require ignorance of the four noble truths.
There is some disagreement over the meaning of the three types of fabrication in this list.
One passage in the Canon, which seems to treat fabrications as they are immediately experienced in the present, defines bodily fabrication as the breath, verbal fabrication as directed thought and evaluation, and mental fabrication as feeling and perception.
Other passages, which seem to regard fabrications as they function over time, simply class these three types of fabrication as to whether they are meritorious, demeritorious, or imperturbable.
If we regard these two definitions as typical of the dual time frame of dependent co-arising, there is no conflict between them.
Another point of disagreement is over the question of how the factors of fabrication and ignorance came to be added to the basic list.
Some scholars maintain that this was the result of a temporal development in the Buddha's teachings, either during his lifetime or after his passing away.
However, if we examine the content of the added factors, we find that they are simply an elaboration of the mutual dependence between name-and-form and sensory consciousness, and do not add anything substantially new to the list.
The three fabrications are simply another way of presenting name-and-form in their active role as shapers of consciousness.
Bodily fabrication, the breath, is the active element of “form”; verbal fabrications, directed thought and evaluation, are the active element in the attention and intention sub-factors of “name”; while mental fabrications, feeling and perception, are identical with the feeling and perception under “name.” Ignorance, on the other hand, is the type of consciousness that actively promotes inappropriate questioning in the verbal fabrication of evaluation, which in turn can lead to inappropriate attention in the factor of name-and-form.
It may seem redundant to have the factors of name-and-form on the one hand, and fabrications on the other, covering the same territory in two different configurations, but these configurations serve at least two practical purposes.
First, the connection between ignorance and inappropriate questioning helps to pinpoint precisely what is wrong in the typical relationship between name-and-form and consciousness.
As one modern teacher has put it, the verbal fabrications are the ones to watch out for.
Second, the relationship between verbal fabrications on the one hand, and attention and intention on the other, mediated by consciousness, diagrams the double-tiered relationships among mental events as they breed and feed on one another in the presence of consciousness.
In the course of giving rise to suffering and stress, this incestuous interbreeding can fly out of hand, leading to many complex and intense patterns of suffering.
However, its double-tiered quality can also be used — as we will see below — to help bring that suffering to an end.
Passage § adds yet another factor to the list, pointing out another way of looking at the mutually dependent relationships that feed the process of dependent co-arising: ignorance requires the effluents of sensuality, becoming, views, and ignorance, while these effluents in turn require ignorance of the four noble truths.
These added factors point to one of the ways in which the process of dependent co-arising is self-sustaining.
Sensuality and views are forms of clinging/sustenance, while becoming is a result of clinging/sustenance.
Ignorance as an effluent is nowhere defined in the discourses to differentiate it from simple ignorance, and in fact the distinction may simply be one of role, with both forms of ignorance denoting a state of awareness out of touch with the four noble truths.
When ignorance is entwined with the feelings that result from contact, it forms the requisite condition for clinging/sustenance and becoming; together, all of these factors act as impulses that “flow out” of the process and then return to reinforce the ignorance that provides the requisite condition for fabrications, consciousness, and name-and-form, thus fueling another round in the process leading to further becoming and stress.
The self-sustaining nature of dependent co-arising makes it easy to see why many non-canonical texts explain it as a wheel.
However, the many openings for feedback loops among the various factors — creating smaller cycles within the larger cycle — make the process exceedingly complex.
This explains why stress and suffering are so bewildering.
If they were a simple cycle, there would be little or no variety to the sufferings of living beings, and the process of suffering would be easy for everyone to predict and understand.
Some of the feedback loops that make stress so complex are explicitly mentioned in the texts.
Others are implicit in the fact that particular factors — such as feeling and contact — keep re-appearing at different points of the process of dependent co-arising.
Feeling is perhaps the most important of these.
The stress that forms the final factor of dependent co-arising can be experienced as a feeling, which can then re-enter the causal stream at the factor of fabrications, name-and-form, or at feeling itself.
If it re-enters at feeling, it would then directly condition further craving, which in turn would create a positive feedback loop, leading to increased stress and pain.
On the other hand, if the stress re-enters the stream at name-and-form, it could be subjected either to unskillful intentions and inappropriate attention, or to skillful intentions and appropriate attention.
The former pair would simply aggravate the stress and pain, whereas the latter pair would weaken the tendency to craving, and thus act as a negative feedback loop, alleviating the conditions that would lead to further stress and pain or eliminating them altogether.
This shows that these feedback loops, instead of being a mere curiosity in the formal structure of dependent co-arising, actually help to explain the wide variations in the way living beings experience stress.
They also help explain the possibility of the cessation of stress.
The elements of contact, intention, and attention under the factor of “name” are especially important in opening up this latter possibility.
As we noted in I/A, this is the factor of dependent co-arising that intersects with the teachings on kamma and skillfulness.
Contact — here, apparently, meaning contact with consciousness — forms the precondition for kamma.
Intention lies at the essence of the kamma that keeps the cycle of rebirth in motion.
Through appropriate attention — the right way of looking at things and focusing on appropriate questions about them — kamma can be trained to be skillful and thus lead away from stress rather than toward it.
For this reason, any feedback loop that does not pass through the factor of name-and-form will tend simply to continue the problem of stress and pain, whereas any loop that does lead through this factor allows for the possibility for using appropriate attention to weaken the process or disband it entirely.
In feeding the loops of dependent co-arising through the factor of name-and-form, the factor of fabrication plays an especially important role.
As we have noted in III/E, the practice of jhāna focused on the breath gathers all three forms of fabrication — bodily, verbal, and mental — into a single whole.
In doing so, it takes all the aggregates that play a variety of roles in the pattern of dependent co-arising, and gathers them into a configuration where appropriate attention can conveniently focus on all their interactions at once.
To express this in terms of the four noble truths, it takes the aggregates that make up the first noble truth and gives them a role in the fourth.
In this way, the double-tiered relationship mentioned above — between name-and-form on the one hand, and fabrications on the other — can be put to use in disbanding, rather than compounding, the causal network leading to suffering and stress.
In terms of meditation practice, this double-tiered relationship corresponds to the five factors of noble right concentration.
The three types of fabrication cover the same ground as the four levels of jhāna, while the sub-factor of attention under “name” forms a separate tier of mental activity that allows one to monitor one's practice of jhāna and to develop it as a skill.
As the process of developing skill becomes more and more refined, this tier of attention turns into the fifth, reflective level of noble concentration that allows one to analyze the state of jhāna while it is present, and thus to develop a sharpened discernment of its fabricated nature.
As passage § shows, one begins to see that jhāna is composed not only of such “fabrication” sub-factors as directed thought, evaluation, feeling, and perception, but also of sensory consciousness and such “name” factors as attention, intention, and contact.
In other words, the boundary line between the different tiers of mental activity begins to break down.
This allows for the conflation of discernment and concentration noted in II/H and III/H, in which concentrated discernment begins to take its own workings as its object.
As discernment in the role of “object” short-circuits with discernment in the role of “approach”, then contact between the factors of name-and-form on the one hand, and sensory consciousness on the other, ceases in a state of clear knowing.
In the image of Ven.
Sariputta, one of the two sheaves of reeds is pulled away, and the entire edifice of suffering based on them comes tumbling down.
Another crucial point to note in understanding how to disband the workings of dependent co-arising is that the relationships between particular factors and their neighbors in the list are not all the same.
In some cases, factor x is a sufficient cause for factor y.
What this means is that whenever x occurs, y will always have to follow.
An example is the relationship between contact and feeling, or between clinging and the remaining factors leading up to stress.
Whenever there is contact in the presence of consciousness, there will have to be feeling.
Whenever there is clinging, there will have to be becoming and stress.
Thus it is impossible to cut the process at these links.
However, there are other cases where x is a necessary cause, but not a sufficient one, for y.
In other words, x has to be present for y to occur, but y does not have to follow every time there is x.
Examples would include the link between consciousness and name-and-form, between feeling and craving, and between craving and clinging.
In each of these cases there has to be an added factor — the presence of ignorance, the most subtle and basic of the roots of unskillfulness — for x to give rise to y.
This fact is what opens the way for appropriate attention to bring about the end of suffering and stress.
At the same time it determines precisely what that way must be.
An analysis of how this happens will reveal in a nutshell the convergence of many of the themes of this book: the role of the three levels of frames-of-reference practice, and by extension the three levels in the development of concentration and discernment; the way in which the principles of this/that conditionality and skillfulness apply to the practice; and the way in which the duties appropriate to the four noble truths — comprehending stress, abandoning its origination, realizing its cessation, and developing the path — in practice are one.
The nutshell is this: If each factor in dependent co-arising were a sufficient cause for the following factor, the pattern would be absolutely deterministic and there would be no way out.
However, in cases where the link between x and y is necessary but not sufficient, then in terms of this/that conditionality, the x factor is input from the past — even if only a split-second past — whereas ignorance is the input from the present needed to give rise to y.
Thus the strategy of the practice must be to use appropriate attention to eliminate ignorance in the presence of x.
To do this, one must focus on comprehending the aggregate that functions as x — or, in the case of the craving/clinging link, that functions as the potential object of x.
At first this means learning to focus on the aggregate in and of itself.
Then, to overcome the unskillfulness inherent in ignorance, one must gain practical familiarity with the aggregate in its role as a factor in the skillful practice of jhāna.
As this approach attains a state of mastery, one focuses one's powers of discernment on the “how” of the approach to the practice, taking it as the “what” or object of investigation, until one can see the aggregate even in this role in terms of the four noble truths.
The more precise and comprehensive this knowing, the less craving is produced; the less craving produced, the fewer the effluents that cloud one's knowing.
With the culmination of totally clear knowing, ignorance is totally wiped out, together with its attendant craving, and thus the present input that maintained the cycle is ended.
This achieves a point of “resonance”, the point of non-fashioning at which the cycle breaks down, and where stress and suffering cease.
Modern practice traditions differ as to which links in dependent co-arising they focus on in order to bring about the cessation of craving and thus realize the third noble truth.
For the purposes of this essay, we will discuss three of these links as they relate to the three different lists of factors mentioned above.
These different points of focus are best regarded as alternative options for tackling the problem of stress and its cessation.
All are equally valid, and so it is up to the individual meditator to choose whichever focus seems most congenial and comprehensible, and to follow it through.
The first list of the factors of dependent co-arising, which takes the process down to the mutual dependence of consciousness and name-and-form, emphasizes precisely that link: how name-and-form depends on consciousness, and how consciousness relates to name-and-form.
Passage § treats this point in detail, using the term “fabrication” to cover attention, intention, and contact.
In practical terms this approach focuses on the question of how consciousness relates to its objects, making use of skillful intention and appropriate attention as the approach to help peel away any sense of passion or desire for name-and-form.
Once the more blatant forms of passion and desire have been eliminated, this approach then peels away passion and desire even for the approach of skillful intentions and appropriate attention themselves.
Consciousness — thus deprived of its support in name-and-form either in terms of objects or approaches — has no basis for proliferation and so is released.
Passages related to this perspective on Awakening include §§,, and.
As for the second list, which traces the pattern of dependent co-arising down to fabrication and ignorance, we have already noted that this is simply an explanation of a particular type of relationship between consciousness and name-and-form.
We have also noted that all three types of fabrication, in their present aspect, are brought together in the experience of jhāna based on the breath.
Thus the question here is how to master jhāna to the point where one can step back in the fifth factor of five-factored noble concentration so as to overcome one's ignorance of the willed and fabricated nature of jhāna or of any views and assumptions — based on inappropriate attention — that might underlie the attainment of jhāna.
With the cessation of ignorance, there is nothing willed or fabricated to form a station of consciousness.
At this point of non-fashioning — where there is no sense of one's doing anything, or of anyone else's doing anything — nothing is created for the sake of further becoming or non-becoming.
As a result, consciousness is released.
Passages related to this perspective on Awakening include §§-.
In the third list of dependent co-arising, which traces the pattern to the mutual dependence of ignorance and the effluents, the focus is on the acts of clinging/sustenance and the resultant states of becoming that, conditioned by ignorance, breed more ignorance.
The difficulty in focusing on becoming is that its apparent opposite, non-becoming — the destruction of what has come to be — can also act as an object of craving leading to further becoming.
Thus the question is how to focus on the drawbacks of sensuality and becoming without falling into the reverse trap of willing non-becoming.
As § shows, this requires seeing the drawbacks of all willed states, regardless of whether the will is aimed at proliferation or destruction.
Once the mind has abandoned all such states, the only alternative left open is the equipoise of non-fashioning, the threshold to the Unfabricated.
Passages related to this perspective on Awakening include §§-.
Although these three points of focus differ in emphasis, in essence they come down to different aspects of the same approach.
In every case, one must use skillful intentions and appropriate attention to undercut craving and ignorance regarding the five aggregates so that no fabrications will be activated for the sake of further becoming.
This lack of activation — the moment of non-fashioning — releases consciousness from the aggregates, both in their role as objects of consciousness and in their role as the intention and attention that served as the approaches to release.
The differences among the points of focus lie primarily in the questions they ask in framing a view of the problem at hand.
In this we see the true function of the teaching of dependent co-arising in practice: as a guide to appropriate attention.
Not only does the teaching provide a direct way of viewing experience that avoids useless questions of being and non-being, self and other, it also gives a framework for inspiring alternative ways of asking appropriate questions about the crucial junctures in the conditioned flow of phenomena in and of themselves.
As with all of the Buddha's teachings, once the processes of discernment inspired by the teaching of dependent co-arising have fully performed their function, the teaching itself is transcended in the release of consciousness.
Once consciousness is released from the objects that bring sensory consciousness into play, all that remains is “consciousness without feature, without end, luminous all around”.
This consciousness — which lies beyond “the extent to which there are means of designation, expression, & description… the extent to which the sphere of discernment extends, the extent to which the cycle revolves for the manifesting of this cosmos” — is the experience of the goal.
There is some question as to whether the goal can be equated with the third noble truth.
Some passages in the Canon would seem to indicate yes; others, no.
This contradiction can be resolved by noting that the full realization of the third noble truth and the experience of the goal are two different things so intimately related that the one cannot be experienced without the other.
Their relationship can be compared to noticing a long-overlooked valuable in the course of cleaning one's yard.
The act of cleaning is not the same as the valuable, but only in the course of doing the former thoroughly and attentively can the latter be found.
As one modern teacher has said, the fact that the third noble truth involves a duty means that it is part of fabricated reality, whereas the goal at the end of the path is absolutely unfabricated.
Free from all acting and doing, it pertains to an entirely different dimension, and thus — although found along with the truth of cessation — it is something utterly beyond and unbound.
From the time of Awakening to that of death, there remains a sense of dissociated contact between the inner and outer sense media that comprise the Awakened One's old kamma and his/her only remaining experience of the stress inherent in the dimensions of time and the present: contact, in that there is sensitivity to pain and pleasure in these things; dissociated, in that the passion and delight, the fetters, defilements, and attachments in between the inner and outer sense media are totally severed by discernment.
Old kamma thus runs through the pattern of dependent co-arising from name-and-form and consciousness up through feeling, but — without the fashioning factors of ignorance and craving — the feeling of pain and pleasure does not feed back into any causal patterns that would lead to further becoming or any renewed kamma.
The texts liken this state to a fire that has gone out but whose embers are still glowing and warm.
Eventually, old kamma runs out at the death of the Awakened One, and there is a total Unbinding like that of a fire so completely released from its fuel that the embers have grown thoroughly cold.
Although this analogy may sound negative in terms of modern ideas about the workings of fire, in the Buddha's time it was recognized as an image, not of extinction or annihilation, but of freedom so unlimited and irreversible that it cannot be described.
Gandhabhaka: It would be good, lord, if the Blessed One would teach me the origination & ending of stress.
The Buddha: If I were to teach you the origination & ending of stress with reference to the past, saying, 'Thus it was in the past,' you would be doubtful and perplexed.
If I were to teach you the origination & ending of stress with reference to the future, saying, 'Thus it will be in the future,' you would be doubtful and perplexed.
So instead, I — sitting right here — will teach you sitting right there the origination & ending of stress.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
Gandhabhaka: As you say, lord.
The Buddha: Now, what do you think?
Are there any people in Uruvelakappa who, if they were murdered or imprisoned or fined or censured, would cause sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, or despair to arise in you?
Gandhabhaka: Yes, there are…
The Buddha: And are there any people in Uruvelakappa who, if they were murdered or imprisoned or fined or censured, would cause no sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, or despair to arise in you?
Gandhabhaka: Yes, there are…
The Buddha: Now what is the cause, what is the reason, why the murder… of some would cause you sorrow… and the murder… of others would cause you no sorrow…?
Gandhabhaka: Those… whose murder… would cause me sorrow… are those for whom I feel desire & passion.
Those… whose murder… would cause me no sorrow… are those for whom I feel no desire or passion.
The Buddha: Now, from what you have realized, attained, fathomed right now in the present, without regard to time, you may draw an inference with regard to the past and future: 'Whatever stress, in arising, arose for me in the past, all of it had desire as its root, had desire as its cause, for desire is the cause of stress.
And whatever stress, in arising, will arise for me in the future, all of it will have desire as the root, will have desire as its cause — for desire is the cause of stress.'
Gandhabhaka: Amazing, lord.
Astounding.
How well the Blessed One has put it: Whatever stress, in arising, arose for me in the past, all of it had desire as its root, had desire as its cause, for desire is the cause of stress.
And whatever stress, in arising, will arise for me in the future, all of it will have desire as the root, will have desire as its cause, for desire is the cause of stress.
I have a son, lord, named Cīravāsin, who lives far away from here.
When I get up in the morning, I send a man, saying, 'Go, learn how Cīravāsin is doing.' And as long as that man has not returned, I am simply beside myself, 'Don't let Cīravāsin be sick!'
The Buddha: Now, what do you think?
If Cīravāsin were to be murdered or imprisoned or fined or censured, would you feel sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair?
Gandhabhaka: If my son Cīravāsin were to be murdered or imprisoned or fined or censured, my very life would be altered.
So how could I not feel sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair?
The Buddha:…And what do you think?
Before you had seen or heard of Cīravāsin's mother, did you feel desire, passion, or love for her?
Gandhabhaka: No, lord.
The Buddha: And after you had seen or heard of Cīravāsin's mother, did you feel desire, passion, or love for her?
Gandhabhaka: Yes, lord.
The Buddha: Now, what do you think?
If Cīravāsin's mother were to be murdered or imprisoned or fined or censured, would you feel sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair?
Gandhabhaka: If Cīravāsin's mother were to be murdered or imprisoned or fined or censured, my very life would be altered.
So how could I not feel sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair?
The Buddha: Thus by this line of reasoning it may be realized how stress, when arising, arises: All of it has desire as its root, has desire as its cause — for desire is the cause of stress.
Craving & Its Cessation.
Now what is the noble truth of the origination of stress?
The craving that makes for further becoming — accompanied by passion & delight, relishing now here & now there — i.e., craving for sensuality, craving for becoming, craving for non-becoming.
And where does this craving, when arising, arise?
And where, when dwelling, does it dwell?
Whatever seems endearing and agreeable in terms of the world: that is where this craving, when arising, arises.
That is where, when dwelling, it dwells.
And what seems endearing and agreeable in terms of the world?
The eye seems endearing and agreeable in terms of the world.
That is where this craving, when arising, arises.
That is where, when dwelling, it dwells.
The ear… The nose… The tongue… The body… The intellect…
Forms… Sounds… Smells… Tastes… Tactile sensations… Ideas…
Eye-consciousness… Ear-consciousness… Nose-consciousness… Tongue-consciousness… Body-consciousness… Intellect-consciousness…
Eye-contact… Ear-contact… Nose-contact… Tongue-contact… Body-contact… Intellect-contact…
Feeling born of eye-contact… Feeling born of ear-contact… Feeling born of nose-contact… Feeling born of tongue-contact… Feeling born of body-contact… Feeling born of intellect-contact…
Perception of forms… Perception of sounds… Perception of smells… Perception of tastes… Perception of tactile sensations… Perception of ideas…
Intention for forms… Intention for sounds… Intention for smells… Intention for tastes… Intention for tactile sensations… Intention for ideas…
Craving for forms… Craving for sounds… Craving for smells… Craving for tastes… Craving for tactile sensations… Craving for ideas…
Thought directed at forms… Thought directed at sounds… Thought directed at smells… Thought directed at tastes… Thought directed at tactile sensations… Thought directed at ideas…
Evaluation of forms… Evaluation of sounds… Evaluation of smells… Evaluation of tastes… Evaluation of tactile sensations… Evaluation of ideas seems endearing and agreeable in terms of the world.
That is where this craving, when arising, arises.
That is where, when dwelling, it dwells.
This is called the noble truth of the origination of stress.
And what is the noble truth of the cessation of stress?
The remainderless fading & cessation, renunciation, relinquishment, release, & letting go of that very craving.
And where, when being abandoned, is this craving abandoned?
And where, when ceasing, does it cease?
Whatever seems endearing and agreeable in terms of the world: that is where, when being abandoned, this craving is abandoned.
That is where, when ceasing, it ceases.
And what seems endearing and agreeable in terms of the world?
The eye seems endearing and agreeable in terms of the world.
That is where, when being abandoned, this craving is abandoned.
That is where, when ceasing, it ceases.
The ear… The nose… The tongue… The body… The intellect…
Forms… Sounds… Smells… Tastes… Tactile sensations… Ideas…
Eye-consciousness… Ear-consciousness… Nose-consciousness… Tongue-consciousness… Body-consciousness… Intellect-consciousness…
Eye-contact… Ear-contact… Nose-contact… Tongue-contact… Body-contact… Intellect-contact…
Feeling born of eye-contact… Feeling born of ear-contact… Feeling born of nose-contact… Feeling born of tongue-contact… Feeling born of body-contact… Feeling born of intellect-contact…
Perception of forms… Perception of sounds… Perception of smells… Perception of tastes… Perception of tactile sensations… Perception of ideas…
Intention for forms… Intention for sounds… Intention for smells… Intention for tastes… Intention for tactile sensations… Intention for ideas…
Craving for forms… Craving for sounds… Craving for smells… Craving for tastes… Craving for tactile sensations… Craving for ideas…
Thought directed at forms… Thought directed at sounds… Thought directed at smells… Thought directed at tastes… Thought directed at tactile sensations… Thought directed at ideas…
Evaluation of forms… Evaluation of sounds… Evaluation of smells… Evaluation of tastes… Evaluation of tactile sensations… Evaluation of ideas seems endearing and agreeable in terms of the world.
That is where, when being abandoned, this craving is abandoned.
That is where, when ceasing, it ceases.
This is called the noble truth of the cessation of stress.
And what is the noble method that is rightly seen & rightly ferreted out by discernment?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones notices:
In other words:
From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications.
From fabrications as a requisite condition comes consciousness.
From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.
From name-&-form as a requisite condition come the six sense media.
From the six sense media as a requisite condition comes contact.
From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.
From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.
From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging/sustenance.
From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
From birth as a requisite condition, then aging-&-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
Now from the remainderless fading & cessation of that very ignorance comes the cessation of fabrications.
From the cessation of fabrications comes the cessation of consciousness.
From the cessation of consciousness comes the cessation of name-&-form.
From the cessation of name-&-form comes the cessation of the six sense media.
From the cessation of the six sense media comes the cessation of contact.
From the cessation of contact comes the cessation of feeling.
From the cessation of feeling comes the cessation of craving.
From the cessation of craving comes the cessation of clinging/sustenance.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance comes the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging-&-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
This is the noble method that is rightly seen & rightly ferreted out by discernment.
Monks, I will teach you the origination & disappearance of the world.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
What is the origination of the world?
In dependence on the eye & forms there arises eye-consciousness.
The coming together of these three is contact.
From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.
From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.
From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging/sustenance.
From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
From birth as a requisite condition, then aging-&-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
This is the origination of the world.

And what is the disappearance of the world?
In dependence on the eye & forms there arises eye-consciousness.
The coming together of these three is contact.
From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.
From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.
Now from the remainderless fading & cessation of that very craving comes the cessation of clinging/sustenance.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance comes the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging-&-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
This is the disappearance of the world.

A certain monk: 'The world, the world,' it is said.
To what extent does the word 'world' apply?
The Buddha: It disintegrates, therefore it is called the 'world.' Now what disintegrates?
The eye disintegrates.
Forms disintegrate.
Eye-consciousness disintegrates.
Eye-contact disintegrates.
And anything that arises in dependence on eye-contact, experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure-nor-pain, that too disintegrates.
The ear disintegrates.
Sounds disintegrate…
The nose disintegrates.
Aromas disintegrate…
The tongue disintegrates.
Flavors disintegrate…
The body disintegrates.
Tactile sensations disintegrate…
The intellect disintegrates.
Ideas disintegrate.
Intellect-consciousness disintegrates.
Intellect-contact disintegrates.
And anything that arises in dependence on intellect-contact, experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure-nor-pain, that too disintegrates.
It disintegrates, therefore it is called the 'world.'
Ānanda: Concerning the brief statement made by the Blessed One, after which he entered his dwelling without expounding the detailed meaning — i.e., 'I do not say that the end of the world is to be known, seen, & reached by traveling.
But neither do I say that there is a making an end of stress without having reached the end of the world' — I understand the detailed meaning of this statement to be this:
That by means of which one has a perception of world, a concept of world with regard to the world: That, in the discipline of a noble one, is called the 'world.' Now, by means of what does one have a perception of world, a concept of world with regard to the world?
By means of the eye… the ear… the nose… the tongue… the body… the intellect one has a perception of world, a concept of world with regard to the world.
Now what, monks, are the bases for knowledge?
Knowledge with regard to aging-&-death, knowledge with regard to the origination of aging-&-death, knowledge with regard to the cessation of aging-&-death, knowledge with regard to the path of practice leading to the cessation of aging-&-death.

And what is aging-&-death?
Whatever aging, decrepitude, brokenness, graying, wrinkling, decline of life-force, weakening of the faculties of the various beings in this or that group of beings, that is called aging.
Whatever deceasing, passing away, breaking up, disappearance, dying, death, completion of time, break up of the aggregates, casting off of the body, interruption in the life faculty of the various beings in this or that group of beings, that is called death.
From the origination of birth comes the origination of aging-&-death.
From the cessation of birth comes the cessation of aging-&-death.
And just this noble eightfold path is the path of practice leading to the cessation of aging-&-death…
Now, when the disciple of the noble ones discerns aging-&-death in this way, discerns the origination of aging-&-death in this way, discerns the cessation of aging-&-death in this way, discerns the path of practice leading to the cessation of aging-&-death in this way, that is his knowledge of the Dhamma.
By means of this principle — seen, understood, not limited to time, attained, fathomed — he draws out inferences with regard to the past & future: 'Whatever contemplatives & brahmans in the past comprehended aging-&-death… the origination of aging-&-death… the cessation of aging-&-death… the path of practice leading to the cessation of aging-&-death, all comprehended them as I do now; whatever contemplatives & brahmans in the future will comprehend aging-&-death… the origination of aging-&-death… the cessation of aging-&-death… the path of practice leading to the cessation of aging-&-death, all will comprehend them as I do now.' This is his knowledge of consistency.
Now, when these two knowledges of the disciple of the noble ones — knowledge of principle & knowledge of consistency — are pure & clear, he is called a disciple of the noble ones who is consummate in view, consummate in vision, attained to this true Dhamma.
He is said to see this true Dhamma, to be endowed with the knowledge of one in training, endowed with the clear knowing of one in training, attained to the stream of the Dhamma, a person of penetrating noble discernment who stands knocking at the door to the Deathless.
Sariputta: Now, the Blessed One has said, 'Whoever sees dependent co-arising sees the Dhamma; whoever sees the Dhamma sees dependent co-arising.'
I will teach you dependent co-arising & dependently co-arisen phenomena.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak…
Now, what is dependent co-arising?
From birth as a requisite condition comes aging-&-death.
Whether or not there is the arising of Tathāgatas, this property stands — this regularity of the Dhamma, this orderliness of the Dhamma, this this/that conditionality.
The Tathāgata directly awakens to that, breaks through to that.
Directly awakening & breaking through to that, he declares it, teaches it, describes it, sets it forth.
He reveals it, explains it, makes it plain, & says, 'Look.' From birth as a requisite condition comes aging-&-death.
From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications.
Whether or not there is the arising of Tathāgatas, this property stands — this regularity of the Dhamma, this orderliness of the Dhamma, this this/that conditionality.
The Tathāgata directly awakens to that, breaks through to that.
Directly awakening & breaking through to that, he declares it, teaches it, describes it, sets it forth.
He reveals it, explains it, makes it plain, & says, 'Look.' From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications.
What's there in this way is a reality, not an unreality, not other than what it seems, conditioned by this/ that.
This is called dependent co-arising.
And what are dependently co-arisen phenomena?
Aging-&-death is a dependently co-arisen phenomenon: inconstant, fabricated, dependently co-arisen, subject to ending, subject to passing away, subject to fading, subject to cessation.

Ignorance is a dependently co-arisen phenomenon: inconstant, fabricated, dependently co-arisen, subject to ending, subject to passing away, subject to fading, subject to cessation.
These are called dependently co-arisen phenomena.
When a disciple of the noble ones has seen well with right discernment this dependent co-arising & these dependently co-arisen phenomena as they have come to be, it is not possible that he would run after the past, thinking, 'Was I in the past?
Was I not in the past?
What was I in the past?
How was I in the past?
Having been what, what was I in the past?' or that he would run after the future, thinking, 'Shall I be in the future?
Shall I not be in the future?
What shall I be in the future?
How shall I be in the future?
Having been what, what shall I be in the future?' or that he would be inwardly perplexed about the immediate present, thinking, 'Am I?
Am I not?
What am I?
How am I?
Where has this being come from?
Where is it bound?' 
Such a thing is not possible.
Why is that?
Because the disciple of the noble ones has seen well with right discernment this dependent co-arising & these dependently co-arisen phenomena as they have come to be.
Now what is becoming?
These three are becomings: sensuality becoming, form becoming, & formless becoming.
This is called becoming.
And what is clinging/sustenance?
These four are clingings: sensuality clinging, view clinging, habit & practice clinging, and doctrine of self clinging.
This is called clinging.
And what is craving?
These six are classes of craving: craving for forms, craving for sounds, craving for smells, craving for tastes, craving for tactile sensations, craving for ideas.
This is called craving.
And what is feeling?
These six are classes of feeling: feeling born from eye-contact, feeling born from ear-contact, feeling born from nose-contact, feeling born from tongue-contact, feeling born from body-contact, feeling born from intellect-contact.
This is called feeling.
And what is contact?
These six are classes of contact: eye-contact, ear-contact, nose-contact, tongue-contact, body-contact, intellect-contact.
This is called contact.
And what are the six sense media?
These six are sense media: the eye-medium, the ear-medium, the nose-medium, the tongue-medium, the body-medium, the intellect-medium.
These are called the six sense media.
And what is name-&-form?
Feeling, perception, intention, contact, & attention: this is called name.
The four great elements, and the form dependent on the four great elements: this is called form.
This name & this form are called name-&-form.
And what is consciousness?
These six are classes of consciousness: eye-consciousness, ear-consciousness, nose-consciousness, tongue-consciousness, body-consciousness, intellect-consciousness.
This is called consciousness.
And what are fabrications?
These three are fabrications: bodily fabrications, verbal fabrications, mental fabrications.
These are called fabrications.
And what is ignorance?
Not knowing in terms of stress, not knowing in terms of the origination of stress, not knowing in terms of the cessation of stress, not knowing in terms of the way of practice leading to the cessation of stress: this is called ignorance.
When a fool is obstructed by ignorance and conjoined with craving, this body thus results.
Now there is both this body and external name-&-form.
Here, in dependence on this duality, there is contact at the six senses.
Touched by these, or one or another of them, the fool is sensitive to pleasure & pain.
When a wise person is obstructed by ignorance and conjoined with craving, this body thus results.
Now there is both this body and external name-&-form.
Here, in dependence on this duality, there is contact at the six senses.
Touched by these, or one or another of them, the wise person is sensitive to pleasure & pain.
Now what is the difference… here between the wise person & the fool?…
In the wise person that ignorance has been abandoned and that craving has been destroyed.
Why is that?
The wise person has practiced the holy life for the right ending of stress.
Therefore, at the breakup of the body, he is not headed for a body.
Not headed for a body, he is entirely freed from birth, aging, death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
I tell you, he is entirely freed from stress.
Becoming.
Ānanda: This word, 'becoming, becoming' — to what extent is there becoming?
The Buddha: If there were no kamma ripening in the property of sensuality, would sensual becoming be discerned?
Ānanda: No, lord.
The Buddha: Thus kamma is the field, consciousness the seed, and craving the moisture.
The consciousness of living beings hindered by ignorance & fettered by craving is established in a lower property.
Thus there is the production of renewed becoming in the future.
If there were no kamma ripening in the property of form, would form becoming be discerned?
Ānanda: No, lord.
The Buddha: Thus kamma is the field, consciousness the seed, and craving the moisture.
The consciousness of living beings hindered by ignorance & fettered by craving is established in a middling property.
Thus there is the production of renewed becoming in the future.
If there were no kamma ripening in the property of formlessness, would formless becoming be discerned?
Ānanda: No, lord.
The Buddha: Thus kamma is the field, consciousness the seed, and craving the moisture.
The consciousness of living beings hindered by ignorance & fettered by craving is established in a refined property.
Thus there is the production of renewed becoming in the future.
This is how there is becoming.
I have heard that on one occasion, when the Blessed One was newly Awakened — living at Uruvelā by the banks of the Nerañjarā River in the shade of the Bodhi tree, the tree of Awakening — he sat in the shade of the Bodhi tree for seven days in one session, sensitive to the bliss of release.
At the end of seven days, after emerging from that concentration, he surveyed the world with the eye of an Awakened One.
As he did so, he saw living beings burning with the many fevers and aflame with the many fires born of passion, aversion, & delusion.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, he on that occasion exclaimed:
Whatever contemplatives or brahmans say that liberation from becoming is by means of becoming, all of them are not released from becoming, I say.
And whatever contemplatives or brahmans say that escape from becoming is by means of non-becoming, all of them have not escaped from becoming, I say.
Overcome by two viewpoints, some human & divine beings adhere, other human & divine beings slip right past, while those with vision see.
And how do some adhere?
Human & divine beings delight in becoming, enjoy becoming, are satisfied with becoming.
When the Dhamma is being taught for the sake of the cessation of becoming, their minds do not take to it, are not calmed by it, do not settle on it, or become resolved on it.
This is how some adhere.
And how do some slip right past?
Some, feeling horrified, humiliated, & disgusted with that very becoming, delight in non-becoming: 'When this self, at the breakup of the body, after death, perishes & is destroyed, and does not exist after death, that is peaceful, that is exquisite, that is sufficiency!' This is how some slip right past.
And how do those with vision see?
There is the case where a monk sees what's come to be as what's come to be.
Seeing this, he practices for disenchantment with what's come to be, dispassion for what's come to be, and the cessation of what's come to be.
This is how those with vision see…
Fabrications.
Visākha: And what, lady, are bodily fabrications, what are verbal fabrications, what are mental fabrications?
Sister Dhammadinnā: In-&-out breathing is bodily, bound up with the body, therefore is it called a bodily fabrication.
Having directed one's thought and evaluated, one breaks into speech.
Therefore directed thought & evaluation are called verbal fabrications.
Perception & feeling are mental, bound up with the mind.
Therefore perception & feeling are called mental fabrications.
When there is a body, pleasure & pain arise internally with bodily intention as the cause; or when there is speech, pleasure & pain arise internally with verbal intention as the cause; or when there is intellect, pleasure & pain arise internally with intellectual intention as the cause.
From ignorance as a requisite condition, then either of one's own accord one fabricates the bodily fabrication on account of which that pleasure & pain arise internally, or because of others one fabricates the bodily fabrication on account of which that pleasure & pain arise internally.
With alertness… or without alertness one fabricates the bodily fabrication on account of which that pleasure & pain arise internally.

Now, ignorance is bound up in these things.
From the remainderless fading & cessation of that very ignorance, there no longer exists the body… the speech… the intellect on account of which that pleasure & pain internally arise.
There no longer exists the field, the site, the dimension, or the issue on account of which that pleasure & pain internally arise.
If a person immersed in ignorance fabricates a meritorious fabrication, his consciousness goes on to merit.
If he fabricates a demeritorious fabrication, his consciousness goes on to demerit.
If he fabricates an imperturbable fabrication, his consciousness goes on to the imperturbable.
When ignorance is abandoned by a monk, clear knowing arises.
From the fading of ignorance and the arising of knowledge, he neither fabricates a meritorious fabrication nor a demeritorious fabrication nor an imperturbable fabrication.
Neither fabricating nor willing, he is not sustained by anything in the world.
Unsustained, he is not agitated.
Unagitated, he is totally unbound right within.
He discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'
Sensing a feeling of pleasure, he discerns that it is fleeting, not grasped at, not relished.
Sensing a feeling of pain… Sensing a feeling of neither-pleasure-nor-pain, he discerns that it is fleeting, not grasped at, not relished.
Sensing a feeling of pleasure, he senses it disjoined from it.
Sensing a feeling of pain… Sensing a feeling of neither-pleasure-nor-pain, he senses it disjoined from it.
When sensing a feeling limited to the body, he discerns that 'I am sensing a feeling limited to the body.' When sensing a feeling limited to life, he discerns that 'I am sensing a feeling limited to life.' He discerns that 'With the breakup of the body, after the termination of life, all that is experienced, not being relished, will grow cold right here, while the corpse will remain.'
Just as if a man, having removed a heated jar from a kiln, were to place it on level ground: any heat in the jar would subside right there, while the fired clay would remain.
In the same way, when sensing a feeling limited to the body, he discerns that 'I am sensing a feeling limited to the body.' When sensing a feeling limited to life, he discerns that 'I am sensing a feeling limited to life.' He discerns that 'With the breakup of the body, after the termination of life, all that is experienced, not being relished, will grow cold right here, while the corpse will remain.'
What do you think, monks?
Would a monk whose effluents were ended fabricate a meritorious or a demeritorious or an imperturbable fabrication?
With the total non-existence of fabrications, from the cessation of fabrications, would consciousness be discernible?
With the total non-existence of birth, from the cessation of birth, would aging-&-death be discernible?
Very good, monks.
Just so should you construe it.
Just so should you be convinced.
Just so should you believe.
Do not be doubtful, do not be uncertain.
This, just this, is the end of stress.
What is willed, what is arranged, and what is obsessed over: this is a support for the stationing of consciousness.
There being a support, there is a landing of consciousness.
When that consciousness lands and grows, there is the production of renewed becoming in the future.
When there is the production of renewed becoming in the future, there is future birth, aging-&-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of stress.
If nothing is willed, if nothing is arranged, but something is obsessed over: This is a support for the stationing of consciousness… Such is the origination of this entire mass of stress.
But when nothing is willed, arranged, or obsessed over, there is no support for the stationing of consciousness.
There being no support, there is no landing of consciousness.
When that consciousness does not land & grow, there is no production of renewed becoming in the future.
When there is no production of renewed becoming in the future, there is no future birth, aging-&-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, or despair.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of stress.
Sāriputta: Now what is ignorance, what is the origination of ignorance, what is the cessation of ignorance, and what is the way of practice leading to the cessation of ignorance?
Not knowing in terms of stress, not knowing in terms of the origination of stress, not knowing in terms of the cessation of stress, not knowing in terms of the way of practice leading to the cessation of stress: this is called ignorance.
From the origination of effluents comes the origination of ignorance.
From the cessation of effluents comes the cessation of ignorance.
And just this noble eightfold path is the way of practice leading to the cessation of ignorance…
Now when a disciple of the noble ones discerns ignorance in this way, discerns the origination of ignorance in this way, discerns the cessation of ignorance in this way, & discerns the way of practice leading to the cessation of ignorance in this way, when — having entirely abandoned passion-obsession, having abolished irritation-obsession, having uprooted the view-&-conceit obsession 'I am,' having abandoned ignorance, having given rise to clear knowing — he has put an end to stress in the here & now, then it is to this extent that the disciple of the noble ones is a person of right view, one whose view is made straight, who is endowed with verified confidence in the Dhamma, and who has arrived at this true Dhamma…
Now what are effluents, what is the origination of effluents, what is the cessation of effluents, and what is the way of practice leading to the cessation of effluents?
These three are effluents: the effluent of sensuality, the effluent of becoming, the effluent of ignorance.
From the origination of ignorance comes the origination of effluents.
From the cessation of ignorance comes the cessation of effluents.
And just this noble eightfold path is the way of practice leading to the cessation of effluents…
Now when a disciple of the noble ones discerns the effluents in this way, discerns the origination of effluents in this way, discerns the cessation of effluents in this way, & discerns the way of practice leading to the cessation of effluents in this way, when — having entirely abandoned passion-obsession, having abolished irritation- obsession, having uprooted the view-&-conceit obsession 'I am,' having abandoned ignorance, having given rise to clear knowing — he has put an end to stress in the here & now, then it is to this extent that the disciple of the noble ones is a person of right view, one whose view is made straight, who is endowed with verified confidence in the Dhamma, and who has arrived at this true Dhamma.
Ven.
Mahā Koṭṭhita: Now tell me, Sāriputta my friend: Is aging-&-death self-made or other-made or both self-made & other-made, or — without self-making or other-making — spontaneously arisen?
Ven.
Sāriputta: It's not the case, Koṭṭhita my friend, that aging-&-death is self-made, that it is other-made, that it is both self-made & other-made, or that — without self-making or other-making — it's spontaneously arisen.
However, from birth as a requisite condition comes aging-&-death.
Ven.
Mahā Koṭṭhita: Now tell me: Is name-&-form self-made or other-made or both self-made & other-made, or — without self-making or other-making — spontaneously arisen?
Ven.
Sāriputta: It's not the case that name-&-form is self-made, that it is other-made, that it is both self-made & other-made, or that — without self-making or other-making — it's spontaneously arisen.
However, from consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.
Ven.
Mahā Koṭṭhita: Now tell me: Is consciousness self-made or other-made or both self-made & other-made, or — without self-making or other-making, spontaneously arisen?
Ven.
Sāriputta: It's not the case that consciousness is self-made, that it is other-made, that it is both self-made & other-made, or that — without self-making or other-making — it's spontaneously arisen.
However, from name-&-form as a requisite condition comes consciousness.
Ven.
Mahā Koṭṭhita: Just now I understood what you said as… from consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form… from name-&-form as a requisite condition comes consciousness.
Now how is the meaning of what you said to be understood?
Ven.
Sāriputta: Very well then, my friend, I will give you an analogy; for there are cases where it is through the use of an analogy that intelligent people can understand the meaning of what is being said.
It's as if two sheaves of reeds stood leaning against one another.
In the same way, from name-&-form as a requisite condition comes consciousness, from consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.
From name-&-form as a requisite condition come the six sense media… Thus is the origination of this entire mass of stress.
If one were to pull away one of those sheaves of reeds, the other would fall; if one were to pull away the other, the first one would fall.
In the same way, from the cessation of name-&-form comes the cessation of consciousness, from the cessation of consciousness comes the cessation of name-&-form.
From the cessation of name-&-form comes the cessation of the six sense media… Thus is the cessation of this entire mass of stress.
§.
The Buddha: 'From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications… From birth as a requisite condition, then old age & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of stress & suffering.'
When this was said, a certain monk said to the Blessed One: 'Which aging-&-death, lord?
And whose is this aging-&-death?'
'Not a valid question,' the Blessed One said.
If one were to ask, “Which aging-&-death?
And whose is this aging-&-death?” and if one were to ask, “Is aging-&-death one thing, and is this the aging-&-death of someone/something else?” both of them would have the same meaning, even though their words would differ.
When there is the view that the soul is the same as the body, there isn't the leading of the holy life.
And when there is the view that the soul is one thing and the body another, there isn't the leading of the holy life.
Avoiding these two extremes, the Tathāgata points out the Dhamma in between: From birth as a requisite condition comes aging-&-death.'
'Which birth, lord?
And whose is this birth?'
'Not a valid question,' the Blessed One said.
'…Avoiding these two extremes, the Tathāgata points out the Dhamma in between: From ignorance as requisite condition come fabrications.
Now from the remainderless fading & cessation of that very ignorance, every one of these writhings & wrigglings & wigglings — “Which aging-&-death?
And whose is this aging-&-death?” or “Is aging-&-death one thing, and is this the aging-&-death of someone/something else?” or “The soul is the same as the body,” or “The soul is one thing and the body another” — are abandoned, their root destroyed, like an uprooted palm tree, deprived of the conditions of existence, not destined for future arising.'
Ven.
Ānanda: It's amazing, lord, it's astounding, how deep this dependent co-arising is, & how deep its appearance, and yet to me it seems as clear as clear can be.
The Buddha: Don't say that, Ānanda.
Don't say that.
Deep is this dependent co-arising, and deep its appearance.
It's because of not understanding & not penetrating this Dhamma that this generation is like a tangled skein, a knotted ball of string, like matted rushes & reeds, and does not go beyond the cycle of the planes of deprivation, woe, & bad destinations…
'From birth as a requisite condition comes aging-&-death.' Thus it has been said.
And this is the way to understand how from birth as a requisite condition comes aging-&-death.
If there were no birth at all, in any way, of anything anywhere… in the utter absence of birth from the cessation of birth, would aging-&-death be discerned?'
Ven.
Ānanda: No, lord.
The Buddha: Thus this is a cause, this is a reason, this is an origination, this is a requisite condition for aging-&-death, i.e., birth.

'From name-&-form as a requisite condition comes contact.
Thus it has been said.
And this is the way to understand how, from name-&-form as a requisite condition comes contact.
If the qualities, traits, themes, & indicators by which there is a description of name-group were all absent, would designation-contact with regard to the form-group be discerned?
Ven.
Ānanda: No, lord.
The Buddha: If the permutations, signs, themes, & indicators by which there is a description of form-group were all absent, would resistance-contact with regard to the name-group be discerned?
Ven.
Ānanda: No, lord.
The Buddha: If the permutations, signs, themes, & indicators by which there is a description of name-group & form-group were all absent, would designation-contact or resistance-contact be discerned?
Ven.
Ānanda: No, lord.
The Buddha: Thus this is a cause, this is a reason, this is an origination, this is a requisite condition for contact, i.e., name-&-form.
'From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.' Thus it has been said.
And this is the way to understand how from consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.
If consciousness were not to descend into the mother's womb, would name-&-form take shape in the womb?
Ven.
Ānanda: No, lord.
The Buddha: If, after descending into the womb, consciousness were to depart, would name-&-form be produced for this world?
Ven.
Ānanda: No, lord.
The Buddha: If the consciousness of the young boy or girl were to be cut off, would name-&-form ripen, grow, & reach maturity?
Ven.
Ānanda: No, lord.
The Buddha: Thus this is a cause, this is a reason, this is an origination, this is a requisite condition for name-&-form, i.e., consciousness.
'From name-&-form as a requisite condition comes consciousness.' Thus it has been said.
And this is the way to understand how from name-&-form as a requisite condition comes consciousness.
If consciousness were not to gain a foothold in name-&-form, would a coming-into-play of the origination of birth, aging, death, & stress in the future be discerned?

Ven.
Ānanda: No, lord.
The Buddha: Thus this is a cause, this is a reason, this is an origination, this is a requisite condition for consciousness, i.e., name-&-form.
This is the extent to which there is birth, aging, death, passing away, & re-arising.
This is the extent to which there are means of designation, expression, & description.
This is the extent to which the sphere of discernment extends, the extent to which the cycle revolves for the manifesting of this world — i.e., name-&-form together with consciousness.
It's in dependence on a pair that consciousness comes into play.
And how does consciousness come into play in dependence on a pair?
In dependence on the eye & forms there arises eye-consciousness.
The eye is inconstant, changeable, of a nature to become otherwise.
Forms are inconstant, changeable, of a nature to become otherwise.
Thus this pair is both fleeting & unsettled — inconstant, changeable, of a nature to become otherwise.
Eye-consciousness is inconstant, changeable, of a nature to become otherwise.
Whatever is the cause, the requisite condition, for the arising of eye-consciousness, that is inconstant, changeable, of a nature to become otherwise.
Having arisen in dependence on an inconstant factor, how could eye-consciousness be constant?

One attached is unreleased; one unattached is released.
Should consciousness, when taking a stance, stand attached to form, supported by form, established on form, watered with delight, it would exhibit growth, increase, & proliferation.
Should consciousness, when taking a stance, stand attached to feeling… to perception… to fabrications… it would exhibit growth, increase, & proliferation.
Were someone to say, 'I will describe a coming, a going, a passing away, an arising, a growth, an increase or a proliferation of consciousness apart from form, from feeling, from perception, from fabrications,' that would be impossible.
If a monk abandons passion for the property of form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness, then owing to the abandoning of passion, the support is cut off, and there is no base for consciousness.
Consciousness thus unestablished — not proliferating, not performing any function — is released.
Owing to its release, it is steady.
Owing to its steadiness, it is contented.
Owing to its contentment, it is not agitated.
Not agitated, he is totally unbound right within.
He discerns, 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'
'There are these four nutriments for the establishing of beings who have taken birth or for the support of those in search of a place to be born.
Which four?
Physical food, gross or refined; contact as the second, consciousness the third, and intellectual intention the fourth.
These are the four nutriments for the establishing of beings or for the support of those in search of a place to be born.
'Where there is passion, delight, & craving for the nutriment of physical food, consciousness lands there and grows.
Where consciousness lands and grows, name-&-form alights.
Where name-&-form alights, there is the growth of fabrications.
Where there is the growth of fabrications, there is the production of renewed becoming in the future.
Where there is the production of renewed becoming in the future, there is future birth, aging, & death, together, I tell you, with sorrow, affliction, & despair.
'Just as — when there is dye, lac, yellow orpiment, indigo, or crimson — a dyer or painter would paint the picture of a woman or a man, complete in all its parts, on a well-polished panel or wall, or on a piece of cloth; in the same way, where there is passion, delight, & craving for the nutriment of physical food, consciousness lands there & grows… together, I tell you, with sorrow, affliction, & despair.
'Where there is no passion for the nutriment of physical food, where there is no delight, no craving, then consciousness does not land there or grow… Name-&-form does not alight… There is no growth of fabrications… There is no production of renewed becoming in the future.
Where there is no production of renewed becoming in the future, there is no future birth, aging, & death.
That, I tell you, has no sorrow, affliction, or despair.
'Just as if there were a roofed house or a roofed hall having windows on the north, the south, or the east.
When the sun rises, and a ray has entered by way of the window, where does it land?'
'On the western wall, lord.'
'And if there is no western wall…?'
'On the ground, lord.'
'And if there is no ground…?'
'On the water, lord.'
'And if there is no water…?'
'It does not land, lord.'
'In the same way, where there is no passion for the nutriment of physical food…consciousness does not land or grow… That, I tell you, has no sorrow, affliction, or despair.'
§.
§.
Then Ven.
Ānanda, together with a group of monks, went to where the Blessed One was staying in Pālileyyaka, at the root of the Auspicious Sal Tree, and on arrival, after bowing down to him, sat down to one side.
As they were sitting there, the Blessed One instructed, urged, roused, & encouraged them with a talk on Dhamma.
Then this train of thought appeared in the awareness of one of the monks: 'Now I wonder — knowing in what way, seeing in what way, does one without delay put an end to the effluents?'
The Blessed One, perceiving with his awareness the train of thought in the monk's awareness, said to the monks, 'I have analyzed & taught you the Dhamma, monks.
I have analyzed & taught you the four frames of reference, the four right exertions, the four bases of power, the five faculties, the five strengths, the seven factors for Awakening, & the noble eightfold path… And yet still there appears this train of thought in the awareness of one of the monks: “Now I wonder — knowing in what way, seeing in what way, does one without delay put an end to the effluents?
'Well then — knowing in what way, seeing in what way, does one without delay put an end to the effluents?
There is the case where an uninstructed, run-of-the-mill person… assumes form to be the self.
That assumption is a fabrication.
Now what is the cause, what is the origination, what is the birth, what is the coming-into-existence of that fabrication?
To an uninstructed, run-of-the-mill person, touched by that which is felt born of contact with ignorance, craving arises.
That fabrication is born of that.
And that fabrication is inconstant, fabricated, dependently co-arisen.
That craving… That feeling… That contact… That ignorance is inconstant, fabricated, dependently co-arisen.
It's by knowing & seeing in this way that one without delay puts an end to the effluents.
'Or he doesn't assume form to be the self, but he assumes the self as possessing form… form as in the self… self as in form… or feeling to be the self… the self as possessing feeling… feeling as in the self… self as in feeling… or perception to be the self… the self as possessing perception… perception as in the self… self as in perception… or fabrications to be the self… the self as possessing fabrications… fabrications as in the self… self as in fabrications… or consciousness to be the self… the self as possessing consciousness… consciousness as in the self… self as in consciousness.
'Now that assumption is a fabrication.
What is the cause… of that fabrication?
To an uninstructed, run-of-the-mill person, touched by that which is felt born of contact with ignorance, craving arises.
That fabrication is born of that.
And that fabrication is inconstant, fabricated, dependently co-arisen.
That craving… That feeling… That contact… That ignorance is inconstant, fabricated, dependently co-arisen.
It's by knowing & seeing in this way that one without delay puts an end to the effluents.
'Or… he may have a view such as this: “This self is the same as the cosmos.
This I will be after death, constant, lasting, eternal, not subject to change.” This eternalist view is a fabrication… Or… he may have a view such as this: “I would not be, neither would there be what is mine.
I will not be, neither will there be what is mine.” This annihilationist view is a fabrication… Or… he may be doubtful & uncertain, having come to no conclusion with regard to the true Dhamma.
That doubt, uncertainty, & coming-to-no-conclusion is a fabrication.
'What is the cause… of that fabrication?
To an uninstructed, run-of-the-mill person, touched by that which is felt born of contact with ignorance, craving arises.
That fabrication is born of that.
And that fabrication is inconstant, fabricated, dependently co-arisen.
That craving… That feeling… That contact… That ignorance is inconstant, fabricated, dependently co-arisen.
It's by knowing & seeing in this way that one without delay puts an end to the effluents.'
The ending of the effluents is for one who knows & sees, I tell you, not for one who does not know & does not see.
For one who knows what & sees what?… 'Such is form, such its origination, such its disappearance.
Such is feeling… Such is perception… Such are fabrications… Such is consciousness, such its origination, such its disappearance.' The ending of the effluents is for one who knows in this way & sees in this way.

The knowledge of ending in the presence of ending has its prerequisite, I tell you.
It is not without a prerequisite.
And what is its prerequisite?
Release…Release has its prerequisite, I tell you.
It is not without a prerequisite.
And what is its prerequisite?
Dispassion… Disenchantment… Knowledge & vision of things as they have come to be… Concentration… Pleasure… Serenity… Rapture… Joy… Conviction… Stress… Birth… Becoming… Clinging… Craving… Feeling… Contact…The six sense media… Name-&-form… Consciousness… Fabrications… Fabrications have their prerequisite, I tell you.
They are not without a prerequisite.
And what is their prerequisite?
Ignorance…
Just as when the devas pour rain in heavy drops & crash thunder on the upper mountains: the water, flowing down along the slopes, fills the mountain clefts & rifts & gullies.
When the mountain clefts & rifts & gullies are full, they fill the little ponds.
When the little ponds are full, they fill the big lakes… the little rivers… the big rivers.
When the big rivers are full, they fill the great ocean.
In the same way:
Before my self-awakening, when I was still just an unawakened Bodhisatta, the realization came to me: 'How this world has fallen on difficulty!
It is born, it ages, it dies, it falls away & rearises, but it does not discern the escape from this stress, from this aging-&-death.
O when will it discern the escape from this stress, from this aging-&-death?'
Then the thought occurred to me, 'Aging-&-death exists when what exists?
From what as a requisite condition is there aging-&-death?' From my appropriate attention there came the breakthrough of discernment: 'Aging-&-death exists when birth exists.
From birth as a requisite condition comes aging-&-death.' Then the thought occurred to me, 'Birth exists when what exists?
From what as a requisite condition comes birth?' From my appropriate attention there came the breakthrough of discernment: 'Birth exists when becoming exists.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth… 'Name-&-form exists when what exists?
From what as a requisite condition is there name-&-form?' From my appropriate attention there came the breakthrough of discernment: 'Name-&-form exists when consciousness exists.
From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.' Then the thought occurred to me, 'Consciousness exists when what exists?
From what as a requisite condition comes consciousness?' From my appropriate attention there came the breakthrough of discernment: 'Consciousness exists when name-&-form exists.
From name-&-form as a requisite condition comes consciousness.'
Then the thought occurred to me, 'This consciousness turns back at name-&-form, and goes no farther.
It is to this extent that there is birth, aging, death, falling away, & re-arising, i.e., from name-&-form as a requisite condition comes consciousness, from consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.
From name-&-form as a requisite condition come the six sense media… Thus is the origination of this entire mass of stress.
Origination, origination.' Vision arose, clear knowing arose, discernment arose, knowledge arose, illumination arose within me with regard to things never heard before.
Then the thought occurred to me, 'Aging-&-death doesn't exist when what doesn't exist?
From the cessation of what comes the cessation of aging-&-death?' From my appropriate attention there came the breakthrough of discernment: 'Aging-&-death doesn't exist when birth doesn't exist.
From the cessation of birth comes the cessation of aging-&-death.'… 'Name-&-form doesn't exist when what doesn't exist?
From the cessation of what comes the cessation of name-&-form?' From my appropriate attention there came the breakthrough of discernment: 'Name-&-form doesn't exist when consciousness doesn't exist.
From the cessation of consciousness comes the cessation of name-&-form.' Then the thought occurred to me, 'Consciousness doesn't exist when what doesn't exist?
From the cessation of what comes the cessation of consciousness?' From my appropriate attention there came the breakthrough of discernment: 'Consciousness doesn't exist when name-&-form doesn't exist.
From the cessation of name-&-form comes the cessation of consciousness.'
The thought occurred to me, 'I have attained this path to Awakening, i.e., from the cessation of name-&-form comes the cessation of consciousness, from the cessation of consciousness comes the cessation of name-&-form.
From the cessation of name-&-form comes the cessation of the six sense media… Thus is the cessation of this entire mass of stress.
Cessation, cessation.' Vision arose, clear knowing arose, discernment arose, knowledge arose, illumination arose within me with regard to things never heard before.
It's just as if a man, traveling along a wilderness track, were to see an ancient path, an ancient road, traveled by people of former times.
He would follow it.
Following it, he would see an ancient city, an ancient capital inhabited by people of former times, complete with parks, groves, & ponds, walled, delightful.
He would go to address the king or the king's minister, saying, 'Sire, you should know that while traveling along a wilderness track I saw an ancient path… I followed it… I saw an ancient city, an ancient capital… complete with parks, groves, & ponds, walled, delightful.
Sire, rebuild that city!' The king or king's minister would rebuild the city, so that at a later date the city would become powerful, rich, & well-populated, fully grown & prosperous.
In the same way I saw an ancient path, an ancient road, traveled by the Rightly Self-awakened Ones of former times.
And what is that ancient path…?
Just this noble eightfold path: right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration… I followed that path.
Following it, I came to direct knowledge of aging-&-death, direct knowledge of the origination of aging-&-death, direct knowledge of the cessation of aging-&-death, direct knowledge of the path leading to the cessation of aging-&-death.
I followed that path.
Following it, I came to direct knowledge of birth… becoming… clinging… craving… feeling… contact… the six sense media… name-&-form… consciousness, direct knowledge of the origination of consciousness, direct knowledge of the cessation of consciousness, direct knowledge of the path leading to the cessation of consciousness.
I followed that path.
Following it, I came to direct knowledge of fabrications, direct knowledge of the origination of fabrications, direct knowledge of the cessation of fabrications, direct knowledge of the path leading to the cessation of fabrications.
Knowing that directly, I have revealed it to monks, nuns, male lay followers, & female lay followers, so that this holy life has become powerful, rich, detailed, well-populated, wide-spread, proclaimed among celestial & human beings.
Now at that time Subhadda the wanderer was staying in Kusinārā.
He heard, 'Tonight, in the last watch of the night, the total Unbinding of Gotama the contemplative will take place.' Then this thought occurred to him: 'I have heard the venerable elder wanderers, teachers of teachers, saying that only once in a long, long time do Tathāgatas — worthy ones, rightly self-awakened — appear in the world.
Tonight, in the last watch of the night, the total Unbinding of Gotama the contemplative will take place.
Now there is a doubt that has arisen in me, but I have faith that he could teach me the Dhamma in such a way that I might abandon that doubt.'
So he went to the Mallan Sal Tree grove, to Ven.
Ānanda, and on arrival said to him, 'I have heard the venerable elder wanderers, teachers of teachers, saying that only once in a long, long time do Tathāgatas — worthy ones, rightly self-awakened — appear in the world.
Tonight, in the last watch of the night, the total Unbinding of Gotama the contemplative will take place.
Now there is a doubt that has arisen in me, but I have faith that he could teach me the Dhamma in such a way that I might abandon that doubt.
It would be good, Master Ānanda, if I could get to see him.'
When this was said, Ven.
Ānanda said to him, 'Enough, friend Subhadda.
Do not bother the Blessed One.
The Blessed One is tired.'
For a second time… For a third time, Subhadda the wanderer said to Ven.
Ānanda, '… It would be good, Master Ānanda, if I could get to see him.'
For a third time, Ven.
Ānanda said to him, 'Enough, friend Subhadda.
Do not bother the Blessed One.
The Blessed One is tired.'
Now, the Blessed One heard the exchange between Ven.
Ānanda & Subhadda the wanderer, and so he said to Ven.
Ānanda, 'Enough, Ānanda.
Do not stand in his way.
Let him see the Tathāgata.
Whatever he asks me will all be for the sake of knowledge, and not to be bothersome.
And whatever I answer when asked, he will quickly understand.'
So Ven.
Ānanda said to Subhadda the wanderer, 'Go ahead, friend Subhadda.
The Blessed One gives you his leave.'
Then Subhadda went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One, 'Venerable sir, these contemplatives & brahmans, each with his group, each with his community, each the teacher of his group, an honored leader, well-regarded by people at large — i.e., Pūraṇa Kassapa, Makkhali Gosāla, Ajita Kesakambalin, Pakudha Kaccāyana, Sañjaya Belaṭṭhaputta, & Nigaṇṭha Nāṭaputta: Do they all have direct knowledge as they themselves claim, or do they all not have direct knowledge, or do some of them have direct knowledge and some of them not?'
'Enough, Subhadda.
Put this question aside.
I will teach you the Dhamma.
Listen and pay close attention.
I will speak.'
'As you say, lord,' Subhadda responded, and the Blessed One said, 'In any doctrine & discipline where the noble eightfold path is not ascertained, no contemplative of the first… second… third… fourth order is ascertained.
But in any doctrine & discipline where the noble eightfold path is ascertained, contemplatives of the first… second… third… fourth order are ascertained.
The noble eightfold path is ascertained in this doctrine & discipline, and right here are contemplatives of the first… second… third… fourth order.
Other teachings are empty of knowledgeable contemplatives.
And if the monks dwell rightly, this world will not be empty of Arahants.
And no contemplative of the second… third… fourth order.
Other teachings are empty of knowledgeable contemplatives.
And if the monks dwell rightly, this world will not be empty of Arahants.'
Then Subhadda the wanderer said, 'Magnificent, lord, magnificent!
In many ways has the Blessed One made the Dhamma clear — just as if one were to place upright what has been overturned, to reveal what has been hidden, to point out the way to one who is lost, or to set out a lamp in the darkness so that those with eyes might see forms.
I go to the Blessed One for refuge, and to the Dhamma and to the Community of monks.
Let me obtain the going forth in the Blessed One's presence, let me obtain admission.'
'Anyone, Subhadda, who has previously belonged to another sect and who desires the going forth & admission in this doctrine & discipline, must first undergo probation for four months.
If, at the end of four months, the monks are pleased, they give him the going forth & admit him to the monk's state.
But I know distinctions among individuals in this matter.'
'Lord, if that is so, I am willing to undergo probation for four years.
If, at the end of four years, the monks are pleased, let them give me the going forth & admit me to the monk's state.'
Then the Blessed One said to Ven.
Ānanda, 'Very well then, Ānanda, give Subhadda the going forth.'
'As you say, lord,' Ven.
Ānanda responded.
Then Subhadda said to Ven.
Ānanda, 'It is a gain for you, friend Ānanda, a great gain, that you have been anointed here in the Teacher's presence with the pupil's anointing.'
Then Subhadda the wanderer received the going forth, he received the admission in the Blessed One's presence.
And not long after his admission — dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute — he in no long time entered & remained in the unexcelled goal of the holy life, for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew, 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.' And thus Ven.
Subhadda became another one of the Arahants, the last of the Blessed One's face-to-face disciples.
In Theravada, the relationship between teacher and student is like that between a master craftsman and his apprentice.
The Dhamma is a skill, like carpentry, archery, or cooking.
The duty of the teacher is to pass on the skill not only by word and example, but also by creating situations to foster the ingenuity and powers of observation the student will need to become skillful.
The duty of the student is to choose a reliable master — someone whose skills are solid and whose intentions can be trusted — and to be as observant as possible.
After all, there's no way you can become a skilled craftsman by passively watching the master or merely obeying his words.
You can't abdicate responsibility for your own actions.
You have to pay attention both to your actions and to their results, at the same time using your ingenuity and discernment to correct mistakes and overcome obstacles as they arise.
This requires that you combine respect for your teacher with respect for the principle of cause and effect as it plays out in your own thoughts, words, and deeds.
Shortly before my ordination, my teacher — Ajaan Fuang Jotiko — told me: “If you want to learn, you'll have to think like a thief and figure out how to steal your knowledge.” And soon I learned what he meant.
During my first years with him, he had no one to attend to his needs: cleaning his hut, boiling the water for his bath, looking after him when he was sick, etc.
So, even though I was a foreigner — barely fluent in Thai and probably the most uncouth barbarian he had ever met — I quickly took on the role of his attendant.
Instead of explaining where things should be placed or when certain duties should be done, he left it up to me to observe for myself.
If I caught on, he wouldn't say anything.
If I didn't, he'd point out my mistake — but still wouldn't fully explain what was wrong.
I had to observe for myself: Where did he place things when he straightened out his hut?
And I had to do this out of the corner of my eye, for if I was too obvious in watching him, he would chase me away.
As he said, “If I have to explain everything, you'll get used to having things handed to you on a platter.
And then what will you do when problems come up in your meditation and you don't have any experience in figuring things out and experimenting on your own?
So I swallowed my pride and learned to take my mistakes as my teachers.
Before, I could never tolerate being in the wrong.
But when I could finally admit to being wrong, I started finding the inner resources I needed to start setting things right.
Still, the issue of balancing respect was a problem.
Ajaan Fuang was amazingly principled, wise, and compassionate, and I could always trust his intentions toward me.
As a result I felt enormous respect for him.
Nevertheless, he was a human being with human foibles.
Because my Christian upbringing had taught me to reserve my ultimate respect for a supposedly infallible being, I was awkward in handling the occasions when Ajaan Fuang was a little less than perfect.
At the same time, I didn't know quite what to do with my strongly ingrained streak of independence.
So one day, out of the blue, Ajaan Fuang told me a story about a time when he had had a disagreement with his own teacher, Ajaan Lee Dhammadharo.
Toward the end of his life, Ajaan Lee had built a monastery in a mangrove swamp on the outskirts of Bangkok.
The lay supporters wanted an ordination hall, so that was the first permanent building erected in the monastery.
When laying the foundations, they placed a concrete vault under the spot where the Buddha image was to be situated, and filled it with sacred objects: Buddha relics, Buddha images, amulets, pieces of scripture, and so forth.
Then they sealed it up for posterity.
Traditionally in Thailand, Buddha images always face east — the direction the Buddha was facing on the day of his Awakening — so the vault was placed under the western side of the building, under the spot where the main Buddha image would be placed.
Halfway through the construction, though, Ajaan Lee changed his mind and decided to place the Buddha image on the eastern side of the building, facing west.
Although he never offered an explanation for this unusual move, his students are generally unanimous in their interpretation of what he wanted it to represent: the Dharma was going West.
Not until the building was finished, though, did anyone realize that the vault was no longer in line with the image.
This meant that people entering the building through the western door would be stepping right over the sacred objects in the vault, violating a strong Thai taboo.
So one evening Ajaan Lee said to Ajaan Fuang, “Get the monks together and move the vault to the other side of the building.” Ajaan Fuang thought to himself, “That vault is firmly planted in the ground, and the area beneath the ordination hall is nothing but mud.” However, he knew if he said that it couldn't be moved, Ajaan Lee would say, “If you don't have the conviction to do it, I'll find someone else who does.” So the next morning, after the meal, Ajaan Fuang got all the able-bodied monks and novices in the monastery down under the building, with ropes to pull the vault over to the eastern side.
They worked all day but couldn't budge it an inch.
So now was the time to express an opinion — and to suggest an alternative solution to the problem.
Ajaan Fuang went to Ajaan Lee that evening and said, “How about if we build another vault under the image, open the original vault, take all the sacred objects out of the old vault, and seal them up in the new one?” Ajaan Lee gave him a brief nod, and thus the problem was solved.
“And that,” Ajaan Fuang concluded, “is how you show respect for your teacher.”
Meditation is the most useful skill you can master.
It can bring the mind to the end of suffering, something no other skill can do.
But it's also the most subtle and demanding skill there is.
It requires all the mental qualities ordinarily involved in mastering a physical skill — mindfulness and alertness, persistence and patience, discipline and ingenuity — but to an extraordinary degree.
This is why, when you come to meditation, it's good to reflect on any skills, crafts, or disciplines you've already mastered so that you can apply the lessons they've taught you to the training of the mind.
As a meditation teacher, I've often found it helpful to illustrate my points with analogies drawn from physical skills.
And, given the particular range of skills and disciplines currently popular in America, I've found that one useful source of analogies is strength training.
Meditation is more like a good workout than you might have thought.
The Buddha himself noticed the parallels here.
He defined the practice as a path of five strengths: conviction, persistence, mindfulness, concentration, and discernment.
He likened the mind's ability to beat down its most stubborn thoughts to that of a strong man beating down a weaker man.
The agility of a well-trained mind, he said, is like that of a strong man who can easily flex his arm when it's extended, or extend it when it's flexed.
And he often compared the higher skills of concentration and discernment to the skills of archery, which — given the massive bows of ancient India — was strength training for the noble warriors of his day.
These skills included the ability to shoot great distances, to fire arrows in rapid succession, and to pierce great masses — the great mass, here, standing for the mass of ignorance that envelops the untrained mind.
So even if you've been pumping great masses instead of piercing them, you've been learning some important lessons that will stand you in good stead as a meditator.
A few of the more important lessons are these:
Read up on anatomy.
If you want to strengthen a muscle, you need to know where it is and what it moves if you're going to understand the exercises that target it.
Only then can you perform them efficiently.
In the same way, you have to understand the anatomy of the mind's suffering if you want to understand how meditation is supposed to work.
Read up on what the Buddha had to say on the topic, and don't settle for books that put you at the far end of a game of telephone.
Go straight to the source.
You'll find, for instance, that the Buddha explained how ignorance shapes the way you breathe, and how that in turn can add to your suffering.
This is why most meditation regimens start with the breath, and why the Buddha's own regimen takes the breath all the way to nirvana.
So read up to understand how and why.
Start where you are.
Too many meditators get discouraged at the outset because their minds won't settle down.
But just as you can't wait until you're big and strong before you start strength training, you can't wait until your concentration is strong before you start sitting.
Only by exercising what little concentration you have will you make it solid and steady.
So even though you feel scrawny when everyone around you seems big, or fat when everyone else seems fit, remember that you're not here to compete with them or with the perfect meditators you see in magazines.
You're here to work on yourself.
So establish that as your focus, and keep it strong.
Establish a regular routine.
You're in this for the long haul.
We all like the stories of sudden enlightenment, but even the most lightning-like insights have to be primed by a long, steady discipline of day-to-day practice.
That's because the consistency of your discipline is what allows you to observe subtle changes, and being observant is what enables insight to see.
So don't get taken in by promises of quick and easy shortcuts.
Set aside a time to meditate every day and then stick to your schedule whether you feel like meditating or not.
The mind grows by overcoming resistance to repetition, just like a muscle.
Sometimes the best insights come on the days you least feel like meditating.
Even when they don't, you're establishing a strength of discipline, patience, and resilience that will see you through the even greater difficulties of aging, illness, and death.
That's why it's called practice.
Aim for balance.
The “muscle groups” of the path are three: virtue, concentration, and discernment.  If any one of these gets overdeveloped at the expense of the others, it throws you out of alignment, and your extra strength turns into a liability.
Set interim goals.
You can't fix a deadline for your enlightenment, but you can keep aiming for a little more sitting or walking time, a little more consistency in your mindfulness, a little more speed in recovering from distraction, a little more understanding of what you're doing.
The type of meditation taught on retreats where they tell you not to have goals is aimed at people who get neurotic around goals in general and the weekend warriors who need to be cautioned so that they don't push themselves past the breaking point.
If you're approaching meditation as a lifetime activity, you've got to have goals.
You've got to want results.
Otherwise the whole thing loses focus, and you start wondering why you're sitting here when you could be sitting out on the beach.
Focus on proper form.
Get your desire for results to work for you and not against you.
Once you've set your goals, focus directly not on the results but on the means that will get you there.
It's like building muscle mass.
You don't blow air or stuff protein into the muscle to make it larger.
You focus on performing your reps properly, and the muscle grows on its own.
If, as you meditate, you want the mind to develop more concentration, don't focus on the idea of concentration.
Focus on allowing this breath to be more comfortable, and then this breath, this breath, one breath at a time.
Concentration will then grow without your having to think about it.
Pace yourself.
Learn how to read your pain.
When you meditate, some pains in the body are simply a sign that it's adapting to the meditation posture; others, that you're pushing yourself too hard.
Some pains are telling the truth, some are lying.
Learn how to tell the difference.
The same principle applies to the mind.
When the mind can't seem to settle down, sometimes it needs to be pushed even harder, sometimes you need to pull back.
Your ability to read the difference is what exercises your powers of wisdom and discernment.
Learn, too, how to read your progress.
The meditation won't really be a skill, won't really be your own, until you learn to judge what works for you and what doesn't.
You may have heard that meditation is non-judgmental, but that's simply meant to counteract the tendency to prejudge things before they've had a chance to show their results.
Once the results are in, you need to learn how to gauge them, to see how they connect with their causes, so that you can adjust the causes in the direction of the outcome you really want.
Vary your routine.
Just as a muscle can stop responding to a particular exercise, your mind can hit a plateau if it's strapped to only one meditation technique.
So don't let your regular routine get into a rut.
Sometimes the only change you need is a different way of breathing, a different way of visualizing the breath energy in the body.
But then there are days when the mind won't stay with the breath no matter how many different ways of breathing you try.
This is why the Buddha taught supplemental meditations to deal with specific problems as they arise.
For starters, there's goodwill for when you're feeling down on yourself or the human race — the people you dislike would be much more tolerable if they could find genuine happiness inside, so wish them that happiness.
There's contemplation of the parts of the body for when you're overcome with lust — it's hard to maintain a sexual fantasy when you keep thinking about what lies just underneath the skin.
And there's contemplation of death for when you're feeling lazy — you don't know how much time you've got left, so you'd better meditate now if you want to be ready when the time comes to go.
When these supplemental contemplations have done their work, you can get back to the breath, refreshed and revived.
So keep expanding your repertoire.
That way your skill becomes all-around.
Take your ups and downs in stride.
The rhythms of the mind are even more complex than those of the body, so a few radical ups and downs are par for the course.
Just make sure that they don't knock you off balance.
When things are going so well that the mind grows still without any effort on your part, don't get careless or overly confident.
When your mood is so bad that even the supplemental meditations don't work, view it as an opportunity to learn how to be patient and observant of bad moods.
Either way, you learn a valuable lesson: how to keep your inner observer separate from whatever else is going on.
So do your best to maintain proper form regardless, and you'll come out the other side.
Watch your eating habits.
As the Buddha once said, we survive both on mental food and physical food.
Mental food consists of the external stimuli you focus on, as well as the intentions that motivate the mind.
If you feed your mind junk food, it's going to stay weak and sickly no matter how much you meditate.
So show some restraint in your eating.
If you know that looking at things in certain ways, with certain intentions, gives rise to greed, anger, or delusion, look at them in the opposite way.
As Ajaan Lee, my teacher's teacher, once said, look for the bad side of the things you're infatuated with, and the good side of the things you hate.
The same principle applies to all your senses.
That way you become a discriminating eater, and the mind gets the healthy, nourishing food it needs to grow strong.
As for your physical eating habits, this is one of the areas where inner strength training and outer strength training part ways.
As a meditator, you have to be concerned less with what physical food you eat than with why you eat.
If you're bulking up for no real purpose, it's actually harmful for the mind.
You have to realize that in eating — even if it's vegetarian food — you're placing a burden on the world around you, so you want to give some thought to the purposes served by the strength you gain from your food.
Don't take more from the world than you're willing to give back.
Don't eat just for the fun of it, because the beings that provided the food didn't provide it in fun.
Make sure the energy gets put to good use.
Don't leave your strength in the gym.
If you don't use your strength in other activities, strength training becomes largely an exercise in vanity — aimed at impressing yourself or others, but the impression is rarely deep or lasting.
The same principle applies to your meditative skills.
If you leave them on the cushion and don't apply them in everyday life, they never make a deep impression on the mind, and you don't get as much out of them as you really should.
The ability to maintain your center and to breathe comfortably in any situation can be a genuine lifesaver, keeping the mind in a position where you can more easily think of the right thing to do, say, or think when your surroundings get tough.
As a result, the people around you are no longer subjected to your greed, anger, and delusion.
And as you maintain your inner balance in this way, it helps them maintain theirs.
So make the whole world your meditation seat, and you'll find that meditation both on the big seat and the little seat will get a lot stronger.
At the same time, it'll become a gift both to yourself and to the world around you.
Never lose sight of your ultimate goal.
Mental strength has at least one major advantage over physical strength in that it doesn't inevitably decline with age.
It can always keep growing to and through the experience of death.
The Buddha promises that it leads to the Deathless, and he wasn't a man to make vain, empty promises.
So when you establish your priorities, make sure that you give more time and energy to strengthening your meditation than you do to strengthening your body.
After all, someday you'll be forced to lay down this body, no matter how fit or strong you've made it, but you'll never be forced to lay down the strengths you've built into the mind.
Thus have I heard:
On one occasion the Exalted One was dwelling in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels' Sanctuary, near Rajagaha.
Now at that time, young Sigala, a householder's son, rising early in the morning, departing from Rajagaha, with wet clothes and wet hair, worshipped with joined hands the various quarters — the East, the South, the West, the North, the Nadir, and the Zenith.
Then the Exalted One, having robed himself in the forenoon took bowl and robe, and entered Rajagaha for alms.
Now he saw young Sigala worshipping thus and spoke to him as follows:
“Wherefore do you, young householder, rising early in the morning, departing from Rajagaha, with wet clothes and wet hair, worship, with joined hands these various quarters — the East, the South, the West, the North, the Nadir, and the Zenith?
“My father, Lord, while dying, said to me: The six quarters, dear son, you shall worship.
And I, Lord, respecting, revering, reverencing and honoring my father's word, rise early in the morning, and leaving Rajagaha, with wet clothes and wet hair, worship with joined hands, these six quarters.
“It is not thus, young householder, the six quarters should be worshipped in the discipline of the noble.
“How then, Lord, should the six quarters be worshipped in the discipline of the noble?
It is well, Lord, if the Exalted One would teach the doctrine to me showing how the six quarters should be worshipped in the discipline of the noble.
“Well, young householder, listen and bear it well in mind; I shall speak.” — “Very good, Lord,” responded young Sigala.
And the Exalted One spoke as follows:
“Inasmuch, young householder, as the noble disciple has eradicated the four vices in conduct, inasmuch as he commits no evil action in four ways, inasmuch as he pursues not the six channels for dissipating wealth, he thus, avoiding these fourteen evil things, covers the six quarters, and enters the path leading to victory in both worlds: he is favored in this world and in the world beyond.
Upon the dissolution of the body, after death, he is born in a happy heavenly realm.
“What are the four vices in conduct that he has eradicated?
The destruction of life, householder, is a vice and so are stealing, sexual misconduct, and lying.
These are the four vices that he has eradicated.
Thus spoke the Exalted One.
And when the Master had thus spoken, he spoke yet again:
“In which four ways does one commit no evil action?
Led by desire does one commit evil.
Led by anger does one commit evil.
Led by ignorance does one commit evil.
Led by fear does one commit evil.
“But inasmuch as the noble disciple is not led by desire, anger, ignorance, and fear, he commits no evil.
Thus spoke the Exalted One.
And when the Master had thus spoken, he spoke yet again:
“What are the six channels for dissipating wealth which he does not pursue?
“There are, young householder, these six evil consequences in indulging in intoxicants which cause infatuation and heedlessness:
“There are, young householder, these six evil consequences in sauntering in streets at unseemly hours:
“There are, young householder, these six evil consequences in frequenting theatrical shows.
He is ever thinking:
“There are, young householder, these six evil consequences in indulging in gambling:
“There are, young householder, these six evil consequences in associating with evil companions, namely: any gambler, any libertine, any drunkard, any swindler, any cheat, any rowdy is his friend and companion.
“There are, young householder, these six evil consequences in being addicted to idleness:
“He does no work, saying:
“Living in this way, he leaves many duties undone, new wealth he does not get, and wealth he has acquired dwindles away.
Thus spoke the Exalted One.
And when the Master had thus spoken, he spoke yet again:
“One is a bottle friend; one says, 'friend, friend' only to one's face; one is a friend and an associate only when it is advantageous.
“Sleeping till sunrise, adultery, irascibility, malevolence, evil companions, avarice — these six causes ruin a man.
“The man who has evil comrades and friends is given to evil ways, to ruin does he fall in both worlds — here and the next.
“Dice, women, liquor, dancing, singing, sleeping by day, sauntering at unseemly hours, evil companions, avarice — these nine causes ruin a man.
“Who plays with dice and drinks intoxicants, goes to women who are dear unto others as their own lives, associates with the mean and not with elders — he declines just as the moon during the waning half.
“Who is drunk, poor, destitute, still thirsty whilst drinking, frequents the bars, sinks in debt as a stone in water, swiftly brings disrepute to his family.
“Who by habit sleeps by day, and keeps late hours, is ever intoxicated, and is licentious, is not fit to lead a household life.
“Who says it is too hot, too cold, too late, and leaves things undone, the opportunities for good go past such men.
“But he who does not regard cold or heat any more than a blade of grass and who does his duties manfully, does not fall away from happiness.
“These four, young householder, should be understood as foes in the guise of friends:
“In four ways, young householder, should one who appropriates be understood as a foe in the guise of a friend:
“In four ways, young householder, should one who renders lip-service be understood as a foe in the guise of a friend:
“In four ways, young householder, should one who flatters be understood as a foe in the guise of a friend:
“In four ways, young householder, should one who brings ruin be understood as a foe in the guise of a friend:
Thus spoke the Exalted One.
And when the Master had thus spoken, he spoke yet again:
“These four, young householder, should be understood as warm-hearted friends:
“In four ways, young householder, should a helpmate be understood as a warm-hearted friend:
“In four ways, young householder, should one who is the same in happiness and sorrow be understood as a warm-hearted friend:
“In four ways, young householder, should one who gives good counsel be understood as a warm-hearted friend:
“In four ways, young householder, should one who sympathises be understood as a warm-hearted friend:
Thus spoke the Exalted One.
And when the Master had thus spoken, he spoke yet again:
“And how, young householder, does a noble disciple cover the six quarters?
“The following should be looked upon as the six quarters.
The parents should be looked upon as the East, teachers as the South, wife and children as the West, friends and associates as the North, servants and employees as the Nadir, ascetics and brahmans as the Zenith.
“In five ways, young householder, a child should minister to his parents as the East:
“In five ways, young householder, the parents thus ministered to as the East by their children, show their compassion:
“In these five ways do children minister to their parents as the East and the parents show their compassion to their children.
Thus is the East covered by them and made safe and secure.
“In five ways, young householder, a pupil should minister to a teacher as the South:
“In five ways, young householder, do teachers thus ministered to as the South by their pupils, show their compassion:
“The teachers thus ministered to as the South by their pupils, show their compassion towards them in these five ways.
Thus is the South covered by them and made safe and secure.
“In five ways, young householder, should a wife as the West be ministered to by a husband:
“The wife thus ministered to as the West by her husband shows her compassion to her husband in five ways:
“In these five ways does the wife show her compassion to her husband who ministers to her as the West.
Thus is the West covered by him and made safe and secure.
“In five ways, young householder, should a clansman minister to his friends and associates as the North:
“The friends and associates thus ministered to as the North by a clansman show compassion to him in five ways:
“The friends and associates thus ministered to as the North by a clansman show their compassion towards him in these five ways.
Thus is the North covered by him and made safe and secure.
“In five ways should a master minister to his servants and employees as the Nadir:
“The servants and employees thus ministered to as the Nadir by their master show their compassion to him in five ways:
“The servants and employees thus ministered to as the Nadir show their compassion towards him in these five ways.
Thus is the Nadir covered by him and made safe and secure.
“In five ways, young householder, should a householder minister to ascetics and brahmans as the Zenith:
“The ascetics and brahmans thus ministered to as the Zenith by a householder show their compassion towards him in six ways:
“In these six ways do ascetics and brahmans show their compassion towards a householder who ministers to them as the Zenith.
Thus is the Zenith covered by him and made safe and secure.” Thus spoke the Exalted One.
And when the Master had thus spoken, he spoke yet again:
When the Exalted One had spoken thus, Sigala, the young householder, said as follows:
“Excellent, Lord, excellent!
It is as if, Lord, a man were to set upright that which was overturned, or were to reveal that which was hidden, or were to point out the way to one who had gone astray, or were to hold a lamp amidst the darkness, so that those who have eyes may see.
Even so, has the doctrine been explained in various ways by the Exalted One.
“I take refuge, Lord, in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha.
May the Exalted One receive me as a lay follower; as one who has taken refuge from this very day to life's end.”
This is what I heard.
On one occasion, the Buddha was living near the town of Rajagaha at a spot in the Bamboo Grove called the Squirrel's Feeding Place.
At that time a young householder named Sigalaka arose early and set out from Rajagaha with freshly washed clothes and hair.
With palms together held up in reverence, he was paying respect towards the six directions: that is east, south, west, north, lower and upper.
Meanwhile the Buddha dressed himself in the early morning, took his bowl and robe and went in to Rajagaha on alms round.
On the way, he saw Sigalaka worshipping the six directions.
Seeing this, the Buddha said to him: “Young man, why have you risen in the early morning and set out from Rajagaha to worship in such a way?
“Dear sir, my father on his deathbed urged me, 'My son, you must worship the directions'.
So, dear sir, realizing, honoring, respecting, and holding sacred my father's request, I have risen in the early morning and set out from Rajagaha to worship in this way.
“But, young man, that is not how the six directions should be worshipped according to the discipline of the noble ones.
“Then how, dear sir, should the six directions be worshipped according to the discipline of the noble ones?
I would appreciate it if you would teach me the proper way this should be done.
“Very well, young man, listen and pay careful attention while I tell you.
“Yes, dear sir,” agreed Sigalaka.
The Buddha said this:
“Young man, by abandoning the four impure actions, a noble disciple refrains from harmful deeds rooted in four causes and avoids the six ways of squandering wealth.
So, these fourteen harmful things are removed.
The noble disciple, now with the six directions protected, has entered upon a path for conquering both worlds, firmly grounded in this world and the next.
At the dissolution of the body after death, a good rebirth occurs in a heavenly world.
“What four impure actions are abandoned?
The harming of living beings is an impure action, taking what is not given is an impure action, sexual misconduct is an impure action, and false speech is an impure action.
These four are abandoned.
That is what the Buddha said.
Summing up in verse, the sublime teacher said:
“What are the four causes of harmful deeds?
Going astray through desire, hatred, delusion, or fear, the noble disciple does harmful deeds.
But, young man, not going astray through desire, hatred, delusion, or fear, the noble disciple does not perform harmful deeds.
That is what the Buddha said.
Summing up in verse, the sublime teacher said:
“And what six ways of squandering wealth are to be avoided?
Young man, heedlessness caused by intoxication, roaming the streets at inappropriate times, habitual partying, compulsive gambling, bad companionship, and laziness are the six ways of squandering wealth.
“These are the six dangers inherent in heedlessness caused by intoxication: loss of immediate wealth, increased quarreling, susceptibility to illness, disrepute, indecent exposure, and weakened insight.
“These are the six dangers inherent in roaming the streets at inappropriate times: oneself, one's family, and one's property are all left unguarded and unprotected; one is suspected of crimes; then rumors spread; and one is subjected to many miseries.
“These are the six dangers inherent in habitual partying: You constantly seek, 'Where's the dancing?
Where's the singing?
Where's the music?
Where are the stories?
Where's the applause?
Where's the drumming?'
“These are the six dangers inherent in compulsive gambling: winning breeds resentment; the loser mourns lost property; savings are lost; one's word carries no weight in a public forum; friends and colleagues display their contempt; and one is not sought after for marriage, since a gambler cannot adequately support a family.
“These are the six dangers inherent in bad companionship: any rogue, drunkard, addict, cheat, swindler, or thug becomes a friend and colleague.
“These are the six dangers inherent in laziness: saying, 'It's too cold,' one does not work; saying, 'It's too hot,' one does not work; saying, 'It's too late,' one does not work; saying, 'It's too early,' one does not work; saying, 'I'm too hungry,' one does not work; saying, 'I'm too full,' one does not work.
With an abundance of excuses for not working, new wealth does not accrue and existing wealth goes to waste.
That is what the Buddha said.
Summing up in verse, the sublime teacher said:
“Young man, be aware of these four enemies disguised as friends: the taker, the talker, the flatterer, and the reckless companion.
“The taker can be identified by four things: by only taking, asking for a lot while giving little, performing duty out of fear, and offering service in order to gain something.
“The talker can be identified by four things: by reminding of past generosity, promising future generosity, mouthing empty words of kindness, and protesting personal misfortune when called on to help.
“The flatterer can be identified by four things: by supporting both bad and good behavior indiscriminately, praising you to your face, and putting you down behind your back.
“The reckless companion can be identified by four things: by accompanying you in drinking, roaming around at night, partying, and gambling.
That is what the Buddha said.
Summing up in verse, the sublime teacher said:
“Young man, be aware of these four good-hearted friends: the helper, the friend who endures in good times and bad, the mentor, and the compassionate friend.
“The helper can be identified by four things: by protecting you when you are vulnerable, and likewise your wealth, being a refuge when you are afraid, and in various tasks providing double what is requested.
“The enduring friend can be identified by four things: by telling you secrets, guarding your own secrets closely, not abandoning you in misfortune, and even dying for you.
“The mentor can be identified by four things: by restraining you from wrongdoing, guiding you towards good actions, telling you what you ought to know, and showing you the path to heaven.
“The compassionate friend can be identified by four things: by not rejoicing in your misfortune, delighting in your good fortune, preventing others from speaking ill of you, and encouraging others who praise your good qualities.
That is what the Buddha said.
Summing up in verse, the sublime teacher said:
“And how, young man, does the noble disciple protect the six directions?
These six directions should be known: mother and father as the east, teachers as the south, spouse and family as the west, friends and colleagues as the north, workers and servants as the lower direction, and ascetics and Brahmans as the upper direction.
“In five ways should a mother and father as the eastern direction be respected by a child: 'I will support them who supported me; I will do my duty to them; I will maintain the family lineage and tradition; I will be worthy of my inheritance; and I will make donations on behalf of dead ancestors.'
“And, the mother and father so respected reciprocate with compassion in five ways: by restraining you from wrongdoing, guiding you towards good actions, training you in a profession, supporting the choice of a suitable spouse, and in due time, handing over the inheritance.
“In this way, the eastern direction is protected and made peaceful and secure.
“In five ways should teachers as the southern direction be respected by a student: by rising for them, regularly attending lessons, eagerly desiring to learn, duly serving them, and receiving instruction.
“And, teachers so respected reciprocate with compassion in five ways: by training in self-discipline, ensuring the teachings are well-grasped, instructing in every branch of knowledge, introducing their friends and colleagues, and providing safeguards in every direction.
“In this way, the southern direction is protected and made peaceful and secure.
“In five ways should a wife as the western direction be respected by a husband: by honoring, not disrespecting, being faithful, sharing authority, and by giving gifts.
“And, the wife so respected reciprocates with compassion in five ways: by being well-organized, being kindly disposed to the in-laws and household workers, being faithful, looking after the household goods, and being skillful and diligent in all duties.
In this way, the western direction is protected and made peaceful and secure.
“In five ways should friends and colleagues as the northern direction be respected: by generosity, kind words, acting for their welfare, impartiality, and honesty.
“And, friends and colleagues so respected reciprocate with compassion in five ways: by protecting you when you are vulnerable, and likewise your wealth, being a refuge when you are afraid, not abandoning you in misfortunes, and honoring all your descendants.
“In this way, the northern direction is protected and made peaceful and secure.
“In five ways should workers and servants as the lower direction be respected by an employer: by allocating work according to aptitude, providing wages and food, looking after the sick, sharing special treats, and giving reasonable time off work.
“And, workers and servants so respected reciprocate with compassion in five ways: being willing to start early and finish late when necessary, taking only what is given, doing work well, and promoting a good reputation.
“In this way, the lower direction is protected and made peaceful and secure.
“In five ways should ascetics and Brahmans as the upper direction be respected: by kindly actions, speech, and thoughts, having an open door, and providing material needs.
“And, ascetics and Brahmans so respected reciprocate with compassion in six ways: by restraining you from wrongdoing, guiding you to good actions, thinking compassionately, telling you what you ought to know, clarifying what you already know, and showing you the path to heaven.
“In this way, the upper direction is protected and made peaceful and secure.
That is what the Buddha said.
Summing up in verse, the sublime teacher said:
When all was said, the young householder, Sigalaka, exclaimed to the Buddha:
“Wonderful, dear sir!
Wonderful!
It is as though you have set upright what was overturned, or uncovered what was concealed, or shown the path to one gone astray, or brought an oil-lamp into the darkness such that those with eyes could see.
So too has the Buddha made clear the Dhamma by various ways.
I go for refuge to the Buddha and to the Dhamma and to the monastic community.
May the exalted one accept me as a lay-follower gone for refuge from henceforth for as long as I live.”
Having been given leave by the Blessed One, Sakka the deva-king asked him his first question: “Fettered with what, dear sir — though they think, 'May we live free from hostility, free from violence, free from rivalry, free from ill will, free from those who are hostile' — do devas, human beings, asuras, nagas, gandhabbas, & whatever other many kinds of beings there are, nevertheless live in hostility, violence, rivalry, ill will, with those who are hostile?
Thus Sakka asked his first question of the Blessed One, and the Blessed One, when asked, replied: “Devas, human beings, asuras, nagas, gandhabbas, & whatever other many kinds of beings there are, are fettered with envy & stinginess, which is why — even though they think, 'May we live free from hostility, free from violence, free from rivalry, free from ill will, free from those who are hostile' — they nevertheless live in hostility, violence, rivalry, ill will, with those who are hostile.
Thus the Blessed One answered, having been asked by Sakka the deva-king.
Gratified, Sakka was delighted in & expressed his approval of the Blessed One's words: “So it is, O Blessed One.
So it is, O One Well-gone.
Hearing the Blessed One's answer to my question, my doubt is now cut off, my perplexity is overcome.
Then Sakka, having delighted in & expressed his approval of the Blessed One's words, asked him a further question: “But what, dear sir, is the cause of envy & stinginess, what is their origination, what gives them birth, what is their source?
When what exists do they come into being?
When what doesn't exist do they not?
“Envy & stinginess have dear-&-not-dear as their cause, have dear-&-not-dear as their origination, have dear-&-not-dear as what gives them birth, have dear-&-not-dear as their source.
When dear-&-not-dear exist, they come into being.
When dear-&-not-dear are not, they don't.
“But what, dear sir, is the cause of dear-&-not-dear, what is their origination, what gives them birth, what is their source?
When what exists do they come into being?
When what doesn't exist do they not?
“Dear-&-not-dear have desire as their cause, have desire as their origination, have desire as what gives them birth, have desire as their source.
When desire exists, they come into being.
When desire is not, they don't.
“But what, dear sir, is the cause of desire, what is its origination, what gives it birth, what is its source?
When what exists does it come into being?
When what doesn't exist does it not?
“Desire has thinking as its cause, has thinking as its origination, has thinking as what gives it birth, has thinking as its source.
When thinking exists, desire comes into being.
When thinking is not, it doesn't.
“But what, dear sir, is the cause of thinking, what is its origination, what gives it birth, what is its source?
When what exists does it come into being?
When what doesn't exist does it not?
“Thinking has the perceptions & categories of objectification as its cause, has the perceptions & categories of objectification as its origination, has the perceptions & categories of objectification as what gives it birth, has the perceptions & categories of objectification as its source.
When the perceptions & categories of objectification exist, thinking comes into being.
When the perceptions & categories of objectification are not, it doesn't.
“And how has he practiced, dear sir: the monk who has practiced the practice leading to the right cessation of the perceptions & categories of objectification?
“Joy is of two sorts, I tell you, deva-king: to be pursued & not to be pursued.
Grief is of two sorts: to be pursued & not to be pursued.
Equanimity is of two sorts: to be pursued & not to be pursued.
“'Joy is of two sorts, I tell you, deva-king: to be pursued & not to be pursued.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
When one knows of a feeling of joy, 'As I pursue this joy, unskillful mental qualities increase, and skillful mental qualities decline,' that sort of joy is not to be pursued.
When one knows of a feeling of joy, 'As I pursue this joy, unskillful mental qualities decline, and skillful mental qualities increase,' that sort of joy is to be pursued.
And this sort of joy may be accompanied by directed thought & evaluation or free of directed thought & evaluation.
Of the two, the latter is the more refined.
'Joy is of two sorts, I tell you, deva-king: to be pursued & not to be pursued.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“'Grief is of two sorts, I tell you: to be pursued & not to be pursued.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
When one knows of a feeling of grief, 'As I pursue this grief, unskillful mental qualities increase, and skillful mental qualities decline,' that sort of grief is not to be pursued.
When one knows of a feeling of grief, 'As I pursue this grief, unskillful mental qualities decline, and skillful mental qualities increase,' that sort of grief is to be pursued.
And this sort of grief may be accompanied by directed thought & evaluation or free of directed thought & evaluation.
Of the two, the latter is the more refined.
'Grief is of two sorts, I tell you: to be pursued & not to be pursued.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“'Equanimity is of two sorts, I tell you: to be pursued & not to be pursued.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
When one knows of a feeling of equanimity, 'As I pursue this equanimity, unskillful mental qualities increase, and skillful mental qualities decline,' that sort of equanimity is not to be pursued.
When one knows of a feeling of equanimity, 'As I pursue this equanimity, unskillful mental qualities decline, and skillful mental qualities increase,' that sort of equanimity is to be pursued.
And this sort of equanimity may be accompanied by directed thought & evaluation or free of directed thought & evaluation.
Of the two, the latter is the more refined.
'Equanimity is of two sorts, I tell you: to be pursued & not to be pursued.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“This is how he has practiced, deva-king: the monk who has practiced the practice leading to the right cessation of the perceptions & categories of objectification.
Thus the Blessed One answered, having been asked by Sakka the deva-king.
Gratified, Sakka was delighted in & expressed his approval of the Blessed One's words: “So it is, O Blessed One.
So it is, O One Well-gone.
Hearing the Blessed One's answer to my question, my doubt is now cut off, my perplexity is overcome.
Then Sakka, having delighted in & expressed his approval of the Blessed One's words, asked him a further question: “But how has he practiced, dear sir: the monk who has practiced for restraint in the Patimokkha?
“Bodily conduct is of two sorts, I tell you, deva-king: to be pursued & not to be pursued.
Verbal conduct is of two sorts: to be pursued & not to be pursued.
Searching is of two sorts: to be pursued & not to be pursued.
“'Bodily conduct is of two sorts, I tell you, deva-king: to be pursued & not to be pursued.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
When one knows of bodily conduct, 'As I pursue this bodily conduct, unskillful mental qualities increase, and skillful mental qualities decline,' that sort of bodily conduct is not to be pursued.
When one knows of bodily conduct, 'As I pursue this bodily conduct, unskillful mental qualities decline, and skillful mental qualities increase,' that sort of bodily conduct is to be pursued.
'Bodily conduct is of two sorts, I tell you, deva-king: to be pursued & not to be pursued.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“'Verbal conduct is of two sorts, I tell you, deva-king: to be pursued & not to be pursued.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
When one knows of verbal conduct, 'As I pursue this verbal conduct, unskillful mental qualities increase, and skillful mental qualities decline,' that sort of verbal conduct is not to be pursued.
When one knows of verbal conduct, 'As I pursue this verbal conduct, unskillful mental qualities decline, and skillful mental qualities increase,' that sort of verbal conduct is to be pursued.
'Verbal conduct is of two sorts, I tell you, deva-king: to be pursued & not to be pursued.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“'Searching is of two sorts, I tell you, deva-king: to be pursued & not to be pursued.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
When one knows of a search, 'As I pursue this search, unskillful mental qualities increase, and skillful mental qualities decline,' that sort of search is not to be pursued.
When one knows of a search, 'As I pursue this search, unskillful mental qualities decline, and skillful mental qualities increase,' that sort of search is to be pursued.
'Searching is of two sorts, I tell you, deva-king: to be pursued & not to be pursued.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“This is how he has practiced, deva-king: the monk who has practiced the practice for restraint in the Patimokkha.
Thus the Blessed One answered, having been asked by Sakka the deva-king.
Gratified, Sakka was delighted in & expressed his approval of the Blessed One's words: “So it is, O Blessed One.
So it is, O One Well-gone.
Hearing the Blessed One's answer to my question, my doubt is now cut off, my perplexity is overcome.
Then Sakka, having delighted in & expressed his approval of the Blessed One's words, asked him a further question: “But how has he practiced, dear sir: the monk who has practiced for restraint with regard to the sense faculties?
“Forms cognizable by the eye are of two sorts, I tell you, deva-king: to be pursued & not to be pursued.
Sounds cognizable by the ear… Aromas cognizable by the nose… Flavors cognizable by the tongue… Tactile sensations cognizable by the body… Ideas cognizable by the intellect are of two sorts: to be pursued & not to be pursued.
When this was said, Sakka the deva-king said to the Blessed One, “Dear sir, I understand the detailed meaning of the Blessed One's brief statement.
If, as one pursues a certain type of form cognizable by the eye, unskillful mental qualities increase, and skillful mental qualities decline, that sort of form cognizable by the eye is not to be pursued.
But if, as one pursues a certain type of form cognizable by the eye, unskillful mental qualities decline, and skillful mental qualities increase, that sort of form cognizable by the eye is to be pursued.
“If, as one pursues a certain type of sound cognizable by the ear…
“If, as one pursues a certain type of aroma cognizable by the nose…
“If, as one pursues a certain type of flavor cognizable by the tongue…
“If, as one pursues a certain type of tactile sensation cognizable by the body…
“If, as one pursues a certain type of idea cognizable by the intellect, unskillful mental qualities increase, and skillful mental qualities decline, that sort of idea cognizable by the intellect is not to be pursued.
But if, as one pursues a certain type of idea cognizable by the intellect, unskillful mental qualities decline, and skillful mental qualities increase, that sort of idea cognizable by the intellect is to be pursued.
“This is how I understand the detailed meaning of the Blessed One's brief statement.
Hearing the Blessed One's answer to my question, my doubt is now cut off, my perplexity is overcome.
Then Sakka, having delighted in & expressed his approval of the Blessed One's words, asked him a further question: “Dear sir, do all brahmans & contemplatives teach the same doctrine, adhere to the same precepts, desire the same thing, aim at the same goal?
“No, deva-king, not all brahmans & contemplatives teach the same doctrine, adhere to the same precepts, desire the same thing, aim at the same goal.
“Why, dear sir, don't all brahmans & contemplatives teach the same doctrine, adhere to the same precepts, desire the same thing, aim at the same goal?
“The world is made up of many properties, various properties.
Because of the many & various properties in the world, then whichever property living beings get fixated on, they become entrenched & latch onto it, saying, 'Only this is true; anything else is worthless.' This is why not all brahmans & contemplatives teach the same doctrine, adhere to the same precepts, desire the same thing, aim at the same goal.
“But, dear sir, are all brahmans & contemplatives utterly complete, utterly free from bonds, followers of the utterly holy life, utterly consummate?
“No, deva-king, not all brahmans & contemplatives are utterly complete, utterly free from bonds, followers of the utterly holy life, utterly consummate.
“But why, dear sir, are not all brahmans & contemplatives utterly complete, utterly free from bonds, followers of the utterly holy life, utterly consummate?
“Those monks who are released through the total ending of craving are the ones who are utterly complete, utterly free from bonds, followers of the utterly holy life, utterly consummate.
This is why not all brahmans & contemplatives are utterly complete, utterly free from bonds, followers of the utterly holy life, utterly consummate.
Thus the Blessed One answered, having been asked by Sakka the deva-king.
Gratified, Sakka was delighted in & expressed his approval of the Blessed One's words: “So it is, O Blessed One.
So it is, O One Well-gone.
Hearing the Blessed One's answer to my question, my doubt is now cut off, my perplexity is overcome.
Then Sakka, having delighted in & expressed his approval of the Blessed One's words, said to him: “Yearning is a disease, yearning is a boil, yearning is an arrow.
It seduces one, drawing one into this or that state of being, which is why one is reborn in high states & low.
Whereas other outside brahmans & contemplatives gave me no chance to ask them these questions, the Blessed One has answered at length, so that he has removed the arrow of my uncertainty & perplexity.
“Deva-king, do you recall having asked other brahmans & contemplatives these questions?
“Yes, lord, I recall having asked other brahmans & contemplatives these questions.
“If it's no inconvenience, could you tell me how they answered?
“It's no inconvenience when sitting with the Blessed One or one who is like him.
“Then tell me, deva-king.
“Having gone to those whom I considered to be brahmans & contemplatives living in isolated dwellings in the wilderness, I asked them these questions.
But when asked by me, they were at a loss.
Being at a loss, they asked me in return, 'What is your name?'
“Being asked, I responded, 'I, dear sir, am Sakka, the deva-king.'
“So they questioned me further, 'But what kamma did you do to attain to this state?'
“So I taught them the Dhamma as far as I had heard & mastered it.
And they were gratified with just this much: 'We have seen Sakka, the deva-king, and he has answered our questions!' So, instead of my becoming their disciple, they simply became mine.
But I, lord, am the Blessed One's disciple, a stream-winner, steadfast, never again destined for states of woe, headed for self-awakening.
“Deva-king, do you recall ever having previously experienced such happiness & joy?
“Yes, lord, I do.
“And how do you recall ever having previously experienced such happiness & joy?
“Once, lord, the devas & asuras were arrayed in battle.
And in that battle the devas won, while the asuras lost.
Having won the battle, as the victor in the battle, this thought occurred to me: 'Whatever has been the divine nourishment of the asuras, whatever has been the divine nourishment of the devas, the devas will now enjoy both of them.' But my attainment of happiness & joy was in the sphere of violence & weapons.
It didn't lead to disenchantment, to dispassion, to cessation, to calm, to direct knowledge to self-awakening, to Unbinding.
But my attainment of happiness & joy on hearing the Blessed One's Dhamma is in the sphere of no violence, the sphere of no weapons.
It leads to disenchantment, to dispassion, to cessation, to calm, to direct knowledge to self-awakening, to Unbinding.
…
Then Sakka, the deva-king, touched the earth with his hand and said three times, “Homage to the Worthy One, the Blessed One, the Rightly Self-awakened One!
Homage to the Worthy One, the Blessed One, the Rightly Self-awakened One!
Homage to the Worthy One, the Blessed One, the Rightly Self-awakened One!
While this explanation was being given, there arose to Sakka the dustless, stainless Dhamma eye — “Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation” — as it also did to, other devas.
Such were the questions that the Blessed One answered at Sakka's bidding.
And so this discourse is called “Sakka's Questions.”
Since the time of the Buddha, more than two thousand five hundred years ago, monks have retreated into the depths of the forests, mountains and caves, seeking physical isolation to aid them in the development of meditation and realization of Dhamma, the truth of the Buddha's Teaching.
Whether in solitude or in small groups, such monks live a life of simplicity, austerity and determined effort and have included some of the greatest meditation masters since the Buddha himself.
Far from cities and towns, willing to put up with the rigours and hardships of living in the wild for the opportunity to learn from nature, and uninterested in worldly fame or recognition, these forest monks often remain unknown, their life stories lost among the jungle thickets and mountain tops.
This book is the autobiography of one such monk.
Venerable Ajahn Thate recorded his own life story — it was first published for his seventy-second birthday celebration — so that it might be of benefit to those monks, nuns, laymen and laywomen following him.
He recounts his life from his boyhood encounter with forest monks to his final status as one of the great masters of the modern era.
Venerable Ajahn Thate passed away in aged ninety-two.
In his Autobiography, the author also takes the opportunity to record his gratitude to all those people — whether monks or lay — who had helped him over those years.
Much of this is directed towards the ordinary rural villagers of the Northeast of Thailand who are Ven.
Ajahn Thate's own stock.
Although it is the poorest and most underdeveloped region, the people there are particularly devout Buddhists and it is from them that most of the Thai meditation masters have arisen.
In later years, this Northeast-based Forest Kammatthana Tradition started to attract the interest of sophisticated city folk and he also describes and acknowledges this trend.
This book is not intended only a description of Ven.
Ajahn Thate's experiences but is a narrative of a personal spiritual quest and contains advice and reflections on Buddhist meditation and practice.
It also, incidentally, offers a unique, grassroots perspective on rural life spanning a period of unprecedented change in Thai culture.
However, Ven.
Ajahn Thate did not just stay in his native region, for he wandered through the forests to all corners of Thailand and even across its borders.
He gives us therefore also glimpses of Laos and the Shan States, and notes that would be interesting even to the anthropologist.
The descriptions of his journeys to Singapore, Indonesia and Australia are mainly for his Thai readers but even so they give a new reflection on 'developed countries'.
Lay disciples have sometimes written biographies of deceased meditation masters not knowing all the influential events in their teachers' lives.
Some biographies have been idealized out of respect for the teacher.
Ven.
Ajahn Thate, however, writes with straightforward frankness, honestly relating the events that affected him most deeply and were instrumental in shaping his life.
Ven.
Ajahn Thate lived into his nineties and in the later years of his long life he was considered the most senior disciple of the 'fathers' of the contemporary forest tradition of Northeast Thailand, Ven.
Ajahn Bhuuridatta and Ven.
Ajahn Sao Kantasiilo.
During his early years of practice he had enjoyed a privileged intimacy with these great teachers.
In writing his autobiography, Ven.
Ajahn Thate assumes a familiarity with the Thai forest tradition and its ways of practice, so the following brief explanation of the lifestyle and its purpose may be helpful.
In former times, the monasteries in the villages and towns of Thailand were usually the principal centers of learning.
The village monastery provided a spiritual center for the village, where rites and ceremonies could be performed and where local boys could become monks, learn to read and perhaps start to study the Buddhist scriptures.
In the more isolated rural areas, however, knowledge of the Vinaya was often only rudimentary and therefore standards were not very strict.
Young monks who were interested in furthering their Buddhist studies could transfer to a monastery in a local market town, provincial center or even Bangkok.
The programme there, however, would more usually be dedicated to scholastic study than strict observance of the monk's rules or meditation.
The revival of the forest tradition in Thailand during the last century was a grassroots movement to return to the lifestyle and training that was practiced in the time of the Buddha.
Some monks abandoned the busy village and town monasteries for the peace and quiet of the forest.
They followed the Vinaya Rule more strictly, emphasizing the importance of every detail.
Such monks lived without money, living frugally on whatever was offered and patiently enduring when necessities were scarce.
They integrated the extra austere practices recommended by the Buddha into their lifestyle.
For example, eating only one meal a day from their alms bowl, wearing robes made from discarded cloth, and living in the forest or in cemeteries — often using a krot for shelter.
These forest monks would often wander barefoot through the sparsely settled regions — Thailand's previously small population was scattered over quite a large country — seeking places conducive to meditation.
The very heart of the forest tradition is the development of meditation.
By cultivating deep states of tranquillity and systematically investigating the body and mind, insight can arise into the true nature of existence.
The forest masters were noted for their creativity in overcoming the problems, hindrances and defilements of the mind, and for their daring determination to realize Nibbana, enlightenment, the fulfillment of the spiritual path taught by the Buddha.
The reader is asked to remember that this work was written by a Thai for a Thai audience, with no thought of its being translated into English.
It depicts and represents the lifestyle, social values and gender roles of a rural Asian culture at the beginning of this century.
The experience of ultimate reality must necessarily be expressed through the conventional modes of a particular time and place.
Furthermore, the author often wrote specifically for young monks, giving advice and warnings.
Nonetheless, the timeless truths of Ven.
Ajahn Thate's wisdom shine forth, bound neither by era nor culture.
Nearly all the tropical forest Ven.
Ajahn Thate walked through and described had been destroyed during his lifetime.
In an attempt to slow this destruction and save such forest as remains, forest monks have often been in the forefront of raising social awareness of environmental issues.
In many areas the only patches of forest left are those protected behind forest monastery walls.
This book also includes two other examples of Ven.
Ajahn Thate's Dhamma teachings, for those who want a practical guide on the path to serenity and insight: Steps Along the Path and The Meaning of Anatta, both translated by Thanissaro Bhikkhu.
and Buddho 
Ven.
Ajahn Thate dedicated his life to the Buddha, Dhamma and Sangha, and from great compassion he taught and trained his followers in the practices leading to Nibbana.
It is our sincere wish that the readers of his autobiography find it to be a source of inspiration and that they experience the deep peace, joy and wisdom that are the fruits of the Buddha's path.
Translators
Due to this memoir's uniqueness and importance, I have aimed for an accurate translation even at the cost of losing some of the original's spirit and inspiration.
However, in some places with a wholly Thai context, material has been condensed and this is shown by ellipses.
All are from the original, and footnotes have been added by the translators.
The author had brought the book up to date with additions and the translation has kept to that structure, the section numbering therefore comes from the original.???
Please see the Glossary for an explanation of many words and terms.

